AUTHOR/WILLIAM SHAKESPEARE/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/Let the bird of loudest lay

On the sole Arabian tree

Herald sad and trumpet be,

To whose sound chaste wings obey.



But thou shrieking harbinger,

Foul precurrer of the fiend,

Augur of the fever's end,

To this troop come thou not near.



From this session interdict

Every fowl of tyrant wing,

Save the eagle, feather'd king;

Keep the obsequy so strict.



Let the priest in surplice white,

That defunctive music can,

Be the death-divining swan,

Lest the requiem lack his right.



And thou treble-dated crow,

That thy sable gender mak'st

With the breath thou giv'st and tak'st,

'Mongst our mourners shalt thou go.



Here the anthem doth commence:

Love and constancy is dead;

Phoenix and the Turtle fled

In a mutual flame from hence.



So they lov'd, as love in twain

Had the essence but in one;

Two distincts, division none:

Number there in love was slain.



Hearts remote, yet not asunder;

Distance and no space was seen

'Twixt this Turtle and his queen:

But in them it were a wonder.



So between them love did shine

That the Turtle saw his right

Flaming in the Phoenix' sight:

Either was the other's mine.



Property was thus appalled

That the self was not the same;

Single nature's double name

Neither two nor one was called.



Reason, in itself confounded,

Saw division grow together,

To themselves yet either neither,

Simple were so well compounded;



That it cried, ""How true a twain

Seemeth this concordant one!

Love has reason, reason none,

If what parts can so remain.""



Whereupon it made this threne

To the Phoenix and the Dove,

Co-supremes and stars of love,

As chorus to their tragic scene:



                 threnos



Beauty, truth, and rarity,

Grace in all simplicity,

Here enclos'd, in cinders lie.



Death is now the Phoenix' nest,

And the Turtle's loyal breast

To eternity doth rest,



Leaving no posterity:

'Twas not their infirmity,

It was married chastity.



Truth may seem but cannot be;

Beauty brag but 'tis not she;

Truth and beauty buried be.



To this urn let those repair

That are either true or fair;

For these dead birds sigh a prayer./CONTENT"	NAME/The Phoenix and the Turtle/NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Mythology & Folklore/TYPE
AUTHOR/DUCHESS OF NEWCASTLE MARGARET CAVENDISH/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/Sir Charles into my chamber coming in,

When I was writing of my Fairy Queen;

I praysaid hewhen Queen Mab you do see

Present my service to her Majesty:

And tell her I have heard Fame's loud report

Both of her beauty and her stately court.

When I Queen Mab within my fancy viewed,

My thoughts bowed low, fearing I should be rude;

Kissing her garment thin which fancy made,

I knelt upon a thought, like one that prayed;

And then, in whispers soft, I did present

His humble service which in mirth was sent;

Thus by imagination I have been

In Fairy court and seen the Fairy Queen./CONTENT"	NAME/An Epilogue to the Above/NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Mythology & Folklore/TYPE
AUTHOR/THOMAS BASTARD/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/Our vice runs beyond all that old men saw,

And far authentically above our laws,

And scorning virtues safe and golden mean,

Sits uncontrolled upon the high extreme.

Circes, thy monsters painted out the hue,

Of feigned filthiness, but ours is true.

Our vice puts down all proverbs and all themes,

Our vice excels all fables and all dreams./CONTENT"	NAME/Book 7, Epigram 42/NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Mythology & Folklore/TYPE
AUTHOR/EDMUND SPENSER/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/Lo I the man, whose Muse whilome did maske,

As time her taught in lowly Shepheards weeds,

Am now enforst a far unfitter taske,

For trumpets sterne to chaunge mine Oaten reeds,

And sing of Knights and Ladies gentle deeds;

Whose prayses having slept in silence long,

Me, all too meane, the sacred Muse areeds

To blazon broad emongst her learned throng:

Fierce warres and faithful loves shall moralize my song.

Helpe then, O holy Virgin chiefe of nine,

Thy weaker Novice to performe thy will,

Lay forth out of thine everlasting scryne

The antique rolles, which there lye hidden still,

Of Faerie knights and fairest Tanaquill,

Whom that most noble Briton Prince so long

Sought through the world, and suffered so much ill,

That I must rue his undeserved wrong:

O helpe thou my weake wit, and sharpen my dull tong.

And thou most dreaded impe of highest Jove,

Faire Venus sonne, that with thy cruell dart

At that good knight so cunningly didst rove,

That glorious fire it kindled in his hart,

Lay now thy deadly Heben bow apart,

And with thy mother milde come to mine ayde:

Come both, and with you bring triumphant Mart,

In loves and gentle jollities arrayd,

After his murdrous spoiles and bloudy rage allayd.

And with them eke, O Goddesse heavenly bright,

Mirrour of grace and Majestie divine,

Great Lady of the greatest Isle, whose light

Like Phoebus lampe throughout the world doth shine,

Shed thy faire beames into my feeble eyne,

And raise my thoughts too humble and too vile,

To thinke of that true glorious type of thine,

The argument of mine afflicted stile:

The which to heare, vouchsafe, O dearest dred a-while.



i

A Gentle Knight was pricking on the plaine,

Y cladd in mightie armes and silver shielde,

Wherein old dints of deepe wounds did remaine,

The cruell markes of many a bloudy fielde;

Yet armes till that time did he never wield:

His angry steede did chide his foming bitt,

As much disdayning to the curbe to yield:

Full jolly knight he seemd, and faire did sitt,

As one for knightly giusts and fierce encounters fitt.



ii

But on his brest a bloudie Crosse he bore,

The deare remembrance of his dying Lord,

For whose sweete sake that glorious badge he wore,

And dead as living ever him ador'd:

Upon his shield the like was also scor'd,

For soveraine hope, which in his helpe he had:

Right faithfull true he was in deede and word,

But of his cheere did seeme too solemne sad;

Yet nothing did he dread, but ever was ydrad.



iii

Upon a great adventure he was bond,

That greatest Gloriana to him gave,

That greatest Glorious Queene of Faerie lond,

To winne him worship, and her grace to have,

Which of all earthly things he most did crave;

And ever as he rode, his hart did earne

To prove his puissance in battell brave

Upon his foe, and his new force to learne;

Upon his foe, a Dragon horrible and stearne.



iv

A lovely Ladie rode him faire beside,

Upon a lowly Asse more white then snow,

Yet she much whiter, but the same did hide

Under a vele, that wimpled was full low,

And over all a blacke stole she did throw,

As one that inly mournd: so was she sad,

And heavie sat upon her palfrey slow;

Seemed in heart some hidden care she had,

And by her in a line a milke white lambe she lad.



v

So pure an innocent, as that same lambe,

She was in life and every vertuous lore,

And by descent from Royall lynage came

Of ancient Kings and Queenes, that had of yore

Their scepters stretcht from East to Westerne shore,

And all the world in their subjection held;

Till that infernall feend with foule uprore

Forwasted all their land, and them expeld:

Whom to avenge, she had this Knight from far compeld.



vi

Behind her farre away a Dwarfe did lag,

That lasie seemd in being ever last,

Or wearied with bearing of her bag

Of needments at his backe. Thus as they past,

The day with cloudes was suddeine overcast,

And angry Jove an hideous storme of raine

Did poure into his Lemans lap so fast,

That every wight to shrowd it did constrain,

And this faire couple eke to shroud themselves were fain.



vii

Enforst to seeke some covert nigh at hand,

A shadie grove not far away they spide,

That promist ayde the tempest to withstand:

Whose loftie trees yclad with sommers pride,

Did spred so broad, that heavens light did hide,

Not perceable with power of any starre:

And all within were pathes and alleies wide,

With footing worne, and leading inward farre:

Faire harbour that them seemes; so in they entred arre.



viii

And foorth they passe, with pleasure forward led,

Joying to heare the birdes sweete harmony,

Which therein shrouded from the tempest dred,

Seemd in their song to scorne the cruell sky.

Much can they prayse the trees so straight and hy,

The sayling Pine, the Cedar proud and tall,

The vine-prop Elme, the Poplar never dry,

The builder Oake, sole king of forrests all,

The Aspine good for staves, the Cypresse funerall.



ix

The Laurell, meed of mightie Conquerours

And Poets sage, the Firre that weepeth still,

The Willow worne of forlorne Paramours,

The Eugh obedient to the benders will,

The Birch for shaftes, the Sallow for the mill,

The Mirrhe sweete bleeding in the bitter wound,

The warlike Beech, the Ash for nothing ill,

The fruitfull Olive, and the Platane round,

The carver Holme, the Maple seeldom inward sound.



x

Led with delight, they thus beguile the way,

Untill the blustring storme is overblowne;

When weening to returne, whence they did stray,

They cannot find that path, which first was showne,

But wander too and fro in wayes unknowne,

Furthest from end then, when they neerest weene,

That makes them doubt, their wits be not their owne:

So many pathes, so many turnings seene,

That which of them to take, in diverse doubt they been.



xi

At last resolving forward still to fare,

Till that some end they finde or in or out,

That path they take, that beaten seemd most bare,

And like to lead the labyrinth about;

Which when by tract they hunted had throughout,

At length it brought them to a hollow cave,

Amid the thickest woods. The Champion stout

Eftsoones dismounted from his courser brave,

And to the Dwarfe a while his needlesse spere he gave.



xii

Be well aware, quoth then that Ladie milde,

Least suddaine mischiefe ye too rash provoke:

The danger hid, the place unknowne and wilde,

Breeds dreadfull doubts: Oft fire is without smoke,

And perill without show: therefore your stroke

Sir knight with-hold, till further triall made.

Ah Ladie (said he) shame were to revoke

The forward footing for an hidden shade:

Vertue gives her selfe light, through darkenesse for to wade.



xiii

Yea but (quoth she) the perill of this place

I better wot then you, though now too late

To wish you backe returne with foule disgrace,

Yet wisedome warnes, whilest foot is in the gate,

To stay the steppe, ere forced to retrate.

This is the wandring wood, this Errours den,

A monster vile, whom God and man does hate:

Therefore I read beware. Fly fly (quoth then

The fearefull Dwarfe:) this is no place for living men.



xiv

But full of fire and greedy hardiment,

The youthfull knight could not for ought be staide,

But forth unto the darksome hole he went,

And looked in: his glistring armor made

A litle glooming light, much like a shade,

By which he saw the ugly monster plaine,

Halfe like a serpent horribly displaide,

But th'other halfe did womans shape retaine,

Most lothsom, filthie, foule, and full of vile disdaine.



xv

And as she lay upon the durtie ground,

Her huge long taile her den all overspred,

Yet was in knots and many boughtes upwound,

Pointed with mortall sting. Of her there bred

A thousand yong ones, which she dayly fed,

Sucking upon her poisonous dugs, eachone

Of sundry shapes, yet all ill favored:

Soone as that uncouth light upon them shone,

Into her mouth they crept, and suddain all were gone.



xvi

Their dam upstart, out of her den effraide,

And rushed forth, hurling her hideous taile

About her cursed head, whose folds displaid

Were stretcht now forth at length without entraile.

She lookt about, and seeing one in mayle

Armed to point, sought backe to turne againe;

For light she hated as the deadly bale,

Ay wont in desert darknesse to remaine,

Where plaine none might her see, nor she see any plaine.



xvii

Which when the valiant Elfe perceiv'd, he lept

As Lyon fierce upon the flying pray,

And with his trenchand blade her boldly kept

From turning backe, and forced her to stay:

Therewith enrag'd she loudly gan to bray,

And turning fierce, her speckled taile advaunst,

Threatning her angry sting, him to dismay:

Who nought aghast, his mightie hand enhaunst:

The stroke down from her head unto her shoulder glaunst.



xviii

Much daunted with that dint, her sence was dazd,

Yet kindling rage, her selfe she gathered round,

And all attonce her beastly body raizd

With doubled forces high above the ground:

Tho wrapping up her wrethed sterne arownd,

Lept fierce upon his shield, and her huge traine

All suddenly about his body wound,

That hand or foot to stirre he strove in vaine:

God helpe the man so wrapt in Errours endlesse traine.



xix

His Lady sad to see his sore constraint,

Cride out, Now now Sir knight, shew what ye bee,

Add faith unto your force, and be not faint:

Strangle her, else she sure will strangle thee.

That when he heard, in great perplexitie,

His gall did grate for griefe and high disdaine,

And knitting all his force got one hand free,

Wherewith he grypt her gorge with so great paine,

That soone to loose her wicked bands did her constraine.



xx

Therewith she spewd out of her filthy maw

A floud of poyson horrible and blacke,

Full of great lumpes of flesh and gobbets raw,

Which stunck so vildly, that it forst him slacke

His grasping hold, and from her turne him backe:

Her vomit full of bookes and papers was,

With loathly frogs and toades, which eyes did lacke,

And creeping sought way in the weedy gras:

Her filthy parbreake all the place defiled has.



xxi

As when old father Nilus gins to swell

With timely pride above the Aegyptian vale,

His fattie waves do fertile slime outwell,

And overflow each plaine and lowly dale:

But when his later spring gins to avale,

Huge heapes of mudd he leaves, wherein there breed

Ten thousand kindes of creatures, partly male

And partly female of his fruitfull seed;

Such ugly monstrous shapes elsewhere may no man reed.



xxii

The same so sore annoyed has the knight,

That welnigh choked with the deadly stinke,

His forces faile, ne can no longer fight.

Whose corage when the feend perceiv'd to shrinke,

She poured forth out of her hellish sinke

Her fruitfull cursed spawne of serpents small,

Deformed monsters, fowle, and blacke as inke,

Which swarming all about his legs did crall,

And him encombred sore, but could not hurt at all.



xxiii

As gentle Shepheard in sweete even-tide,

When ruddy Phoebus gins to welke in west,

High on an hill, his flocke to vewen wide,

Markes which do byte their hasty supper best;

A cloud of combrous gnattes do him molest,

All striving to infixe their feeble stings,

That from their noyance he no where can rest,

But with his clownish hands their tender wings

He brusheth oft, and oft doth mar their murmurings.



xxiv

Thus ill bestedd, and fearefull more of shame,

Then of the certaine perill he stood in,

Halfe furious unto his foe he came,

Resolv'd in minde all suddenly to win,

Or soone to lose, before he once would lin;

And strooke at her with more then manly force,

That from her body full of filthie sin

He raft her hatefull head without remorse;

A streame of cole black bloud forth gushed from her corse.



xxv

Her scattred brood, soone as their Parent deare

They saw so rudely falling to the ground,

Groning full deadly, all with troublous feare,

Gathred themselves about her body round,

Weening their wonted entrance to have found

At her wide mouth: but being there withstood

They flocked all about her bleeding wound,

And sucked up their dying mothers blood,

Making her death their life, and eke her hurt their good.



xxvi

That detestable sight him much amazde,

To see th'unkindly Impes of heaven accurst,

Devoure their dam; on whom while so he gazd,

Having all satisfide their bloudy thurst,

Their bellies swolne he saw with fulnesse burst,

And bowels gushing forth: well worthy end

Of such as drunke her life, the which them nurst;

Now needeth him no lenger labour spend,

His foes have slaine themselves, with whom he should contend.



xxvii

His Ladie seeing all, that chaunst, from farre

Approcht in hast to greet his victorie,

And said, Faire knight, borne under happy starre,

Who see your vanquisht foes before you lye:

Well worthy be you of that Armorie,

Wherein ye have great glory wonne this day,

And proov'd your strength on a strong enimie,

Your first adventure: many such I pray,

And henceforth ever wish, that like succeed it may.



xxviii

Then mounted he upon his Steede againe,

And with the Lady backward sought to wend;

That path he kept, which beaten was most plame,

Ne ever would to any by-way bend,

But still did follow one unto the end,

The which at last out of the wood them brought.

So forward on his way (with God to frend)

He passed forth, and new adventure sought;

Long way he travelled, before he heard of ought.



xxix

At length they chaunst to meet upon the way

An aged Sire, in long blacke weedes yclad,

His feete all bare, his beard all hoarie gray,

And by his belt his booke he hanging had;

Sober he seemde, and very sagely sad,

And to the ground his eyes were lowly bent,

Simple in shew, and voyde of malice bad,

And all the way he prayed, as he went,

And often knockt his brest, as one that did repent.



xxx

He faire the knight saluted, louting low,

Who faire him quited, as that courteous was:

And after asked him, if he did know

Of straunge adventures, which abroad did pas.

Ah my deare Sonne (quoth he) how should, alas,

Silly old man, that lives in hidden cell,

Bidding his beades all day for his trespas,

Tydings of warre and worldly trouble tell?

With holy father sits not with such things to mell.



xxxi

But if of daunger which hereby doth dwell,

And homebred evill ye desire to heare,

Of a straunge man I can you tidings tell,

That wasteth all this countrey farre and neare.

Of such (said he) I chiefly do inquere,

And shall you well reward to shew the place,

In which that wicked wight his dayes doth weare:

For to all knighthood it is foule disgrace,

That such a cursed creature lives so long a space.



xxxii

Far hence (quoth he) in wastfull wildernesse

His dwelling is, by which no living wight

May ever passe, but thorough great distresse.

Now (sayd the Lady) draweth toward night,

And well I wote, that of your later fight

Ye all forwearied be: for what so strong,

But wanting rest will also want of might?

The Sunne that measures heaven all day long,

At night doth baite his steedes the Ocean waves emong.



xxxiii

Then with the Sunne take Sir, your timely rest,

And with new day new worke at once begin:

Untroubled night they say gives counsell best.

Right well Sir knight ye have advised bin,

(Quoth then that aged man;) the way to win

Is wisely to advise: now day is spent;

Therefore with me ye may take up your In

For this same night. The knight was well content:

So with that godly father to his home they went.



xxxiv

A little lowly Hermitage it was,

Downe in a dale, hard by a forests side,

Far from resort of people, that did pas

In travell to and froe: a little wyde

There was an holy Chappell edifyde,

Wherein the Hermite dewly wont to say

His holy things each morne and eventyde:

Thereby a Christall streame did gently play,

Which from a sacred fountaine welled forth alway.



xxxv

Arrived there, the little house they fill,

Ne looke for entertainement, where none was:

Rest is their feast, and all things at their will;

The noblest mind the best contentment has.

With faire discourse the evening so they pas:

For that old man of pleasing wordes had store,

And well could file his tongue as smooth as glas;

He told of Saintes and Popes, and evermore

He strowd an Ave-Mary after and before.



xxxvi

The drouping Night thus creepeth on them fast,

And the sad humour loading their eye liddes,

As messenger of Morpheus on them cast

Sweet slombring deaw, the which to sleepe them biddes.

Unto their lodgings then his guestes he riddes:

Where when all drownd in deadly sleepe he findes,

He to his study goes, and there amiddes

His Magick bookes and artes of sundry kindes,

He seekes out mighty charmes, to trouble sleepy mindes.



xxxvii

Then choosing out few wordes most horrible,

(Let none them read) thereof did verses frame,

With which and other spelles like terrible,

He bad awake blacke Plutoes griesly Dame,

And cursed heaven, and spake reprochfull shame

Of highest God, the Lord of life and light;

A bold bad man, that dar'd to call by name

Great Gorgon, Prince of darknesse and dead night,

At which Cocytus quakes, and Styx is put to flight.



xxxviii

And forth he cald out of deepe darknesse dred

Legions of Sprights, the which like little flyes

Fluttring about his ever damned hed,

A-waite whereto their service he applyes,

To aide his friends, or fray his enimies:

Of those he chose out two, the falsest twoo,

And fittest for to forge true-seeming lyes;

The one of them he gave a message too,

The other by him selfe staide other worke to doo.



xxxix

He making speedy way through spersed ayre,

And through the world of waters wide and peepe,

To Morpheus house doth hastily repaire.

Amid the bowels of the earth full steepe,

And low, where dawning day doth never peepe,

His dwelling is; there Tethys his wet bed

Doth ever wash, and Cynthia still doth steepe

In silver deaw his ever-drouping hed,

Whiles sad Night over him her mantle black doth spred.



xl

Whose double gates he findeth locked fast,

The one faire fram'd of burnisht Yvory,

The other all with silver overcast;

And wakefull dogges before them farre do lye

Watching to banish Care their enimy,

Who oft is wont to trouble gentle Sleepe.

By them the Sprite doth passe in quietly,

And unto Morpheus comes, whom drowned deepe

In drowsie fit he findes: of nothing he takes keepe.



xli

And more, to lulle him in his slumber soft,

A trickling streame from high rocke tumbling downe

And ever-drizling raine upon the loft,

Mixt with a murmuring winde, much like the sowne

Of swarming Bees, did cast him in a swowne:

No other noyse, nor peoples troublous cryes,

As still are wont t'annoy the walled towne,

Might there be heard: but carelesse Quiet lyes,

Wrapt in eternall silence farre from enemyes.



xlii

The messenger approching to him spake,

But his wast wordes returnd to him in vaine:

So sound he slept, that nought mought him awake.

Then rudely he him thrust, and pusht with paine,

Whereat he gan to stretch: but he againe

Shooke him so hard, that forced him to speake.

As one then in a dreame, whose dryer braine

In tost with troubled sights and fancies weake,

He mumbled soft, but would not all his silence breake.



xliii

The Sprite then gan more boldly him to wake,

And threatned unto him the dreaded name

Of Hecate: whereat he gan to quake,

And lifting up his lumpish head, with blame

Halfe angry asked him, for what he came.

Hither (quoth he) me Archimago sent,

He that the stubborne Sprites can wisely tame,

He bids thee to him send for his intent

A fit false dreame, that can delude the sleepers sent.



xliv

The God obayde, and calling forth straight way

A diverse dreame out of his prison darke,

Delivered it to him, and downe did lay

His heavie head, devoide of carefull carke,

Whose sences all were straight benumbed and starke.

He backe returning by the Yvorie dore,

Remounted up as light as chearefull Larke,

And on his litle winges the dreame he bore

In hast unto his Lord, where he him left afore.



xlv

Who all this while with charmes and hidden artes,

Had made a Lady of that other Spright,

And fram'd of liquid ayre her tender partes

So lively, and so like in all mens sight,

That weaker sence it could have ravisht quight:

The maker selfe for all his wondrous witt,

Was nigh beguiled with so goodly sight:

Her all in white he clad, and over it

Cast a blacke stole, most like to seeme for Una fit.



xlvi

Now when that ydle dreame was to him brought,

Unto that Elfin knight he bad him fly,

Where he slept soundly void of evill thought

And with false shewes abuse his fantasy,

In sort as he him schooled privily:

And that new creature borne without her dew,

Full of the makers guile, with usage sly

He taught to imitate that Lady trew,

Whose semblance she did carrie under feigned hew.



xlvii

Thus well instructed, to their worke they hast,

And comming where the knight in slomber lay,

The one upon his hardy head him plast,

And made him dreame of loves and lustfull play,

That nigh his manly hart did melt away,

Bathed in wanton blis and wicked joy:

Then seemed him his Lady by him lay,

And to him playnd, how that false winged boy,

Her chast hart had subdewd, to learne Dame pleasures toy.



xlviii

And she her selfe of beautie soveraigne Queene,

Faire Venus seemde unto his bed to bring

Her, whom he waking evermore did weene,

To be the chastest flowre, that ay did spring

On earthly braunch, the daughter of a king,

Now a loose Leman to vile service bound:

And eke the Graces seemed all to sing,

Hymen {i}{_o} Hymen, dauncing all around,

While freshest Flora her with Yvie girlond crownd.



xlix

In this great passion of unwonted lust,

Or wonted feare of doing ought amis,

He started up, as seeming to mistrust

Some secret ill, or hidden foe of his:

Lo there before his face his Lady is,

Under blake stole hyding her bayted hooke,

And as halfe blushing offred him to kis,

With gentle blandishment and lovely looke,

Most like that virgin true, which for her knight him took.



l

All cleane dismayd to see so uncouth sight,

And halfe enraged at her shamelesse guise,

He thought have slaine her in his fierce despight:

But hasty heat tempring with sufferance wise,

He stayde his hand, and gan himselfe advise

To prove his sense, and tempt her faigned truth.

Wringing her hands in wemens pitteous wise,

Tho can she weepe, to stirre up gentle ruth,

Both for her noble bloud, and for her tender youth.



li

And said, Ah Sir, my liege Lord and my love,

Shall I accuse the hidden cruell fate,

And mightie causes wrought in heaven above,

Or the blind God, that doth me thus amate,

For hoped love to winne me certaine hate?

Yet thus perforce he bids me do, or die.

Die is my dew: yet rew my wretched state

You, whom my hard avenging destinie

Hath made judge of my life or death indifferently.



lii

Your owne deare sake forst me at first to leave

My Fathers kingdome, There she stopt with teares;

Her swollen hart her speach seemd to bereave,

And then againe begun, My weaker yeares

Captiv'd to fortune and frayle worldly feares,

Fly to your faith for succour and sure ayde:

Let me not dye in languor and long teares.

Why Dame (quoth he) what hath ye thus dismayd?

What frayes ye, that were wont to comfort me affrayd?



liii

Love of your selfe, she said, and deare constraint

Lets me not sleepe, but wast the wearie night

In secret anguish and unpittied plaint,

Whiles you in carelesse sleepe are drowned quight.

Her doubtfull words made that redoubted knight

Suspect her truth: yet since no'untruth he knew,

Her fawning love with foule disdainefull spight

He would not shend, but said, Deare dame I rew,

That for my sake unknowne such griefe unto you grew.



liv

Assure your selfe, it fell not all to ground;

For all so deare as life is to my hart,

I deeme your love, and hold me to you bound;

Ne let vaine feares procure your needlesse smart,

Where cause is none, but to your rest depart.

Not all content, yet seemd she to appease

Her mournefull plaintes, beguiled of her art,

And fed with words, that could not chuse but please,

So slyding softly forth, she turnd as to her ease.



lv

Long after lay he musing at her mood,

Much griev'd to think that gentle Dame so light,

For whose defence he was to shed his blood.

At last dull wearinesse of former fight

Having yrockt a sleepe his irkesome spright,

That troublous dreame gan freshly tosse his braine,

With bowres, and beds, and Ladies deare delight:

But when he saw his labour all was vaine,

With that misformed spright he backe returnd againe./CONTENT"	NAME/from The Faerie Queene: Book I, Canto I/NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Mythology & Folklore/TYPE
AUTHOR/RICHARD BARNFIELD/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/Long have I longd to see my love againe,

Still have I wisht, but never could obtaine it;

Rather than all the world (if I might gaine it)

Would I desire my loves sweet precious gaine.

Yet in my soule I see him everie day,

See him, and see his still sterne countenaunce,

But (ah) what is of long continuance,

Where majestie and beautie beares the sway?

Sometimes, when I imagine that I see him,

(As love is full of foolish fantasies)

Weening to kisse his lips, as my loves fees,

I feele but aire: nothing but aire to bee him.

Thus with Ixion, kisse I clouds in vaine:

Thus with Ixion, feele I endles paine./CONTENT"	NAME/Sonnet 16/NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Mythology & Folklore/TYPE
AUTHOR/RICHARD BARNFIELD/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/Cherry-lipt Adonis in his snowie shape,

    Might not compare with his pure ivorie white,

    On whose faire front a poets pen may write,

Whose roseate red excels the crimson grape,

His love-enticing delicate soft limbs,

    Are rarely framd tintrap poore gazine eies:

    His cheeks, the lillie and carnation dies,

With lovely tincture which Apollos dims.

His lips ripe strawberries in nectar wet,

    His mouth a Hive, his tongue a hony-combe,

    Where Muses (like bees) make their mansion.

His teeth pure pearle in blushing correll set.

    Oh how can such a body sinne-procuring,

    Be slow to love, and quicke to hate, enduring?/CONTENT"	NAME/Sonnet 17/NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Mythology & Folklore/TYPE
AUTHOR/SIR WALTER RALEGH/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/Praisd be Dianas fair and harmless light;

Praisd be the dews wherewith she moists the ground;

Praisd be her beams, the glory of the night;

Praisd be her power by which all powers abound.



Praisd be her nymphs with whom she decks the woods,

Praisd be her knights in whom true honour lives;

Praisd be that force by which she moves the floods;

Let that Diana shine which all these gives.



In heaven queen she is among the spheres;

In aye she mistress-like makes all things pure;

Eternity in her oft change she bears;

She beauty is; by her the fair endure.



Time wears her not: she doth his chariot guide;

Mortality below her orb is placd;

By her the virtue of the stars down slide;

In her is virtues perfect image cast.



         A knowledge pure it is her worth to know:

         With Circes let them dwell that think not so./CONTENT"	NAME/Praisd be Dianas Fair and Harmless Light/NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Mythology & Folklore/TYPE
AUTHOR/QUEEN ELIZABETH I/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/When I was fair and young, then favor graced me.

Of many was I sought their mistress for to be.

But I did scorn them all and answered them therefore:

Go, go, go, seek some other where; importune me no more.



How many weeping eyes I made to pine in woe,

How many sighing hearts I have not skill to show,

But I the prouder grew and still this spake therefore:

Go, go, go, seek some other where, importune me no more.



Then spake fair Venus son, that proud victorious boy,

Saying: You dainty dame, for that you be so coy,

I will so pluck your plumes as you shall say no more:

Go, go, go, seek some other where, importune me no more.



As soon as he had said, such change grew in my breast

That neither night nor day I could take any rest.

Wherefore I did repent that I had said before:

Go, go, go, seek some other where, importune me no more./CONTENT"	NAME/When I Was Fair and Young/NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Mythology & Folklore/TYPE
AUTHOR/JOHN DONNE/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/When by thy scorn, O murd'ress, I am dead

         And that thou think'st thee free

From all solicitation from me,

Then shall my ghost come to thy bed,

And thee, feign'd vestal, in worse arms shall see;

Then thy sick taper will begin to wink,

And he, whose thou art then, being tir'd before,

Will, if thou stir, or pinch to wake him, think

         Thou call'st for more,

And in false sleep will from thee shrink;

And then, poor aspen wretch, neglected thou

Bath'd in a cold quicksilver sweat wilt lie

         A verier ghost than I.

What I will say, I will not tell thee now,

Lest that preserve thee; and since my love is spent,

I'had rather thou shouldst painfully repent,

Than by my threat'nings rest still innocent./CONTENT"	NAME/The Apparition/NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Mythology & Folklore/TYPE
AUTHOR/JOHN SKELTON/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/Pla ce bo,

Who is there, who?

Di le xi,

Dame Margery;

Fa, re, my, my,

Wherfore and why, why?

For the sowle of Philip Sparowe,

That was late slayn at Carowe,

Among the Nones Blake,

For that swete soules sake,

And for all sparowes soules,

Set in our bederolles,

Pater noster qui,

With an Ave Mari,

And with the corner of a Crede,

The more shalbe your mede.



Whan I remembre agayn

How mi Philyp was slayn,

Never halfe the payne

Was betwene you twayne,

Pyramus and Thesbe,

As than befell to me:

I wept and I wayled,

The tearys downe hayled;

But nothinge it avayled

To call Phylyp agayne,

Whom Gyb our cat hath slayne.



Gib, I saye, our cat,

Worrowyd her on that

Which I loved best:

It can not be exprest

My sorowfull hevynesse,

But all without redresse;

For within that stounde,

Halfe slumbrynge, in a swounde

I fell downe to the grounde.



Unneth I kest myne eyes

Towarde the cloudy skyes:

But whan I dyd beholde

My sparow dead and colde,

No creatuer but that wolde

Have rewed upon me,

To behold and se

What hevynesse dyd me pange;

Wherewith my handes I wrange,

That my senaws cracked,

As though I had ben racked,

So payned and so strayned,

That no lyfe wellnye remayned.



I syghed and I sobbed,

For that I was robbed

Of my sparowes lyfe.

O mayden, wydow, and wyfe,

Of what estate ye be,

Of hye or lowe degre,

Great sorowe than ye myght se,

And lerne to wepe at me!

Such paynes dyd me frete,

That myne hert dyd bete,

My vysage pale and dead,

Wanne, and blewe as lead;

The panges of hatefull death

Wellnye had stopped my breath.

Heu, heu, me,

That I am wo for the!

Ad Dominum, cum tribularer, clamavi:

Of God nothynge els crave I

But Phyllypes soule to kepe

From the marees deepe

Of Acherontes well,

That is a flode of hell;

And from the great Pluto,

The prynce of endles wo;

And from foule Alecto,

With vysage blacke and blo;

And from Medusa, that mare,

That lyke a fende doth stare;

And from Megeras edders,

For rufflynge of Phillips fethers,

And from her fyry sparklynges,

For burnynge of his wynges;

And from the smokes sowre

Of Proserpinas bowre;

And from the dennes darke,

Wher Cerberus doth barke,

Whom Theseus dyd afraye,

Whom Hercules dyd outraye,

As famous poetes say;

From that hell-hounde,

That lyeth in cheynes bounde,

With gastly hedes thre,

To Jupyter pray we

That Phyllyp preserved may be!

Amen, say ye with me!



Do mi nus,

Helpe nowe, swete Jesus!

Levavi oculos meos in montes:

Wolde God I had Zenophontes,

Or Socrates the wyse

To shew me their devyse,

Moderatly to take

This sorrow that I make

For Phylyp Sparowes sake!

So fervently I shake,

I fele my body quake;

So urgently I am brought

Into carefull thought.

Like Andromach, Hectors wyfe,

Was wery of her lyfe,

Whan she had lost her joye,

Noble Hector of Troye;

In lyke maner also

Encreaseth my dedly wo,

For my sparowe is go.



It was so prety a fole,

It wold syt on a stole,

And lerned after my scole

For to kepe his cut,

With, ""Phyllyp, kepe your cut!""



It had a velvet cap,

And wold syt upon my lap,

And seke after small wormes,

And somtyme white bred crommes;

And many tymes and ofte

Betwene my brestes softe

It wolde lye and rest;

It was propre and prest.



Somtyme he wolde gaspe

Whan he sawe a waspe;

A fly or a gnat,

He wolde flye at that;

And prytely he wold pant

Whan he saw an ant;

Lord, how he wolde pry

After the butterfly!

Lorde, how he wolde hop

After the gressop!

And whan I sayd, ""Phyp! Phyp!""

Than he wold lepe and skyp,

And take me by the lyp.

Alas, it wyll me slo,

That Phillyp is gone me fro!/CONTENT"	NAME/The Book of Phillip Sparrow/NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Mythology & Folklore/TYPE
AUTHOR/EDMUND SPENSER/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/Ye learned sisters which have oftentimes

Beene to me ayding, others to adorne:

Whom ye thought worthy of your gracefull rymes,

That even the greatest did not greatly scorne

To heare theyr names sung in your simple layes,

But joyed in theyr prayse.

And when ye list your owne mishaps to mourne,

Which death, or love, or fortunes wreck did rayse,

Your string could soone to sadder tenor turne,

And teach the woods and waters to lament

Your dolefull dreriment.

Now lay those sorrowfull complaints aside,

And having all your heads with girland crownd,

Helpe me mine owne loves prayses to resound,

Ne let the same of any be envide:

So Orpheus did for his owne bride,

So I unto my selfe alone will sing,

The woods shall to me answer and my Eccho ring.



Early before the worlds light giving lampe,

His golden beame upon the hils doth spred,

Having disperst the nights unchearefull dampe,

Doe ye awake, and with fresh lusty hed,

Go to the bowre of my beloved love,

My truest turtle dove,

Bid her awake; for Hymen is awake,

And long since ready forth his maske to move,

With his bright Tead that flames with many a flake,

And many a bachelor to waite on him,

In theyr fresh garments trim.

Bid her awake therefore and soone her dight,

For lo the wished day is come at last,

That shall for al the paynes and sorrowes past,

Pay to her usury of long delight:

And whylest she doth her dight,

Doe ye to her of joy and solace sing,

That all the woods may answer and your eccho ring.



Bring with you all the Nymphes that you can heare

Both of the rivers and the forrests greene:

And of the sea that neighbours to her neare,

Al with gay girlands goodly wel beseene.

And let them also with them bring in hand

Another gay girland

For my fayre love of lillyes and of roses,

Bound truelove wize with a blew silke riband.

And let them make great store of bridale poses,

And let them eeke bring store of other flowers

To deck the bridale bowers.

And let the ground whereas her foot shall tread,

For feare the stones her tender foot should wrong

Be strewed with fragrant flowers all along,

And diapred lyke the discolored mead.

Which done, doe at her chamber dore awayt,

For she will waken strayt,

The whiles doe ye this song unto her sing,

The woods shall to you answer and your Eccho ring.



Ye Nymphes of Mulla which with carefull heed,

The silver scaly trouts doe tend full well,

And greedy pikes which use therein to feed,

(Those trouts and pikes all others doo excell)

And ye likewise which keepe the rushy lake,

Where none doo fishes take,

Bynd up the locks the which hang scatterd light,

And in his waters which your mirror make,

Behold your faces as the christall bright,

That when you come whereas my love doth lie,

No blemish she may spie.

And eke ye lightfoot mayds which keepe the deere,

That on the hoary mountayne use to towre,

And the wylde wolves which seeke them to devoure,

With your steele darts doo chace from comming neer,

Be also present heere,

To helpe to decke her and to help to sing,

That all the woods may answer and your eccho ring.



Wake, now my love, awake; for it is time,

The Rosy Morne long since left Tithones bed,

All ready to her silver coche to clyme,

And Phoebus gins to shew his glorious hed.

Hark how the cheerefull birds do chaunt theyr laies

And carroll of loves praise.

The merry Larke hir mattins sings aloft,

The thrush replyes, the Mavis descant playes,

The Ouzell shrills, the Ruddock warbles soft,

So goodly all agree with sweet consent,

To this dayes merriment.

Ah my deere love why doe ye sleepe thus long,

When meeter were that ye should now awake,

T'awayt the comming of your joyous make,

And hearken to the birds lovelearned song,

The deawy leaves among.

For they of joy and pleasance to you sing,

That all the woods them answer and theyr eccho ring.



My love is now awake out of her dreames,

And her fayre eyes like stars that dimmed were

With darksome cloud, now shew theyr goodly beames

More bright then Hesperus his head doth rere.

Come now ye damzels, daughters of delight,

Helpe quickly her to dight,

But first come ye fayre houres which were begot

In Joves sweet paradice, of Day and Night,

Which doe the seasons of the yeare allot,

And al that ever in this world is fayre

Doe make and still repayre.

And ye three handmayds of the Cyprian Queene,

The which doe still adorne her beauties pride,

Helpe to addorne my beautifullest bride:

And as ye her array, still throw betweene

Some graces to be seene,

And as ye use to Venus, to her sing,

The whiles the woods shal answer and your eccho ring.



Now is my love all ready forth to come,

Let all the virgins therefore well awayt,

And ye fresh boyes that tend upon her groome

Prepare your selves; for he is comming strayt.

Set all your things in seemely good aray

Fit for so joyfull day,

The joyfulst day that ever sunne did see.

Faire Sun, shew forth thy favourable ray,

And let thy lifull heat not fervent be

For feare of burning her sunshyny face,

Her beauty to disgrace.

O fayrest Phoebus, father of the Muse,

If ever I did honour thee aright,

Or sing the thing, that mote thy mind delight,

Doe not thy servants simple boone refuse,

But let this day let this one day be myne,

Let all the rest be thine.

Then I thy soverayne prayses loud will sing,

That all the woods shal answer and theyr eccho ring.



Harke how the Minstrels gin to shrill aloud

Their merry Musick that resounds from far,

The pipe, the tabor, and the trembling Croud,

That well agree withouten breach or jar.

But most of all the Damzels doe delite,

When they their tymbrels smyte,

And thereunto doe daunce and carrol sweet,

That all the sences they doe ravish quite,

The whyles the boyes run up and downe the street,

Crying aloud with strong confused noyce,

As if it were one voyce.

Hymen io Hymen, Hymen they do shout,

That even to the heavens theyr shouting shrill

Doth reach, and all the firmament doth fill,

To which the people standing all about,

As in approvance doe thereto applaud

And loud advaunce her laud,

And evermore they Hymen Hymen sing,

That al the woods them answer and theyr eccho ring.



Loe where she comes along with portly pace

Lyke Phoebe from her chamber of the East,

Arysing forth to run her mighty race,

Clad all in white, that seemes a virgin best.

So well it her beseemes that ye would weene

Some angell she had beene.

Her long loose yellow locks lyke golden wyre,

Sprinckled with perle, and perling flowres a tweene,

Doe lyke a golden mantle her attyre,

And being crowned with a girland greene,

Seeme lyke some mayden Queene.

Her modest eyes abashed to behold

So many gazers, as on her do stare,

Upon the lowly ground affixed are.

Ne dare lift up her countenance too bold,

But blush to heare her prayses sung so loud,

So farre from being proud.

Nathlesse doe ye still loud her prayses sing,

That all the woods may answer and your eccho ring.



Tell me ye merchants daughters did ye see

So fayre a creature in your towne before?

So sweet, so lovely, and so mild as she,

Adornd with beautyes grace and vertues store,

Her goodly eyes lyke Saphyres shining bright,

Her forehead yvory white,

Her cheekes lyke apples which the sun hath rudded,

Her lips lyke cherryes charming men to byte,

Her brest like to a bowle of creame uncrudded,

Her paps lyke lyllies budded,

Her snowie necke lyke to a marble towre,

And all her body like a pallace fayre,

Ascending uppe with many a stately stayre,

To honors seat and chastities sweet bowre.

Why stand ye still ye virgins in amaze,

Upon her so to gaze,

Whiles ye forget your former lay to sing,

To which the woods did answer and your eccho ring.



But if ye saw that which no eyes can see,

The inward beauty of her lively spright,

Garnisht with heavenly guifts of high degree,

Much more then would ye wonder at that sight,

And stand astonisht lyke to those which red

Medusaes mazeful hed.

There dwels sweet love and constant chastity,

Unspotted fayth and comely womenhed,

Regard of honour and mild modesty,

There vertue raynes as Queene in royal throne,

And giveth lawes alone.

The which the base affections doe obay,

And yeeld theyr services unto her will,

Ne thought of thing uncomely ever may

Thereto approch to tempt her mind to ill.

Had ye once seene these her celestial threasures,

And unrevealed pleasures,

Then would ye wonder and her prayses sing,

That al the woods should answer and your eccho ring.



Open the temple gates unto my love,

Open them wide that she may enter in,

And all the postes adorne as doth behove,

And all the pillours deck with girlands trim,

For to recyve this Saynt with honour dew,

That commeth in to you.

With trembling steps and humble reverence,

She commeth in, before th'almighties vew:

Of her ye virgins learne obedience,

When so ye come into those holy places,

To humble your proud faces;

Bring her up to th'high altar that she may,

The sacred ceremonies there partake,

The which do endlesse matrimony make,

And let the roring Organs loudly play

The praises of the Lord in lively notes,

The whiles with hollow throates

The Choristers the joyous Antheme sing,

That al the woods may answere and their eccho ring.



Behold whiles she before the altar stands

Hearing the holy priest that to her speakes

And blesseth her with his two happy hands,

How the red roses flush up in her cheekes,

And the pure snow with goodly vermill stayne,

Like crimsin dyde in grayne,

That even th'Angels which continually,

About the sacred Altare doe remaine,

Forget their service and about her fly,

Ofte peeping in her face that seemes more fayre,

The more they on it stare.

But her sad eyes still fastened on the ground,

Are governed with goodly modesty,

That suffers not one looke to glaunce awry,

Which may let in a little thought unsownd.

Why blush ye love to give to me your hand,

The pledge of all our band?

Sing ye sweet Angels, Alleluya sing,

That all the woods may answere and your eccho ring.



Now al is done; bring home the bride againe,

Bring home the triumph of our victory,

Bring home with you the glory of her gaine,

With joyance bring her and with jollity.

Never had man more joyfull day then this,

Whom heaven would heape with blis.

Make feast therefore now all this live long day,

This day for ever to me holy is,

Poure out the wine without restraint or stay,

Poure not by cups, but by the belly full,

Poure out to all that wull,

And sprinkle all the postes and wals with wine,

That they may sweat, and drunken be withall.

Crowne ye God Bacchus with a coronall,

And Hymen also crowne with wreathes of vine,

And let the Graces daunce unto the rest;

For they can doo it best:

The whiles the maydens doe theyr carroll sing,

To which the woods shal answer and theyr eccho ring.



Ring ye the bels, ye yong men of the towne,

And leave your wonted labors for this day:

This day is holy; doe ye write it downe,

That ye for ever it remember may.

This day the sunne is in his chiefest hight,

With Barnaby the bright,

From whence declining daily by degrees,

He somewhat loseth of his heat and light,

When once the Crab behind his back he sees.

But for this time it ill ordained was,

To chose the longest day in all the yeare,

And shortest night, when longest fitter weare:

Yet never day so long, but late would passe.

Ring ye the bels, to make it weare away,

And bonefiers make all day,

And daunce about them, and about them sing:

That all the woods may answer, and your eccho ring.



Ah when will this long weary day have end,

And lende me leave to come unto my love?

How slowly do the houres theyr numbers spend?

How slowly does sad Time his feathers move?

Hast thee O fayrest Planet to thy home

Within the Westerne fome:

Thy tyred steedes long since have need of rest.

Long though it be, at last I see it gloome,

And the bright evening star with golden creast

Appeare out of the East.

Fayre childe of beauty, glorious lampe of love

That all the host of heaven in rankes doost lead,

And guydest lovers through the nightes dread,

How chearefully thou lookest from above,

And seemst to laugh atweene thy twinkling light

As joying in the sight

Of these glad many which for joy doe sing,

That all the woods them answer and their echo ring.



Now ceasse ye damsels your delights forepast;

Enough is it, that all the day was youres:

Now day is doen, and night is nighing fast:

Now bring the Bryde into the brydall boures.

Now night is come, now soone her disaray,

And in her bed her lay;

Lay her in lillies and in violets,

And silken courteins over her display,

And odourd sheetes, and Arras coverlets.

Behold how goodly my faire love does ly

In proud humility;

Like unto Maia, when as Jove her tooke,

In Tempe, lying on the flowry gras,

Twixt sleepe and wake, after she weary was,

With bathing in the Acidalian brooke.

Now it is night, ye damsels may be gon,

And leave my love alone,

And leave likewise your former lay to sing:

The woods no more shal answere, nor your echo ring.



Now welcome night, thou night so long expected,

That long daies labour doest at last defray,

And all my cares, which cruell love collected,

Hast sumd in one, and cancelled for aye:

Spread thy broad wing over my love and me,

That no man may us see,

And in thy sable mantle us enwrap,

From feare of perrill and foule horror free.

Let no false treason seeke us to entrap,

Nor any dread disquiet once annoy

The safety of our joy:

But let the night be calme and quietsome,

Without tempestuous storms or sad afray:

Lyke as when Jove with fayre Alcmena lay,

When he begot the great Tirynthian groome:

Or lyke as when he with thy selfe did lie,

And begot Majesty.

And let the mayds and yongmen cease to sing:

Ne let the woods them answer, nor theyr eccho ring.



Let no lamenting cryes, nor dolefull teares,

Be heard all night within nor yet without:

Ne let false whispers, breeding hidden feares,

Breake gentle sleepe with misconceived dout.

Let no deluding dreames, nor dreadful sights

Make sudden sad affrights;

Ne let housefyres, nor lightnings helpelesse harmes,

Ne let the Pouke, nor other evill sprights,

Ne let mischivous witches with theyr charmes,

Ne let hob Goblins, names whose sence we see not,

Fray us with things that be not.

Let not the shriech Oule, nor the Storke be heard:

Nor the night Raven that still deadly yels,

Nor damned ghosts cald up with mighty spels,

Nor griesly vultures make us once affeard:

Ne let th'unpleasant Quyre of Frogs still croking

Make us to wish theyr choking.

Let none of these theyr drery accents sing;

Ne let the woods them answer, nor theyr eccho ring.



But let stil Silence trew night watches keepe,

That sacred peace may in assurance rayne,

And tymely sleep, when it is tyme to sleepe,

May poure his limbs forth on your pleasant playne,

The whiles an hundred little winged loves,

Like divers fethered doves,

Shall fly and flutter round about your bed,

And in the secret darke, that none reproves,

Their prety stelthes shal worke, and snares shal spread

To filch away sweet snatches of delight,

Conceald through covert night.

Ye sonnes of Venus, play your sports at will,

For greedy pleasure, carelesse of your toyes,

Thinks more upon her paradise of joyes,

Then what ye do, albe it good or ill.

All night therefore attend your merry play,

For it will soone be day:

Now none doth hinder you, that say or sing,

Ne will the woods now answer, nor your Eccho ring.



Who is the same, which at my window peepes?

Or whose is that faire face, that shines so bright,

Is it not Cinthia, she that never sleepes,

But walkes about high heaven al the night?

O fayrest goddesse, do thou not envy

My love with me to spy:

For thou likewise didst love, though now unthought,

And for a fleece of woll, which privily,

The Latmian shephard once unto thee brought,

His pleasures with thee wrought.

Therefore to us be favorable now;

And sith of wemens labours thou hast charge,

And generation goodly dost enlarge,

Encline thy will t'effect our wishfull vow,

And the chast wombe informe with timely seed,

That may our comfort breed:

Till which we cease our hopefull hap to sing,

Ne let the woods us answere, nor our Eccho ring.



And thou great Juno, which with awful might

The lawes of wedlock still dost patronize,

And the religion of the faith first plight

With sacred rites hast taught to solemnize:

And eeke for comfort often called art

Of women in their smart,

Eternally bind thou this lovely band,

And all thy blessings unto us impart.

And thou glad Genius, in whose gentle hand,

The bridale bowre and geniall bed remaine,

Without blemish or staine,

And the sweet pleasures of theyr loves delight

With secret ayde doest succour and supply,

Till they bring forth the fruitfull progeny,

Send us the timely fruit of this same night.

And thou fayre Hebe, and thou Hymen free,

Grant that it may so be.

Til which we cease your further prayse to sing,

Ne any woods shal answer, nor your Eccho ring.



And ye high heavens, the temple of the gods,

In which a thousand torches flaming bright

Doe burne, that to us wretched earthly clods,

In dreadful darknesse lend desired light;

And all ye powers which in the same remayne,

More then we men can fayne,

Poure out your blessing on us plentiously,

And happy influence upon us raine,

That we may raise a large posterity,

Which from the earth, which they may long possesse,

With lasting happinesse,

Up to your haughty pallaces may mount,

And for the guerdon of theyr glorious merit

May heavenly tabernacles there inherit,

Of blessed Saints for to increase the count.

So let us rest, sweet love, in hope of this,

And cease till then our tymely joyes to sing,

The woods no more us answer, nor our eccho ring.



Song made in lieu of many ornaments,

With which my love should duly have bene dect,

Which cutting off through hasty accidents,

Ye would not stay your dew time to expect,

But promist both to recompens,

Be unto her a goodly ornament,

And for short time an endlesse moniment./CONTENT"	NAME/Epithalamion/NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Mythology & Folklore/TYPE
AUTHOR/CHRISTOPHER MARLOWE/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/On Hellespont, guilty of true love's blood,

In view and opposite two cities stood,

Sea-borderers, disjoin'd by Neptune's might;

The one Abydos, the other Sestos hight.

At Sestos Hero dwelt; Hero the fair,

Whom young Apollo courted for her hair,

And offer'd as a dower his burning throne,

Where she could sit for men to gaze upon.

The outside of her garments were of lawn,

The lining purple silk, with gilt stars drawn;

Her wide sleeves green, and border'd with a grove,

Where Venus in her naked glory strove

To please the careless and disdainful eyes

Of proud Adonis, that before her lies;

Her kirtle blue, whereon was many a stain,

Made with the blood of wretched lovers slain.

Upon her head she ware a myrtle wreath,

From whence her veil reach'd to the ground beneath;

Her veil was artificial flowers and leaves,

Whose workmanship both man and beast deceives;

Many would praise the sweet smell as she past,

When 'twas the odour which her breath forth cast;

And there for honey bees have sought in vain,

And beat from thence, have lighted there again.

About her neck hung chains of pebble-stone,

Which lighten'd by her neck, like diamonds shone.

She ware no gloves; for neither sun nor wind

Would burn or parch her hands, but, to her mind,

Or warm or cool them, for they took delight

To play upon those hands, they were so white.

Buskins of shells, all silver'd, used she,

And branch'd with blushing coral to the knee;

Where sparrows perch'd, of hollow pearl and gold,

Such as the world would wonder to behold:

Those with sweet water oft her handmaid fills,

Which as she went, would chirrup through the bills.

Some say, for her the fairest Cupid pin'd,

And looking in her face, was strooken blind.

But this is true; so like was one the other,

As he imagin'd Hero was his mother;

And oftentimes into her bosom flew,

About her naked neck his bare arms threw,

And laid his childish head upon her breast,

And with still panting rock'd there took his rest.

So lovely-fair was Hero, Venus' nun,

As Nature wept, thinking she was undone,

Because she took more from her than she left,

And of such wondrous beauty her bereft:

Therefore, in sign her treasure suffer'd wrack,

Since Hero's time hath half the world been black.



         Amorous Leander, beautiful and young

(Whose tragedy divine Musus sung),

Dwelt at Abydos; since him dwelt there none

For whom succeeding times make greater moan.

His dangling tresses, that were never shorn,

Had they been cut, and unto Colchos borne,

Would have allur'd the vent'rous youth of Greece

To hazard more than for the golden fleece.

Fair Cynthia wish'd his arms might be her sphere;

Grief makes her pale, because she moves not there.

His body was as straight as Circe's wand;

Jove might have sipt out nectar from his hand.

Even as delicious meat is to the taste,

So was his neck in touching, and surpast

The white of Pelops' shoulder: I could tell ye,

How smooth his breast was, and how white his belly;

And whose immortal fingers did imprint

That heavenly path with many a curious dint

That runs along his back; but my rude pen

Can hardly blazon forth the loves of men,

Much less of powerful gods: let it suffice

That my slack Muse sings of Leander's eyes;

Those orient cheeks and lips, exceeding his

That leapt into the water for a kiss

Of his own shadow, and, despising many,

Died ere he could enjoy the love of any.

Had wild Hippolytus Leander seen,

Enamour'd of his beauty had he been.

His presence made the rudest peasant melt,

That in the vast uplandish country dwelt;

The barbarous Thracian soldier, mov'd with nought,

Was mov'd with him, and for his favour sought.

Some swore he was a maid in man's attire,

For in his looks were all that men desire,

A pleasant smiling cheek, a speaking eye,

A brow for love to banquet royally;

And such as knew he was a man, would say,

""Leander, thou art made for amorous play;

Why art thou not in love, and lov'd of all?

Though thou be fair, yet be not thine own thrall.""



         The men of wealthy Sestos every year,

For his sake whom their goddess held so dear,

Rose-cheek'd Adonis, kept a solemn feast.

Thither resorted many a wandering guest

To meet their loves; such as had none at all

Came lovers home from this great festival;

For every street, like to a firmament,

Glister'd with breathing stars, who, where they went,

Frighted the melancholy earth, which deem'd

Eternal heaven to burn, for so it seem'd

As if another Pha{""e}ton had got

The guidance of the sun's rich chariot.

But far above the loveliest, Hero shin'd,

And stole away th' enchanted gazer's mind;

For like sea-nymphs' inveigling harmony,

So was her beauty to the standers-by;

Nor that night-wandering, pale, and watery star

(When yawning dragons draw her thirling car

From Latmus' mount up to the gloomy sky,

Where, crown'd with blazing light and majesty,

She proudly sits) more over-rules the flood

Than she the hearts of those that near her stood.

Even as when gaudy nymphs pursue the chase,

Wretched Ixion's shaggy-footed race,

Incens'd with savage heat, gallop amain

From steep pine-bearing mountains to the plain,

So ran the people forth to gaze upon her,

And all that view'd her were enamour'd on her.

And as in fury of a dreadful fight,

Their fellows being slain or put to flight,

Poor soldiers stand with fear of death dead-strooken,

So at her presence all surpris'd and tooken,

Await the sentence of her scornful eyes;

He whom she favours lives; the other dies.

There might you see one sigh, another rage,

And some, their violent passions to assuage,

Compile sharp satires; but, alas, too late,

For faithful love will never turn to hate.

And many, seeing great princes were denied,

Pin'd as they went, and thinking on her, died.

On this feast-dayO cursed day and hour!

Went Hero thorough Sestos, from her tower

To Venus' temple, where unhappily,

As after chanc'd, they did each other spy.

So fair a church as this had Venus none:

The walls were of discolour'd jasper-stone,

Wherein was Proteus carved; and over-head

A lively vine of green sea-agate spread,

Where by one hand light-headed Bacchus hung,

And with the other wine from grapes out-wrung.

Of crystal shining fair the pavement was;

The town of Sestos call'd it Venus' glass:

There might you see the gods in sundry shapes,

Committing heady riots, incest, rapes:

For know, that underneath this radiant flower

Was Danae's statue in a brazen tower,

Jove slyly stealing from his sister's bed,

To dally with Idalian Ganimed,

And for his love Europa bellowing loud,

And tumbling with the rainbow in a cloud;

Blood-quaffing Mars heaving the iron net,

Which limping Vulcan and his Cyclops set;

Love kindling fire, to burn such towns as Troy,

Sylvanus weeping for the lovely boy

That now is turn'd into a cypress tree,

Under whose shade the wood-gods love to be.

And in the midst a silver altar stood:

There Hero, sacrificing turtles' blood,

Vail'd to the ground, veiling her eyelids close;

And modestly they opened as she rose.

Thence flew Love's arrow with the golden head;

And thus Leander was enamoured.

Stone-still he stood, and evermore he gazed,

Till with the fire that from his count'nance blazed

Relenting Hero's gentle heart was strook:

Such force and virtue hath an amorous look.



         It lies not in our power to love or hate,

For will in us is over-rul'd by fate.

When two are stript, long ere the course begin,

We wish that one should lose, the other win;

And one especially do we affect

Of two gold ingots, like in each respect:

The reason no man knows, let it suffice,

What we behold is censur'd by our eyes.

Where both deliberate, the love is slight:

Who ever lov'd, that lov'd not at first sight?/CONTENT"	NAME/Hero and Leander/NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Mythology & Folklore/TYPE
AUTHOR/EDMUND SPENSER/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/By that he ended had his ghostly sermon,

The fox was well induc'd to be a parson,

And of the priest eftsoons gan to inquire,

How to a benefice he might aspire.

""Marry, there"" (said the priest) ""is art indeed:

Much good deep learning one thereout may read;

For that the ground-work is, and end of all,

How to obtain a beneficial.

First, therefore, when ye have in handsome wise

Yourself attired, as you can devise,

Then to some nobleman yourself apply,

Or other great one in the worldes eye,

That hath a zealous disposition

To God, and so to his religion.

There must thou fashion eke a godly zeal,

Such as no carpers may contrare reveal;

For each thing feigned ought more wary be.

There thou must walk in sober gravity,

And seem as saint-like as Saint Radegund:

Fast much, pray oft, look lowly on the ground,

And unto every one do courtesy meek:

These looks (nought saying) do a benefice seek,

But be thou sure one not to lack or long.

And if thee list unto the court to throng,

And there to hunt after the hoped prey,

Then must thou thee dispose another way:

For there thou needs must learn to laugh, to lie,

To face, to forge, to scoff, to company,

To crouch, to please, to be a beetle-stock

Of thy great master's will, to scorn, or mock.

So may'st thou chance mock out a benefice,

Unless thou canst one conjure by device,

Or cast a figure for a bishopric;

And if one could, it were but a school trick.

These be the ways by which without reward

Livings in court be gotten, though full hard;

For nothing there is done without a fee:

The courtier needs must recompensed be

With a benevolence, or have in gage

The primitias of your parsonage:

Scarce can a bishopric forpass them by,

But that it must be gelt in privity.

Do not thou therefore seek a living there,

But of more private persons seek elsewhere,

Whereas thou may'st compound a better penny,

Ne let thy learning question'd be of any.

For some good gentleman, that hath the right

Unto his church for to present a wight,

Will cope with thee in reasonable wise;

That if the living yearly do arise

To forty pound, that then his youngest son

Shall twenty have, and twenty thou hast won:

Thou hast it won, for it is of frank gift,

And he will care for all the rest to shift,

Both that the bishop may admit of thee,

And that therein thou may'st maintained be.

This is the way for one that is unlearn'd

Living to get, and not to be discern'd.

But they that are great clerks, have nearer ways,

For learning sake to living them to raise;

Yet many eke of them (God wot) are driven

T' accept a benefice in pieces riven.

How say'st thou (friend), have I not well discourst

Upon this common-place (though plain, not worst)?

Better a short tale than a bad long shriving.

Needs any more to learn to get a living?""



""Now sure, and by my halidom,"" (quoth he)

""Ye a great master are in your degree:

Great thanks I yield you for your discipline,

And do not doubt but duly to incline

My wits thereto, as ye shall shortly hear.""

The priest him wish'd good speed, and well to fare:

So parted they, as either's way them led.

But th' ape and fox ere long so well them sped,

Through the priest's wholesome counsel lately taught,

And through their own fair handling wisely wrought,

That they a benefice 'twixt them obtained;

And crafty Reynold was a priest ordained,

And th' ape his parish clerk procur'd to be.

Then made they revel rout and goodly glee;

But, ere long time had passed, they so ill

Did order their affairs, that th' evil will

Of all their parish'ners they had constrain'd;

Who to the Ordinary of them complain'd,

How foully they their offices abus'd,

And them of crimes and heresies accus'd,

That pursuivants he often for them sent;

But they neglected his commandement.

So long persisted obstinate and bold,

Till at the length he published to hold

A visitation, and them cited thether:

Then was high time their wits about to geather.

What did they then, but made a composition

With their next neighbour priest, for light condition,

To whom their living they resigned quite

For a few pence, and ran away by night./CONTENT"	NAME/Prosopopoia: or Mother Hubbard's Tale/NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Mythology & Folklore/TYPE
AUTHOR/EDMUND SPENSER/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/CALM was the day, and through the trembling air

Sweet breathing Zephyrus did softly play,

A gentle spirit, that lightly did delay

Hot Titan's beams, which then did glister fair;

When I whose sullen care,

Through discontent of my long fruitless stay

In prince's court, and expectation vain

Of idle hopes, which still do fly away

Like empty shadows, did afflict my brain,

Walked forth to ease my pain

Along the shore of silver streaming Thames,

Whose rutty bank, the which his river hems,

Was painted all with variable flowers,

And all the meads adorned with dainty gems,

Fit to deck maidens' bowers,

And crown their paramours,

Against the bridal day, which is not long:

      Sweet Thames, run softly, till I end my song.



There, in a meadow, by the river's side,

A flock of nymphs I chanced to espy,

All lovely daughters of the flood thereby,

With goodly greenish locks, all loose untied,

As each had been a bride;

And each one had a little wicker basket,

Made of fine twigs, entrailed curiously,

In which they gathered flowers to fill their flasket,

And with fine fingers cropt full featously

The tender stalks on high.

Of every sort, which in that meadow grew,

They gathered some; the violet pallid blue,

The little daisy, that at evening closes,

The virgin lily, and the primrose true,

With store of vermeil roses,

To deck their bridegrooms' posies

Against the bridal day, which was not long:

      Sweet Thames, run softly, till I end my song.



With that, I saw two swans of goodly hue

Come softly swimming down along the Lee;

Two fairer birds I yet did never see.

The snow which doth the top of Pindus strew,

Did never whiter shew,

Nor Jove himself, when he a swan would be

For love of Leda, whiter did appear:

Yet Leda was they say as white as he,

Yet not so white as these, nor nothing near.

So purely white they were,

That even the gentle stream, the which them bare,

Seemed foul to them, and bade his billows spare

To wet their silken feathers, lest they might

Soil their fair plumes with water not so fair,

And mar their beauties bright,

That shone as heaven's light,

Against their bridal day, which was not long:

      Sweet Thames, run softly, till I end my song.



Eftsoons the nymphs, which now had flowers their fill,

Ran all in haste, to see that silver brood,

As they came floating on the crystal flood.

Whom when they saw, they stood amazed still,

Their wondering eyes to fill.

Them seemed they never saw a sight so fair,

Of fowls so lovely, that they sure did deem

Them heavenly born, or to be that same pair

Which through the sky draw Venus' silver team;

For sure they did not seem

To be begot of any earthly seed,

But rather angels, or of angels' breed:

Yet were they bred of Somers-heat they say,

In sweetest season, when each flower and weed

The earth did fresh array,

So fresh they seemed as day,

Even as their bridal day, which was not long:

      Sweet Thames, run softly, till I end my song.



Then forth they all out of their baskets drew

Great store of flowers, the honour of the field,

That to the sense did fragrant odours yield,

All which upon those goodly birds they threw,

And all the waves did strew,

That like old Peneus' waters they did seem,

When down along by pleasant Tempe's shore,

Scattered with flowers, through Thessaly they stream,

That they appear through lilies' plenteous store,

Like a bride's chamber floor.

Two of those nymphs meanwhile, two garlands bound,

Of freshest flowers which in that mead they found,

The which presenting all in trim array,

Their snowy foreheads therewithal they crowned,

Whilst one did sing this lay,

Prepared against that day,

Against their bridal day, which was not long:

      Sweet Thames, run softly, till I end my song.



'Ye gentle birds, the world's fair ornament,

And heaven's glory, whom this happy hour

Doth lead unto your lovers' blissful bower,

Joy may you have and gentle heart's content

Of your love's complement:

And let fair Venus, that is queen of love,

With her heart-quelling son upon you smile,

Whose smile, they say, hath virtue to remove

All love's dislike, and friendship's faulty guile

For ever to assoil.

Let endless peace your steadfast hearts accord,

And blessed plenty wait upon your board,

And let your bed with pleasures chaste abound,

That fruitful issue may to you afford,

Which may your foes confound,

And make your joys redound

Upon your bridal day, which is not long:

      Sweet Thames, run softly, till I end my song.'



So ended she; and all the rest around

To her redoubled that her undersong,

Which said their bridal day should not be long.

And gentle echo from the neighbour ground

Their accents did resound.

So forth those joyous birds did pass along,

Adown the Lee, that to them murmured low,

As he would speak, but that he lacked a tongue,

Yet did by signs his glad affection show,

Making his stream run slow.

And all the fowl which in his flood did dwell

Gan flock about these twain, that did excel

The rest so far as Cynthia doth shend

The lesser stars. So they, enranged well,

Did on those two attend,

And their best service lend,

Against their wedding day, which was not long:

      Sweet Thames, run softly, till I end my song.



At length they all to merry London came,

To merry London, my most kindly nurse,

That to me gave this life's first native source;

Though from another place I take my name,

An house of ancient fame.

There when they came, whereas those bricky towers,

The which on Thames' broad aged back do ride,

Where now the studious lawyers have their bowers

There whilom wont the Templar Knights to bide,

Till they decayed through pride:

Next whereunto there stands a stately place,

Where oft I gained gifts and goodly grace

Of that great lord, which therein wont to dwell,

Whose want too well now feels my friendless case.

But ah, here fits not well

Old woes but joys to tell

Against the bridal day, which is not long:

      Sweet Thames, run softly, till I end my song.



Yet therein now doth lodge a noble peer,

Great England's glory, and the world's wide wonder,

Whose dreadful name late through all Spain did thunder,

And Hercules' two pillars standing near

Did make to quake and fear:

Fair branch of honour, flower of chivalry,

That fillest England with thy triumph's fame,

Joy have thou of thy noble victory,

And endless happiness of thine own name

That promiseth the same:

That through thy prowess and victorious arms,

Thy country may be freed from foreign harms;

And great Elisa's glorious name may ring

Through all the world, filled with thy wide alarms,

Which some brave Muse may sing

To ages following,

Upon the bridal day, which is not long:

      Sweet Thames, run softly, till I end my song.



From those high towers this noble lord issuing,

Like radiant Hesper when his golden hair

In th'Ocean billows he hath bathed fair,

Descended to the river's open viewing,

With a great train ensuing.

Above the rest were goodly to be seen

Two gentle knights of lovely face and feature

Beseeming well the bower of any queen,

With gifts of wit and ornaments of nature,

Fit for so goodly stature;

That like the twins of Jove they seemed in sight,

Which deck the baldric of the heavens bright.

They two forth pacing to the river's side,

Received those two fair birds, their love's delight;

Which, at th' appointed tide,

Each one did make his bride

Against their bridal day, which is not long:

      Sweet Thames, run softly, till I end my song./CONTENT"	NAME/Prothalamion/NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Mythology & Folklore/TYPE
AUTHOR/EDMUND SPENSER/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/THENOT    &      HOBBINOLL

Tell me good Hobbinoll, what garres thee greete?

What? hath some Wolfe thy tender Lambes ytorne?

Or is thy Bagpype broke, that soundes so sweete?

Or art thou of thy loved lasse forlorne?



Or bene thine eyes attempred to the yeare,

Quenching the gasping furrowes thirst with rayne?

Like April shoure, so stremes the trickling teares

Adowne thy cheeke, to quenche thy thristye payne.



HOBBINOLL

Nor thys, nor that, so muche doeth make me mourne,

But for the ladde, whome long I lovd so deare,

Nowe loves a lasse, that all his love doth scorne:

He plongd in payne, his tressed locks dooth teare.



Shepheards delights he dooth them all forsweare,

Hys pleasaunt Pipe, whych made us meriment,

He wylfully hath broke, and doth forbeare

His wonted songs, wherein he all outwent.



THENOT

What is he for a Ladde, you so lament?

Ys love such pinching payne to them, that prove?

And hath he skill to make so excellent,

Yet hath so little skill to brydle love?



HOBBINOLL

Colin thou kenst, the Southerne shepheardes boye:

Him Love hath wounded with a deadly darte.

Whilome on him was all my care and joye,

Forcing with gyfts to winne his wanton heart.



But now from me hys madding mynd is starte,

And woes the Widdowes daughter of the glenne:

So nowe fayre Rosalind hath bredde hys smart,

So now his frend is chaunged for a frenne.



THENOT

But if hys ditties bene so trimly dight,

I pray thee Hobbinoll, recorde some one:

The whiles our flockes doe graze about in sight,

And we close shrowded in thys shade alone.



HOBBINOLL

Contented I: then will I singe his laye

Of fayre Elisa, Queene of shepheardes all:

Which once he made, as by a spring he laye,

And tuned it unto the Waters fall.



Ye dayntye Nymphs, that in this blessed Brooke

         doe bathe your brest,

Forsake your watry bowres, and hether looke,

         at my request:

And eke you Virgins, that on Parnasse dwell,

Whence floweth Helicon the learned well,

         Helpe me to blaze

         Her worthy praise,

Which in her sexe doth all excell.



Of fayre Eliza be your silver song,

         that blessed wight:

The flowre of Virgins, may shee florish long,

         In princely plight.

For shee is Syrinx daughter without spotte,

Which Pan the shepheards God of her begot:

         So sprong her grace

         Of heavenly race,

No mortall blemishe may her blotte.



See, where she sits upon the grassie greene,

         (O seemely sight)

Yclad in Scarlot like a mayden Queene,

         And Ermines white.

Upon her head a Cremosin coronet,

With Damaske roses and Daffadillies set:

         Bayleaves betweene,

         And Primroses greene

Embellish the sweete Violet.



Tell me, have ye seene her angelick face,

         Like Ph{oe}be fayre?

Her heavenly haveour, her princely grace

         can you well compare?

The Redde rose medled with the White yfere,

In either cheeke depeincten lively chere.

         Her modest eye,

         Her Majestie,

Where have you seene the like, but there?



I sawe Ph{oe}bus thrust out his golden hedde,

         upon her to gaze:

But when he sawe, how broade her beames did spredde,

         it did him amaze.

He blusht to see another Sunne belowe,

Ne durst againe his fyrye face out showe:

         Let him, if he dare,

         His brightnesse compare

With hers, to have the overthrowe.



Shewe thy selfe Cynthia with thy silver rayes,

         and be not abasht:

When shee the beames of her beauty displayes,

         O how art thou dasht?

But I will not match her with Latonaes seede,

Such follie great sorow to Niobe did breede.

         Now she is a stone,

         And makes dayly mone,

Warning all other to take heede.



Pan may be proud, that ever he begot

         such a Bellibone,

And Syrinx rejoyse, that ever was her lot

         to beare such an one.

Soone as my younglings cryen for the dam,

To her will I offer a milkwhite Lamb:

         Shee is my goddesse plaine,

         And I her shepherds swayne,

Albee forswonck and forswatt I am.



I see Calliope speede her to the place,

         where my Goddesse shines:

And after her the other Muses trace,

         with their Violines.

Bene they not Bay braunches, which they doe beare,

All for Elisa in her hand to weare?

         So sweetely they play,

         And sing all the way,

That it a heaven is to heare.



Lo how finely the graces can it foote

         to the Instrument:

They dauncen deffly, and singen soote,

         in their meriment.

Wants not a fourth grace, to make the daunce even?

Let that rowme to my Lady be yeven:

         She shalbe a grace,

         To fyll the fourth place,

And reigne with the rest in heaven.



And whither rennes this bevie of Ladies bright,

         raunged in a rowe?

They bene all Ladyes of the lake behight,

         that unto her goe.

Chloris, that is the chiefest Nymph of al,

Of Olive braunches beares a Coronall:

         Olives bene for peace,

         When wars doe surcease:

Such for a Princesse bene principall.



Ye shepheards daughters, that dwell on the greene,

         hye you there apace:

Let none come there, but that Virgins bene,

         to adorne her grace.

And when you come, whereas shee is in place,

See, that your rudeness doe not you disgrace:

         Binde your fillets faste,

         And gird in your waste,

For more finesse, with a tawdrie lace.



Bring hether the Pincke and purple Cullambine,

         With Gelliflowres:

Bring Coronations, and Sops in wine,

         worne of Paramoures.

Strowe me the ground with Daffadowndillies,

And Cowslips, and Kingcups, and loved Lillies:

         The pretie Pawnce,

         And the Chevisaunce,

Shall match with the fayre flowre Delice.



Now ryse up Elisa, decked as thou art,

         in royall aray:

And now ye daintie Damsells may depart

         echeone her way,

I feare, I have troubled your troupes to longe:

Let dame Eliza thanke you for her song.

         And if you come hether,

         When Damsines I gether,

I will part them all you among.



THENOT

And was thilk same song of Colins owne making?

Ah foolish boy, that is with love yblent:

Great pittie is, he be in such taking,

For naught caren, that bene so lewdly bent.



HOBBINOLL

Sicker I hold him, for a greater fon,

That loves the thing, he cannot purchase.

But let us homeward: for night draweth on,

And twincling starres the daylight hence chase.



THENOTS EMBLEME

O quam te memorem virgo?



HOBBINOLLS EMBLEME

O dea certe./CONTENT"	NAME/from The Shepheardes Calender: April/NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Mythology & Folklore/TYPE
AUTHOR/EDMUND SPENSER/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/PIERCE       &         CUDDIE

Cuddie, for shame hold up thy heavye head,

And let us cast with what delight to chace,

And weary thys long lingring Phoebus race.

Whilome thou wont the shepheards laddes to leade,

In rymes, in ridles, and in bydding base:

Now they in thee, and thou in sleepe art dead.



CUDDY

Piers, I have pyped erst so long with payne,

That all mine Oten reedes bene rent and wore:

And my poore Muse hath spent her spared store,

Yet little good hath got, and much lesse gayne,

Such pleasaunce makes the Grashopper so poore,

And ligge so layd, when Winter doth her straine.



The dapper ditties, that I wont devise,

To feede youthes fancie, and the flocking fry,

Delighten much: what I the bett for thy?

They han the pleasure, I a sclender prise.

I beate the bush, the byrds to them doe flye:

What good thereof to Cuddie can arise?



PIERS

Cuddie, the prayse is better, then the price,

The glory eke much greater then the gayne:

O what an honor is it, to restraine

The lust of lawlesse youth with good advice:

Or pricke them forth with pleasaunce of thy vaine,

Whereto thou list their trayned willes entice.



Soone as thou gynst to sette thy notes in frame,

O how the rurall routes to thee doe cleave:

Seemeth thou dost their soule of sence bereave,

All as the shepheard, that did fetch his dame

From Plutoes balefull bowre withouten leave:

His musicks might the hellish hound did tame.



CUDDIE

So praysen babes the Peacoks spotted traine,

And wondren at bright Argus blazing eye:

But who rewards him ere the more for thy?

Or feedes him once the fuller by a graine?

Sike prayse is smoke, that sheddeth in the skye,

Sike words bene wynd, and wasten soone in vayne.



PIERS

Abandon then the base and viler clowne,

Lyft up thy selfe out of the lowly dust:

And sing of bloody Mars, of wars, of giusts.

Turne thee to those, that weld the awful crowne,

To doubted Knights, whose woundlesse armour rusts,

And helmes unbruzed wexen dayly browne.



There may thy Muse display her fluttryng wing,

And stretch her selfe at large from East to West:

Whither thou list in fayre Elisa rest,

Or if thee please in bigger notes to sing,

Advaunce the worthy whome shee loveth best,

That first the white beare to the stake did bring.



And when the stubborne stroke of stronger stounds,

Has somewhat slackt the tenor of thy string:

Of love and lustihed tho mayst thou sing,

And carrol lowde, and leade the Myllers rownde,

All were Elisa one of thilke same ring.

So mought our Cuddies name to Heaven sownde.



CUDDYE

Indeed the Romish Tityrus, I heare,

Through his Mecoenas left his Oaten reede,

Whereon he earst had taught his flocks to feede,

And laboured lands to yield the timely eare,

And eft did sing of warres and deadly drede,

So as the Heavens did quake his verse to here.



But ah Mecoenas is yclad in claye,

And great Augustus long ygoe is dead:

And all the worthies liggen wrapt in leade,

That matter made for Poets on to play:

For ever, who in derring doe were dreade,

The loftie verse of hem was loved aye.



But after vertue gan for age to stoupe,

And mighty manhode brought a bedde of ease:

The vaunting Poets found nought worth a pease,

To put in preace emong the learned troupe.

Tho gan the streames of flowing wittes to cease,

And sonnebright honour pend in shamefull coupe.



And if that any buddes of Poesie,

Yet of the old stocke gan to shoote agayne:

Or it mens follies mote be forst to fayne,

And rolle with rest in rymes of rybaudrye:

Or as it sprong, it wither must agayne:

Tom Piper makes us better melodie.



PIERS

O pierlesse Poesye, where is then thy place?

If nor in Princes pallace thou doe sitt:

(And yet is Princes pallace the most fitt)

Ne brest of baser birth doth thee embrace.

Then make thee winges of thine aspyring wit,

And, whence thou camst, flye backe to heaven apace.



CUDDIE

Ah Percy it is all to weake and wanne,

So high to sore, and make so large a flight:

Her peeced pyneons bene not so in plight,

For Colin fittes such famous flight to scanne:

He, were he not with love so ill bedight,

Would mount as high, and sing as soote as Swanne.



PIERS

Ah fon, for love does teach him climbe so hie,

And lyftes him up out of the loathsome myre:

Such immortall mirrhor, as he doth admire,

Would rayse ones mynd above the starry skie.

And cause a caytive corage to aspire,

For lofty love doth loath a lowly eye.



CUDDIE

All otherwise the state of Poet stands,

For lordly love is such a Tyranne fell:

That where he rules, all power he doth expell.

The vaunted verse a vacant head demaundes,

Ne wont with crabbed care the Muses dwell.

Unwisely weaves, that takes two webbes in hand.



Who ever casts to compasse weightye prise,

And thinks to throwe out thondring words of threate:

Let powre in lavish cups and thriftie bitts of meate,

For Bacchus fruite is frend to Phoebus wise.

And when with Wine the braine begins to sweate,

The nombers flowe as fast as spring doth ryse.



Thou kenst not Percie howe the ryme should rage.

O if my temples were distaind with wine,

And girt in girlonds of wild Yvie twine,

How I could reare the Muse on stately stage,

And teache her tread aloft in buskin fine,

With queint Bellona in her equipage.



But ah my corage cooles ere it be warme,

For thy, content us in thys humble shade:

Where no such troublous tydes han us assayde,

Here we our slender pipes may safely charme.



PIERS

And when my Gates shall han their bellies layd:

Cuddie shall have a Kidde to store his farme.



CUDDIES EMBLEME

Agitante calescimus illo/CONTENT"	NAME/from The Shepheardes Calender: October/NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Mythology & Folklore/TYPE
AUTHOR/JOHN DONNE/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/Go and catch a falling star,

    Get with child a mandrake root,

Tell me where all past years are,

    Or who cleft the devil's foot,

Teach me to hear mermaids singing,

Or to keep off envy's stinging,

            And find

            What wind

Serves to advance an honest mind.



If thou be'st born to strange sights,

    Things invisible to see,

Ride ten thousand days and nights,

    Till age snow white hairs on thee,

Thou, when thou return'st, wilt tell me,

All strange wonders that befell thee,

            And swear,

            No where

Lives a woman true, and fair.



If thou find'st one, let me know,

    Such a pilgrimage were sweet;

Yet do not, I would not go,

    Though at next door we might meet;

Though she were true, when you met her,

And last, till you write your letter,

            Yet she

            Will be

False, ere I come, to two, or three.











Poetry Out Loud Note: In the print anthology, this poem is titled simply ""Song."" The student may give either title during the recitation. /CONTENT"	NAME/Song: Go and catch a falling star/NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Mythology & Folklore/TYPE
AUTHOR/WILLIAM SHAKESPEARE/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/Orpheus with his lute made trees,

And the mountain tops that freeze,

Bow themselves when he did sing:

To his music plants and flowers

Ever sprung; as sun and showers

There had made a lasting spring.

Every thing that heard him play,

Even the billows of the sea,

Hung their heads, and then lay by.

In sweet music is such art,

Killing care and grief of heart

Fall asleep, or hearing, die./CONTENT"	NAME/Song: Orpheus with his lute made trees/NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Mythology & Folklore/TYPE
AUTHOR/WILLIAM SHAKESPEARE/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/What is your substance, whereof are you made,

That millions of strange shadows on you tend?

Since every one hath, every one, one shade,

And you, but one, can every shadow lend.

Describe Adonis, and the counterfeit

Is poorly imitated after you;

On Helen's cheek all art of beauty set,

And you in Grecian tires are painted new.

Speak of the spring and foison of the year:

The one doth shadow of your beauty show,

The other as your bounty doth appear;

And you in every blessed shape we know.

    In all external grace you have some part,

    But you like none, none you, for constant heart./CONTENT"	NAME/Sonnet 53: What is your substance, whereof are you made/NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Mythology & Folklore/TYPE
AUTHOR/WILLIAM SHAKESPEARE/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/Why didst thou promise such a beauteous day,

And make me travel forth without my cloak,

To let base clouds oertake me in my way,

Hiding thy bravery in their rotten smoke?

Tis not enough that through the cloud thou break,

To dry the rain on my storm-beaten face,

For no man well of such a salve can speak

That heals the wound and cures not the disgrace:

Nor can thy shame give physic to my grief;

Though thou repent, yet I have still the loss:

The offenders sorrow lends but weak relief

To him that bears the strong offences cross.

   Ah! but those tears are pearl which thy love sheds,

   And they are rich and ransom all ill deeds.





 /CONTENT"	NAME/Sonnet 34: Why didst thou promise such a beauteous day/NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Nature/TYPE
AUTHOR/THOMAS BASTARD/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/The welcome Sun from sea Freake is returned,

And cheereth with his beams the naked earth,

Which gains with his coming her apparel

And had his absence six long months mourned.

Out of her fragrant sides she sends to greet him

The rashed primrose and the violet;

While she the fields and meadows doth beset

With flowers, and hangs the trees with pearl to meet him.

Amid this hope and joy she doth forget,

To kill the hemlock which doth grow too fast,

And chill the adder making too much haste,

With his black sons revived with the heat;

     Till summer comes with diverse colours clad,

      Much like my Epigrams both good and bad./CONTENT"	NAME/Book 1, Epigram 34: Ad. Thomam Freake armig. de veris adventu.  /NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Nature/TYPE
AUTHOR/THOMAS BASTARD/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/I met a courtier riding on the plain,

Well-mounted on a brave and gallant steed;

I sat upon a jade, and spurred to my pain

My lazy beast, whose tired sides did bleed:

He saw my case, and then of courtesy

Did rein his horse, and drew the bridle in,

Because I did desire his company:

But he corvetting way of me did win.

     What should I do, who was besteaded so?

      His horse stood still faster than mine could go./CONTENT"	NAME/Book 2, Epigram 22/NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Nature/TYPE
AUTHOR/THOMAS BASTARD/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/Walking the fields a wantcatcher I spied,

To him I went, desirous of his game:

Sir, have you taken wants? Yes, he replied,

Here are a dozen, which were lately taen.

Then you have left no more. No more? quoth he.

Sir I can show you more: the more the worse;

And to his work he went, but 'twould not be,

For all the wants were crept into my purse.

     Farewell friend wantcatcher, since 'twill not be,

     Thou cannot catch the wants, but they catch me./CONTENT"	NAME/Book 2, Epigram 8/NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Nature/TYPE
AUTHOR/THOMAS BASTARD/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/Fishing, if I a fisher may protest,

Of pleasures is the sweetest, of sports the best,

Of exercises the most excellent.

Of recreations the most innocent.

But now the sport is marred, and what, ye, why?

Fishes decrease, and fishers multiply./CONTENT"	NAME/Book 6, Epigram 14: De Piscatione./NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Nature/TYPE
AUTHOR/LADY MARY WROTH/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/Come darkest night, becoming sorrow best;

    Light; leave thy light; fitt for a lightsome soule;

    Darknes doth truly sure with mee oprest

    Whom absence power doth from mirthe controle:



The very trees with hanging heads condole

    Sweet sommers parting, and of leaves distrest

    In dying coulers make a griefe-full role;

    Soe much (alas) to sorrow are they prest,



Thus of dead leaves her farewell carpetts made:

    Theyr fall, theyr branches, all theyr mournings prove;

    With leavles, naked bodies, whose huese vade

    From hopefull greene, to wither in theyr love,



If trees, and leaves for absence, mourners bee

Noe mervaile that I grieve, who like want see./CONTENT"	NAME/from Pamphilia to Amphilanthus: 19/NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Nature/TYPE
AUTHOR/EDMUND SPENSER/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/Januarie. gloga prima. ARGVMENT.



    IN this fyrst glogue Colin clout a shepheardes boy complaineth him of his vnfortunate loue, being but newly (as semeth) enamoured of a countrie lasse called Rosalinde: with which strong affection being very sore traueled, he compareth his carefull case to the sadde season of the yeare, to the frostie ground, to the frosen trees, and to his owne winterbeaten flocke. And lastlye, fynding himselfe robbed of all former pleasaunce and delights, hee breaketh his Pipe in peeces, and casteth him selfe to the ground.





COLIN Cloute.





A Shepeheards boye (no better doe him call)

when Winters wastful spight was almost spent,

All in a sunneshine day, as did befall,

Led forth his flock, that had been long ypent.

So faynt they woxe, and feeble in the folde,

That now vnnethes their feete could them vphold.





All as the Sheepe, such was the shepeheards looke,

For pale and wanne he was, (alas the while,)

May seeme he lovd, or els some care he tooke:

Well couth he tune his pipe, and frame his stile.

Tho to a hill his faynting flocke he ledde,

And thus him playnd, the while his shepe there fedde.





Ye gods of loue, that pitie louers payne,

(if any gods the paine of louers pitie:)

Looke from aboue, where you in ioyes remaine,

And bowe your eares vnto my doleful dittie.

And Pan thou shepheards God, that once didst loue,

Pitie the paines, that thou thy selfe didst proue.





Thou barrein ground, whome winters wrath hath wasted,

Art made a myrrhour, to behold my plight:

Whilome thy fresh spring flowrd, and after hasted

Thy sommer prowde with Daffadillies dight.

And now is come thy wynters stormy state,

Thy mantle mard, wherein thou mas-kedst late.





Such rage as winters, reigneth in my heart,

My life bloud friesing wtih vnkindly cold:

Such stormy stoures do breede my balefull smarte,

As if my yeare were wast, and woxen old.

And yet alas, but now my spring begonne,

And yet alas, yt is already donne.





You naked trees, whose shady leaves are lost,

Wherein the byrds were wont to build their bowre:

And now are clothd with mosse and hoary frost,

Instede of bloosmes, wherwith your buds did flowre:

I see your teares, that from your boughes doe raine,

Whose drops in drery ysicles remaine.





All so my lustfull leafe is drye and sere,

My timely buds with wayling all are wasted:

The blossome, which my braunch of youth did beare,

With breathed sighes is blowne away, & blasted,

And from mine eyes the drizling teares descend,

As on your boughes the ysicles depend.





Thou feeble flocke, whose fleece is rough and rent,

Whose knees are weak through fast and evill fare:

Mayst witnesse well by thy ill gouernement,

Thy maysters mind is ouercome with care.

Thou weak, I wanne: thou leabe, I quite forlorne:

With mourning pyne I, you with pyning mourne.





A thousand sithes I curse that carefull hower,

Wherein I longd the neighbour towne to see:

And eke tenne thousand sithes I blesse the stoure,

Wherein I sawe so fayre a sight, as shee.

Yet all for naught: snch [such] sight hath bred my bane.

Ah God, that loue should breede both ioy and payne.





It is not Hobbinol, wherefore I plaine,

Albee my loue he seeke with dayly suit:

His clownish gifts and curtsies I disdaine,

His kiddes, his cracknelles, and his early fruit.

Ah foolish Hobbinol, thy gyfts bene vayne:

Colin them gives to Rosalind againe.





I loue thilke lasse, (alas why doe I loue?)

And am forlorne, (alas why am I lorne?)

Shee deignes not my good will, but doth reproue,

And of my rurall musick holdeth scorne.

Shepheards deuise she hateth as the snake,

And laughes the songes, that Colin Clout doth make.





Wherefore my pype, albee rude Pan thou please,

Yet for thou pleasest not, where most I would:

And thou vnlucky Muse, that wontst to ease

My musing mynd, yet canst not, when thou should:

Both pype and Muse, shall sore the while abye.

So broke his oaten pype, and downe dyd lye.





By that, the welked Phoebus gan availe,

His weary waine, and nowe the frosty Night

Her mantle black through heauen gan overhaile.

Which seene, the pensife boy halfe in despight

Arose, and homeward drove his sonned sheepe,

Whose hanging heads did seeme his carefull case to weepe./CONTENT"	NAME/The Shepheardes Calender: January/NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Nature/TYPE
AUTHOR/WILLIAM SHAKESPEARE/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/Where the bee sucks, there suck I:

In a cowslips bell I lie;

There I couch when owls do cry.

On the bats back I do fly

After summer merrily.

Merrily, merrily shall I live now

Under the blossom that hangs on the bough./CONTENT"	NAME/Song: Where the bee sucks, there suck I/NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Nature/TYPE
AUTHOR/JOHN DONNE/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/Tis true, tis day, what though it be?

O wilt thou therefore rise from me?

Why should we rise because tis light?

Did we lie down because twas night?

Love, which in spite of darkness brought us hither,

Should in despite of light keep us together.



Light hath no tongue, but is all eye;

If it could speak as well as spy,

This were the worst that it could say,

That being well I fain would stay,

And that I loved my heart and honour so,

That I would not from him, that had them, go.



Must business thee from hence remove?

Oh, thats the worst disease of love,

The poor, the foul, the false, love can

Admit, but not the busied man.

He which hath business, and makes love, doth do

Such wrong, as when a married man doth woo./CONTENT"	NAME/Break of Day/NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Nature/TYPE
AUTHOR/ROBERT SOUTHWELL, SJ/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/As I in hoary winters night stood shivering in the snow,

Surprisd I was with sudden heat which made my heart to glow;

And lifting up a fearful eye to view what fire was near,

A pretty Babe all burning bright did in the air appear;

Who, scorched with excessive heat, such floods of tears did shed

As though his floods should quench his flames which with his tears were fed.

Alas! quoth he, but newly born, in fiery heats I fry,

Yet none approach to warm their hearts or feel my fire but I!

My faultless breast the furnace is, the fuel wounding thorns,

Love is the fire, and sighs the smoke, the ashes shame and scorns;

The fuel Justice layeth on, and Mercy blows the coals,

The metal in this furnace wrought are mens defiled souls,

For which, as now on fire I am to work them to their good,

      So will I melt into a bath to wash them in my blood.

      With this he vanishd out of sight and swiftly shrunk away,

      And straight I called unto mind that it was Christmas day./CONTENT"	NAME/The Burning Babe/NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Nature/TYPE
AUTHOR/WILLIAM BYRD/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/Care for thy soul as thing of greatest price,

      Made to the end to taste of power divine,

Devoid of guilt, abhorring sin and vice,

      Apt by Gods grace to virtue to incline.

Care for it so as by thy retchless train

It be not brought to taste eternal pain.



Care for thy corse, but chiefly for souls sake;

      Cut off excess, sustaining food is best;

To vanquish pride but comely clothing take;

      Seek after skill, deep ignorance detest.

Care so, I say, the flesh to feed and clothe

That thou harm not thy soul and body both.



Care for the world to do thy body right;

      Rack not thy wit to win thy wicked ways;

Seek not to oppress the weak by wrongful might;

      To pay thy due do banish all delays.

Care to dispend according to thy store,

And in like sort be mindful of the poor.



Care for thy soul, as for thy chiefest stay;

      Care for thy body for thy souls avail;

Care for the world for bodys help alway;

      Care yet but so as virtue may prevail.

Care in such sort that thou be sure of this:

Care keep thee not from heaven and heavenly bliss./CONTENT"	NAME/Care for Thy Soul as Thing of Greatest Price/NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Nature/TYPE
AUTHOR/QUEEN ELIZABETH I/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/The doubt of future foes exiles my present joy,

And wit me warns to shun such snares as threaten mine annoy;

For falsehood now doth flow, and subjects faith doth ebb,

Which should not be if reason ruled or wisdom weaved the web.

But clouds of joys untried do cloak aspiring minds,

Which turn to rain of late repent by changed course of winds.

The top of hope supposed the root upreared shall be,

And fruitless all their grafted guile, as shortly ye shall see.

The dazzled eyes with pride, which great ambition blinds,

Shall be unsealed by worthy wights whose foresight falsehood finds.

The daughter of debate that discord aye doth sow

Shall reap no gain where former rule still peace hath taught to know.

No foreign banished wight shall anchor in this port;

Our realm brooks not seditious sects, let them elsewhere resort.

My rusty sword through rest shall first his edge employ

To poll their tops that seek such change or gape for future joy./CONTENT"	NAME/The Doubt of Future Foes/NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Nature/TYPE
AUTHOR/GEORGE GASCOIGNE/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/Fie pleasure, fie! thou cloyest me with delight,

Thou fillst my mouth with sweetmeats overmuch;

I wallow still in joy both day and night:

I deem, I dream, I do, I taste, I touch,

No thing but all that smells of perfect bliss;

Fie pleasure, fie! I cannot like of this.



   To taste (sometimes) a bait of bitter gall,

To drink a draught of sour ale (some season)

To eat brown bread with homely hands in hall,

Doth much increase mens appetites, by reason,

And makes the sweet more sugard that ensues,

Since minds of men do still seek after news.



   The pamperd horse is seldom seen in breath,

Whose manger makes his grace (oftimes) to melt;

The crammed fowl comes quickly to his death;

Such colds they catch in hottest haps that swelt;

And I (much like) in pleasure scawled still,

Do fear to starve although I feed my fill.



   It might suffice that Love hath built his bower

Between my ladys lively shining eyes;

It were enough that beautys fading flower

Grows ever fresh with her in heavenly wise;

It had been well that she were fair of face,

And yet not rob all other dames of grace.



   To muse in mind, how wise, how fair, how good,

How brave, how frank, how courteous, and how true

My lady is, doth but inflame my blood

With humours such as bid my health adieu;

Since hap always when it is clomb on high,

Doth fall full low, though erst it reachd the sky.



   Lo, pleasure, lo! lo thus I lead a life

That laughs for joy, and trembleth oft for dread;

Thy pangs are such as call for changes knife

To cut the twist, or else to stretch the thread,

Which holds yfeer the bundle of my bliss:

Fie, pleasure, fie! I dare not trust to this./CONTENT"	NAME/Fie, Pleasure, Fie!/NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Nature/TYPE
AUTHOR/HENRY VIII, KING OF ENGLAND/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/Green groweth the holly,

So doth the ivy.

Though winter blasts blow never so high,

Green groweth the holly.



As the holly groweth green

And never changeth hue,

So I am, ever hath been,

Unto my lady true.



As the holly groweth green

With ivy all alone

When flowers cannot be seen

And greenwood leaves be gone,



Now unto my lady

Promise to her I make,

From all other only

To her I me betake.



Adieu, mine own lady,

Adieu, my special

Who hath my heart truly

Be sure, and ever shall./CONTENT"	NAME/Green Groweth the Holly/NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Nature/TYPE
AUTHOR/SIR THOMAS WYATT/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/Lucks, my fair falcon, and your fellows all,

   How well pleasant it were your liberty!

Ye not forsake me that fair might ye befall.

But they that sometime liked my company:

Like lice away from dead bodies they crawl.

Lo what a proof in light adversity!

But ye my birds, I swear by all your bells,

Ye be my friends, and so be but few else./CONTENT"	NAME/Lucks, My Fair Falcon/NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Nature/TYPE
AUTHOR/SIR WALTER RALEGH/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/If all the world and love were young,

And truth in every Shepherds tongue,

These pretty pleasures might me move,

To live with thee, and be thy love.



Time drives the flocks from field to fold,

When Rivers rage and Rocks grow cold,

And Philomel becometh dumb,

The rest complains of cares to come.



The flowers do fade, and wanton fields,

To wayward winter reckoning yields,

A honey tongue, a heart of gall,

Is fancys spring, but sorrows fall.



Thy gowns, thy shoes, thy beds of Roses,

Thy cap, thy kirtle, and thy posies

Soon break, soon wither, soon forgotten:

In folly ripe, in reason rotten.



Thy belt of straw and Ivy buds,

The Coral clasps and amber studs,

All these in me no means can move

To come to thee and be thy love.



But could youth last, and love still breed,

Had joys no date, nor age no need,

Then these delights my mind might move

To live with thee, and be thy love./CONTENT"	NAME/The Nymphs Reply to the Shepherd/NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Nature/TYPE
AUTHOR/EN JONSON/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/Gut eats all day and lechers all the night;

So all his meat he tasteth over twice;

And, striving so to double his delight,

He makes himself a thoroughfare of vice.

Thus in his belly can he change a sin:

Lust it comes out, that gluttony went in./CONTENT"	NAME/On Gut/NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Nature/TYPE
AUTHOR/SIR WALTER RALEGH/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/Praisd be Dianas fair and harmless light;

Praisd be the dews wherewith she moists the ground;

Praisd be her beams, the glory of the night;

Praisd be her power by which all powers abound.



Praisd be her nymphs with whom she decks the woods,

Praisd be her knights in whom true honour lives;

Praisd be that force by which she moves the floods;

Let that Diana shine which all these gives.



In heaven queen she is among the spheres;

In aye she mistress-like makes all things pure;

Eternity in her oft change she bears;

She beauty is; by her the fair endure.



Time wears her not: she doth his chariot guide;

Mortality below her orb is placd;

By her the virtue of the stars down slide;

In her is virtues perfect image cast.



         A knowledge pure it is her worth to know:

         With Circes let them dwell that think not so./CONTENT"	NAME/Praisd be Dianas Fair and Harmless Light/NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Nature/TYPE
AUTHOR/ORLANDO GIBBONS/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/The silver swan, who living had no note,

When death approached, unlocked her silent throat;

Leaning her breast against the reedy shore,

Thus sung her first and last, and sung no more:

Farewell, all joys; Oh death, come close mine eyes;

More geese than swans now live, more fools than wise./CONTENT"	NAME/The Silver Swan/NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Nature/TYPE
AUTHOR/WILLIAM SHAKESPEARE/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/Blow, blow, thou winter wind,

   Thou art not so unkind

      As mans ingratitude;

   Thy tooth is not so keen,

Because thou art not seen,

      Although thy breath be rude.

Heigh-ho! sing, heigh-ho! unto the green holly:

Most friendship is feigning, most loving mere folly:

   Then, heigh-ho, the holly!

      This life is most jolly.



   Freeze, freeze, thou bitter sky,

   That dost not bite so nigh

      As benefits forgot:

   Though thou the waters warp,

      Thy sting is not so sharp

      As friend remembered not.

Heigh-ho! sing, heigh-ho! unto the green holly.../CONTENT"	NAME/Song: Blow, blow, thou winter wind/NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Nature/TYPE
AUTHOR/WILLIAM SHAKESPEARE/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/When daisies pied and violets blue

      And lady-smocks all silver-white

And cuckoo-buds of yellow hue

      Do paint the meadows with delight,

The cuckoo then, on every tree,

Mocks married men; for thus sings he:

                                                    Cuckoo;

Cuckoo, cuckoo! O, word of fear,

Unpleasing to a married ear!



When shepherds pipe on oaten straws,

      And merry larks are ploughmen's clocks,

When turtles tread, and rooks, and daws,

      And maidens bleach their summer smocks,

The cuckoo then, on every tree,

Mocks married men; for thus sings he,

                                                    Cuckoo;

Cuckoo, cuckoo! O, word of fear,

Unpleasing to a married ear!



When icicles hang by the wall,

      And Dick the shepherd blows his nail,

And Tom bears logs into the hall,

      And milk comes frozen home in pail,

When blood is nipp'd, and ways be foul,

Then nightly sings the staring-owl,

                                                    Tu-who;

Tu-whit, tu-who!a merry note,

While greasy Joan doth keel the pot.



When all aloud the wind doth blow,

      And coughing drowns the parson's saw,

And birds sit brooding in the snow,

      And Marian's nose looks red and raw,

When roasted crabs hiss in the bowl,

Then nightly sings the staring owl,

                                                    Tu-who;

Tu-whit, tu-who!a merry note,

While greasy Joan doth keel the pot./CONTENT"	NAME/Song: When daisies pied and violets blue /NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Nature/TYPE
AUTHOR/WILLIAM SHAKESPEARE/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/When that I was and a little tiny boy,

    With hey, ho, the wind and the rain,

A foolish thing was but a toy,

    For the rain it raineth every day.



But when I came to mans estate,

    With hey, ho, the wind and the rain,

Gainst knaves and thieves men shut their gate,

    For the rain it raineth every day.



But when I came, alas! to wive,

    With hey, ho, the wind and the rain,

By swaggering could I never thrive,

    For the rain it raineth every day.



But when I came unto my beds,

    With hey, ho, the wind and the rain,

With toss-pots still had drunken heads,

    For the rain it raineth every day.



A great while ago the world begun,

    With hey, ho, the wind and the rain,

But thats all one, our play is done,

    And well strive to please you every day./CONTENT"	NAME/Song: When that I was and a little tiny boy (With hey, ho, the wind and the rain)/NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Nature/TYPE
AUTHOR/WILLIAM SHAKESPEARE/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/From fairest creatures we desire increase,

That thereby beautys rose might never die,

But as the riper should by time decease,

His tender heir might bear his memory;

But thou, contracted to thine own bright eyes,

Feedst thy lights flame with self-substantial fuel,

Making a famine where abundance lies,

Thyself thy foe, to thy sweet self too cruel.

Though that art now the worlds fresh ornament

And only herald to the gaudy spring,

Within thine own bud buriest thy content,

And, tender churl, makst waste in niggarding.

   Pity the world, or else this glutton be,

   To eat the worlds due, by the grave and thee./CONTENT"	NAME/Sonnet 1: From fairest creatures we desire increase/NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Nature/TYPE
AUTHOR/WILLIAM SHAKESPEARE/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/Shall I compare thee to a summers day?

Thou art more lovely and more temperate:

Rough winds do shake the darling buds of May,

And summers lease hath all too short a date;

Sometime too hot the eye of heaven shines,

And often is his gold complexion dimm'd;

And every fair from fair sometime declines,

By chance or natures changing course untrimm'd;

But thy eternal summer shall not fade,

Nor lose possession of that fair thou owst;

Nor shall death brag thou wanderst in his shade,

When in eternal lines to time thou growst:

   So long as men can breathe or eyes can see,

   So long lives this, and this gives life to thee./CONTENT"	NAME/Sonnet 18: Shall I compare thee to a summers day?/NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Nature/TYPE
AUTHOR/THOMAS NASHE/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/Spring, the sweet spring, is the years pleasant king,

Then blooms each thing, then maids dance in a ring,

Cold doth not sting, the pretty birds do sing:

      Cuckoo, jug-jug, pu-we, to-witta-woo!



The palm and may make country houses gay,

Lambs frisk and play, the shepherds pipe all day,

And we hear aye birds tune this merry lay:

      Cuckoo, jug-jug, pu-we, to-witta-woo!



The fields breathe sweet, the daisies kiss our feet,

Young lovers meet, old wives a-sunning sit,

In every street these tunes our ears do greet:

      Cuckoo, jug-jug, pu-we, to witta-woo!

            Spring, the sweet spring!/CONTENT"	NAME/Spring, the sweet spring/NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Nature/TYPE
AUTHOR/QUEEN ELIZABETH I/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/When I was fair and young, then favor graced me.

Of many was I sought their mistress for to be.

But I did scorn them all and answered them therefore:

Go, go, go, seek some other where; importune me no more.



How many weeping eyes I made to pine in woe,

How many sighing hearts I have not skill to show,

But I the prouder grew and still this spake therefore:

Go, go, go, seek some other where, importune me no more.



Then spake fair Venus son, that proud victorious boy,

Saying: You dainty dame, for that you be so coy,

I will so pluck your plumes as you shall say no more:

Go, go, go, seek some other where, importune me no more.



As soon as he had said, such change grew in my breast

That neither night nor day I could take any rest.

Wherefore I did repent that I had said before:

Go, go, go, seek some other where, importune me no more./CONTENT"	NAME/When I Was Fair and Young/NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Nature/TYPE
AUTHOR/QUEEN ELIZABETH I/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/No crooked leg, no bleared eye,

No part deformed out of kind,

Nor yet so ugly half can be

As is the inward suspicious mind./CONTENT"	NAME/Written in her French Psalter/NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Nature/TYPE
AUTHOR/JOHN DONNE/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/Twice or thrice had I lov'd thee,

Before I knew thy face or name;

So in a voice, so in a shapeless flame

Angels affect us oft, and worshipp'd be;

         Still when, to where thou wert, I came,

Some lovely glorious nothing I did see.

         But since my soul, whose child love is,

Takes limbs of flesh, and else could nothing do,

         More subtle than the parent is

Love must not be, but take a body too;

         And therefore what thou wert, and who,

                I bid Love ask, and now

That it assume thy body, I allow,

And fix itself in thy lip, eye, and brow.



Whilst thus to ballast love I thought,

And so more steadily to have gone,

With wares which would sink admiration,

I saw I had love's pinnace overfraught;

         Ev'ry thy hair for love to work upon

Is much too much, some fitter must be sought;

         For, nor in nothing, nor in things

Extreme, and scatt'ring bright, can love inhere;

         Then, as an angel, face, and wings

Of air, not pure as it, yet pure, doth wear,

         So thy love may be my love's sphere;

                Just such disparity

As is 'twixt air and angels' purity,

'Twixt women's love, and men's, will ever be./CONTENT"	NAME/Air and Angels/NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Nature/TYPE
AUTHOR/SIR PHILIP SIDNEY/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/With how sad steps, O Moon, thou climb'st the skies!

How silently, and with how wan a face!

What, may it be that even in heav'nly place

That busy archer his sharp arrows tries!

Sure, if that long-with love-acquainted eyes

Can judge of love, thou feel'st a lover's case,

I read it in thy looks; thy languish'd grace

To me, that feel the like, thy state descries.

Then, ev'n of fellowship, O Moon, tell me,

Is constant love deem'd there but want of wit?

Are beauties there as proud as here they be?

Do they above love to be lov'd, and yet

Those lovers scorn whom that love doth possess?

Do they call virtue there ungratefulness?/CONTENT"	NAME/Astrophil and Stella 31: With how sad steps, O Moon, thou climb'st the skies/NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Nature/TYPE
AUTHOR/SIR PHILIP SIDNEY/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/When Nature made her chief work, Stella's eyes,

In colour black why wrapt she beams so bright?

Would she in beamy black, like painter wise,

Frame daintiest lustre, mix'd of shades and light?

Or did she else that sober hue devise,

In object best to knit and strength our sight;

Lest, if no veil these brave gleams did disguise,

They, sunlike, should more dazzle than delight?

Or would she her miraculous power show,

That, whereas black seems beauty's contrary,

She even in black doth make all beauties flow?

Both so, and thus, she, minding Love should be

Plac'd ever there, gave him this mourning weed

To honour all their deaths who for her bleed./CONTENT"	NAME/Astrophil and Stella 7: When Nature made her chief work, Stella's eyes/NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Nature/TYPE
AUTHOR/JOHN DONNE/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/Come live with me, and be my love,

And we will some new pleasures prove

Of golden sands, and crystal brooks,

With silken lines, and silver hooks.



There will the river whispering run

Warm'd by thy eyes, more than the sun;

And there the 'enamour'd fish will stay,

Begging themselves they may betray.



When thou wilt swim in that live bath,

Each fish, which every channel hath,

Will amorously to thee swim,

Gladder to catch thee, than thou him.



If thou, to be so seen, be'st loth,

By sun or moon, thou dark'nest both,

And if myself have leave to see,

I need not their light having thee.



Let others freeze with angling reeds,

And cut their legs with shells and weeds,

Or treacherously poor fish beset,

With strangling snare, or windowy net.



Let coarse bold hands from slimy nest

The bedded fish in banks out-wrest;

Or curious traitors, sleeve-silk flies,

Bewitch poor fishes' wand'ring eyes.



For thee, thou need'st no such deceit,

For thou thyself art thine own bait:

That fish, that is not catch'd thereby,

Alas, is wiser far than I./CONTENT"	NAME/The Bait/NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Nature/TYPE
AUTHOR/JOHN DONNE/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/Our storm is past, and that storm's tyrannous rage,

A stupid calm, but nothing it, doth 'suage.

The fable is inverted, and far more

A block afflicts, now, than a stork before.

Storms chafe, and soon wear out themselves, or us;

In calms, Heaven laughs to see us languish thus.

As steady'as I can wish that my thoughts were,

Smooth as thy mistress' glass, or what shines there,

The sea is now; and, as the isles which we

Seek, when we can move, our ships rooted be.

As water did in storms, now pitch runs out;

As lead, when a fir'd church becomes one spout.

And all our beauty, and our trim, decays,

Like courts removing, or like ended plays.

The fighting-place now seamen's rags supply;

And all the tackling is a frippery.

No use of lanthorns; and in one place lay

Feathers and dust, to-day and yesterday.

Earth's hollownesses, which the world's lungs are,

Have no more wind than the upper vault of air.

We can nor lost friends nor sought foes recover,

But meteor-like, save that we move not, hover.

Only the calenture together draws

Dear friends, which meet dead in great fishes' jaws;

And on the hatches, as on altars, lies

Each one, his own priest, and own sacrifice.

Who live, that miracle do multiply,

Where walkers in hot ovens do not die.

If in despite of these we swim, that hath

No more refreshing than our brimstone bath;

But from the sea into the ship we turn,

Like parboil'd wretches, on the coals to burn.

Like Bajazet encag'd, the shepherds' scoff,

Or like slack-sinew'd Samson, his hair off,

Languish our ships. Now as a myriad

Of ants durst th' emperor's lov'd snake invade,

The crawling gallies, sea-gaols, finny chips,

Might brave our pinnaces, now bed-rid ships.

Whether a rotten state, and hope of gain,

Or to disuse me from the queasy pain

Of being belov'd and loving, or the thirst

Of honour, or fair death, out-push'd me first,

I lose my end; for here, as well as I,

A desperate may live, and a coward die.

Stag, dog, and all which from or towards flies,

Is paid with life or prey, or doing dies.

Fate grudges us all, and doth subtly lay

A scourge, 'gainst which we all forget to pray.

He that at sea prays for more wind, as well

Under the poles may beg cold, heat in hell.

What are we then? How little more, alas,

Is man now, than before he was? He was

Nothing; for us, we are for nothing fit;

Chance, or ourselves, still disproportion it.

We have no power, no will, no sense; I lie,

I should not then thus feel this misery./CONTENT"	NAME/The Calm/NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Nature/TYPE
AUTHOR/JOHN DONNE/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/Where, like a pillow on a bed

         A pregnant bank swell'd up to rest

The violet's reclining head,

         Sat we two, one another's best.

Our hands were firmly cemented

         With a fast balm, which thence did spring;

Our eye-beams twisted, and did thread

         Our eyes upon one double string;

So to'intergraft our hands, as yet

         Was all the means to make us one,

And pictures in our eyes to get

         Was all our propagation.

As 'twixt two equal armies fate

         Suspends uncertain victory,

Our souls (which to advance their state

         Were gone out) hung 'twixt her and me.

And whilst our souls negotiate there,

         We like sepulchral statues lay;

All day, the same our postures were,

         And we said nothing, all the day.

If any, so by love refin'd

         That he soul's language understood,

And by good love were grown all mind,

         Within convenient distance stood,

He (though he knew not which soul spake,

         Because both meant, both spake the same)

Might thence a new concoction take

         And part far purer than he came.

This ecstasy doth unperplex,

         We said, and tell us what we love;

We see by this it was not sex,

         We see we saw not what did move;

But as all several souls contain

         Mixture of things, they know not what,

Love these mix'd souls doth mix again

         And makes both one, each this and that.

A single violet transplant,

         The strength, the colour, and the size,

(All which before was poor and scant)

         Redoubles still, and multiplies.

When love with one another so

         Interinanimates two souls,

That abler soul, which thence doth flow,

         Defects of loneliness controls.

We then, who are this new soul, know

         Of what we are compos'd and made,

For th' atomies of which we grow

         Are souls, whom no change can invade.

But oh alas, so long, so far,

         Our bodies why do we forbear?

They'are ours, though they'are not we; we are

         The intelligences, they the spheres.

We owe them thanks, because they thus

         Did us, to us, at first convey,

Yielded their senses' force to us,

         Nor are dross to us, but allay.

On man heaven's influence works not so,

         But that it first imprints the air;

So soul into the soul may flow,

            Though it to body first repair.

As our blood labors to beget

         Spirits, as like souls as it can,

Because such fingers need to knit

         That subtle knot which makes us man,

So must pure lovers' souls descend

         T' affections, and to faculties,

Which sense may reach and apprehend,

         Else a great prince in prison lies.

To'our bodies turn we then, that so

         Weak men on love reveal'd may look;

Love's mysteries in souls do grow,

         But yet the body is his book.

And if some lover, such as we,

         Have heard this dialogue of one,

Let him still mark us, he shall see

         Small change, when we'are to bodies gone./CONTENT"	NAME/The Ecstasy/NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Nature/TYPE
AUTHOR/JOHN DONNE/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/No spring nor summer beauty hath such grace

         As I have seen in one autumnal face.

Young beauties force our love, and that's a rape,

         This doth but counsel, yet you cannot scape.

If 'twere a shame to love, here 'twere no shame;

         Affection here takes reverence's name.

Were her first years the golden age? That's true,

         But now she's gold oft tried and ever new.

That was her torrid and inflaming time,

         This is her tolerable tropic clime.

Fair eyes, who asks more heat than comes from hence,

         He in a fever wishes pestilence.

Call not these wrinkles, graves; if graves they were,

         They were Love's graves, for else he is no where.

Yet lies not Love dead here, but here doth sit

         Vow'd to this trench, like an anachorit;

And here till hers, which must be his death, come,

         He doth not dig a grave, but build a tomb.

Here dwells he; though he sojourn ev'rywhere

         In progress, yet his standing house is here:

Here where still evening is, not noon nor night,

         Where no voluptuousness, yet all delight.

In all her words, unto all hearers fit,

         You may at revels, you at council, sit.

This is Love's timber, youth his underwood;

         There he, as wine in June, enrages blood,

Which then comes seasonabliest when our taste

         And appetite to other things is past.

Xerxes' strange Lydian love, the platan tree,

         Was lov'd for age, none being so large as she,

Or else because, being young, nature did bless

         Her youth with age's glory, barrenness.

If we love things long sought, age is a thing

         Which we are fifty years in compassing;

If transitory things, which soon decay,

         Age must be loveliest at the latest day.

But name not winter faces, whose skin's slack,

         Lank as an unthrift's purse, but a soul's sack;

Whose eyes seek light within, for all here's shade;

         Whose mouths are holes, rather worn out than made;

Whose every tooth to a several place is gone,

         To vex their souls at resurrection:

Name not these living death's-heads unto me,

         For these, not ancient, but antique be.

I hate extremes, yet I had rather stay

         With tombs than cradles, to wear out a day.

Since such love's natural lation is, may still

         My love descend, and journey down the hill,

Not panting after growing beauties. So,

         I shall ebb on with them who homeward go./CONTENT"	NAME/Elegy IX: The Autumnal/NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Nature/TYPE
AUTHOR/JOHN DONNE/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/Here take my picture; though I bid farewell

Thine, in my heart, where my soul dwells, shall dwell.

'Tis like me now, but I dead, 'twill be more

When we are shadows both, than 'twas before.

When weather-beaten I come back, my hand

Perhaps with rude oars torn, or sun beams tann'd,

My face and breast of haircloth, and my head

With care's rash sudden storms being o'erspread,

My body'a sack of bones, broken within,

And powder's blue stains scatter'd on my skin;

If rival fools tax thee to'have lov'd a man

So foul and coarse as, oh, I may seem then,

This shall say what I was, and thou shalt say,

""Do his hurts reach me? doth my worth decay?

Or do they reach his judging mind, that he

Should now love less, what he did love to see?

That which in him was fair and delicate,

Was but the milk which in love's childish state

Did nurse it; who now is grown strong enough

To feed on that, which to disus'd tastes seems tough.""/CONTENT"	NAME/Elegy V: His Picture/NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Nature/TYPE
AUTHOR/JOHN DONNE/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/Thou hast made me, and shall thy work decay?

Repair me now, for now mine end doth haste,

I run to death, and death meets me as fast,

And all my pleasures are like yesterday;

I dare not move my dim eyes any way,

Despair behind, and death before doth cast

Such terror, and my feebled flesh doth waste

By sin in it, which it towards hell doth weigh.

Only thou art above, and when towards thee

By thy leave I can look, I rise again;

But our old subtle foe so tempteth me,

That not one hour I can myself sustain;

Thy grace may wing me to prevent his art,

And thou like adamant draw mine iron heart./CONTENT"	NAME/Holy Sonnets: Thou hast made me, and shall thy work decay?/NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Nature/TYPE
AUTHOR/JOHN DONNE/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/Since I am coming to that holy room,

         Where, with thy choir of saints for evermore,

I shall be made thy music; as I come

         I tune the instrument here at the door,

         And what I must do then, think here before.



Whilst my physicians by their love are grown

         Cosmographers, and I their map, who lie

Flat on this bed, that by them may be shown

         That this is my south-west discovery,

      Per fretum febris, by these straits to die,



I joy, that in these straits I see my west;

         For, though their currents yield return to none,

What shall my west hurt me? As west and east

         In all flat maps (and I am one) are one,

         So death doth touch the resurrection.



Is the Pacific Sea my home? Or are

         The eastern riches? Is Jerusalem?

Anyan, and Magellan, and Gibraltar,

         All straits, and none but straits, are ways to them,

         Whether where Japhet dwelt, or Cham, or Shem.



We think that Paradise and Calvary,

         Christ's cross, and Adam's tree, stood in one place;

Look, Lord, and find both Adams met in me;

         As the first Adam's sweat surrounds my face,

         May the last Adam's blood my soul embrace.



So, in his purple wrapp'd, receive me, Lord;

         By these his thorns, give me his other crown;

And as to others' souls I preach'd thy word,

         Be this my text, my sermon to mine own:

""Therefore that he may raise, the Lord throws down.""/CONTENT"	NAME/Hymn to God, My God, in My Sickness/NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Nature/TYPE
AUTHOR/SIR THOMAS WYATT/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/My galley, charged with forgetfulness,

Thorough sharp seas in winter nights doth pass

'Tween rock and rock; and eke mine en'my, alas,

That is my lord, steereth with cruelness;

And every owre a thought in readiness,

As though that death were light in such a case.

An endless wind doth tear the sail apace

Of forced sighs and trusty fearfulness.

A rain of tears, a cloud of dark disdain,

Hath done the weared cords great hinderance;

Wreathed with error and eke with ignorance.

The stars be hid that led me to this pain;

Drowned is Reason that should me comfort,

And I remain despairing of the port./CONTENT"	NAME/My Galley, Charged with Forgetfulness/NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Nature/TYPE
AUTHOR/SIR THOMAS WYATT/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/My mother's maids, when they did sew and spin,

They sang sometime a song of the field mouse,

That, for because her livelood was but thin,



Would needs go seek her townish sister's house.

She thought herself endured too much pain;

The stormy blasts her cave so sore did souse



That when the furrows swimmed with the rain,

She must lie cold and wet in sorry plight;

And worse than that, bare meat there did remain



To comfort her when she her house had dight;

Sometime a barley corn; sometime a bean;

For which she laboured hard both day and night



In harvest time whilst she might go and glean;

And where store was stroyed with the flood,

Then well away! for she undone was clean.



Then was she fain to take instead of food

Sleep, if she might, her hunger to beguile.

""My sister,"" quod she, ""hath a living good,



And hence from me she dwelleth not a mile.

In cold and storm she lieth warm and dry

In bed of down; the dirt doth not defile



Her tender foot, she laboureth not as I.

Richly she feedeth and at the richman's cost,

And for her meat she needs not crave nor cry.



By sea, by land, of the delicates, the most

Her cater seeks, and spareth for no peril.

She feedeth on boiled bacon meet and roast,



And hath thereof neither charge nor travail;

And when she list, the liquor of the grape

Doth glad her heart till that her belly swell.""



And at this journey she maketh but a jape;

So forth she goeth, trusting of all this wealth

With her sister her part so for to shape,



That if she might keep herself in health,

To live a lady while her life doth last.

And to the door now is she come by stealth,



And with her foot anon she scrapeth full fast.

Th' other for fear durst not well scarce appear,

Of every noise so was the wretch aghast.



At last she asked softly who was there.

And in her language, as well as she could,

""Peep!"" quod the other. ""Sister, I am here.""



""Peace,"" quod the towny mouse, ""why speakest thou so loud?""

And by the hand she took her fair and well.

""Welcome,"" quod she, ""my sister, by the Rood!""



She feasted her, that joy it was to tell

The fare they had; they drank the wine so clear,

And as to purpose now and then it fell,



She cheered her with ""How, sister, what cheer!""

Amids this joy befell a sorry chance,

That, well away! the stranger bought full dear



The fare she had, for, as she look askance,

Under a stool she spied two steaming eyes

In a round head with sharp ears. In France



Was never mouse so fear'd, for the unwise

Had not i-seen such a beast before,

Yet had nature taught her after her guise



To know her foe and dread him evermore.

The towny mouse fled, she know whither to go;

Th' other had no shift, but wonders sore



Feard of her life. At home she wished her tho,

And to the door, alas! as she did skip,

The Heaven it would, lo! and eke her chance was so,



At the threshold her silly foot did trip;

And ere she might recover it again,

The traitor cat had caught her by the hip,



And made her there against her will remain,

That had forgotten her poor surety and rest

For seeming wealth wherein she thought to reign.



Alas, my Poynz, how men do seek the best

And find the worst, by error as they stray!

And no marvail; when sight is so opprest.



And blind the guide; anon out of the way

Goeth guide and all in seeking quiet life.

O wretched minds, there is no gold that may



Grant that ye seek; no war, no peace, no strife.

No, no, although thy head were hooped with gold,

Sergeant with mace, hawbert, sword, nor knife,



Cannot repulse the care that follow should.

Each kind of life hath with him his disease.

Live in delight even as thy lust would,



And thou shalt find, when lust doth most thee please,

It irketh straight and by itself doth fade.

A small thing it is that may thy mind appease.



None of ye all there is that is so mad

To seek grapes upon brambles or breres;

Nor none, I trow, that hath his wit so bad



To set his hay for conies over rivers,

Ne ye set not a drag-net for an hare;

And yet the thing that most is your desire



Ye do mis-seek with more travail and care.

Make plain thine heart, that it be not knotted

With hope or dread, and see thy will be bare



From all affects, whom vice hath ever spotted.

Thyself content with that is thee assigned,

And use it well that is to thee allotted.



Then seek no more out of thyself to find

The thing that thou hast sought so long before,

For thou shalt feel it sitting in thy mind.



Mad, if ye list to continue your sore,

Let present pass and gape on time to come,

And deep yourself in travail more and more.



Henceforth, my Poynz, this shall be all and some,

These wretched fools shall have nought else of me;

But to the great God and to his high doom,



None other pain pray I for them to be,

But when the rage doth lead them from the right,

That, looking backward, Virtue they may see,



Even as she is, so goodly fair and bright;

And whilst they clasp their lusts in arms across,

Grant them, good Lord, as Thou mayst of Thy might

To fret inward for losing such a loss./CONTENT"	NAME/Of the Mean and Sure Estate/NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Nature/TYPE
AUTHOR/JOHN DONNE/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/Forget this rotten world, and unto thee

Let thine own times as an old story be.

Be not concern'd; study not why, nor when;

Do not so much as not believe a man.

For though to err, be worst, to try truths forth

Is far more business than this world is worth.

I'he world is but a carcass; thou art fed

By it, but as a worm, that carcass bred;

And why shouldst thou, poor worm, consider more,

When this world will grow better than before,

Than those thy fellow-worms do think upon

That carcass's last resurrection?

Forget this world, and scarce think of it so,

As of old clothes, cast off a year ago.

To be thus stupid is alacrity;

Men thus lethargic have best memory.

Look upward; that's towards her, whose happy state

We now lament not, but congratulate.

She, to whom all this world was but a stage,

Where all sat heark'ning how her youthful age

Should be employ'd, because in all she did

Some figure of the golden times was hid.

Who could not lack, what'er this world could give,

Because she was the form, that made it live;

Nor could complain that this world was unfit

To be stay'd in, then when she was in it;

She, that first tried indifferent desires

By virtue, and virtue by religious fires;

She, to whose person paradise adher'd,

As courts to princes; she, whose eyes enspher'd

Star-light enough t' have made the South control,

(Had she been there) the star-full Northern Pole;

She, she is gone; she is gone; when thou knowest this,

What fragmentary rubbish this world is

Thou knowest, and that it is not worth a thought;

He honours it too much that thinks it nought.

Think then, my soul, that death is but a groom,

Which brings a taper to the outward room,

Whence thou spiest first a little glimmering light,

And after brings it nearer to thy sight;

For such approaches doth heaven make in death.

Think thyself labouring now with broken breath,

And think those broken and soft notes to be

Division, and thy happiest harmony.

Think thee laid on thy death-bed, loose and slack,

And think that but unbinding of a pack,

To take one precious thing, thy soul, from thence.

Think thyself parch'd with fever's violence;

Anger thine ague more, by calling it

Thy physic; chide the slackness of the fit.

Think that thou hear'st thy knell, and think no more,

But that, as bells call'd thee to church before,

So this to the Triumphant Church calls thee.

Think Satan's sergeants round about thee be,

And think that but for legacies they thrust;

Give one thy pride, to'another give thy lust;

Give them those sins which they gave thee before,

And trust th' immaculate blood to wash thy score.

Think thy friends weeping round, and think that they

Weep but because they go not yet thy way.

Think that they close thine eyes, and think in this,

That they confess much in the world amiss,

Who dare not trust a dead man's eye with that

Which they from God and angels cover not.

Think that they shroud thee up, and think from thence

They reinvest thee in white innocence.

Think that thy body rots, and (if so low,

Thy soul exalted so, thy thoughts can go)

Think thee a prince, who of themselves create

Worms, which insensibly devour their state.

Think that they bury thee, and think that rite

Lays thee to sleep but a Saint Lucy's night./CONTENT"	NAME/Of the Progress of the Soul: The Second Anniversary/NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Nature/TYPE
AUTHOR/CHRISTOPHER MARLOWE/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/Come live with me and be my love,

And we will all the pleasures prove,

That Valleys, groves, hills, and fields,

Woods, or steepy mountain yields.



And we will sit upon the Rocks,

Seeing the Shepherds feed their flocks,

By shallow Rivers to whose falls

Melodious birds sing Madrigals.



And I will make thee beds of Roses

And a thousand fragrant posies,

A cap of flowers, and a kirtle

Embroidered all with leaves of Myrtle;



A gown made of the finest wool

Which from our pretty Lambs we pull;

Fair lined slippers for the cold,

With buckles of the purest gold;



A belt of straw and Ivy buds,

With Coral clasps and Amber studs:

And if these pleasures may thee move,

Come live with me, and be my love.



The Shepherds Swains shall dance and sing

For thy delight each May-morning:

If these delights thy mind may move,

Then live with me, and be my love./CONTENT"	NAME/The Passionate Shepherd to His Love/NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Nature/TYPE
AUTHOR/EDMUND SPENSER/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/CALM was the day, and through the trembling air

Sweet breathing Zephyrus did softly play,

A gentle spirit, that lightly did delay

Hot Titan's beams, which then did glister fair;

When I whose sullen care,

Through discontent of my long fruitless stay

In prince's court, and expectation vain

Of idle hopes, which still do fly away

Like empty shadows, did afflict my brain,

Walked forth to ease my pain

Along the shore of silver streaming Thames,

Whose rutty bank, the which his river hems,

Was painted all with variable flowers,

And all the meads adorned with dainty gems,

Fit to deck maidens' bowers,

And crown their paramours,

Against the bridal day, which is not long:

      Sweet Thames, run softly, till I end my song.



There, in a meadow, by the river's side,

A flock of nymphs I chanced to espy,

All lovely daughters of the flood thereby,

With goodly greenish locks, all loose untied,

As each had been a bride;

And each one had a little wicker basket,

Made of fine twigs, entrailed curiously,

In which they gathered flowers to fill their flasket,

And with fine fingers cropt full featously

The tender stalks on high.

Of every sort, which in that meadow grew,

They gathered some; the violet pallid blue,

The little daisy, that at evening closes,

The virgin lily, and the primrose true,

With store of vermeil roses,

To deck their bridegrooms' posies

Against the bridal day, which was not long:

      Sweet Thames, run softly, till I end my song.



With that, I saw two swans of goodly hue

Come softly swimming down along the Lee;

Two fairer birds I yet did never see.

The snow which doth the top of Pindus strew,

Did never whiter shew,

Nor Jove himself, when he a swan would be

For love of Leda, whiter did appear:

Yet Leda was they say as white as he,

Yet not so white as these, nor nothing near.

So purely white they were,

That even the gentle stream, the which them bare,

Seemed foul to them, and bade his billows spare

To wet their silken feathers, lest they might

Soil their fair plumes with water not so fair,

And mar their beauties bright,

That shone as heaven's light,

Against their bridal day, which was not long:

      Sweet Thames, run softly, till I end my song.



Eftsoons the nymphs, which now had flowers their fill,

Ran all in haste, to see that silver brood,

As they came floating on the crystal flood.

Whom when they saw, they stood amazed still,

Their wondering eyes to fill.

Them seemed they never saw a sight so fair,

Of fowls so lovely, that they sure did deem

Them heavenly born, or to be that same pair

Which through the sky draw Venus' silver team;

For sure they did not seem

To be begot of any earthly seed,

But rather angels, or of angels' breed:

Yet were they bred of Somers-heat they say,

In sweetest season, when each flower and weed

The earth did fresh array,

So fresh they seemed as day,

Even as their bridal day, which was not long:

      Sweet Thames, run softly, till I end my song.



Then forth they all out of their baskets drew

Great store of flowers, the honour of the field,

That to the sense did fragrant odours yield,

All which upon those goodly birds they threw,

And all the waves did strew,

That like old Peneus' waters they did seem,

When down along by pleasant Tempe's shore,

Scattered with flowers, through Thessaly they stream,

That they appear through lilies' plenteous store,

Like a bride's chamber floor.

Two of those nymphs meanwhile, two garlands bound,

Of freshest flowers which in that mead they found,

The which presenting all in trim array,

Their snowy foreheads therewithal they crowned,

Whilst one did sing this lay,

Prepared against that day,

Against their bridal day, which was not long:

      Sweet Thames, run softly, till I end my song.



'Ye gentle birds, the world's fair ornament,

And heaven's glory, whom this happy hour

Doth lead unto your lovers' blissful bower,

Joy may you have and gentle heart's content

Of your love's complement:

And let fair Venus, that is queen of love,

With her heart-quelling son upon you smile,

Whose smile, they say, hath virtue to remove

All love's dislike, and friendship's faulty guile

For ever to assoil.

Let endless peace your steadfast hearts accord,

And blessed plenty wait upon your board,

And let your bed with pleasures chaste abound,

That fruitful issue may to you afford,

Which may your foes confound,

And make your joys redound

Upon your bridal day, which is not long:

      Sweet Thames, run softly, till I end my song.'



So ended she; and all the rest around

To her redoubled that her undersong,

Which said their bridal day should not be long.

And gentle echo from the neighbour ground

Their accents did resound.

So forth those joyous birds did pass along,

Adown the Lee, that to them murmured low,

As he would speak, but that he lacked a tongue,

Yet did by signs his glad affection show,

Making his stream run slow.

And all the fowl which in his flood did dwell

Gan flock about these twain, that did excel

The rest so far as Cynthia doth shend

The lesser stars. So they, enranged well,

Did on those two attend,

And their best service lend,

Against their wedding day, which was not long:

      Sweet Thames, run softly, till I end my song.



At length they all to merry London came,

To merry London, my most kindly nurse,

That to me gave this life's first native source;

Though from another place I take my name,

An house of ancient fame.

There when they came, whereas those bricky towers,

The which on Thames' broad aged back do ride,

Where now the studious lawyers have their bowers

There whilom wont the Templar Knights to bide,

Till they decayed through pride:

Next whereunto there stands a stately place,

Where oft I gained gifts and goodly grace

Of that great lord, which therein wont to dwell,

Whose want too well now feels my friendless case.

But ah, here fits not well

Old woes but joys to tell

Against the bridal day, which is not long:

      Sweet Thames, run softly, till I end my song.



Yet therein now doth lodge a noble peer,

Great England's glory, and the world's wide wonder,

Whose dreadful name late through all Spain did thunder,

And Hercules' two pillars standing near

Did make to quake and fear:

Fair branch of honour, flower of chivalry,

That fillest England with thy triumph's fame,

Joy have thou of thy noble victory,

And endless happiness of thine own name

That promiseth the same:

That through thy prowess and victorious arms,

Thy country may be freed from foreign harms;

And great Elisa's glorious name may ring

Through all the world, filled with thy wide alarms,

Which some brave Muse may sing

To ages following,

Upon the bridal day, which is not long:

      Sweet Thames, run softly, till I end my song.



From those high towers this noble lord issuing,

Like radiant Hesper when his golden hair

In th'Ocean billows he hath bathed fair,

Descended to the river's open viewing,

With a great train ensuing.

Above the rest were goodly to be seen

Two gentle knights of lovely face and feature

Beseeming well the bower of any queen,

With gifts of wit and ornaments of nature,

Fit for so goodly stature;

That like the twins of Jove they seemed in sight,

Which deck the baldric of the heavens bright.

They two forth pacing to the river's side,

Received those two fair birds, their love's delight;

Which, at th' appointed tide,

Each one did make his bride

Against their bridal day, which is not long:

      Sweet Thames, run softly, till I end my song./CONTENT"	NAME/Prothalamion/NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Nature/TYPE
AUTHOR/EDMUND SPENSER/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/THENOT    &      HOBBINOLL

Tell me good Hobbinoll, what garres thee greete?

What? hath some Wolfe thy tender Lambes ytorne?

Or is thy Bagpype broke, that soundes so sweete?

Or art thou of thy loved lasse forlorne?



Or bene thine eyes attempred to the yeare,

Quenching the gasping furrowes thirst with rayne?

Like April shoure, so stremes the trickling teares

Adowne thy cheeke, to quenche thy thristye payne.



HOBBINOLL

Nor thys, nor that, so muche doeth make me mourne,

But for the ladde, whome long I lovd so deare,

Nowe loves a lasse, that all his love doth scorne:

He plongd in payne, his tressed locks dooth teare.



Shepheards delights he dooth them all forsweare,

Hys pleasaunt Pipe, whych made us meriment,

He wylfully hath broke, and doth forbeare

His wonted songs, wherein he all outwent.



THENOT

What is he for a Ladde, you so lament?

Ys love such pinching payne to them, that prove?

And hath he skill to make so excellent,

Yet hath so little skill to brydle love?



HOBBINOLL

Colin thou kenst, the Southerne shepheardes boye:

Him Love hath wounded with a deadly darte.

Whilome on him was all my care and joye,

Forcing with gyfts to winne his wanton heart.



But now from me hys madding mynd is starte,

And woes the Widdowes daughter of the glenne:

So nowe fayre Rosalind hath bredde hys smart,

So now his frend is chaunged for a frenne.



THENOT

But if hys ditties bene so trimly dight,

I pray thee Hobbinoll, recorde some one:

The whiles our flockes doe graze about in sight,

And we close shrowded in thys shade alone.



HOBBINOLL

Contented I: then will I singe his laye

Of fayre Elisa, Queene of shepheardes all:

Which once he made, as by a spring he laye,

And tuned it unto the Waters fall.



Ye dayntye Nymphs, that in this blessed Brooke

         doe bathe your brest,

Forsake your watry bowres, and hether looke,

         at my request:

And eke you Virgins, that on Parnasse dwell,

Whence floweth Helicon the learned well,

         Helpe me to blaze

         Her worthy praise,

Which in her sexe doth all excell.



Of fayre Eliza be your silver song,

         that blessed wight:

The flowre of Virgins, may shee florish long,

         In princely plight.

For shee is Syrinx daughter without spotte,

Which Pan the shepheards God of her begot:

         So sprong her grace

         Of heavenly race,

No mortall blemishe may her blotte.



See, where she sits upon the grassie greene,

         (O seemely sight)

Yclad in Scarlot like a mayden Queene,

         And Ermines white.

Upon her head a Cremosin coronet,

With Damaske roses and Daffadillies set:

         Bayleaves betweene,

         And Primroses greene

Embellish the sweete Violet.



Tell me, have ye seene her angelick face,

         Like Ph{oe}be fayre?

Her heavenly haveour, her princely grace

         can you well compare?

The Redde rose medled with the White yfere,

In either cheeke depeincten lively chere.

         Her modest eye,

         Her Majestie,

Where have you seene the like, but there?



I sawe Ph{oe}bus thrust out his golden hedde,

         upon her to gaze:

But when he sawe, how broade her beames did spredde,

         it did him amaze.

He blusht to see another Sunne belowe,

Ne durst againe his fyrye face out showe:

         Let him, if he dare,

         His brightnesse compare

With hers, to have the overthrowe.



Shewe thy selfe Cynthia with thy silver rayes,

         and be not abasht:

When shee the beames of her beauty displayes,

         O how art thou dasht?

But I will not match her with Latonaes seede,

Such follie great sorow to Niobe did breede.

         Now she is a stone,

         And makes dayly mone,

Warning all other to take heede.



Pan may be proud, that ever he begot

         such a Bellibone,

And Syrinx rejoyse, that ever was her lot

         to beare such an one.

Soone as my younglings cryen for the dam,

To her will I offer a milkwhite Lamb:

         Shee is my goddesse plaine,

         And I her shepherds swayne,

Albee forswonck and forswatt I am.



I see Calliope speede her to the place,

         where my Goddesse shines:

And after her the other Muses trace,

         with their Violines.

Bene they not Bay braunches, which they doe beare,

All for Elisa in her hand to weare?

         So sweetely they play,

         And sing all the way,

That it a heaven is to heare.



Lo how finely the graces can it foote

         to the Instrument:

They dauncen deffly, and singen soote,

         in their meriment.

Wants not a fourth grace, to make the daunce even?

Let that rowme to my Lady be yeven:

         She shalbe a grace,

         To fyll the fourth place,

And reigne with the rest in heaven.



And whither rennes this bevie of Ladies bright,

         raunged in a rowe?

They bene all Ladyes of the lake behight,

         that unto her goe.

Chloris, that is the chiefest Nymph of al,

Of Olive braunches beares a Coronall:

         Olives bene for peace,

         When wars doe surcease:

Such for a Princesse bene principall.



Ye shepheards daughters, that dwell on the greene,

         hye you there apace:

Let none come there, but that Virgins bene,

         to adorne her grace.

And when you come, whereas shee is in place,

See, that your rudeness doe not you disgrace:

         Binde your fillets faste,

         And gird in your waste,

For more finesse, with a tawdrie lace.



Bring hether the Pincke and purple Cullambine,

         With Gelliflowres:

Bring Coronations, and Sops in wine,

         worne of Paramoures.

Strowe me the ground with Daffadowndillies,

And Cowslips, and Kingcups, and loved Lillies:

         The pretie Pawnce,

         And the Chevisaunce,

Shall match with the fayre flowre Delice.



Now ryse up Elisa, decked as thou art,

         in royall aray:

And now ye daintie Damsells may depart

         echeone her way,

I feare, I have troubled your troupes to longe:

Let dame Eliza thanke you for her song.

         And if you come hether,

         When Damsines I gether,

I will part them all you among.



THENOT

And was thilk same song of Colins owne making?

Ah foolish boy, that is with love yblent:

Great pittie is, he be in such taking,

For naught caren, that bene so lewdly bent.



HOBBINOLL

Sicker I hold him, for a greater fon,

That loves the thing, he cannot purchase.

But let us homeward: for night draweth on,

And twincling starres the daylight hence chase.



THENOTS EMBLEME

O quam te memorem virgo?



HOBBINOLLS EMBLEME

O dea certe./CONTENT"	NAME/from The Shepheardes Calender: April/NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Nature/TYPE
AUTHOR/EDMUND SPENSER/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/PIERCE       &         CUDDIE

Cuddie, for shame hold up thy heavye head,

And let us cast with what delight to chace,

And weary thys long lingring Phoebus race.

Whilome thou wont the shepheards laddes to leade,

In rymes, in ridles, and in bydding base:

Now they in thee, and thou in sleepe art dead.



CUDDY

Piers, I have pyped erst so long with payne,

That all mine Oten reedes bene rent and wore:

And my poore Muse hath spent her spared store,

Yet little good hath got, and much lesse gayne,

Such pleasaunce makes the Grashopper so poore,

And ligge so layd, when Winter doth her straine.



The dapper ditties, that I wont devise,

To feede youthes fancie, and the flocking fry,

Delighten much: what I the bett for thy?

They han the pleasure, I a sclender prise.

I beate the bush, the byrds to them doe flye:

What good thereof to Cuddie can arise?



PIERS

Cuddie, the prayse is better, then the price,

The glory eke much greater then the gayne:

O what an honor is it, to restraine

The lust of lawlesse youth with good advice:

Or pricke them forth with pleasaunce of thy vaine,

Whereto thou list their trayned willes entice.



Soone as thou gynst to sette thy notes in frame,

O how the rurall routes to thee doe cleave:

Seemeth thou dost their soule of sence bereave,

All as the shepheard, that did fetch his dame

From Plutoes balefull bowre withouten leave:

His musicks might the hellish hound did tame.



CUDDIE

So praysen babes the Peacoks spotted traine,

And wondren at bright Argus blazing eye:

But who rewards him ere the more for thy?

Or feedes him once the fuller by a graine?

Sike prayse is smoke, that sheddeth in the skye,

Sike words bene wynd, and wasten soone in vayne.



PIERS

Abandon then the base and viler clowne,

Lyft up thy selfe out of the lowly dust:

And sing of bloody Mars, of wars, of giusts.

Turne thee to those, that weld the awful crowne,

To doubted Knights, whose woundlesse armour rusts,

And helmes unbruzed wexen dayly browne.



There may thy Muse display her fluttryng wing,

And stretch her selfe at large from East to West:

Whither thou list in fayre Elisa rest,

Or if thee please in bigger notes to sing,

Advaunce the worthy whome shee loveth best,

That first the white beare to the stake did bring.



And when the stubborne stroke of stronger stounds,

Has somewhat slackt the tenor of thy string:

Of love and lustihed tho mayst thou sing,

And carrol lowde, and leade the Myllers rownde,

All were Elisa one of thilke same ring.

So mought our Cuddies name to Heaven sownde.



CUDDYE

Indeed the Romish Tityrus, I heare,

Through his Mecoenas left his Oaten reede,

Whereon he earst had taught his flocks to feede,

And laboured lands to yield the timely eare,

And eft did sing of warres and deadly drede,

So as the Heavens did quake his verse to here.



But ah Mecoenas is yclad in claye,

And great Augustus long ygoe is dead:

And all the worthies liggen wrapt in leade,

That matter made for Poets on to play:

For ever, who in derring doe were dreade,

The loftie verse of hem was loved aye.



But after vertue gan for age to stoupe,

And mighty manhode brought a bedde of ease:

The vaunting Poets found nought worth a pease,

To put in preace emong the learned troupe.

Tho gan the streames of flowing wittes to cease,

And sonnebright honour pend in shamefull coupe.



And if that any buddes of Poesie,

Yet of the old stocke gan to shoote agayne:

Or it mens follies mote be forst to fayne,

And rolle with rest in rymes of rybaudrye:

Or as it sprong, it wither must agayne:

Tom Piper makes us better melodie.



PIERS

O pierlesse Poesye, where is then thy place?

If nor in Princes pallace thou doe sitt:

(And yet is Princes pallace the most fitt)

Ne brest of baser birth doth thee embrace.

Then make thee winges of thine aspyring wit,

And, whence thou camst, flye backe to heaven apace.



CUDDIE

Ah Percy it is all to weake and wanne,

So high to sore, and make so large a flight:

Her peeced pyneons bene not so in plight,

For Colin fittes such famous flight to scanne:

He, were he not with love so ill bedight,

Would mount as high, and sing as soote as Swanne.



PIERS

Ah fon, for love does teach him climbe so hie,

And lyftes him up out of the loathsome myre:

Such immortall mirrhor, as he doth admire,

Would rayse ones mynd above the starry skie.

And cause a caytive corage to aspire,

For lofty love doth loath a lowly eye.



CUDDIE

All otherwise the state of Poet stands,

For lordly love is such a Tyranne fell:

That where he rules, all power he doth expell.

The vaunted verse a vacant head demaundes,

Ne wont with crabbed care the Muses dwell.

Unwisely weaves, that takes two webbes in hand.



Who ever casts to compasse weightye prise,

And thinks to throwe out thondring words of threate:

Let powre in lavish cups and thriftie bitts of meate,

For Bacchus fruite is frend to Phoebus wise.

And when with Wine the braine begins to sweate,

The nombers flowe as fast as spring doth ryse.



Thou kenst not Percie howe the ryme should rage.

O if my temples were distaind with wine,

And girt in girlonds of wild Yvie twine,

How I could reare the Muse on stately stage,

And teache her tread aloft in buskin fine,

With queint Bellona in her equipage.



But ah my corage cooles ere it be warme,

For thy, content us in thys humble shade:

Where no such troublous tydes han us assayde,

Here we our slender pipes may safely charme.



PIERS

And when my Gates shall han their bellies layd:

Cuddie shall have a Kidde to store his farme.



CUDDIES EMBLEME

Agitante calescimus illo/CONTENT"	NAME/from The Shepheardes Calender: October/NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Nature/TYPE
AUTHOR/WILLIAM SHAKESPEARE/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/Full fathom five thy father lies;

Of his bones are coral made;

Those are pearls that were his eyes:

Nothing of him that doth fade,

But doth suffer a sea-change

Into something rich and strange.

Sea-nymphs hourly ring his knell:

                                             Ding-dong.

Hark! now I hear them,ding-dong, bell./CONTENT"	NAME/Song: Full fathom five thy father lies /NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Nature/TYPE
AUTHOR/WILLIAM SHAKESPEARE/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/Hark, hark! the lark at heaven's gate sings,

And Phoebus 'gins arise,

His steeds to water at those springs

On chaliced flowers that lies;

And winking Mary-buds begin

To ope their golden eyes:

With every thing that pretty is,

My lady sweet, arise:

Arise, arise./CONTENT"	NAME/Song: Hark, hark! the lark at heaven's gate sings/NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Nature/TYPE
AUTHOR/WILLIAM SHAKESPEARE/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/Notes:

Macbeth: IV.i 10-19; 35-38/CONTENT"	NAME/Song of the Witches: Double, double toil and trouble/NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Nature/TYPE
AUTHOR/WILLIAM SHAKESPEARE/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/Orpheus with his lute made trees,

And the mountain tops that freeze,

Bow themselves when he did sing:

To his music plants and flowers

Ever sprung; as sun and showers

There had made a lasting spring.

Every thing that heard him play,

Even the billows of the sea,

Hung their heads, and then lay by.

In sweet music is such art,

Killing care and grief of heart

Fall asleep, or hearing, die./CONTENT"	NAME/Song: Orpheus with his lute made trees/NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Nature/TYPE
AUTHOR/WILLIAM SHAKESPEARE/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/Under the greenwood tree

Who loves to lie with me,

And turn his merry note

Unto the sweet bird's throat,

Come hither, come hither, come hither:

            Here shall he see

            No enemy

But winter and rough weather.



Who doth ambition shun

And loves to live i' the sun,

Seeking the food he eats,

And pleased with what he gets,

Come hither, come hither, come hither:

            Here shall he see

            No enemy

But winter and rough weather./CONTENT"	NAME/Song: Under the greenwood tree/NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Nature/TYPE
AUTHOR/WILLIAM SHAKESPEARE/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/Full many a glorious morning have I seen

Flatter the mountain-tops with sovereign eye,

Kissing with golden face the meadows green,

Gilding pale streams with heavenly alchemy;

Anon permit the basest clouds to ride

With ugly rack on his celestial face

And from the forlorn world his visage hide,

Stealing unseen to west with this disgrace.

Even so my sun one early morn did shine

With all-triumphant splendour on my brow;

But out, alack! he was but one hour mine;

The region cloud hath mask'd him from me now.

Yet him for this my love no whit disdaineth;

Suns of the world may stain when heaven's sun staineth./CONTENT"	NAME/Sonnet 33: Full many a glorious morning have I seen/NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Nature/TYPE
AUTHOR/WILLIAM SHAKESPEARE/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/That time of year thou mayst in me behold

When yellow leaves, or none, or few, do hang

Upon those boughs which shake against the cold,

Bare ruin'd choirs, where late the sweet birds sang.

In me thou see'st the twilight of such day

As after sunset fadeth in the west,

Which by and by black night doth take away,

Death's second self, that seals up all in rest.

In me thou see'st the glowing of such fire

That on the ashes of his youth doth lie,

As the death-bed whereon it must expire,

Consum'd with that which it was nourish'd by.

This thou perceiv'st, which makes thy love more strong,

To love that well which thou must leave ere long./CONTENT"	NAME/Sonnet 73: That time of year thou mayst in me behold/NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Nature/TYPE
AUTHOR/WILLIAM SHAKESPEARE/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/How like a winter hath my absence been

From thee, the pleasure of the fleeting year!

What freezings have I felt, what dark days seen!

What old December's bareness everywhere!

And yet this time remov'd was summer's time,

The teeming autumn, big with rich increase,

Bearing the wanton burthen of the prime,

Like widow'd wombs after their lords' decease:

Yet this abundant issue seem'd to me

But hope of orphans and unfather'd fruit;

For summer and his pleasures wait on thee,

And thou away, the very birds are mute;

Or if they sing, 'tis with so dull a cheer

That leaves look pale, dreading the winter's near./CONTENT"	NAME/Sonnet 97: How like a winter hath my absence been/NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Nature/TYPE
AUTHOR/WILLIAM SHAKESPEARE/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/Poor soul, the centre of my sinful earth,

[......] these rebel powers that thee array,

Why dost thou pine within and suffer dearth,

Painting thy outward walls so costly gay?

Why so large cost, having so short a lease,

Dost thou upon thy fading mansion spend?

Shall worms, inheritors of this excess,

Eat up thy charge? Is this thy body's end?

Then soul, live thou upon thy servant's loss

And let that pine to aggravate thy store;

Buy terms divine in selling hours of dross;

Within be fed, without be rich no more.

So shalt thou feed on Death, that feeds on men,

And, Death once dead, there's no more dying then./CONTENT"	NAME/Sonnet 146: Poor soul, the centre of my sinful earth,/NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Nature/TYPE
AUTHOR/WILLIAM SHAKESPEARE/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/Why didst thou promise such a beauteous day,

And make me travel forth without my cloak,

To let base clouds oertake me in my way,

Hiding thy bravery in their rotten smoke?

Tis not enough that through the cloud thou break,

To dry the rain on my storm-beaten face,

For no man well of such a salve can speak

That heals the wound and cures not the disgrace:

Nor can thy shame give physic to my grief;

Though thou repent, yet I have still the loss:

The offenders sorrow lends but weak relief

To him that bears the strong offences cross.

   Ah! but those tears are pearl which thy love sheds,

   And they are rich and ransom all ill deeds.





 /CONTENT"	NAME/Sonnet 34: Why didst thou promise such a beauteous day/NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/WILLIAM SHAKESPEARE/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/Weret aught to me I bore the canopy,

With my extern the outward honouring,

Or laid great bases for eternity,

Which proves more short than waste or ruining;

Have I not seen dwellers on form and favour

Lose all, and more, by paying too much rent,

For compound sweet forgoing simple savour,

Pitiful thrivers, in their gazing spent?

No;let me be obsequious in thy heart,

And take thou my oblation, poor but free,

Which is not mixd with seconds, knows no art,

But mutual render, only me for thee.

   Hence, thou subornd informer! a true soul,

   When most impeachd, stands least in thy control.

 /CONTENT"	NAME/Sonnet 125: Weret aught to me I bore the canopy/NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/WILLIAM SHAKESPEARE/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/Let the bird of loudest lay

On the sole Arabian tree

Herald sad and trumpet be,

To whose sound chaste wings obey.



But thou shrieking harbinger,

Foul precurrer of the fiend,

Augur of the fever's end,

To this troop come thou not near.



From this session interdict

Every fowl of tyrant wing,

Save the eagle, feather'd king;

Keep the obsequy so strict.



Let the priest in surplice white,

That defunctive music can,

Be the death-divining swan,

Lest the requiem lack his right.



And thou treble-dated crow,

That thy sable gender mak'st

With the breath thou giv'st and tak'st,

'Mongst our mourners shalt thou go.



Here the anthem doth commence:

Love and constancy is dead;

Phoenix and the Turtle fled

In a mutual flame from hence.



So they lov'd, as love in twain

Had the essence but in one;

Two distincts, division none:

Number there in love was slain.



Hearts remote, yet not asunder;

Distance and no space was seen

'Twixt this Turtle and his queen:

But in them it were a wonder.



So between them love did shine

That the Turtle saw his right

Flaming in the Phoenix' sight:

Either was the other's mine.



Property was thus appalled

That the self was not the same;

Single nature's double name

Neither two nor one was called.



Reason, in itself confounded,

Saw division grow together,

To themselves yet either neither,

Simple were so well compounded;



That it cried, ""How true a twain

Seemeth this concordant one!

Love has reason, reason none,

If what parts can so remain.""



Whereupon it made this threne

To the Phoenix and the Dove,

Co-supremes and stars of love,

As chorus to their tragic scene:



                 threnos



Beauty, truth, and rarity,

Grace in all simplicity,

Here enclos'd, in cinders lie.



Death is now the Phoenix' nest,

And the Turtle's loyal breast

To eternity doth rest,



Leaving no posterity:

'Twas not their infirmity,

It was married chastity.



Truth may seem but cannot be;

Beauty brag but 'tis not she;

Truth and beauty buried be.



To this urn let those repair

That are either true or fair;

For these dead birds sigh a prayer./CONTENT"	NAME/The Phoenix and the Turtle/NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/GEORGE GASCOIGNE/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/     Sing lullaby, as women do,

Wherewith they bring their babes to rest,

And lullaby can I sing too

As womanly as can the best.

With lullaby they still the child,

And if I be not much beguiled,

Full many wanton babes have I

Which must be stilled with lullaby.



     First lullaby my youthful years;

It is now time to go to bed,

For crooked age and hoary hairs

Have won the haven within my head.

With lullaby, then, youth be still;

With lullaby content thy will;

Since courage quails and comes behind,

Go sleep, and so beguile thy mind.



     Next, lullaby my gazing eyes,

Which wonted were to glance apace.

For every glass may now suffice

To show the furrows in my face;

With lullaby then wink awhile,

With lullaby your looks beguile;

Let no fair face nor beauty bright

Entice you eft with vain delight.



     And lullaby, my wanton will;

Let reason's rule now reign thy thought,

Since all too late I find by skill

How dear I have thy fancies bought;

With lullaby now take thine ease,

With lullaby thy doubts appease.

For trust to this: if thou be still,

My body shall obey thy will.



     Eke lullaby, my loving boy,

My little Robin, take thy rest;

Since age is cold and nothing coy,

Keep close thy coin, for so is best;

With lullaby be thou content,

With lullaby thy lusts relent,

Let others pay which hath mo pence;

Thou art too poor for such expense.



     Thus lullaby, my youth, mine eyes,

My will, my ware, and all that was.

I can no mo delays devise,

But welcome pain, let pleasure pass;

With lullaby now take your leave,

With lullaby your dreams deceive;

And when you rise with waking eye,

Remember then this lullaby./CONTENT"	NAME/The Lullaby of a Lover/NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/WILLIAM SHAKESPEARE/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/Beshrew that heart that makes my heart to groan

For that deep wound it gives my friend and me:

Ist not enough to torture me alone,

But slave to slavery my sweetst friend must be?

Me from myself thy cruel eye hath taken,

And my next self thou harder hast engrossed;

Of him, myself, and thee I am forsaken,

A torment thrice threefold thus to be crossed.

Prison my heart in thy steel bosom's ward,

But then my friend's heart let my poor heart bail;

Whoeer keeps me, let my heart be his guard:

Thou canst not then use rigour in my jail.

    And yet thou wilt; for I, being pent in thee,

    Perforce am thine, and all that is in me./CONTENT"	NAME/Sonnet 133: Beshrew that heart that makes my heart to groan/NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/WILLIAM SHAKESPEARE/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/O, call not me to justify the wrong

That thy unkindness lays upon my heart;

Wound me not with thine eye but with thy tongue;

Use power with power, and slay me not by art.

Tell me thou lovst elsewhere; but in my sight,

Dear heart, forbear to glance thine eye aside;

What needst thou wound with cunning when thy might

Is more than my oerpressed defense can bide?

Let me excuse thee: ah, my love well knows

Her pretty looks have been mine enemies;

And therefore from my face she turns my foes,

That they elsewhere might dart their injuries

    Yet do not so; but since I am near slain,

    Kill me outright with looks and rid my pain./CONTENT"	NAME/Sonnet 139: O, call not me to justify the wrong/NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/WILLIAM SHAKESPEARE/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/Love is my sin, and thy dear virtue hate,

Hate of my sin, grounded on sinful loving.

O, but with mine compare thou thine own state,

And thou shalt find it merits not reproving;

Or if it do, not from those lips of thine,

That have profaned their scarlet ornaments

And sealed false bonds of love as oft as mine,

Robbed others beds revenues of their rents.

Be it lawful I love thee as thou lovst those

Whom thine eyes woo as mine importune thee:

Root pity in thy heart, that, when it grows,

Thy pity may deserve to pitied be.

    If thou dost seek to have what thou dost hide,

    By self-example mayst thou be denied./CONTENT"	NAME/Sonnet 142: Love is my sin, and thy dear virtue hate/NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/WILLIAM SHAKESPEARE/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/My love is as a fever, longing still

For that which longer nurseth the disease,

Feeding on that which doth preserve the ill,

Th uncertain sickly appetite to please.

My reason, the physician to my love,

Angry that his prescriptions are not kept,

Hath left me, and I desperate now approve

Desire is death, which physic did except.

Past cure I am, now reason is past care,

And frantic-mad with evermore unrest;

My thoughts and my discourse as madmens are,

At random from the truth vainly expressed:

    For I have sworn thee fair, and thought thee bright,

    Who art as black as hell, as dark as night./CONTENT"	NAME/Sonnet 147: My love is as a fever, longing still/NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/DUCHESS OF NEWCASTLE MARGARET CAVENDISH/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/A Poet am I neither born nor bred,

But to a witty poet married:

Whose brain is fresh and pleasant as the Spring,

Where Fancies grow and where the Muses sing.

There oft I lean my head, and listening, hark,

To catch his words and all his fancies mark:

And from that garden show of beauties take

Whereof a posy I in verse may make.

Thus I, that have no gardens of my own,

There gather flowers that are newly blown./CONTENT"	NAME/The Duchess to Her Readers/NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/SIR PHILIP SIDNEY/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/Loving in truth, and fain in verse my love to show,

That she, dear she, might take some pleasure of my pain,

Pleasure might cause her read, reading might make her know,

Knowledge might pity win, and pity grace obtain,

I sought fit words to paint the blackest face of woe,

Studying inventions fine, her wits to entertain,

Oft turning others leaves, to see if thence would flow

Some fresh and fruitful showers upon my sunburned brain.

But words came halting forth, wanting Inventions stay:

Invention, Natures child, fled step-dame Studys blows,

And others feet still seemed but strangers in my way.

Thus great with child to speak, and helpless in my throes,

Biting my truant pen, beating myself for spite:

Fool, said my Muse to me, look in thy heart and write./CONTENT"	NAME/Sonnet 1/NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/THOMAS BASTARD/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/Misus and Mopsa hardly could agree,

Striving about superiority.

The text which says that man and wife are one,

Was the chief argument they stood upon.

She held they both one woman should become,

He held both should be man, and both but one.

     So they contended daily, but the strife

     Could not be ended, till both were one wife./CONTENT"	NAME/Book 5, Epigram 20: In Misum & Mopsam./NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/EDMUND SPENSER/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/Joy of my life, full oft for loving you

    I bless my lot, that was so lucky placed:

    But then the more your own mishap I rue,

    That are so much by so mean love embased.

For had the equal heavens so much you graced

    In this as in the rest, ye might invent

    Some heavenly wit, whose verse could have enchased

    Your glorious name in golden monument.

But since ye deignd so goodly to relent

    To me your thrall, in whom is little worth,

    That little that I am shall all be spent

    In setting your immortal praises forth;

Whose lofty argument uplifting me

    Shall lift you up unto an high degree./CONTENT"	NAME/['Joy of my life, full oft for loving you']/NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/LADY MARY WROTH/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/Sweet shades why doe you seeke to give delight

    To mee who deeme delight in this vilde place

    Butt torment, sorrow, and mine owne disgrace

    To taste of joy, or your vaine pleasing sight;



Show them your pleasures who saw never night

    Of greife, wher joyings fauning, smiling face

    Appeers as day, wher griefe found never space

    Yett for a sigh, a grone, or envies spite;



Butt O on mee a world of woes doe ly,

    Or els on mee all harmes strive to rely,

    And to attend like servants bound to mee,



Heat in desire, while frosts of care I prove,

    Wanting my love, yett surfett doe with love

    Burne, and yett freeze, better in hell to bee./CONTENT"	NAME/from Pamphilia to Amphilanthus: 17/NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/LADY MARY WROTH/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/Come darkest night, becoming sorrow best;

    Light; leave thy light; fitt for a lightsome soule;

    Darknes doth truly sure with mee oprest

    Whom absence power doth from mirthe controle:



The very trees with hanging heads condole

    Sweet sommers parting, and of leaves distrest

    In dying coulers make a griefe-full role;

    Soe much (alas) to sorrow are they prest,



Thus of dead leaves her farewell carpetts made:

    Theyr fall, theyr branches, all theyr mournings prove;

    With leavles, naked bodies, whose huese vade

    From hopefull greene, to wither in theyr love,



If trees, and leaves for absence, mourners bee

Noe mervaile that I grieve, who like want see./CONTENT"	NAME/from Pamphilia to Amphilanthus: 19/NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/LADY MARY WROTH/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/Love like a jugler, comes to play his prise,

    And all minds draw his wonders to admire,

    To see how cuningly hee, wanting eyes,

    Can yett deseave the best sight of desire:



 The wanton child, how hee can faine his fire

    So pretely, as none sees his disguise!

    How finely doe his tricks, while wee fooles hire

    The badge, and office of his tirannies,



For in the end, such jugling hee doth make

    As hee our harts, in stead of eyes doth take

    For men can only by theyr slieghts abuse



The sight with nimble, and delightful skill;

    Butt if hee play, his gaine is our lost will:

    Yett childlike, wee can nott his sports refuse./CONTENT"	NAME/from Pamphilia to Amphilanthus: 2/NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/LADY MARY WROTH/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/Time only cause of my unrest

By whom I hopd once to bee blest

    How cruell art thou turned?

That first gavst lyfe unto my love,

And still a pleasure nott to move

    Or change though ever burned;



Have I thee slackd, or left undun

One loving rite, and soe have wunn

    Thy rage or bitter changing?

That now noe minutes I shall see,

Wherein I may least happy bee

    Thy favors soe estranging.



Blame thy self, and nott my folly,

Time gave time butt to bee holly;

    True love such ends best loveth

Unworhty love doth seeke for ends

A worthy love butt worth pretends

    Nor other thoughts itt proveth:



Then stay thy swiftnes cruell time,

And lett mee once more blessed clime

    To joy, that I may prayse thee:

Lett mee pleasure sweetly tasting

Joy in love, and faith nott wasting

    And on fames wings Ile rayse thee:



Never shall thy glory dying

Bee untill thine owne untying

    That time noe longer liveth;

Tis a gaine such tyme to lend:

Since soe thy fame shall never end

    Butt joy for what she giveth./CONTENT"	NAME/from Pamphilia to Amphilanthus: Song 5/NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/LADY MARY WROTH/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/Love peruse me, seeke, and finde

How each corner of my minde

            Is a twine

            Woven to shine.

Not a Webb ill made, foule framd,

Bastard not by Father namd,

            Such in me

            Cannot bee.

Deare behold me, you shall see

Faith the Hive, and love the Bee,

            Which doe bring.

            Gaine and sting.

Pray desect me, sinewes, vaines,

Hold, and loves life in those gaines;

            Lying bare

            To despaire,

When you thus anotamise

All my body, my heart prise;

            Being true

            Just to you.

Close the Truncke, embalme the Chest,

Where your power still shall rest,

            Joy entombe,

            Loves just doome./CONTENT"	NAME/from The Countesse of Montgomerys Urania: Love peruse me, seeke, and finde/NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/LADY MARY WROTH/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/When I beeheld the Image of my deere

    With greedy lookes mine eyes would that way bend,

    Fear, and desire did inwardly contend;

    Feare to bee markd, desire to drawe still neere,



And in my soule a speritt wowld apeer,

    Which boldnes waranted, and did pretend

    To bee my genius, yett I durst nott lend

    My eyes in trust wher others seemed soe cleere,



Then did I search from whence this danger rose,

    If such unworthynes in mee did rest

    As my stervd eyes must nott with sight bee blest;

    When jealousie her poyson did disclose;



Yett in my hart unseense of jealous eye

The truer Image shall in triumph lye./CONTENT"	NAME/from Pamphilia to Amphilanthus: 4/NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/LADY MARY WROTH/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/Love leave to urge, thou knowst thou hast the hand;

    Tis cowardise, to strive wher none resist:

    Pray thee leave off, I yeeld unto thy band;

    Doe nott thus, still, in thine owne powre persist,



Beehold I yeeld: lett forces bee dismist;

    I ame thy subject, conquerd, bound to stand,

    Never thy foe, butt did thy claime assist

    Seeking thy due of those who did withstand;



Butt now, itt seemes, thou wouldst I should thee love;

    I doe confess, twas thy will made mee chuse;

    And thy faire showes made mee a lover prove

    When I my freedome did, for paine refuse.



Yett this Sir God, your boyship I dispise;

Your charmes I obay, butt love nott want of eyes./CONTENT"	NAME/from Pamphilia to Amphilanthus: 7/NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/RICHARD BARNFIELD/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/Long have I longd to see my love againe,

Still have I wisht, but never could obtaine it;

Rather than all the world (if I might gaine it)

Would I desire my loves sweet precious gaine.

Yet in my soule I see him everie day,

See him, and see his still sterne countenaunce,

But (ah) what is of long continuance,

Where majestie and beautie beares the sway?

Sometimes, when I imagine that I see him,

(As love is full of foolish fantasies)

Weening to kisse his lips, as my loves fees,

I feele but aire: nothing but aire to bee him.

Thus with Ixion, kisse I clouds in vaine:

Thus with Ixion, feele I endles paine./CONTENT"	NAME/Sonnet 16/NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/RICHARD BARNFIELD/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/Cherry-lipt Adonis in his snowie shape,

    Might not compare with his pure ivorie white,

    On whose faire front a poets pen may write,

Whose roseate red excels the crimson grape,

His love-enticing delicate soft limbs,

    Are rarely framd tintrap poore gazine eies:

    His cheeks, the lillie and carnation dies,

With lovely tincture which Apollos dims.

His lips ripe strawberries in nectar wet,

    His mouth a Hive, his tongue a hony-combe,

    Where Muses (like bees) make their mansion.

His teeth pure pearle in blushing correll set.

    Oh how can such a body sinne-procuring,

    Be slow to love, and quicke to hate, enduring?/CONTENT"	NAME/Sonnet 17/NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/SIR THOMAS WYATT/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/They flee from me, that sometime did me seek

    With naked foot, stalking in my chamber.

I have seen them gentle, tame, and meek,

    That now are wild, and do not remember

    That sometime they put themselves in danger

         To take bread at my hand; and now they range

         Busily seeking with a continual change.



Thanked be fortune it hath been otherwise

    Twenty times better; but once, in special,

In thin array, after a pleasant guise,

    When her loose gown from her shoulders did fall,

    And she me caught in her arms long and small;

         Therewith all sweetly did me kiss,

         And softly said, Dear heart, how like you this?



It was no dream: I lay broad waking:

    But all is turned, thorough my gentleness,

Into a strange fashion of forsaking;

    And I have leave to go of her goodness,

    And she also to use newfangleness.

         But since that I so kindly am served,

         I would fain know what she hath deserved./CONTENT"	NAME/Remembrance/NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/JOHN DONNE/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/Tis true, tis day, what though it be?

O wilt thou therefore rise from me?

Why should we rise because tis light?

Did we lie down because twas night?

Love, which in spite of darkness brought us hither,

Should in despite of light keep us together.



Light hath no tongue, but is all eye;

If it could speak as well as spy,

This were the worst that it could say,

That being well I fain would stay,

And that I loved my heart and honour so,

That I would not from him, that had them, go.



Must business thee from hence remove?

Oh, thats the worst disease of love,

The poor, the foul, the false, love can

Admit, but not the busied man.

He which hath business, and makes love, doth do

Such wrong, as when a married man doth woo./CONTENT"	NAME/Break of Day/NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/SECOND BARON VAUX OF HARROWDEN THOMAS, LORD VAUX/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/I loathe that I did love,

In youth that I thought sweet,

As time requires for my behove,

Methinks they are not meet.



My lusts they do me leave,

My fancies all be fled,

And tract of time begins to weave

Grey hairs upon my head,



For age with stealing steps

Hath clawed me with his crutch,

And lusty life away she leaps

As there had been none such.



My Muse doth not delight

Me as she did before;

My hand and pen are not in plight,

As they have been of yore.



For reason me denies

This youthly idle rhyme;

And day by day to me she cries,

Leave off these toys in time.



The wrinkles in my brow,

The furrows in my face,

Say, limping age will lodge him now

Where youth must give him place.



The harbinger of death,

To me I see him ride,

The cough, the cold, the gasping breath

Doth bid me provide



A pickaxe and a spade,

And eke a shrouding sheet,

A house of clay for to be made

For such a guest most meet.



Methinks I hear the clark

That knolls the careful knell,

And bids me leave my woeful wark,

Ere nature me compel.



My keepers knit the knot

That youth did laugh to scorn,

Of me that clean shall be forgot

As I had not been born.



Thus must I youth give up,

Whose badge I long did wear;

To them I yield the wanton cup

That better may it bear.



Lo, here the bared skull,

By whose bald sign I know

That stooping age away shall pull

Which youthful years did sow.



For beauty with her band

These crooked cares hath wrought,

And shipped me into the land

From whence I first was brought.



And ye that bide behind,

Have ye none other trust:

As ye of clay were cast by kind,

So shall ye waste to dust./CONTENT"	NAME/The Aged Lover Renounceth Love/NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/HENRY HOWARD, EARL OF SURREY/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/Alas, so all things now do hold their peace!

   Heaven and earth disturbed in no thing;

The beasts, the air, the birds their song do cease,

   The nightes car the stars about doth bring;

Calm is the sea; the waves work less and less:

   So am not I, whom love, alas! doth wring,

Bringing before my face the great increase

   Of my desires, whereat I weep and sing,

In joy and woe, as in a doubtful case.

   For my sweet thoughts sometime do pleasure bring:

But by and by, the cause of my disease

   Gives me a pang that inwardly doth sting,

When that I think what grief it is again

To live and lack the thing should rid my pain.   /CONTENT"	NAME/"Alas, so all things now do hold their peace!"/NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/EDMUND SPENSER/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/Happy ye leaves when as those lilly hands,

Which hold my life in their dead doing might

Shall handle you and hold in loves soft bands,

Lyke captives trembling at the victors sight.

And happy lines, on which with starry light,

Those lamping eyes will deigne sometimes to look

And reade the sorrowes of my dying spright,

Written with teares in harts close bleeding book.

And happy rymes bathd in the sacred brooke,

Of Helicon whence she derived is,

When ye behold that Angels blessed looke,

My soules long lacked foode, my heavens blis.

Leaves, lines, and rymes, seeke her to please alone,

Whom if ye please, I care for other none.





 /CONTENT"	NAME/Amoretti I: Happy ye leaves when as those lilly hands/NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/EDMUND SPENSER/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/New yeare forth looking out of Janus gate,

Doth seeme to promise hope of new delight:

And bidding thold Adieu, his pass/CONTENT"	NAME/Amoretti IV: "New yeare forth looking out of Janus gate"/NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/EDMUND SPENSER/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/Of this worlds Theatre in which we stay,

My love lyke the Spectator ydly sits

Beholding me that all the pageants play,

Disguysing diversly my troubled wits.

Sometimes I joy when glad occasion fits,

And mask in myrth lyke to a Comedy:

Soone after when my joy to sorrow flits,

I waile and make my woes a Tragedy.

Yet she beholding me with constant eye,

Delights not in my merth nor rues my smart:

But when I laugh she mocks, and when I cry

She laughes, and hardens evermore her hart.

What then can move her? if not merth nor mone,

She is no woman, but a sencelesse stone./CONTENT"	NAME/Amoretti LIV: Of this worlds Theatre in which we stay/NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/EDMUND SPENSER/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/So oft as I her beauty do behold,

And therewith do her cruelty compare,

I marvel of what substance was the mould

The which her made at once so cruel-fair.

Not earth; for her high thoughts more heavenly are:

Not water; for her love doth burn like fire:

Not air; for she is not so light or rare:

Not fire; for she doth freeze with faint desire.



Then needs another element inquire

Whereof she might be made; that is, the sky.

For to the heaven her haughty looks aspire,

And eke her love is pure immortal high.

Then since to heaven ye likened are the best,

Be like in mercy as in all the rest./CONTENT"	NAME/Amoretti LV: So oft as I her beauty do behold/NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/EDMUND SPENSER/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/The weary yeare his race now having run,

The new begins his compast course anew:

With shew of morning mylde he hath begun,

Betokening peace and plenty to ensew.

So let us, which this chaunge of weather vew,

Chaunge eeke our mynds and former lives amend,

The old yeares sinnes forepast let us eschew,

And fly the faults with which we did offend.

Then shall the new yeares joy forth freshly send,

Into the glooming world his gladsome ray:

And all these stormes which now his beauty blend,

Shall turne to caulmes and tymely cleare away.

So likewise love cheare you your heavy spright,

And chaunge old yeares annoy to new delight./CONTENT"	NAME/Amoretti LXII: "The weary yeare his race now having run"/NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/EDMUND SPENSER/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/To all those happy blessings which ye have,

With plenteous hand by heaven upon you thrown:

This one disparagement they to you gave,

That ye your love lent to so meane a one.

Yee whose high worths surpassing paragon,

Could not on earth have found one fit for mate,

Ne but in heaven matchable to none,

Why did ye stoup unto so lowly state.

But ye thereby much greater glory gate,

Then had ye sorted with a princes pere:

For now your light doth more it selfe dilate,

And in my darknesse greater doth appeare.

Yet since your light hath once enlumind me,

With my reflex yours shall encreased be./CONTENT"	NAME/Amoretti LXVI: "To all those happy blessings which ye have"/NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/EDMUND SPENSER/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/Fresh spring the herald of loves mighty king,

In whose cote armour richly are displayed

All sorts of flowers the which on earth do spring

In goodly colours gloriously arrayd:

Goe to my love, where she is carelesse layd,

Yet in her winters bowre not well awake:

Tell her the joyous time wil not be staid

Unless she doe him by the forelock take.

Bid her therefore her selfe soone ready make,

To wayt on love amongst his lovely crew:

Where every one that misseth then her make,

Shall be by him amearst with penance dew.

Make hast therefore sweet love, whilest it is prime,

For none can call againe the passed time./CONTENT"	NAME/Amoretti LXX: Fresh spring the herald of loves mighty king/NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/EDMUND SPENSER/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/I joy to see how in your drawen work,

Your selfe unto the Bee ye doe compare;

And me unto the Spyder that doth lurke,

In close awayt to catch her unaware.

Right so your selfe were caught in cunning snare

Of a deare for, and thralled to his love:

In whose streight bands ye now captived are

So firmely, that ye never may remove.

But as your whole worke is woven all about,

With woodbynd flowers and fragrant Enlantine:

So sweet your prison you in time shall prove,

With many deare delights bedecked fyne,

And all thensforth eternall peace shall see

Betweene the Spyder and the gentle Bee./CONTENT"	NAME/Amoretti LXXI: I joy to see how in your drawen work/NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/EDMUND SPENSER/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/Fayre is my love, when her fayre golden heares,

With the loose wynd ye waving chance to marke:

Fayre when the rose in her red cheekes appears,

Or in her eyes the fyre of love does sparke.

Fayre when her brest lyke a rich laden barke,

With pretious merchandize she forth doth lay:

Fayre when that cloud of pryde which oft doth dark

Her goodly light with smiles she drives away,

But fayrest she, when so she doth display

The gate with pearles and rubyes richly dight:

Throgh which her words so wise do make their way

To beare the message of her gentle spright.

The rest be works of natures wonderment,

But this the worke of harts astonishment./CONTENT"	NAME/Amoretti LXXXI: Fayre is my love, when her fayre golden heares/NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/EDMUND SPENSER/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/Lyke as the Culver on the bared bough,

Sits mourning for the absence of her mate:

And in her songs sends many a wishfull vow,

For his returne that seemes to linger late,

So I alone now left disconsolate,

Mourne to my selfe the absence of my love:

And wandring here and there all desolate,

Seek with my playnts to match that mournful dove:

Ne joy of ought that under heaven doth hove,

Can comfort me, but her owne joyous sight:

Whose sweet aspect both God and man can move,

In her unspotted pleasauns to delight.

Dark is my day, whyles her fayre light I mis,

And dead my life that wants such lively blis./CONTENT"	NAME/Amoretti LXXXIX: Lyke as the Culver on the bared bough/NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/EDMUND SPENSER/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/More then most faire, full of the living fire,

Kindled above unto the maker neere:

No eies but joyes, in which al powers conspire,

That to the world naught else be counted deare.

Thrugh your bright beams doth not the blinded guest

Shoot out his darts to base affections wound?

But Angels come to lead fraile mindes to rest

In chast desires on heavenly beauty bound.

You frame my thoughts and fashion me within,

You stop my toung, and teach my hart to speake,

You calme the storme that passion did begin,

Strong thrugh your cause, but by your vertue weak.

Dark is the world, where your light shined never;

Well is he borne, that may behold you ever./CONTENT"	NAME/Amoretti VIII: More then most faire, full of the living fire/NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/EDMUND SPENSER/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/In that proud port, which her so goodly graceth,

Whiles her faire face she reares up to the skie:

And to the ground her eie lids low embaseth

Most goodly temperature ye may descry,

Myld humblesse mixt with awfull majesty,

For looking on the earth whence she was borne:

Her minde remembreth her mortalitie,

What so is fayrest shall to earth returne.

But that same lofty countenance seemes to scorne

Base thing, and thinke how she to heaven may clime:

Treading downe earth as lothsome and forlorne,

That hinders heavenly thoughts with drossy slime.

Yet lowly still vouchsafe to looke on me,

Such lowlinesse shall make you lofty be./CONTENT"	NAME/Amoretti XIII: "In that proud port, which her so goodly graceth"/NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/EDMUND SPENSER/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/Ye tradefull Merchants that with weary toyle,

Do seeke most pretious things to make your gain:

And both the Indias of their treasures spoile,

What needeth you to seeke so farre in vaine?

For loe my love doth in her selfe containe

All this worlds riches that may farre be found,

If Saphyres, loe hir eies be Saphyres plaine,

If Rubies, loe hir lips be Rubies sound:

If Pearles, hir teeth be pearles both pure and round;

If Yvorie, her forhead yvory weene;

If Gold, her locks are finest gold on ground;

If silver, her faire hands are silver sheene;

But that which fairest is, but few behold,

Her mind adornd with vertues manifold./CONTENT"	NAME/Amoretti XV: Ye tradefull Merchants that with weary toyle/NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/EDMUND SPENSER/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/Penelope for her Ulisses sake,

Devizd a Web her wooers to deceave:

In which the worke that she all day did make

The same at night she did again unreave:

Such subtile craft my Damzell doth conceave,

Th importune suit of my desire to shnone:

For all that I in many dayes doo weave,

In one short houre I find by her undonne.

So when I thinke to end that I begonne,

I must begin and never bring to end:

For with one looke she spils that long I sponne,

And with one word my whole years work doth rend.

Such labour like the Spyders web I fynd,

Whose fruitless worke is broken with least wynd./CONTENT"	NAME/Amoretti XXIII: Penelope for her Ulisses sake/NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/EDMUND SPENSER/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/My Love is like to ice, and I to fire:

How comes it then that this her cold so great

Is not dissolved through my so hot desire,

But harder grows the more I her entreat?

Or how comes it that my exceeding heat

Is not allayed by her heart-frozen cold,

But that I burn much more in boiling sweat,

And feel my flames augmented manifold?

What more miraculous thing may be told,

That fire, which all things melts, should harden ice,

And ice, which is congeald with senseless cold,

Should kindle fire by wonderful device?

Such is the power of love in gentle mind,

That it can alter all the course of kind./CONTENT"	NAME/Amoretti XXX: My Love is like to ice, and I to fire/NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/EN JONSON/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/Though beauty be the mark of praise,

   And yours of whom I sing be such

   As not the world can praise too much,

Yet tis your virtue now I raise.



A virtue, like allay, so gone

   Throughout your form, as, though that move

   And draw and conquer all mens love,

This subjects you to love of one.



Wherein you triumph yet; because

   Tis of yourself, and that you use

   The noblest freedom, not to choose

Against or faith or honors laws.



But who should less expect from you,

   In whom alone Love lives again?

   By whom he is restored to men,

And kept, and bred, and brought up true.



His falling temples you have reared,

   The withered garlands taen away;

   His altars kept from the decay

That envy wished, and nature feared;



And on them burn so chaste a flame,

   With so much loyalties expense,

   As Love, t acquit such excellence,

Is gone himself into your name.



And you are he; the deity

   To whom all lovers are designed

   That would their better objects find;

Among which faithful troop am I.



Who, as an offspring at your shrine,

   Have sung this hymn, and here entreat

   One spark of your diviner heat

To light upon a love of mine.



Which, if it kindle not, but scant

   Appear, and that to shortest view,

   Yet give me leave t adore in you

What I in her am grieved to want./CONTENT"	NAME/An Elegy/NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/GEORGE GASCOIGNE/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/And if I did, what then?

Are you aggrievd therefore?

The sea hath fish for every man,

And what would you have more?



   Thus did my mistress once,

Amaze my mind with doubt;

And poppd a question for the nonce

To beat my brains about.



   Whereto I thus replied:

Each fisherman can wish

That all the seas at every tide

Were his alone to fish.



   And so did I (in vain)

But since it may not be,

Let such fish there as find the gain,

And leave the loss for me.



   And with such luck and loss

I will content myself,

Till tides of turning time may toss

Such fishers on the shelf.



   And when they stick on sands,

That every man may see,

Then will I laugh and clap my hands,

As they do now at me./CONTENT"	NAME/And If I Did, What Then?/NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/JOHN DONNE/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/All Kings, and all their favourites,

         All glory of honours, beauties, wits,

    The sun itself, which makes times, as they pass,

    Is elder by a year now than it was

    When thou and I first one another saw:

    All other things to their destruction draw,

         Only our love hath no decay;

    This no tomorrow hath, nor yesterday,

    Running it never runs from us away,

But truly keeps his first, last, everlasting day.



         Two graves must hide thine and my corse;

         If one might, death were no divorce.

    Alas, as well as other Princes, we

    (Who Prince enough in one another be)

    Must leave at last in death these eyes and ears,

    Oft fed with true oaths, and with sweet salt tears;

         But souls where nothing dwells but love

    (All other thoughts being inmates) then shall prove

    This, or a love increased there above,

When bodies to their graves, souls from their graves remove.



         And then we shall be throughly blessed;

         But we no more than all the rest.

    Here upon earth were Kings, and none but we

    Can be such Kings, nor of such subjects be;

    Who is so safe as we? where none can do

    Treason to us, except one of us two.

         True and false fears let us refrain,

    Let us love nobly, and live, and add again

    Years and years unto years, till we attain

To write threescore: this is the second of our reign./CONTENT"	NAME/The Anniversary/NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/SIR WALTER RALEGH/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/As you came from the holy land

Of Walsingham,

Met you not with my true love

By the way as you came?



How shall I know your true love,

That have met many one,

I went to the holy land,

That have come, that have gone?



She is neither white, nor brown,

But as the heavens fair;

There is none hath a form so divine

In the earth, or the air.



Such a one did I meet, good sir,

Such an angelic face,

Who like a queen, like a nymph, did appear

By her gait, by her grace.



She hath left me here all alone,

All alone, as unknown,

Who sometimes did me lead with herself,

And me loved as her own.



Whats the cause that she leaves you alone,

And a new way doth take,

Who loved you once as her own,

And her joy did you make?



I have lovd her all my youth;

But now old, as you see,

Love likes not the falling fruit

From the withered tree.



Know that Love is a careless child,

And forgets promise past;

He is blind, he is deaf when he list,

And in faith never fast.



His desire is a dureless content,

And a trustless joy:

He is won with a world of despair,

And is lost with a toy.



Of womenkind such indeed is the love,

Or the word love abusd,

Under which many childish desires

And conceits are excusd.



But true love is a durable fire,

In the mind ever burning,

Never sick, never old, never dead,

From itself never turning./CONTENT"	NAME/As You Came from the Holy Land (attributed)/NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/SIR PHILIP SIDNEY/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/Stella is sick, and in that sick-bed lies

Sweetness, that breathes and pants as oft as she;

And grace, sick too, such fine conclusions tries

That sickness brags itself best graced to be.

    Beauty is sick, but sick in so fair guise

That in that paleness beautys white we see;

And joy, which is inseparate from these eyes,

Stella now learns (strange case!) to weep in thee.

   Love moves thy pain, and like a faithful page,

As thy looks stir, runs up and down, to make

All folks prest at thy will thy pain to assuage;

Nature with care sweats for her darlings sake,

   Knowing worlds pass, ere she enough can find

   Of such heaven stuff, to clothe so heavenly mind./CONTENT"	NAME/Astrophil and Stella 101: Stella is sick, and in that sick-bed lies/NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/SIR PHILIP SIDNEY/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/Where be the roses gone, which sweetened so our eyes?

    Where those red cheeks, which oft with fair increase did frame

    The height of honor in the kindly badge of shame?

Who hath the crimson weeds stolen from my morning skies?

How doth the color vade of those vermilion dyes,

    Which Nature's self did make, and self engrained the same!

    I would know by what right this paleness overcame

That hue, whose force my heart still unto thraldom ties?

    Galen's adoptive sons, who by a beaten way

    Their judgements hackney on, the fault on sickness lay;

But feeling proof makes me say they mistake it far:

    It is but love, which makes his paper perfect white

    To write therein more fresh the story of delight,

Whiles beauty's reddest ink Venus for him doth stir./CONTENT"	NAME/Astrophil and Stella 102: Where be the roses gone, which sweetened so our eyes?/NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/SIR PHILIP SIDNEY/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/O absent presence, Stella is not here;

    False flattering hope, that with so fair a face

    Bare me in hand, that in this orphan place

Stella, I say my Stella, should appear.

What sayst thou now? Where is that dainty cheer

    Thou toldst mine eyes should help their famished case?

    But thou art gone, now that self-felt disgrace

Doth make me most to wish thy comfort near.

    But here I do store of fair ladies meet,

    Who may with charm of conversation sweet

Make in my heavy mould new thoughts to grow:

    Sure they prevail as much with me, as he

    That bade his friend, but then new maimed, to be

Merry with him, and not think of his woe./CONTENT"	NAME/Astrophil and Stella 106: O absent presence, Stella is not here/NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/SIR PHILIP SIDNEY/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/Stella, since thou so right a princess art

Of all the powers which life bestows on me,

There ere by them aught undertaken be

They first resort unto that sovereign part;

Sweet, for a while give respite to my heart,

Which pants as though it still should leap to thee,

And on my thoughts give thy lieutenancy

To this great cause, which needs both use and art,

And as a queen, who from her presence sends

Whom she employs, dismiss from thee my wit,

Till it have wrought what thy own will attends.

On servants shame oft masters blame doth sit.

Oh let not fools in me thy works reprove,

And scorning say, See what it is to love./CONTENT"	NAME/Astrophil and Stella 107: Stella, since thou so right a princess art /NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/SIR PHILIP SIDNEY/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/Alas, have I not pain enough, my friend,

Upon whose breast a fiercer gripe doth tire

Than did on him who first stale down the fire,

While Love on me doth all his quiver spend,

But with your rhubarb words you must contend

To grieve me worse, in saying that Desire

Doth plunge my well-formed soul even in the mire

Of sinful thoughts, which do in ruin end?

If that be sin which doth the manners frame,

Well stayed with truth in word and faith of deed,

Ready of wit, and fearing naught but shame;

If that be sin which in fixed hearts doth breed

A loathing of all loose unchastity,

Then love is sin, and let me sinful be./CONTENT"	NAME/Astrophil and Stella 14: Alas, have I not pain enough, my friend/NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/SIR PHILIP SIDNEY/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/Not at first sight, nor with a dribbed shot,

   Love gave the wound which while I breathe will bleed:

   But known worth did in mine of time proceed,

Till by degrees it had full conquest got.

I saw, and liked; I liked, but loved not;

   I loved, but straight did not what love decreed:

   At length to loves decrees I, forced, agreed,

Yet with repining at so partial lot.

   Now even that footstep of lost liberty

Is gone, and now like slave-born Muscovite

I call it praise to suffer tyranny;

And now employ the remnant of my wit

   To make myself believe that all is well,

   While with a feeling skill I paint my hell./CONTENT"	NAME/Astrophil and Stella 2: Not at first sight, nor with a dribbed shot/NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/SIR PHILIP SIDNEY/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/Your words my friend (right healthful caustics) blame

My young mind marred, whom Love doth windlass so,

That mine own writings like bad servants show

My wits, quick in vain thoughts, in virtue lame,

That Plato I read for nought, but if he tame

Such coltish gyres, that to my birth I owe

Nobler desires, least else that friendly foe,

Great expectation, wear a train of shame.

For since mad March great promise made of me,

If now the May of my years much decline,

What can be hoped my harvest time will be?

Sure you say well, your wisdoms golden mine

Dig deep with learnings spade, now tell me this,

Hath this world ought so fair as Stella is?/CONTENT"	NAME/Astrophil and Stella 21: Your words my friend (right healthful caustics) blame /NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/SIR PHILIP SIDNEY/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/The wisest scholar of the wight most wise

By Phoebus doom, with sugared sentence says

That Virtue, if it once met with our eyes,

Strange flames of love it in our souls would raise;

But, for that man with pain this truth descries,

While he each thing in senses balance weighs,

And so nor will nor can behold those skies

Which inward sun to heroic mind displays,

Virtue of late, with virtuous care to stir

Love of herself, takes Stellas shape, that she

To mortal eyes might sweetly shine in her.

It is most true, for since I her did see,

Virtues great beauty in that face I prove,

And find theffect, for I do burn in love./CONTENT"	NAME/Astrophil and Stella 25: The wisest scholar of the wight most wise /NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/SIR PHILIP SIDNEY/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/With how sad steps, O moon, thou climbst the skies!

How silently, and with how wan a face!

What! may it be that even in heavenly place

That busy archer his sharp arrows tries?

Sure, if that long-with-love-acquainted eyes

Can judge of love, thou feelst a lovers case:

I read it in thy looks; thy languished grace

To me, that feel the like, thy state descries.

Then, even of fellowship, O Moon, tell me,

Is constant love deemed there but want of wit?

Are beauties there as proud as here they be?

Do they above love to be loved, and yet

    Those lovers scorn whom that love doth possess?

    Do they call virtue thereungratefulness?/CONTENT"	NAME/Astrophil and Stella 30: With how sad steps, O moon, thou climb'st the skies/NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/SIR PHILIP SIDNEY/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/What, have I thus betrayed my liberty?

Can those black beams such burning marks engrave

In my free side? or am I born a slave,

Whose neck becomes such yoke of tyranny?

Or want I sense to feel my misery?

Or sprite, disdain of such disdain to have?

Who for long faith, though daily help I crave,

May get no alms but scorn of beggary.

Virtue, awake! Beauty but beauty is;

I may, I must, I can, I will, I do

Leave following that which it is gain to miss.

Let her go. Soft, but here she comes. Go to,

Unkind, I love you not! O me, that eye

Doth make my heart give to my tongue the lie!/CONTENT"	NAME/Astrophil and Stella 47: What, have I thus betrayed my liberty? /NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/SIR PHILIP SIDNEY/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/Souls joy, bend not those morning stars from me,

Where virtue is made strong by beautys might,

Where love is chasteness, pain doth learn delight,

And humbleness grows one with majesty.

Whatever may ensue, O let me be

Co-partner of the riches of that sight;

Let not mine eyes be hell-drivn from that light;

O look, O shine, O let me die and see.

For though I oft my self of them bemoan,

That through my heart their beamy darts be gone,

Whose cureless wounds even now most freshly bleed,

Yet since my death wound is already got,

Dear killer, spare not they sweet cruel shot;

A kind of grace it is to slay with speed./CONTENT"	NAME/Astrophil and Stella 48: Souls joy, bend not those morning stars from me/NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/SIR PHILIP SIDNEY/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/I on my horse, and Love on me, doth try

Our horsemanships, while by strange work I prove

A horseman to my horse, a horse to Love,

And now mans wrongs in me, poor beast, descry.

The reins wherewith my rider doth me tie

Are humbled thoughts, which bit of reverence move,

Curbed in with fear, but with gilt boss above

Of hope, which makes it seem fair to the eye.

The wand is will; thou, fancy, saddle art,

Girt fast by memory; and while I spur

My horse, he spurs with sharp desire to my heart;

He sits me fast, however I do stir;

And now hath made me to his hand so right

That in the manage myself takes delight./CONTENT"	NAME/Astrophil and Stella 49: I on my horse, and Love on me, doth try /NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/SIR PHILIP SIDNEY/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/It is most true, that eyes are formed to serve

The inward light; and that the heavenly part

Ought to be king, from whose rules who do swerve,

Rebels to Nature, strive for their own smart.

    It is most true, what we call Cupids dart,

An image is, which for ourselves we carve;

And, fools, adore in temple of our heart,

Till that good god make Church and churchman starve.

    True, that true beauty virtue is indeed,

Whereof this beauty can be but a shade,

Which elements with mortal mixture breed;

True, that on earth we are but pilgrims made,

    And should in soul up to our country move;

True; and yet true, that I must Stella love./CONTENT"	NAME/Astrophil and Stella 5: It is most true, that eyes are formed to serve/NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/SIR PHILIP SIDNEY/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/A strife is grown between Virtue and Love,

While each pretends that Stella must be his:

Her eyes, her lips, her all, saith Love, do this,

Since they do wear his badge, most firmly prove.

But Virtue thus that title doth disprove,

That Stella (O dear name) that Stella is

That virtuous soul, sure heir of heavnly bliss;

Not this fair outside, which our hearts doth move.

And therefore, though her beauty and her grace

Be Loves indeed, in Stellas self he may

By no pretense claim any manner place.

Well, Love, since this demur our suit doth stay,

Let Virtue have that Stella's self; yet thus,

Let Virtue but that body grant to us./CONTENT"	NAME/Astrophil and Stella 52: A strife is grown between Virtue and Love/NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/SIR PHILIP SIDNEY/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/O Grammar rules, O now your virtues show;

    So children still read you with awful eyes,

    As my young Dove may in your precepts wise

Her grant to me, by her own virtue know.

For late with heart most high, with eyes most low,

    I cravd the thing which ever she denies:

    She lightning Love, displaying Venus skies,

Least once should not be heard, twice said, No, No.

    Sing then my Muse, now Io Pan sing,

    Heavns envy not at my high triumphing:

But Grammars force with sweet success confirm,

    For Grammar says (O this dear Stella weigh,)

    For Grammar says (to Grammar who says nay)

That in one speech two Negatives affirm./CONTENT"	NAME/Astrophil and Stella 63: O Grammar rules, O now your virtues show/NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/SIR PHILIP SIDNEY/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/Desire, though thou my old companion art,

And oft so clings to my pure Love that I

One from the other scarcely can descry,

While each doth blow the fire of my heart,

Now from thy fellowship I needs must part;

Venus is taught with Dians wings to fly;

I must no more in thy sweet passions lie;

Virtues gold now must head my Cupids dart.

Service and honor, wonder with delight,

Fear to offend, will worthy to appear,

Care shining in mine eyes, faith in my sprite:

These things are let me by my only dear;

But thou, Desire, because thou wouldst have all,

Now banished art. But yet alas how shall?/CONTENT"	NAME/Astrophil and Stella 72: Desire, though thou my old companion art/NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/SIR PHILIP SIDNEY/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/Stella, think not that I by verse seek fame,

Who seek, who hope, who love, who live but thee;

Thine eyes my pride, thy lips my history;

If thou praise not, all other praise is shame.

Nor so ambitious am I, as to frame

A nest for my young praise in laurel tree:

In truth I sweare, I wish not there should be

Graved in mine epitaph a Poets name:

Nay if I would, could I just title make,

That any laud to me thereof should grow,

Without my plumes from others wings I take.

For nothing from my wit or will doth flow,

Since all my words thy beauty doth endite,

And love doth hold my hand, and makes me write./CONTENT"	NAME/Astrophil and Stella 90: Stella, think not that I by verse seek fame/NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/GEORGE CHAPMAN/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/O come, soft rest of cares! come, Night!

       Come, naked Virtues only tire,

The reaped harvest of the light

    Bound up in sheaves of sacred fire,

       Love calls to war:

             Sighs his alarms,

       Lips his swords are,

             The fields his arms.



Come, Night, and lay thy velvet hand

    On glorious Days outfacing face;

And all thy crowned flames command

    For torches to our nuptial grace.

       Love calls to war:

             Sighs his alarms,

       Lips his swords are,

             The field his arms./CONTENT"	NAME/Bridal Song/NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/THOMAS CAMPION/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/There is a garden in her face

   Where roses and white lilies blow;

A heavenly paradise is that place,

   Wherein all pleasant fruits do flow:

      There cherries grow which none may buy

      Till Cherry-ripe themselves do cry.



Those cherries fairly do enclose

   Of orient pearl a double row,

Which when her lovely laughter shows,

   They look like rose-buds filled with snow;

      Yet them no peer nor prince can buy

      Till Cherry-ripe themselves do cry.



Her eyes like angels watch them still;

   Her brows like bended bows do stand,

Threat'ning with piercing frowns to kill

   All that attempt with eye or hand

      Those sacred cherries to come nigh,

      Till Cherry-ripe themselves do cry./CONTENT"	NAME/Cherry-Ripe/NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/ISABELLA WHITNEY/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/The time is come, I must depart

   from thee, ah famous city;

I never yet to rue my smart,

   did find that thou hadst pity.

Wherefore small cause there is, that I

   should grieve from thee to go;

But many women foolishly,

   like me, and other moe,

Do such a fixed fancy set,

   on those which least deserve,

That long it is ere wit we get

   away from them to swerve.

But time with pity oft will tell

   to those that will her try,

Whether it best be more to mell,

   or utterly defy.

And now hath time me put in mind

   of thy great cruelness,

That never once a help would find,

   to ease me in distress.

Thou never yet wouldst credit give

   to board me for a year;

Nor with apparel me relieve,

   except thou payed were.

No, no, thou never didst me good,

   nor ever wilt, I know.

Yet am I in no angry mood,

   but will, or ere I go,

In perfect love and charity,

   my testament here write,

And leave to thee such treasury,

   as I in it recite.

Now stand aside and give me leave

      to write my latest will;

And see that none you do deceive

   of that I leave them till./CONTENT"	NAME/A Communication Which the Author Had to London, Before She Made Her Will/NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/HENRY HOWARD, EARL OF SURREY/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/O happy dames, that may embrace

The fruit of your delight,

Help to bewail the woeful case

And eke the heavy plight

Of me, that wonted to rejoice

The fortune of my pleasant choice;

Good ladies, help to fill my mourning voice.



In ship, freight with remembrance

Of thoughts and pleasures past,

He sails that hath in governance

My life while it will last;

With scalding sighs, for lack of gale,

Furthering his hope, that is his sail,

Toward me, the sweet port of his avail.



Alas! how oft in dreams I see

Those eyes that were my food;

Which sometime so delighted me,

That yet they do me good;

Wherewith I wake with his return,

Whose absent flame did make me burn:

But when I find the lack, Lord, how I mourn!



When other lovers in arms across

Rejoice their chief delight.

Drowned in tears, to mourn my loss

I stand the bitter night

In my window, where I may see

Before the winds how the clouds flee.

Lo! what a mariner love hath made of me!



And in green waves when the salt flood

Doth rise by rage of wind,

A thousand fancies in that mood

Assail my restless mind.

Alas! now drencheth my sweet foe,

That with the spoil of my heart did go,

And left me; but, alas! why did he so?



And when the seas wax calm again

To chase fro me annoy,

My doubtful hope doth cause me pain;

So dread cuts off my joy.

Thus is my wealth mingled with woe,

And of each thought a doubt doth grow;

Now he comes! Will he come? Alas, no, no!

 /CONTENT"	NAME/Complaint of the Absence of Her Love Being Upon the Sea/NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/SAMUEL DANIEL/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/Unto the boundless Ocean of thy beauty

Runs this poor river, charged with streams of zeal:

Returning thee the tribute of my duty,

Which here my love, my youth, my plaints reveal.

Here I unclasp the book of my charged soul,

Where I have cast th'accounts of all my care:

Here have I summed my sighs, here I enroll

How they were spent for thee; look what they are.

Look on the dear expenses of my youth,

And see how just I reckon with thine eyes:

Examine well thy beauty with my truth,

And cross my cares ere greater sum arise.

Read it sweet maid, though it be done but slightly;

Who can show all his love, doth love but lightly./CONTENT"	NAME/Delia 1: Unto the boundless Ocean of thy beauty/NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/SAMUEL DANIEL/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/Go wailing verse, the infants of my love,

Minerva-like, brought forth without a Mother:

Present the image of the cares I prove,

Witness your Fathers grief exceeds all other.

Sigh out a story of her cruel deeds,

With interrupted accents of despair:

A monument that whosoever reads,

May justly praise, and blame my loveless Fair.

Say her disdain hath dried up my blood,

And starved you, in succours still denying:

Press to her eyes, importune me some good;

Waken her sleeping pity with your crying.

Knock at that hard heart, beg till you have moved her;

And tell thunkind, how dearly I have loved her./CONTENT"	NAME/Delia 2: Go wailing verse, the infants of my love/NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/SAMUEL DANIEL/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/But love whilst that thou mayst be loved again,

Now whilst thy May hath filed thy lap with flowers,

Now whilst thy beauty bears without a stain,

Now use the summer smiles, ere winter lowers.

And whilst thou spreadst unto the rising sun

The fairest flower that ever saw the light,

Now joy thy time before thy sweet be done,

And, Delia, think thy morning must have night,

And that thy brightness sets at length to west,

When thou wilt close up that which now thou shewst;

And think the same becomes they fading best

Which then shall most inveil and shadow most.

Men do not weigh the stalk for what it was,

When once they find her flower, her glory, pass./CONTENT"	NAME/Delia 32: But love whilst that thou mayst be loved again/NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/SAMUEL DANIEL/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/But love whilst that thou mayst be loved again,

Now whilst thy May hath filled thy lap with flowers,

Now whilst thy beauty bears without a stain,

Now use the summer smiles, ere winter lowers.

And whilst thou spreadst unto the rising sun

The fairest flower that ever saw the light,

Now joy thy time before thy sweet be done,

And, Delia, think thy morning must have night,

And that thy brightness sets at length to west,

When thou wilt close up that which now thou shewst;

And think the same becomes thy fading best

Which then shall most inveil and shadow most.

Men do not weigh the stalk for what it was,

When once they find her flower, her glory, pass./CONTENT"	NAME/Delia 36: But love whilst that thou mayst be loved again/NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/SAMUEL DANIEL/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/When men shall find thy flower, thy glory pass,

And thou, with careful brow sitting alone,

Received hast this message from thy glass,

That tells thee truth, and says that all is gone,

Fresh shalt thou see in me the wounds thou madest,

Though spent thy flame, in me the heat remaining,

I that have loved thee thus before thou fadest,

My faith shall wax, when thou art in thy waning.

The world shall find this miracle in me,

That fire can burn when all the matters spent;

Then what my faith hath been thyself shall see,

And that thou wast unkind thou mayst repent.

Thou mayst repent that thou hast scorned my tears,

When Winter snows upon thy golden hairs./CONTENT"	NAME/Delia 37: When men shall find thy flower, thy glory pass/NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/SAMUEL DANIEL/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/Unhappy pen and ill accepted papers,

That intimate in vain my chaste desires,

My chaste desires, the ever burning tapers,

Enkindled by her eyes celestial fires.

Celestial fires and unrespecting powers,

That deign not view the glory of your might,

In humble lines the work of careful hours,

The sacrifice I offer to her sight.

But since she scorns her own, this rests for me,

Ill moan my self, and hide the wrong I have:

And so content me that her frowns should be

To my infant style the cradle, and the grave.

What though my self no honor get thereby,

Each bird sings therself, and so will I./CONTENT"	NAME/Delia 53: Unhappy pen and ill accepted papers/NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/SIR THOMAS WYATT/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/A face that should content me wondrous well

Should not be fair but lovely to behold,

With gladsome cheer all grief for to expel;

With sober looks so would I that it should

Speak without words such words as none can tell;

Her tress also should be of crisped gold;

With wit; and thus might chance I might be tied,

And knit again the knot that should not slide./CONTENT"	NAME/A Description of Such a One As He Would Love/NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/CHRISTOPHER MARLOWE/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/In summers heat and mid-time of the day

To rest my limbs upon a bed I lay,

One window shut, the other open stood,

Which gave such light as twinkles in a wood,

Like twilight glimpse at setting of the sun

Or night being past, and yet not day begun.

Such light to shamefaced maidens must be shown,

Where they may sport, and seem to be unknown.

Then came Corinna in a long loose gown,

Her white neck hid with tresses hanging down:

Resembling fair Semiramis going to bed

Or Lais of a thousand wooers sped.

I snatched her gown, being thin, the harm was small,

Yet strived she to be covered therewithal.

And striving thus as one that would be cast,

Betrayed herself, and yielded at the last.

Stark naked as she stood before mine eye,

Not one wen in her body could I spy.



What arms and shoulders did I touch and see,

How apt her breasts were to be pressed by me?

How smooth a belly under her waist saw I?

How large a leg, and what a lusty thigh?

To leave the rest, all liked me passing well,

I clinged her naked body, down she fell,

Judge you the rest: being tired she bad me kiss,

Jove send me more such afternoons as this./CONTENT"	NAME/Elegies, Book One, 5/NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/JOHN DONNE/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/So, so breake off this last lamenting kisse,

    Which sucks two soules, and vapours Both away,

Turne thou ghost that way, and let mee turne this,

    And let our selves benight our happiest day,

We askd none leave to love; nor will we owe

    Any, so cheape a death, as saying, Goe;



Goe; and if that word have not quite kild thee,

    Ease mee with death, by bidding mee goe too.

Oh, if it have, let my word worke on mee,

    And a just office on a murderer doe.

Except it be too late, to kill me so,

    Being double dead, going, and bidding, goe./CONTENT"	NAME/The Expiration/NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/SIR WALTER RALEGH/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/Farewell, false love, the oracle of lies,

A mortal foe and enemy to rest,

An envious boy, from whom all cares arise,

A bastard vile, a beast with rage possessed,

A way of error, a temple full of treason,

In all effects contrary unto reason.



A poisoned serpent covered all with flowers,

Mother of sighs, and murderer of repose,

A sea of sorrows whence are drawn such showers

As moisture lend to every grief that grows;

A school of guile, a net of deep deceit,

A gilded hook that holds a poisoned bait.



A fortress foiled, which reason did defend,

A siren song, a fever of the mind,

A maze wherein affection finds no end,

A raging cloud that runs before the wind,

A substance like the shadow of the sun,

A goal of grief for which the wisest run.



A quenchless fire, a nurse of trembling fear,

A path that leads to peril and mishap,

A true retreat of sorrow and despair,

An idle boy that sleeps in pleasure's lap,

A deep mistrust of that which certain seems,

A hope of that which reason doubtful deems.



Sith then thy trains my younger years betrayed,

And for my faith ingratitude I find;

And sith repentance hath my wrongs bewrayed,

Whose course was ever contrary to kind:

False love, desire, and beauty frail, adieu!

Dead is the root whence all these fancies grew./CONTENT"	NAME/A Farewell to False Love/NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/JOHN DONNE/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/Mark but this flea, and mark in this,

How little that which thou deniest me is;

It sucked me first, and now sucks thee,

And in this flea our two bloods mingled be;

Thou knowst that this cannot be said

A sin, nor shame, nor loss of maidenhead,

    Yet this enjoys before it woo,

    And pampered swells with one blood made of two,

    And this, alas, is more than we would do.



Oh stay, three lives in one flea spare,

Where we almost, nay more than married are.

This flea is you and I, and this

Our mariage bed, and marriage temple is;

Though parents grudge, and you, w'are met,

And cloistered in these living walls of jet.

    Though use make you apt to kill me,

    Let not to that, self-murder added be,

    And sacrilege, three sins in killing three.



Cruel and sudden, hast thou since

Purpled thy nail, in blood of innocence?

Wherein could this flea guilty be,

Except in that drop which it sucked from thee?

Yet thou triumphst, and say'st that thou

Findst not thy self, nor me the weaker now;

    Tis true; then learn how false, fears be:

    Just so much honor, when thou yieldst to me,

    Will waste, as this fleas death took life from thee./CONTENT"	NAME/The Flea/NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/GEORGE GASCOIGNE/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/You must not wonder, though you think it strange,

To see me hold my louring head so low,

And that mine eyes take no delight to range

About the gleams which on your face do grow.

The mouse which once hath broken out of trap

Is seldom ticed with the trustless bait,

But lies aloof for fear of more mishap,

And feedeth still in doubt of deep deceit.

The scorched fly, which once hath scaped the flame,

Will hardly come to play again with fire,

Whereby I learn that grievous is the game

Which follows fancy dazzled by desire:

So that I wink or else hold down my head,

Because your blazing eyes my bale have bred./CONTENT"	NAME/For That He Looked Not upon Her/NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/SIR WALTER RALEGH/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/Fortune hath taken thee away, my love,

My lifes soul and my souls heaven above;

Fortune hath taken thee away, my princess;

My only light and my true fancys mistress.



Fortune hath taken all away from me,

Fortune hath taken all by taking thee.

Dead to all joy, I only live to woe,

So fortune now becomes my mortal foe.



In vain you eyes, you eyes do waste your tears,

In vain you sighs do smoke forth my despairs,

In vain you search the earth and heaven above,

In vain you search, for fortune rules in love.



Thus now I leave my love in fortunes hands,

Thus now I leave my love in fortunes bands,

And only love the sorrows due to me;

Sorrow henceforth it shall my princess be.



I joy in this, that fortune conquers kings;

Fortune that rules on earth and earthly things

Hath taken my love in spite of Cupids might;

So blind a dame did never Cupid right.



With wisdoms eyes had but blind Cupid seen,

Then had my love my love for ever been;

But love farewell; though fortune conquer thee,

No fortune base shall ever alter me./CONTENT"	NAME/[Fortune Hath Taken Thee Away, My Love]/NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/SIR PHILIP SIDNEY/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/Only joy, now here you are,

Fit to hear and ease my care;

Let my whispering voice obtain,

Sweet reward for sharpest pain;

Take me to thee, and thee to me.

No, no, no, no, my dear, let be.



Night hath closed all in her cloak,

Twinkling stars love-thoughts provoke:

Danger hence good care doth keep,

Jealousy itself doth sleep;

Take me to thee, and thee to me.

No, no, no, no, my dear, let be.



Better place no wit can find,

Cupids yoke to loose or bind:

These sweet flowers on fine bed too,

Us in their best language woo;

Take me to thee, and thee to me.

No, no, no, no, my dear, let be.



This small light the moon bestows,

Serves thy beams but to disclose,

So to raise my hap more high;

Fear not else, none can us spy:

Take me to thee, and thee to me.

No, no, no, no, my dear, let be.



That you heard was but a mouse,

Dumb sleep holdeth all the house;

Yet asleep, methinks they say,

Young folks, take time while you may:

Take me to thee, and thee to me.

No, no, no, no, my dear, let be.



Niggard Time threats, if we miss

This large offer of our bliss,

Long stay ere he grant the same;

Sweet then, while each thing doth frame,

Take me to thee, and thee to me.

No, no, no, no, my dear, let be.



Your fair mother is abed,

Candles out, and curtains spread:

She thinks you do letters write.

Write, but first let me indite:

Take me to thee, and thee to me.

No, no, no, no, my dear, let be.



Sweet, alas, why strive you thus?

Concord better fitteth us:

Leave to Mars the force of hands,

Your power in your beauty stands;

Take me to thee, and thee to me.

No, no, no, no, my dear, let be.



Woe to me, and do you swear

Me to hate, but I forbear,

Cursed by my destines all

That brought me so high to fall:

Soon with my death I will please thee.

No, no, no, no, my dear, let be./CONTENT"	NAME/Fourth Song/NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/HENRY VIII, KING OF ENGLAND/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/Green groweth the holly,

So doth the ivy.

Though winter blasts blow never so high,

Green groweth the holly.



As the holly groweth green

And never changeth hue,

So I am, ever hath been,

Unto my lady true.



As the holly groweth green

With ivy all alone

When flowers cannot be seen

And greenwood leaves be gone,



Now unto my lady

Promise to her I make,

From all other only

To her I me betake.



Adieu, mine own lady,

Adieu, my special

Who hath my heart truly

Be sure, and ever shall./CONTENT"	NAME/Green Groweth the Holly/NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/CHRISTOPHER MARLOWE/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/It lies not in our power to love or hate,

For will in us is overruled by fate.

When two are stripped, long ere the course begin,

We wish that one should lose, the other win;

And one especially do we affect

Of two gold ingots, like in each respect:

The reason no man knows; let it suffice

What we behold is censured by our eyes.

Where both deliberate, the love is slight:

Who ever loved, that loved not at first sight?/CONTENT"	NAME/from Hero and Leander: "It lies not in our power to love or hate"/NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/THOMAS CAMPION/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/I care not for these ladies,

That must be wooed and prayed:

Give me kind Amaryllis,

The wanton country maid.

Nature art disdaineth,

Her beauty is her own.

Her when we court and kiss,

She cries, Forsooth, let go!

But when we come where comfort is,

She never will say no.



If I love Amaryllis,

She gives me fruit and flowers:

But if we love these ladies,

We must give golden showers.

Give them gold, that sell love,

Give me the nut-brown lass,

Who, when we court and kiss,

She cries, Forsooth, let go!

But when we come where comfort is,

She never will say no.



These ladies must have pillows,

And beds by strangers wrought;

Give me a bower of willows,

Of moss and leaves unbought,

And fresh Amaryllis,

With milk and honey fed;

Who, when we court and kiss,

She cries, Forsooth, let go!

But when we come where comfort is,

She never will say no./CONTENT"	NAME/I Care Not for These Ladies/NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/HENRY VIII, KING OF ENGLAND/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/If love now reigned as it hath been

And were rewarded as it hath sin,



Noble men then would sure ensearch

All ways whereby they might it reach,



But envy reigneth with such disdain

And causeth lovers outwardly to refrain,



Which puts them to more and more

Inwardly most grievous and sore.



The fault in whom I cannot set,

But let them tell which love doth get



To lovers I put now sure this case:

Which of their loves doth get them grace?



And unto them which doth it know

Better than do I, I think it so./CONTENT"	NAME/If Love Now Reigned As It Hath Been/NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/THOMAS NASHE/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/Adieu, farewell, earths bliss;

This world uncertain is;

Fond are lifes lustful joys;

Death proves them all but toys;

None from his darts can fly;

I am sick, I must die.

   Lord, have mercy on us!



Rich men, trust not in wealth,

Gold cannot buy you health;

Physic himself must fade.

All things to end are made,

The plague full swift goes by;

I am sick, I must die.

   Lord, have mercy on us!



Beauty is but a flower

Which wrinkles will devour;

Brightness falls from the air;

Queens have died young and fair;

Dust hath closed Helens eye.

I am sick, I must die.

   Lord, have mercy on us!



Strength stoops unto the grave,

Worms feed on Hectors brave;

Swords may not fight with fate,

Earth still holds ope her gate.

Come, come! the bells do cry.

I am sick, I must die.

   Lord, have mercy on us.



Wit with his wantonness

Tasteth deaths bitterness;

Hells executioner

Hath no ears for to hear

What vain art can reply.

I am sick, I must die.

   Lord, have mercy on us.



Haste, therefore, each degree,

To welcome destiny;

Heaven is our heritage,

Earth but a players stage;

Mount we unto the sky.

I am sick, I must die.

   Lord, have mercy on us./CONTENT"	NAME/In Time of Plague [Adieu, farewell, earths bliss]/NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/EN JONSON/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/Tonight, grave sir, both my poor house, and I

Do equally desire your company;

Not that we think us worthy such a guest,

But that your worth will dignify our feast

With those that come, whose grace may make that seem

Something, which else could hope for no esteem.

It is the fair acceptance, sir, creates

The entertainment perfect, not the cates.

Yet shall you have, to rectify your palate,

An olive, capers, or some better salad

Ushering the mutton; with a short-legged hen,

If we can get her, full of eggs, and then

Lemons, and wine for sauce; to these a cony

Is not to be despaired of, for our money;

And, though fowl now be scarce, yet there are clerks,

The sky not falling, think we may have larks.

Ill tell you of more, and lie, so you will come:

Of partridge, pheasant, woodcock, of which some

May yet be there, and godwit, if we can;

Knat, rail, and ruff too. Howsoeer, my man

Shall read a piece of Virgil, Tacitus,

Livy, or of some better book to us,

Of which well speak our minds, amidst our meat;

And Ill profess no verses to repeat.

To this, if ought appear which I not know of,

That will the pastry, not my paper, show of.

Digestive cheese and fruit there sure will be;

But that which most doth take my Muse and me,

Is a pure cup of rich Canary wine,

Which is the Mermaids now, but shall be mine;

Of which had Horace, or Anacreon tasted,

Their lives, as so their lines, till now had lasted.

Tobacco, nectar, or the Thespian spring,

Are all but Luther's beer to this I sing.

Of this we will sup free, but moderately,

And we will have no Pooley, or Parrot by,

Nor shall our cups make any guilty men;

But, at our parting we will be as when

We innocently met. No simple word

That shall be uttered at our mirthful board,

Shall make us sad next morning or affright

The liberty that well enjoy tonight./CONTENT"	NAME/Inviting a Friend to Supper/NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/THOMAS CAMPION/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/Kind are her answers,

But her performance keeps no day;

Breaks time, as dancers

From their own music when they stray:

All her free favors

And smooth words wing my hopes in vain.

O did ever voice so sweet but only feign?

Can true love yield such delay,

Converting joy to pain?



Lost is our freedom,

When we submit to women so:

Why do we need em,

When in their best they work our woe?

There is no wisdom

Can alter ends, by Fate prefixed.

O why is the good of man with evil mixed?

Never were days yet called two,

But one night went betwixt./CONTENT"	NAME/Kind Are Her Answers/NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/SAMUEL DANIEL/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/Love is a sickness full of woes,

All remedies refusing;

A plant that with most cutting grows,

Most barren with best using.

Why so?

More we enjoy it, more it dies;

If not enjoyed, it sighting cries,

Heigh ho!



Love is a torment of the mind,

A tempest everlasting;

And Jove hath made it of a kind

Not well, not full, nor fasting.

Why so?

More we enjoy it, more it dies;

If not enjoyed, it sighing cries,

Heigh ho!/CONTENT"	NAME/Love Is A Sickness Full of Woes/NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/THOMAS HEYWOOD/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/Pack, clouds away! and welcome day!

With night we banish sorrow;

Sweet air, blow soft, mount larks aloft

To give my love good-morrow!

Wings from the wind to please her mind,

Notes from the lark Ill borrow;

Bird, prune thy wing, nightingale, sing,

To give my love good-morrow;

To give my love good-morrow;

Notes from them both Ill borrow.



Wake from thy nest, Robin Redbreast,

Sing birds in every furrow;

And from each hill, let music shrill

Give my fair love good-morrow!

Blackbird and thrush in every bush,

Stare, linnet, and cock-sparrow!

You pretty elves, amongst yourselves,

Sing my fair love good-morrow;

To give my love good-morrow,

Sing birds in every furrow./CONTENT"	NAME/Love's Good-Morrow/NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/JOHN DONNE/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/I scarce believe my love to be so pure

   As I had thought it was,

   Because it doth endure

Vicissitude, and season, as the grass;

Methinks I lied all winter, when I swore

My love was infinite, if spring make it more.



But if medicine, love, which cures all sorrow

With more, not only be no quintessence,

But mixed of all stuffs paining soul or sense,

And of the sun his working vigor borrow,

Loves not so pure, and abstract, as they use

To say, which have no mistress but their muse,

But as all else, being elemented too,

Love sometimes would contemplate, sometimes do.



And yet no greater, but more eminent,

   Love by the spring is grown;

   As, in the firmament,

Stars by the sun are not enlarged, but shown,

Gentle love deeds, as blossoms on a bough,

From loves awakened root do bud out now.



If, as water stirred more circles be

Produced by one, love such additions take,

Those, like so many spheres, but one heaven make,

For they are all concentric unto thee;

And though each spring do add to love new heat,

As princes do in time of action get

New taxes, and remit them not in peace,

No winter shall abate the springs increase./CONTENT"	NAME/Love's Growth/NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/JOHN SKELTON/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/Ay, beshrew you! by my fay,

These wanton clerks be nice alway!

Avaunt, avaunt, my popinjay!

What, will ye do nothing but play?

Tilly, vally, straw, let be I say!

Gup, Christian Clout, gup, Jack of the Vale!

With Mannerly Margery Milk and Ale.



By God, ye be a pretty pode,

And I love you an whole cart-load.

Straw, James Foder, ye play the fode,

I am no hackney for your rod:

Go watch a bull, your back is broad!

Gup, Christian Clout, gup, Jack of the Vale!

With Mannerly Margery Milk and Ale.



Ywis ye deal uncourteously;

What, would ye frumple me? now fy!

What, and ye shall be my pigesnye?

By Christ, ye shall not, no hardely:

I will not be japed bodily!

Gup, Christian Clout, gup, Jack of the Vale!

With Mannerly Margery Milk and Ale.



Walk forth your way, ye cost me nought;

Now have I found that I have sought:

The best cheap flesh that I ever bought.

Yet, for his love that all hath wrought,

Wed me, or else I die for thought.

Gup, Christian Clout, your breath is stale!

Go, Mannerly Margery Milk and Ale!

Gup, Christian Clout, gup, Jack of the Vale!

With Mannerly Margery Milk and Ale./CONTENT"	NAME/Mannerly Margery Milk and Ale/NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/GIOVANNI BATTISTA GUARINI/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/Man of himselfs a little world, but joind

With woman, woman for that end designd,

(Hear cruel fair one whilst I this rehearse!)

He makes up then a complete universe.

Man, like this sublunary world, is born

The sport of two cross planets, love, and scorn:

Woman the other world resembles well,

In whose looks Heavn is, in whose breast Hell./CONTENT"	NAME/The Microcosm/NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/SIR EDWARD DYER/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/The lowest trees have tops, the ant her gall,

The fly her spleen, the little sparks their heat;

The slender hairs cast shadows, though but small,

And bees have stings, although they be not great;

Seas have their source, and so have shallow springs;

And love is love, in beggars as in kings.



Where rivers smoothest run, deep are the fords;

The dial stirs, yet none perceives it move;

The firmest faith is in the fewest words;

The turtles cannot sing, and yet they love:

True hearts have eyes and ears, no tongues to speak;

They hear and see, and sigh, and then they break./CONTENT"	NAME/A Modest Love/NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/THOMAS CAMPION/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/Come, O come, my lifes delight,

Let me not in languor pine!

Love loves no delay; thy sight,

The more enjoyed, the more divine:

O come, and take from me

The pain of being deprived of thee!



Thou all sweetness dost enclose,

Like a little world of bliss.

Beauty guards thy looks: the rose

In them pure and eternal is.

Come, then, and make thy flight

As swift to me, as heavenly light./CONTENT"	NAME/My Lifes Delight/NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/THOMAS CAMPION/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/My sweetest Lesbia, let us live and love,

And though the sager sort our deeds reprove,

Let us not weigh them. Heavens great lamps do dive

Into their west, and straight again revive,

But soon as once set is our little light,

Then must we sleep one ever-during night.



If all would lead their lives in love like me,

Then bloody swords and armor should not be;

No drum nor trumpet peaceful sleeps should move,

Unless alarm came from the camp of love.

But fools do live, and waste their little light,

And seek with pain their ever-during night.



When timely death my life and fortune ends,

Let not my hearse be vexed with mourning friends,

But let all lovers, rich in triumph, come

And with sweet pastimes grace my happy tomb;

And Lesbia, close up thou my little light,

And crown with love my ever-during night./CONTENT"	NAME/My Sweetest Lesbia/NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/THOMAS CAMPION/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/Never love unless you can

Bear with all the faults of man:

Men sometimes will jealous be

Though but little cause they see;

And hang the head, as discontent,

And speak what straight they will repent.



Men that but one saint adore

Make a show of love to more.

Beauty must be scorned in none,

Though but truly served in one:

For what is courtship but disguise?

True hearts may have dissembling eyes.



Men, when their affairs require,

Must awhile themselves retire;

Sometimes hunt, and sometimes hawk,

And not ever sit and talk.

If these and such-like you can bear,

Then like, and love, and never fear!/CONTENT"	NAME/Never Love Unless/NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/SIR PHILIP SIDNEY/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/The nightingale, as soon as April bringeth

Unto her rested sense a perfect waking,

While late bare earth, proud of new clothing, springeth,

Sings out her woes, a thorn her song-book making,

And mournfully bewailing,

Her throat in tunes expresseth

What grief her breast oppresseth

For Tereus force on her chaste will prevailing.

O Philomela fair, O take some gladness,

That here is juster cause of plaintful sadness:

Thine earth now springs, mine fadeth;

Thy thorn without, my thorn my heart invadeth.



Alas, she hath no other cause of anguish

But Tereus love, on her by strong hand wroken,

Wherein she suffering, all her spirits languish;

Full womanlike complains her will was broken.

But I, who daily craving,

Cannot have to content me,

Have more cause to lament me,

Since wanting is more woe than too much having.

O Philomela fair, O take some gladness,

That here is juster cause of plaintful sadness:

Thine earth now springs, mine fadeth;

Thy thorn without, my thorn my heart invadeth./CONTENT"	NAME/The Nightingale/NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/THOMAS CAMPION/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/Now winter nights enlarge

The number of their hours;

And clouds their storms discharge

Upon the airy towers.

Let now the chimneys blaze

And cups oerflow with wine,

Let well-turned words amaze

With harmony divine.

Now yellow waxen lights

Shall wait on honey love

While youthful revels, masques, and courtly sights

Sleeps leaden spells remove.



This time doth well dispense

With lovers long discourse;

Much speech hath some defense,

Though beauty no remorse.

All do not all things well;

Some measures comely tread,

Some knotted riddles tell,

Some poems smoothly read.

The summer hath his joys,

And winter his delights;

Though love and all his pleasures are but toys,

They shorten tedious nights./CONTENT"	NAME/Now Winter Nights Enlarge/NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/SIR WALTER RALEGH/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/If all the world and love were young,

And truth in every Shepherds tongue,

These pretty pleasures might me move,

To live with thee, and be thy love.



Time drives the flocks from field to fold,

When Rivers rage and Rocks grow cold,

And Philomel becometh dumb,

The rest complains of cares to come.



The flowers do fade, and wanton fields,

To wayward winter reckoning yields,

A honey tongue, a heart of gall,

Is fancys spring, but sorrows fall.



Thy gowns, thy shoes, thy beds of Roses,

Thy cap, thy kirtle, and thy posies

Soon break, soon wither, soon forgotten:

In folly ripe, in reason rotten.



Thy belt of straw and Ivy buds,

The Coral clasps and amber studs,

All these in me no means can move

To come to thee and be thy love.



But could youth last, and love still breed,

Had joys no date, nor age no need,

Then these delights my mind might move

To live with thee, and be thy love./CONTENT"	NAME/The Nymphs Reply to the Shepherd/NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/QUEEN ELIZABETH I/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/I grieve and dare not show my discontent,

I love and yet am forced to seem to hate,

I do, yet dare not say I ever meant,

I seem stark mute but inwardly do prate.

I am and not, I freeze and yet am burned,

Since from myself another self I turned.



My care is like my shadow in the sun,

Follows me flying, flies when I pursue it,

Stands and lies by me, doth what I have done.

His too familiar care doth make me rue it.

No means I find to rid him from my breast,

Till by the end of things it be supprest.



Some gentler passion slide into my mind,

For I am soft and made of melting snow;

Or be more cruel, love, and so be kind.

Let me or float or sink, be high or low.

Or let me live with some more sweet content,

Or die and so forget what love ere meant./CONTENT"	NAME/On Monsieurs Departure/NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/WILLIAM SHAKESPEARE/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/Her lily hand her rosy cheek lies under,

Cozening the pillow of a lawful kiss;

Who, therefore angry, seems to part in sunder,

Swelling on either side to want his bliss;

Between whose hills her head entombed is;

Where like a virtuous monument she lies,

To be admired of lewd unhallowed eyes.



Without the bed her other fair hand was,

On the green coverlet, whose perfect white

Showed like an April daisy on the grass,

With pearly sweat resembling dew of night.

Her eyes, like marigolds, had sheathed their light,

And canopied in darkness sweetly lay

Till they might open to adorn the day.



Her hair like golden threads played with her breath

O modest wantons, wanton modesty!

Showing lifes triumph in the map of death,

And deaths dim look in lifes mortality.

Each in her sleep themselves so beautify

As if between them twain there were no strife,

But that life lived in death, and death in life.



Her breasts like ivory globes circled with blue,

A pair of maiden worlds unconquered,

Save of their lord no bearing yoke they knew,

And him by oath they truly honoured.

These worlds in Tarquin new ambition bred,

Who like a foul usurper went about

From this fair throne to heave the owner out.



What could he see but mightily he noted?

What did he note but strongly he desired?

What he beheld, on that he firmly doted,

And in his will his willful eye he tired.

With more than admiration he admired

Her azure veins, her alabaster skin,

Her coral lips, her snow-white dimpled chin.



As the grim lion fawneth oer his prey

Sharp hunger by the conquest satisfied,

So oer this sleeping soul doth Tarquin stay,

His rage of lust by gazing qualified;

Slacked, not suppressed; for, standing by her side,

His eye, which late this mutiny restrains,

Unto a greater uproar tempts his veins.



And they, like straggling slaves for pillage fighting,

Obdurate vassals fell exploits effecting.

In bloody death and ravishment delighting,

Nor childrens tears nor mothers groans respecting,

Swell in their pride, the onset still expecting.

Anon his beating heart, alarum striking,

Gives the hot charge and bids them do their liking.



His drumming heart cheers up his burning eye,

His eye commends the leading to his hand;

His hand, as proud of such a dignity,

Smoking with pride, marched on to make his stand

On her bare breast, the heart of all her land,

Whose ranks of blue veins, as his hand did scale,

Left their round turrets destitute and pale.



They, mustering to the quiet cabinet

Where their dear governess and lady lies,

Do tell her she is dreadfully beset

And fright her with confusion of their cries.

She, much amazed, breaks ope her locked-up eyes,

Who, peeping forth this tumult to behold,

Are by his flaming torch dimmed and controlled.



Imagine her as one in dead of night

From forth dull sleep by dreadful fancy waking,

That thinks she hath beheld some ghastly sprite,

Whose grim aspect sets every joint a-shaking.

What terror tis! but she, in worser taking,

From sleep disturbed, heedfully doth view

The sight which makes supposed terror true.



Wrapped and confounded in a thousand fears,

Like to a new-killed bird she trembling lies.

She dares not look; yet, winking, there appears

Quick-shifting antics ugly in her eyes.

Such shadows are the weak brains forgeries,

Who, angry that the eyes fly from their lights,

In darkness daunts them with more dreadful sights.



His hand, that yet remains upon her breast

(Rude ram, to batter such an ivory wall!)

May feel her heart (poor citizen) distressed,

Wounding itself to death, rise up and fall,

Beating her bulk, that his hand shakes withal.

This moves in him more rage and lesser pity,

To make the breach and enter this sweet city./CONTENT"	NAME/from The Rape of Lucrece/NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/THOMAS LODGE/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/Love in my bosom like a bee

Doth suck his sweet;

Now with his wings he plays with me,

Now with his feet.

Within mine eyes he makes his nest,

His bed amidst my tender breast;

My kisses are his daily feast,

And yet he robs me of my rest.

Ah, wanton, will ye?



And if I sleep, then percheth he

With pretty flight,

And makes his pillow of my knee

The livelong night.

Strike I my lute, he tunes the string;

He music plays if so I sing;

He lends me every lovely thing;

Yet cruel he my heart doth sting.

Whist, wanton, still ye!



Else I with roses every day

Will whip you hence,

And bind you, when you long to play,

For your offense.

Ill shut mine eyes to keep you in,

Ill make you fast it for your sin,

Ill count your power not worth a pin.

Alas! what hereby shall I win

If he gainsay me?



What if I beat the wanton boy

With many a rod?

He will repay me with annoy,

Because a god.

Then sit thou safely on my knee,

And let thy bower my bosom be;

Lurk in mine eyes, I like of thee.

O Cupid, so thou pity me,

Spare not, but play thee!/CONTENT"	NAME/Rosalinds Madrigal/NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/SIR PHILIP SIDNEY/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/Whose sense in so evil consort, their stepdame Nature lays,

That ravishing delight in them most sweet tunes do not raise;

Or if they do delight therein, yet are so cloyed with wit,

As with sententious lips to set a title vain on it:

O let them hear these sacred tunes, and learn in wonders schools,

To be (in things past bounds of wit) fools, if they be not fools.



Who have so leaden eyes, as not to see sweet beautys show,

Or seeing, have so wooden wits, as not that worth to know;

Or knowing, have so muddy minds, as not to be in love;

Or loving, have so frothy thoughts, as easly thence to move:

Or let them see these heavenly beams, and in fair letters read

A lesson fit, both sight and skill, love and firm love to breed.



Hear then, but then with wonder hear; see but adoring see,

No mortal gifts, no earthly fruits, now here descended be;

See, do you see this face? a face? nay, image of the skies,

Of which the two life-giving lights are figured in her eyes:

Hear you this soul-invading voice, and count it but a voice?

The very essence of their tunes, when Angels do rejoice./CONTENT"	NAME/Seventh Song/NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/EN JONSON/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/Slow, slow, fresh fount, keep time with my salt tears;

Yet slower, yet, O faintly, gentle springs!

List to the heavy part the music bears,

Woe weeps out her division, when she sings.

Droop herbs and flowers;

Fall grief in showers;

Our beauties are not ours.

O, I could still,

Like melting snow upon some craggy hill,

Drop, drop, drop, drop,

Since natures pride is now a withered daffodil./CONTENT"	NAME/Slow, Slow, Fresh Fount/NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/WILLIAM SHAKESPEARE/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/Come away, come away, death,

    And in sad cypress let me be laid.

Fly away, fly away, breath;

    I am slain by a fair cruel maid.

My shroud of white, stuck all with yew,

             O, prepare it!

My part of death, no one so true

         Did share it.



Not a flower, not a flower sweet,

    On my black coffin let there be strown.

Not a friend, not a friend greet

    My poor corpse, where my bones shall be thrown.

A thousand thousand sighs to save,

             Lay me, O, where

Sad true lover never find my grave,

             To weep there!/CONTENT"	NAME/Song: Come away, come away, death /NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/WILLIAM SHAKESPEARE/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/It was a lover and his lass,

   With a hey, and a ho, and a hey nonino,

That oer the green cornfield did pass,

   In springtime, the only pretty ring time,

When birds do sing, hey ding a ding, ding;

Sweet lovers love the spring.



Between the acres of the rye,

   With a hey, and a ho, and a hey nonino,

Those pretty country folks would lie,

   In springtime, the only pretty ring time,

When birds do sing, hey ding a ding, ding;

Sweet lovers love the spring.



This carol they began that hour,

   With a hey, and a ho, and a hey nonino,

How that a life was but a flower

   In springtime, the only pretty ring time,

When birds do sing, hey ding a ding, ding;

Sweet lovers love the spring.



And therefore take the present time,

   With a hey, and a ho, and a hey nonino,

For love is crowned with the prime

   In springtime, the only pretty ring time,

When birds do sing, hey ding a ding, ding;

Sweet lovers love the spring./CONTENT"	NAME/Song: It was a lover and his lass/NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/WILLIAM SHAKESPEARE/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/Sigh no more, ladies, sigh no more.

    Men were deceivers ever,

One foot in sea, and one on shore,

    To one thing constant never.

Then sigh not so, but let them go,

    And be you blithe and bonny,

Converting all your sounds of woe

    Into hey nonny, nonny.



Sing no more ditties, sing no more

    Of dumps so dull and heavy.

The fraud of men was ever so

    Since summer first was leafy.

Then sigh not so, but let them go,

    And be you blithe and bonny,

Converting all your sounds of woe

    Into hey, nonny, nonny./CONTENT"	NAME/Song: Sigh no more, ladies, sigh no more/NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/EN JONSON/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/Come, my Celia, let us prove,

While we can, the sports of love;

Time will not be ours forever;

He at length our good will sever.

Spend not then his gifts in vain.

Suns that set may rise again;

But if once we lose this light,

Tis with us perpetual night.

Why should we defer our joys?

Fame and rumor are but toys.

Cannot we delude the eyes

Of a few poor household spies,

Or his easier ears beguile,

So removed by our wile?

Tis no sin loves fruit to steal;

But the sweet thefts to reveal,

To be taken, to be seen,

These have crimes accounted been./CONTENT"	NAME/Song: to Celia [Come, my Celia, let us prove]/NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/WILLIAM SHAKESPEARE/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/Who is Silvia? what is she,

    That all our swains commend her?

Holy, fair, and wise is she;

    The heaven such grace did lend her,

That she might admired be.



Is she kind as she is fair?

    For beauty lives with kindness.

Love doth to her eyes repair,

    To help him of his blindness;

And, being helped, inhabits there.



Then to Silvia let us sing,

    That Silvia is excelling;

She excels each mortal thing

    Upon the dull earth dwelling;

To her let us garlands bring/CONTENT"	NAME/Song: Who is Silvia? what is she/NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/WILLIAM SHAKESPEARE/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/From fairest creatures we desire increase,

That thereby beautys rose might never die,

But as the riper should by time decease,

His tender heir might bear his memory;

But thou, contracted to thine own bright eyes,

Feedst thy lights flame with self-substantial fuel,

Making a famine where abundance lies,

Thyself thy foe, to thy sweet self too cruel.

Though that art now the worlds fresh ornament

And only herald to the gaudy spring,

Within thine own bud buriest thy content,

And, tender churl, makst waste in niggarding.

   Pity the world, or else this glutton be,

   To eat the worlds due, by the grave and thee./CONTENT"	NAME/Sonnet 1: From fairest creatures we desire increase/NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/WILLIAM SHAKESPEARE/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/When forty winters shall besiege thy brow

And dig deep trenches in thy beautys field,

Thy youths proud livery, so gazed on now,

Will be a tattered weed, of small worth held.

Then being asked where all thy beauty lies

Where all the treasure of thy lusty days

To say within thine own deep-sunken eyes

Were an all-eating shame and thriftless praise.

How much more praise deserved thy beautys use

If thou couldst answer ""This fair child of mine

Shall sum my count and make my old excuse"",

Proving his beauty by succession thine.

    This were to be new made when thou art old,

    And see thy blood warm when thou feelst it cold./CONTENT"	NAME/Sonnet 2: When forty winters shall besiege thy brow/NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/WILLIAM SHAKESPEARE/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/Look in thy glass and tell the face thou viewest,

Now is the time that face should form another,

Whose fresh repair if now thou not renewest,

Thou dost beguile the world, unbless some mother.

For where is she so fair whose uneared womb

Disdains the tillage of thy husbandry?

Or who is he so fond will be the tomb

Of his self-love, to stop posterity?

Thou art thy mothers glass, and she in thee

Calls back the lovely April of her prime;

So thou through windows of thine age shalt see,

Despite of wrinkles, this thy golden time.

    But if thou live remembred not to be,

    Die single, and thine image dies with thee./CONTENT"	NAME/Sonnet 3: Look in thy glass and tell the face thou viewest/NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/WILLIAM SHAKESPEARE/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/Shall I compare thee to a summers day?

Thou art more lovely and more temperate:

Rough winds do shake the darling buds of May,

And summers lease hath all too short a date;

Sometime too hot the eye of heaven shines,

And often is his gold complexion dimm'd;

And every fair from fair sometime declines,

By chance or natures changing course untrimm'd;

But thy eternal summer shall not fade,

Nor lose possession of that fair thou owst;

Nor shall death brag thou wanderst in his shade,

When in eternal lines to time thou growst:

   So long as men can breathe or eyes can see,

   So long lives this, and this gives life to thee./CONTENT"	NAME/Sonnet 18: Shall I compare thee to a summers day?/NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/WILLIAM SHAKESPEARE/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/A womans face with natures own hand painted

Hast thou, the master-mistress of my passion;

A womans gentle heart, but not acquainted

With shifting change as is false womens fashion;

An eye more bright than theirs, less false in rolling,

Gilding the object whereupon it gazeth;

A man in hue, all hues in his controlling,

Which steals mens eyes and womens souls amazeth.

And for a woman wert thou first created,

Till nature as she wrought thee fell a-doting,

And by addition me of thee defeated

By adding one thing to my purpose nothing.

      But since she pricked thee out for women's pleasure,

      Mine be thy love and thy loves use their treasure./CONTENT"	NAME/Sonnet 20: A womans face with natures own hand painted/NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/WILLIAM SHAKESPEARE/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/No more be grieved at that which thou hast done:

Roses have thorns, and silver fountains mud,

Clouds and eclipses stain both moon and sun,

And loathsome canker lives in sweetest bud.

All men make faults, and even I in this,

Authorizing thy trespass with compare,

Myself corrupting salving thy amiss,

Excusing thy sins more than thy sins are:

For to thy sensual fault I bring in sense

Thy adverse party is thy advocate

And gainst myself a lawful plea commence.

Such civil war is in my love and hate,

   That I an accessory needs must be

   To that sweet thief which sourly robs from me./CONTENT"	NAME/Sonnet 35: No more be grieved at that which thou hast done/NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/WILLIAM SHAKESPEARE/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/Take all my loves, my love, yea, take them all:

What hast thou then more than thou hadst before?

No love, my love, that thou mayst true love call

All mine was thine before thou hadst this more.

Then if for my love thou my love receivest,

I cannot blame thee for my love thou usest;

But yet be blamed if thou this self deceivest

By wilful taste of what thyself refusest.

I do forgive thy robbry, gentle thief,

Although thou steal thee all my poverty;

And yet love knows it is a greater grief

To bear loves wrong than hates known injury.

    Lascivious grace, in whom all ill well shows,

    Kill me with spites, yet we must not be foes./CONTENT"	NAME/Sonnet 40: Take all my loves, my love, yea, take them all/NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/WILLIAM SHAKESPEARE/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/Not marble nor the gilded monuments

Of princes shall outlive this powerful rhyme,

But you shall shine more bright in these contents

Than unswept stone besmeared with sluttish time.

When wasteful war shall statues overturn,

And broils root out the work of masonry,

Nor Mars his sword nor wars quick fire shall burn

The living record of your memory.

Gainst death and all-oblivious enmity

Shall you pace forth; your praise shall still find room

Even in the eyes of all posterity

That wear this world out to the ending doom.

    So, till the Judgement that yourself arise,

    You live in this, and dwell in lovers eyes./CONTENT"	NAME/Sonnet 55: Not marble nor the gilded monuments/NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/WILLIAM SHAKESPEARE/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/Being your slave, what should I do but tend

Upon the hours and times of your desire?

I have no precious time at all to spend,

Nor services to do, till you require.

Nor dare I chide the world-without-end hour

Whilst I, my sovereign, watch the clock for you.

Nor think the bitterness of absence sour

When you have bid your servant once adieu;

Nor dare I question with my jealous thought

Where you may be, or your affairs suppose,

But like a sad slave, stay and think of nought,

Save, where you are how happy you make those.

So true a fool is love that in your will

Though you do anything, he thinks no ill./CONTENT"	NAME/Sonnet 57: Being your slave, what should I do but tend/NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/WILLIAM SHAKESPEARE/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/Since brass, nor stone, nor earth, nor boundless sea

But sad mortality oer-sways their power,

How with this rage shall beauty hold a plea,

Whose action is no stronger than a flower?

O, how shall summers honey breath hold out

Against the wrackful siege of battring days,

When rocks impregnable are not so stout,

Nor gates of steel so strong, but time decays?

O fearful meditation! where, alack,

Shall times best jewel from times chest lie hid?

Or what strong hand can hold his swift foot back?

Or who his spoil of beauty can forbid?

   O, none, unless this miracle have might,

   That in black ink my love may still shine bright./CONTENT"	NAME/Sonnet 65: Since brass, nor stone, nor earth, nor boundless sea/NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/WILLIAM SHAKESPEARE/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/Why is my verse so barren of new pride,

So far from variation or quick change?

Why with the time do I not glance aside

To new-found methods, and to compounds strange?

Why write I still all one, ever the same,

And keep invention in a noted weed,

That every word doth almost tell my name,

Showing their birth, and where they did proceed?

O know, sweet love, I always write of you,

And you and love are still my argument,

So all my best is dressing old words new,

Spending again what is already spent:

   For as the sun is daily new and old,

   So is my love still telling what is told./CONTENT"	NAME/Sonnet 76: Why is my verse so barren of new pride/NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/WILLIAM SHAKESPEARE/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/Farewell! thou art too dear for my possessing,

And like enough thou knowst thy estimate.

The Charter of thy worth gives thee releasing;

My bonds in thee are all determinate.

For how do I hold thee but by thy granting,

And for that riches where is my deserving?

The cause of this fair gift in me is wanting,

And so my patent back again is swerving.

Thy self thou gav'st, thy own worth then not knowing,

Or me, to whom thou gav'st it, else mistaking,

So thy great gift, upon misprision growing,

Comes home again, on better judgement making.

   Thus have I had thee as a dream doth flatter:

   In sleep a king, but waking no such matter./CONTENT"	NAME/Sonnet 87: Farewell! thou art too dear for my possessing/NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/WILLIAM SHAKESPEARE/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/From you have I been absent in the spring,

When proud-pied April, dressed in all his trim,

Hath put a spirit of youth in everything,

That heavy Saturn laughed and leaped with him.

Yet nor the lays of birds, nor the sweet smell

Of different flowers in odour and in hue,

Could make me any summers story tell,

Or from their proud lap pluck them where they grew:

Nor did I wonder at the lilys white,

Nor praise the deep vermilion in the rose;

They were but sweet, but figures of delight

Drawn after you,  you pattern of all those.

    Yet seemd it winter still, and, you away,

    As with your shadow I with these did play./CONTENT"	NAME/Sonnet 98: From you have I been absent in the spring/NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/WILLIAM SHAKESPEARE/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/To me, fair friend, you never can be old,

For as you were when first your eye I eyed,

Such seems your beauty still. Three winters cold

Have from the forests shook three summers pride,

Three beauteous springs to yellow autumn turned

In process of the seasons have I seen,

Three April perfumes in three hot Junes burned,

Since first I saw you fresh, which yet are green.

Ah, yet doth beauty, like a dial-hand,

Steal from his figure, and no pace perceived;

So your sweet hue, which methinks still doth stand,

Hath motion, and mine eye may be deceived:

For fear of which, hear this, thou age unbred:

Ere you were born was beautys summer dead./CONTENT"	NAME/Sonnet 104: To me, fair friend, you never can be old/NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/WILLIAM SHAKESPEARE/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/O! never say that I was false of heart,

Though absence seemed my flame to qualify.

As easy might I from myself depart

As from my soul, which in thy breast doth lie:

That is my home of love; if I have ranged,

Like him that travels, I return again,

Just to the time, not with the time exchanged,

So that myself bring water for my stain.

Never believe, though in my nature reigned

All frailties that besiege all kinds of blood,

That it could so preposterously be stained,

To leave for nothing all thy sum of good;

   For nothing this wide universe I call,

   Save thou, my rose; in it thou art my all./CONTENT"	NAME/Sonnet 109: O! never say that I was false of heart/NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/WILLIAM SHAKESPEARE/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/O thou, my lovely boy, who in thy powr

Dost hold times fickle glass his sickle hour,

Who hast by waning grown, and therein showst

Thy lovers withering, as thy sweet self growst

In nature, sovereign mistress over wrack,

As thou goest onwards still will pluck thee back,

She keeps thee to this purpose, that her skill

May time disgrace, and wretched minute kill.

Yet fear her, O thou minion of her pleasure;

She may detain but not still keep her treasure.

   Her audit, though delayed, answered must be,

   And her quietus is to render thee./CONTENT"	NAME/Sonnet 126: O thou, my lovely boy, who in thy powr/NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/WILLIAM SHAKESPEARE/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/Whoever hath her wish, thou hast thy Will,

And Will to boot, and Will in overplus;

More than enough am I that vex thee still,

To thy sweet will making addition thus.

Wilt thou, whose will is large and spacious,

Not once vouchsafe to hide my will in thine?

Shall will in others seem right gracious,

And in my will no fair acceptance shine?

The sea, all water, yet receives rain still,

And in abundance addeth to his store;

So thou being rich in Will add to thy Will

One will of mine, to make thy large Will more.

   Let no unkind, no fair beseechers kill;

   Think all but one, and me in that one Will./CONTENT"	NAME/Sonnet 135: Whoever hath her wish, thou hast thy Will/NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/WILLIAM SHAKESPEARE/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/When my love swears that she is made of truth,

I do believe her, though I know she lies,

That she might think me some untutored youth,

Unlearned in the worlds false subtleties.

Thus vainly thinking that she thinks me young,

Although she knows my days are past the best,

Simply I credit her false-speaking tongue:

On both sides thus is simple truth suppressed.

But wherefore says she not she is unjust?

And wherefore say not I that I am old?

Oh, loves best habit is in seeming trust,

And age in love loves not to have years told.

    Therefore I lie with her and she with me,

    And in our faults by lies we flattered be./CONTENT"	NAME/Sonnet 138: When my love swears that she is made of truth/NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/WILLIAM SHAKESPEARE/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/In faith, I do not love thee with mine eyes,

For they in thee a thousand errors note;

But tis my heart that loves what they despise,

Who, in despite of view, is pleased to dote;

Nor are mine ears with thy tongues tune delighted,

Nor tender feeling, to base touches prone,

Nor taste, nor smell, desire to be invited

To any sensual feast with thee alone:

But my five wits nor my five senses can

Dissuade one foolish heart from serving thee,

Who leaves unswayed the likeness of a man,

Thy proud hearts slave and vassal wretch to be.

   Only my plague thus far I count my gain,

   That she that makes me sin awards me pain./CONTENT"	NAME/Sonnet 141: In faith, I do not love thee with mine eyes/NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/WILLIAM SHAKESPEARE/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/Two loves I have of comfort and despair,

Which like two spirits do suggest me still

The better angel is a man right fair,

The worser spirit a woman coloured ill.

To win me soon to hell, my female evil

Tempteth my better angel from my side,

And would corrupt my saint to be a devil,

Wooing his purity with her foul pride.

And, whether that my angel be turnd fiend,

Suspect I may, yet not directly tell,

But being both from me both to each friend,

I guess one angel in anothers hell.

   Yet this shall I neer know, but live in doubt,

   Till my bad angel fire my good one out./CONTENT"	NAME/Sonnet 144: Two loves I have of comfort and despair/NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/EN JONSON/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/I that have been a lover, and could show it,

Though not in these, in rithmes not wholly dumb,

Since I exscribe your sonnets, am become

A better lover, and much better poet.

Nor is my Muse or I ashamed to owe it

To those true numerous graces, whereof some

But charm the senses, others overcome

Both brains and hearts; and mine now best do know it:

For in your verse all Cupids armory,

His flames, his shafts, his quiver, and his bow,

His very eyes are yours to overthrow.

But then his mothers sweets you so apply,

Her joys, her smiles, her loves, as readers take

For Venus ceston every line you make./CONTENT"	NAME/A Sonnet to the Noble Lady, the Lady Mary Wroth/NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/JOHN FLETCHER/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/Take, oh, take those lips away

That so sweetly were forsworn

And those eyes, like break of day,

Lights that do mislead the morn;

But my kisses bring again,

Seals of love, though sealed in vain.



Hide, oh, hide those hills of snow,

Which thy frozen bosom bears,

On whose tops the pinks that grow

Are of those that April wears;

But first set my poor heart free,

Bound in those icy chains by thee./CONTENT"	NAME/Take, Oh, Take Those Lips Away/NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/EN JONSON/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/Though I am young, and cannot tell

    Either what Death or Love is well,

Yet I have heard they both bear darts,

    And both do aim at human hearts.

And then again, I have been told

    Love wounds with heat, as Death with cold;

So that I fear they do but bring

    Extremes to touch, and mean one thing.



As in a ruin we it call

    One thing to be blown up, or fall;

Or to our end like way may have

    By a flash of lightning, or a wave;

So Loves inflamed shaft or brand

    May kill as soon as Deaths cold hand;

Except Loves fires the virtue have

    To fright the frost out of the grave./CONTENT"	NAME/Though I am young, and cannot tell/NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/HENRY VIII, KING OF ENGLAND/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/Though that men do call it dotage,

Who loveth not wanteth courage;



And whosoever may love get,

From Venus sure he must it fet



Or else from her which is her heir,

And she to him must seem most fair.



With eye and mind doth both agree.

There is no boot: there must it be.



The eye doth look and represent,

But mind afformeth with full consent.



Thus am I fixed without grudge:

Mine eye with heart doth me so judge.



Love maintaineth all noble courage.

Who love disdaineth is all of the village:



Such loversthough they take pain

It were pity they should obtain,



For often times where they do sue

They hinder lovers that would be true.



For whoso loveth should love but once.

Change whoso will, I will be none./CONTENT"	NAME/Though that Men do Call it Dotage/NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/JOHN DONNE/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/Come, Madam, come, all rest my powers defy,

Until I labour, I in labour lie.

The foe oft-times having the foe in sight,

Is tird with standing though he never fight.

Off with that girdle, like heavens Zone glistering,

But a far fairer world encompassing.

Unpin that spangled breastplate which you wear,

That theyes of busy fools may be stopped there.

Unlace yourself, for that harmonious chime,

Tells me from you, that now it is bed time.

Off with that happy busk, which I envy,

That still can be, and still can stand so nigh.

Your gown going off, such beauteous state reveals,

As when from flowery meads thhills shadow steals.

Off with that wiry Coronet and shew

The hairy Diadem which on you doth grow:

Now off with those shoes, and then safely tread

In this loves hallowd temple, this soft bed.

In such white robes, heavens Angels used to be

Received by men; Thou Angel bringst with thee

A heaven like Mahomets Paradise; and though

Ill spirits walk in white, we easily know,

By this these Angels from an evil sprite,

Those set our hairs, but these our flesh upright.

    Licence my roving hands, and let them go,

Before, behind, between, above, below.

O my America! my new-found-land,

My kingdom, safeliest when with one man mannd,

My Mine of precious stones, My Empirie,

How blest am I in this discovering thee!

To enter in these bonds, is to be free;

Then where my hand is set, my seal shall be.

    Full nakedness! All joys are due to thee,

As souls unbodied, bodies unclothd must be,

To taste whole joys. Gems which you women use

Are like Atlantas balls, cast in mens views,

That when a fools eye lighteth on a Gem,

His earthly soul may covet theirs, not them.

Like pictures, or like books gay coverings made

For lay-men, are all women thus arrayd;

Themselves are mystic books, which only we

(Whom their imputed grace will dignify)

Must see reveald. Then since that I may know;

As liberally, as to a Midwife, shew

Thy self: cast all, yea, this white linen hence,

There is no penance due to innocence.

    To teach thee, I am naked first; why then

What needst thou have more covering than a man./CONTENT"	NAME/To His Mistress Going to Bed/NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/JOHN SKELTON/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/Merry Margaret,

As midsummer flower,

Gentle as a falcon

Or hawk of the tower:

With solace and gladness,

Much mirth and no madness,

All good and no badness;

So joyously,

So maidenly,

So womanly

Her demeaning

In every thing,

Far, far passing

That I can indite,

Or suffice to write

Of Merry Margaret

As midsummer flower,

Gentle as falcon

Or hawk of the tower.

As patient and still

And as full of good will

As fair Isaphill,

Coriander,

Sweet pomander,

Good Cassander,

Steadfast of thought,

Well made, well wrought,

Far may be sought

Ere that ye can find

So courteous, so kind

As Merry Margaret,

This midsummer flower,

Gentle as falcon

Or hawk of the tower./CONTENT"	NAME/To Mistress Margaret Hussey/NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/EN JONSON/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/That neither fame nor love might wanting be

To greatness, Cary, I sing that and thee;

Whose house, if it no other honor had,

In only thee might be both great and glad;

Who, to upbraid the sloth of this our time,

Durst valor make almost, but not, a crime;

Which deed I know not, whether were more high,

Or thou more happy, it to justify

Against thy fortune: when no foe, that day,

Could conquer thee but chance, who did betray.

Love thy great loss, which a renown hath won,

To live when Broick not stands, nor Ruhr doth run.

Love honors, which of best example be

When they cost dearest and are done most free;

Though every fortitude deserves applause,

It may be much or little in the cause.

Hes valiantst that dares fight, and not for pay;

That virtuous is, when the rewards away./CONTENT"	NAME/To Sir Henry Cary/NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/SIR WALTER RALEGH/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/Methought I saw the grave where Laura lay,

Within that temple where the vestal flame

Was wont to burn; and, passing by that way,

To see that buried dust of living fame,

Whose tomb fair Love, and fairer Virtue kept:

All suddenly I saw the Fairy Queen;

At whose approach the soul of Petrarch wept,

And, from thenceforth, those Graces were not seen:

For they this queen attended; in whose stead

Oblivion laid him down on Lauras hearse:

Hereat the hardest stones were seen to bleed,

And groans of buried ghosts the heavens did pierce:

Where Homers spright did tremble all for grief,

And cursed the access of that celestial thief!/CONTENT"	NAME/A Vision upon the Fairy Queen/NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/THOMAS CAMPION/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/When thou must home to shades of underground,

And there arrived, a new admired guest,

The beauteous spirits do engirt thee round,

White Iope, blithe Helen, and the rest,

To hear the stories of thy finished love

From that smooth tongue whose music hell can move;



Then wilt thou speak of banqueting delights,

Of masques and revels which sweet youth did make,

Of tourneys and great challenges of knights,

And all these triumphs for thy beautys sake:

When thou hast told these honours done to thee,

Then tell, O tell, how thou didst murder me!/CONTENT"	NAME/Vobiscum Est Iope/NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/SIR WALTER RALEGH/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/As you came from the holy land

of Walsinghame

Met you not with my true love

By the way as you came?



How shall I know your true love

That have met many one

As I went to the holy land

That have come, that have gone?



She is neither white nor brown

But as the heavens fair

There is none hath a form so divine

In the earth or the air.



Such an one did I meet, good Sir,

Such an Angelic face,

Who like a queen, like a nymph, did appear

By her gait, by her grace.



She hath left me here all alone,

All alone as unknown,

Who sometimes did me lead with her self,

And me loved as her own.



Whats the cause that she leaves you alone

And a new way doth take;

Who loved you once as her own

And her joy did you make?



I have loved her all my youth,

But now old, as you see,

Love likes not the falling fruit

From the withered tree.



Know that love is a careless child

And forgets promise past,

He is blind, he is deaf when he list

And in faith never fast.



His desire is a dureless content

And a trustless joy

He is won with a world of despair

And is lost with a toy.



Of womenkind such indeed is the love

Or the word Love abused

Under which many childish desires

And conceits are excused.



But true Love is a durable fire

In the mind ever burning;

Never sick, never old, never dead,

From itself never turning./CONTENT"	NAME/Walsinghame/NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/SIR PHILIP SIDNEY/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/What length of verse can serve brave Mopsas good to show,

Whose virtues strange, and beauties such, as no man them may know?

Thus shrewdly burden, then, how can my Muse escape?

The gods must help, and precious things must serve to show her shape.



Like great god Saturn, fair, and like fair Venus, chaste;

As smooth as Pan, as Juno mild, like goddess Iris fast.

With Cupid she foresees, and goes god Vulcans pace;

And for a taste of all these gifts, she borrows Momus grace.



Her forehead jacinth-like, her cheeks of opal hue,

Her twinkling eyes bedecked with pearl, her lips of sapphire blue,

Her hair pure crapall stone, her mouth, O heavenly wide,

Her skin like burnished gold, her hands like silver ore untried.



As for those parts unknown, which hidden sure are best,

Happy be they which believe, and never seek the rest./CONTENT"	NAME/What Length of Verse?/NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/QUEEN ELIZABETH I/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/When I was fair and young, then favor graced me.

Of many was I sought their mistress for to be.

But I did scorn them all and answered them therefore:

Go, go, go, seek some other where; importune me no more.



How many weeping eyes I made to pine in woe,

How many sighing hearts I have not skill to show,

But I the prouder grew and still this spake therefore:

Go, go, go, seek some other where, importune me no more.



Then spake fair Venus son, that proud victorious boy,

Saying: You dainty dame, for that you be so coy,

I will so pluck your plumes as you shall say no more:

Go, go, go, seek some other where, importune me no more.



As soon as he had said, such change grew in my breast

That neither night nor day I could take any rest.

Wherefore I did repent that I had said before:

Go, go, go, seek some other where, importune me no more./CONTENT"	NAME/When I Was Fair and Young/NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/THOMAS CAMPION/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/When to her lute Corinna sings,

Her voice revives the leaden strings,

And doth in highest notes appear

As any challenged echo clear;

But when she doth of mourning speak,

Evn with her sighs the strings do break.



And as her lute doth live or die,

Let by her passion, so must I:

For when of pleasure she doth sing,

My thoughts enjoy a sudden spring,

But if she doth of sorrow speak,

Evn from my heart the strings do break./CONTENT"	NAME/When to Her Lute Corinna Sings/NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/JOHN DONNE/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/Now thou has loved me one whole day,

Tomorrow when you leavst, what wilt thou say?

Wilt thou then antedate some new-made vow?

            Or say that now

We are not just those persons which we were?

Or, that oaths made in reverential fear

Of Love, and his wrath, any may forswear?

Or, as true deaths true marriages untie,

So lovers contracts, images of those,

Bind but till sleep, deaths image, them unloose?

            Or, your own end to justify,

For having purposed change and falsehood, you

Can have no way but falsehood to be true?

Vain lunatic, against these scapes I could

            Dispute and conquer, if I would,

            Which I abstain to do,

For by tomorrow, I may think so too./CONTENT"	NAME/Woman's Constancy/NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/JOHN SKELTON/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/Womanhood, wanton, ye want:

Your meddling, mistress, is mannerless;

Plenty of ill, of goodness scant,

Ye rail at riot, reckless:

To praise your port it is needless;

For all your draff yet and your dregs,

As well borne as ye full oft time begs.



Why so coy and full of scorn?

Mine horse is sold, I ween, you say;

My new furred gown, when it is worn...

Put up your purse, ye shall not pay!

By crede, I trust to see the day,

As proud a pea-hen as ye spread,

Of me and other ye may have need!



Though angelic be your smiling,

Yet is your tongue an adders tail,

Full like a scorpion stinging

All those by whom ye have avail.

Good mistress Anne, there ye do shail:

What prate ye, pretty pigesnye?

I trust to quite you ere I die!



Your key is meet for every lock,

Your key is common and hangeth out;

Your key is ready, we need not knock,

Nor stand long wresting there about;

Of your door-gate ye have no doubt:

But one thing is, that ye be lewd:

Hold your tongue now, all beshrewd!



To mistress Anne, that farly sweet,

That wones at The Key in Thames Street.

 /CONTENT"	NAME/Womanhood, wanton, ye want/NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/HENRY HOWARD, EARL OF SURREY/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/Wyatt resteth here, that quick could never rest;

Whose heavenly gifts increased by disdain,

And virtue sank the deeper in his breast;

Such profit he of envy could obtain.



A head, where wisdom mysteries did frame,

Whose hammers beat still in that lively brain

As on a stith, where some work of fame

Was daily wrought, to turn to Britains gain.



A visage, stern and mild; where both did grow,

Vice to condemn, in virtues to rejoice;

Amid great storms whom grace assured so,

To live upright and smile at fortunes choice.



A hand that taught what might be said in rhyme;

That reft Chaucer the glory of his wit;

A mark the which (unperfited, for time)

Some may approach, but never none shall hit.



A tongue that served in foreign realms his king;

Whose courteous talk to virtue did enflame

Each noble heart; a worthy guide to bring

Our English youth, by travail unto fame.



An eye whose judgment no affect could blind,

Friends to allure, and foes to reconcile;

Whose piercing look did represent a mind

With virtue fraught, reposed, void of guile.



A heart where dread yet never so impressed

To hide the thought that might the truth avaunce;

In neither fortune lift, nor so repressed,

To swell in wealth, nor yield unto mischance.



A valiant corps, where force and beauty met,

Happy, alas! too happy, but for foes,

Lived, and ran the race that nature set;

Of manhoods shape, where she the mold did lose.



But to the heavens that simple soul is fled,

Which left with such, as covet Christ to know

Witness of faith that never shall be dead:

Sent for our health, but not received so.



Thus, for our guilt, this jewel have we lost;

The earth his bones, the heavens possess his ghost.

Amen./CONTENT"	NAME/Wyatt Resteth Here/NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/JOHN DONNE/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/Twice or thrice had I lov'd thee,

Before I knew thy face or name;

So in a voice, so in a shapeless flame

Angels affect us oft, and worshipp'd be;

         Still when, to where thou wert, I came,

Some lovely glorious nothing I did see.

         But since my soul, whose child love is,

Takes limbs of flesh, and else could nothing do,

         More subtle than the parent is

Love must not be, but take a body too;

         And therefore what thou wert, and who,

                I bid Love ask, and now

That it assume thy body, I allow,

And fix itself in thy lip, eye, and brow.



Whilst thus to ballast love I thought,

And so more steadily to have gone,

With wares which would sink admiration,

I saw I had love's pinnace overfraught;

         Ev'ry thy hair for love to work upon

Is much too much, some fitter must be sought;

         For, nor in nothing, nor in things

Extreme, and scatt'ring bright, can love inhere;

         Then, as an angel, face, and wings

Of air, not pure as it, yet pure, doth wear,

         So thy love may be my love's sphere;

                Just such disparity

As is 'twixt air and angels' purity,

'Twixt women's love, and men's, will ever be./CONTENT"	NAME/Air and Angels/NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/SIR THOMAS WYATT/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/Alas, madam, for stealing of a kiss

Have I so much your mind there offended?

Have I then done so grievously amiss

That by no means it may be amended?



Then revenge you, and the next way is this:

Another kiss shall have my life ended,

For to my mouth the first my heart did suck;

The next shall clean out of my breast it pluck./CONTENT"	NAME/Alas Madam for Stealing of a Kiss/NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/EDMUND SPENSER/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/The sovereign beauty which I do admire,

Witness the world how worthy to be praised:

The light whereof hath kindled heavenly fire

In my frail spirit, by her from baseness raised;

That being now with her huge brightness dazed,

Base thing I can no more endure to view;

But looking still on her, I stand amazed

At wondrous sight of so celestial hue.

So when my tongue would speak her praises due,

It stopped is with thought's astonishment:

And when my pen would write her titles true,

It ravish'd is with fancy's wonderment:

Yet in my heart I then both speak and write

The wonder that my wit cannot endite./CONTENT"	NAME/Amoretti III: The Sovereign Beauty/NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/EDMUND SPENSER/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/Like as a huntsman after weary chase,

Seeing the game from him escap'd away,

Sits down to rest him in some shady place,

With panting hounds beguiled of their prey:

So after long pursuit and vain assay,

When I all weary had the chase forsook,

The gentle deer return'd the self-same way,

Thinking to quench her thirst at the next brook.

There she beholding me with milder look,

Sought not to fly, but fearless still did bide:

Till I in hand her yet half trembling took,

And with her own goodwill her firmly tied.

Strange thing, me seem'd, to see a beast so wild,

So goodly won, with her own will beguil'd./CONTENT"	NAME/Amoretti LXVII: Like as a Huntsman/NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/EDMUND SPENSER/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/Most happy letters, fram'd by skilful trade,

With which that happy name was first design'd:

The which three times thrice happy hath me made,

With gifts of body, fortune, and of mind.

The first my being to me gave by kind,

From mother's womb deriv'd by due descent,

The second is my sovereign Queen most kind,

That honour and large richesse to me lent.

The third my love, my life's last ornament,

By whom my spirit out of dust was raised:

To speak her praise and glory excellent,

Of all alive most worthy to be praised.

Ye three Elizabeths for ever live,

That three such graces did unto me give./CONTENT"	NAME/Amoretti LXXIV: Most Happy Letters/NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/EDMUND SPENSER/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/Men call you fair, and you do credit it,

For that your self ye daily such do see:

But the true fair, that is the gentle wit,

And vertuous mind, is much more prais'd of me.

For all the rest, how ever fair it be,

Shall turn to naught and lose that glorious hue:

But only that is permanent and free

From frail corruption, that doth flesh ensue.

That is true beauty: that doth argue you

To be divine, and born of heavenly seed:

Deriv'd from that fair Spirit, from whom all true

And perfect beauty did at first proceed.

He only fair, and what he fair hath made,

All other fair, like flowers untimely fade./CONTENT"	NAME/Amoretti LXXIX: Men Call you Fair/NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/EDMUND SPENSER/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/One day I wrote her name upon the strand,

But came the waves and washed it away:

Again I wrote it with a second hand,

But came the tide, and made my pains his prey.

""Vain man,"" said she, ""that dost in vain assay,

A mortal thing so to immortalize;

For I myself shall like to this decay,

And eke my name be wiped out likewise.""

""Not so,"" (quod I) ""let baser things devise

To die in dust, but you shall live by fame:

My verse your vertues rare shall eternize,

And in the heavens write your glorious name:

Where whenas death shall all the world subdue,

Our love shall live, and later life renew.""/CONTENT"	NAME/Amoretti LXXV: One Day I Wrote her Name/NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/EDMUND SPENSER/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/This holy season, fit to fast and pray,

Men to devotion ought to be inclin'd:

Therefore I likewise on so holy day,

For my sweet saint some service fit will find.

Her temple fair is built within my mind,

In which her glorious image placed is,

On which my thoughts do day and night attend,

Like sacred priests that never think amiss.

There I to her as th' author of my bliss,

Will build an altar to appease her ire:

And on the same my heart will sacrifice,

Burning in flames of pure and chaste desire:

The which vouchsafe, O goddess, to accept,

Amongst thy dearest relics to be kept./CONTENT"	NAME/Amoretti XXII: This Holy Season/NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/EDMUND SPENSER/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/AH whither, Love, wilt thou now carry me?

What wontless fury dost thou now inspire

Into my feeble breast, too full of thee?

Whilst seeking to aslake thy raging fire,

Thou in me kindlest much more great desire,

And up aloft above my strength dost raise

The wondrous matter of my fire to praise.



That as I erst in praise of thine own name,

So now in honour of thy mother dear,

An honourable hymn I eke should frame,

And with the brightness of her beauty clear,

The ravish'd hearts of gazeful men might rear

To admiration of that heavenly light,

From whence proceeds such soul-enchanting might.



Thereto do thou, great goddess, queen of beauty,

Mother of love, and of all world's delight,

Without whose sovereign grace and kindly duty

Nothing on earth seems fair to fleshly sight,

Do thou vouchsafe with thy love-kindling light

T' illuminate my dim and dulled eyne,

And beautify this sacred hymn of thine:



That both to thee, to whom I mean it most,

And eke to her, whose fair immortal beam

Hath darted fire into my feeble ghost,

That now it wasted is with woes extreme,

It may so please, that she at length will stream

Some dew of grace into my withered heart,

After long sorrow and consuming smart.



WHAT time this world's great Workmaster did cast

To make all things such as we now behold,

It seems that he before his eyes had plac'd

A goodly pattern, to whose perfect mould

He fashion'd them as comely as he could;

That now so fair and seemly they appear,

As nought may be amended anywhere.



That wondrous pattern, wheresoe'er it be,

Whether in earth laid up in secret store,

Or else in heaven, that no man may it see

With sinful eyes, for fear it to deflore,

Is perfect Beauty, which all men adore;

Whose face and feature doth so much excel

All mortal sense, that none the same may tell.



Thereof as every earthly thing partakes

Or more or less, by influence divine,

So it more fair accordingly it makes,

And the gross matter of this earthly mine,

Which clotheth it, thereafter doth refine,

Doing away the dross which dims the light

Of that fair beam which therein is empight.



For, through infusion of celestial power,

The duller earth it quick'neth with delight,

And lifeful spirits privily doth pour

Through all the parts, that to the looker's sight

They seem to please. That is thy sovereign might,

O Cyprian queen, which flowing from the beam

Of thy bright star, thou into them dost stream.



That is the thing which giveth pleasant grace

To all things fair, that kindleth lively fire,

Light of thy lamp, which, shining in the face,

Thence to the soul darts amorous desire,

And robs the hearts of those which it admire;

Therewith thou pointest thy son's poison'd arrow,

That wounds the life, and wastes the inmost marrow.



How vainly then do idle wits invent,

That beauty is nought else but mixture made

Of colours fair, and goodly temp'rament

Of pure complexions, that shall quickly fade

And pass away, like to a summer's shade;

Or that it is but comely composition

Of parts well measur'd, with meet disposition.



Hath white and red in it such wondrous power,

That it can pierce through th' eyes unto the heart,

And therein stir such rage and restless stour,

As nought but death can stint his dolour's smart?

Or can proportion of the outward part

Move such affection in the inward mind,

That it can rob both sense and reason blind?



Why do not then the blossoms of the field,

Which are array'd with much more orient hue,

And to the sense most dainty odours yield,

Work like impression in the looker's view?

Or why do not fair pictures like power shew,

In which oft-times we nature see of art

Excell'd, in perfect limning every part?



But ah, believe me, there is more than so,

That works such wonders in the minds of men;

I, that have often prov'd, too well it know,

And whoso list the like assays to ken,

Shall find by trial, and confess it then,

That beauty is not, as fond men misdeem,

An outward shew of things, that only seem.



For that same goodly hue of white and red,

With which the cheeks are sprinkled, shall decay,

And those sweet rosy leaves, so fairly spread

Upon the lips, shall fade and fall away

To that they were, even to corrupted clay;

That golden wire, those sparkling stars so bright,

Shall turn to dust; and lose their goodly light.



But that fair lamp, from whose celestial ray

That light proceeds, which kindleth lovers' fire,

Shall never be extinguish'd nor decay;

But when the vital spirits do expire,

Unto her native planet shall retire;

For it is heavenly born and cannot die,

Being a parcel of the purest sky.



For when the soul, the which derived was,

At first, out of that great immortal Spright,

By whom all live to love, whilom did pass

Down from the top of purest heaven's height

To be embodied here, it then took light

And lively spirits from that fairest star,

Which lights the world forth from his fiery car.



Which power retaining still or more or less,

When she in fleshly seed is eft enraced,

Through every part she doth the same impress,

According as the heavens have her graced,

And frames her house, in which she will be placed,

Fit for herself, adorning it with spoil

Of th' heavenly riches which she robb'd erewhile.



Thereof it comes that these fair souls, which have

The most resemblance of that heavenly light,

Frame to themselves most beautiful and brave

Their fleshly bower, most fit for their delight,

And the gross matter by a sovereign might

Tempers so trim, that it may well be seen

A palace fit for such a virgin queen.



So every spirit, as it is most pure,

And hath in it the more of heavenly light,

So it the fairer body doth procure

To habit in, and it more fairly dight

With cheerful grace and amiable sight.

For of the soul the body form doth take:

For soul is form, and doth the body make.



Therefore wherever that thou dost behold

A comely corpse, with beauty fair endued,

Know this for certain, that the same doth hold

A beauteous soul, with fair conditions thewed,

Fit to receive the seed of virtue strewed.

For all that fair is, is by nature good;

That is a sign to know the gentle blood.



Yet oft it falls that many a gentle mind

Dwells in deformed tabernacle drown'd,

Either by chance, against the course of kind,

Or through unaptness in the substance found,

Which it assumed of some stubborn ground,

That will not yield unto her form's direction,

But is deform'd with some foul imperfection.



And oft it falls, (ay me, the more to rue)

That goodly beauty, albe heavenly born,

Is foul abus'd, and that celestial hue,

Which doth the world with her delight adorn,

Made but the bait of sin, and sinners' scorn,

Whilst every one doth seek and sue to have it,

But every one doth seek but to deprave it.



Yet nathemore is that fair beauty's blame,

But theirs that do abuse it unto ill:

Nothing so good, but that through guilty shame

May be corrupt, and wrested unto will:

Natheless the soul is fair and beauteous still,

However flesh{""e}s fault it filthy make;

For things immortal no corruption take.



But ye fair dames, the world's dear ornaments

And lively images of heaven's light,

Let not your beams with such disparagements

Be dimm'd, and your bright glory dark'ned quite;

But mindful still of your first country's sight,

Do still preserve your first informed grace,

Whose shadow yet shines in your beauteous face.



Loathe that foul blot, that hellish firebrand,

Disloyal lust, fair beauty's foulest blame,

That base affections, which your ears would bland,

Commend to you by love's abused name,

But is indeed the bondslave of defame;

Which will the garland of your glory mar,

And quench the light of your bright shining star.



But gentle Love, that loyal is and true,

Will more illumine your resplendent ray,

And add more brightness to your goodly hue,

From light of his pure fire; which, by like way

Kindled of yours, your likeness doth display;

Like as two mirrors, by oppos'd reflection,

Do both express the face's first impression.



Therefore, to make your beauty more appear,

It you behoves to love, and forth to lay

That heavenly riches which in you ye bear,

That men the more admire their fountain may;

For else what booteth that celestial ray,

If it in darkness be enshrined ever,

That it of loving eyes be viewed never?



But, in your choice of loves, this well advise,

That likest to yourselves ye them select,

The which your forms' first source may sympathize,

And with like beauty's parts be inly deckt;

For, if you loosely love without respect,

It is no love, but a discordant war,

Whose unlike parts amongst themselves do jar.



For love is a celestial harmony

Of likely hearts compos'd of stars' concent,

Which join together in sweet sympathy,

To work each other's joy and true content,

Which they have harbour'd since their first descent

Out of their heavenly bowers, where they did see

And know each other here belov'd to be.



Then wrong it were that any other twain

Should in love's gentle band combined be

But those whom Heaven did at first ordain,

And made out of one mould the more t' agree;

For all that like the beauty which they see,

Straight do not love; for love is not so light

As straight to burn at first beholder's sight.



But they, which love indeed, look otherwise,

With pure regard and spotless true intent,

Drawing out of the object of their eyes

A more refined form, which they present

Unto their mind, void of all blemishment;

Which it reducing to her first perfection,

Beholdeth free from flesh's frail infection.



And then conforming it unto the light,

Which in itself it hath remaining still,

Of that first Sun, yet sparkling in his sight,

Thereof he fashions in his higher skill

An heavenly beauty to his fancy's will;

And it embracing in his mind entire,

The mirror of his own thought doth admire.



Which seeing now so inly fair to be,

As outward it appeareth to the eye,

And with his spirit's proportion to agree,

He thereon fixeth all his fantasy,

And fully setteth his felicity;

Counting it fairer than it is indeed,

And yet indeed her fairness doth exceed.



For lovers' eyes more sharply sighted be

Than other men's, and in dear love's delight

See more than any other eyes can see,

Through mutual receipt of beam{""e}s bright,

Which carry privy message to the spright,

And to their eyes that inmost fair display,

As plain as light discovers dawning day.



Therein they see, through amorous eye-glances,

Armies of loves still flying to and fro,

Which dart at them their little fiery lances;

Whom having wounded, back again they go,

Carrying compassion to their lovely foe;

Who, seeing her fair eyes' so sharp effect,

Cures all their sorrows with one sweet aspect.



In which how many wonders do they rede

To their conceit, that others never see,

Now of her smiles, with which their souls they feed,

Like gods with nectar in their banquets free;

Now of her looks, which like to cordials be;

But when her words' embassade forth she sends,

Lord, how sweet music that unto them lends.



Sometimes upon her forehead they behold

A thousand graces masking in delight;

Sometimes within her eyelids they unfold

Ten thousand sweet belgards, which to their sight

Do seem like twinkling stars in frosty night;

But on her lips, like rosy buds in May,

So many millions of chaste pleasures play.



All those, O Cytherea, and thousands more

Thy handmaids be, which do on thee attend,

To deck thy beauty with their dainties' store,

That may it more to mortal eyes commend,

And make it more admir'd of foe and friend:

That in men's hearts thou may'st thy throne install,

And spread thy lovely kingdom over all.



Then Io, triumph! O great Beauty's Queen,

Advance the banner of thy conquest high,

That all this world, the which thy vassals bene,

May draw to thee, and with due fealty

Adore the power of thy great majesty,

Singing this hymn in honour of thy name,

Compil'd by me, which thy poor liegeman am.



In lieu whereof grant, O great sovereign,

That she whose conquering beauty doth captive

My trembling heart in her eternal chain,

One drop of grace at length will to me give,

That I her bounden thrall by her may live,

And this same life, which first fro me she reaved,

May owe to her, of whom I it received.



And you, fair Venus' darling, my dear dread,

Fresh flower of grace, great goddess of my life,

When your fair eyes these fearful lines shall read,

Deign to let fall one drop of due relief,

That may recure my heart's long pining grief,

And shew what wondrous power your beauty hath,

That can restore a damned wight from death./CONTENT"	NAME/An Hymn In Honour Of Beauty/NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/SIR THOMAS WYATT/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/And wilt thou leave me thus?

Say nay, say nay, for shame,

To save thee from the blame

Of all my grief and grame;

And wilt thou leave me thus?

Say nay, say nay!



And wilt thou leave me thus,

That hath loved thee so long

In wealth and woe among?

And is thy heart so strong

As for to leave me thus?

Say nay, say nay!



And wilt thou leave me thus,

That hath given thee my heart

Never for to depart,

Nother for pain nor smart;

And wilt thou leave me thus?

Say nay, say nay!



And wilt thou leave me thus

And have no more pity

Of him that loveth thee?

Helas, thy cruelty!

And wilt thou leave me thus?

Say nay, say nay!/CONTENT"	NAME/And Wilt thou Leave me Thus?/NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/SIR PHILIP SIDNEY/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/Loving in truth, and fain in verse my love to show,

That she, dear she, might take some pleasure of my pain,

Pleasure might cause her read, reading might make her know,

Knowledge might pity win, and pity grace obtain,

I sought fit words to paint the blackest face of woe;

Studying inventions fine her wits to entertain,

Oft turning others' leaves, to see if thence would flow

Some fresh and fruitful showers upon my sunburn'd brain.

But words came halting forth, wanting invention's stay;

Invention, Nature's child, fled step-dame Study's blows;

And others' feet still seem'd but strangers in my way.

Thus great with child to speak and helpless in my throes,

Biting my truant pen, beating myself for spite,

""Fool,"" said my Muse to me, ""look in thy heart, and write.""/CONTENT"	NAME/Astrophil and Stella 1: Loving in truth, and fain in verse my love to show/NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/SIR PHILIP SIDNEY/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/You that do search for every purling spring

Which from the ribs of old Parnassus flows,

And every flower, not sweet perhaps, which grows

Near thereabouts, into your poesy wring;

Ye that do dictionary's method bring

Into your rimes, running in rattling rows;

You that poor Petrarch's long-deceased woes

With new-born sighs and denizen'd wit do sing:

You take wrong ways; those far-fet helps be such

As do bewray a want of inward touch,

And sure, at length stol'n goods do come to light.

But if, both for your love and skill, your name

You seek to nurse at fullest breasts of Fame,

Stella behold, and then begin to endite./CONTENT"	NAME/Astrophil and Stella 15: You that do search for every purling spring /NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/SIR PHILIP SIDNEY/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/Fly, fly, my friends, I have my death wound, fly!

See there that boy, that murd'ring boy, I say,

Who, like a thief, hid in dark bush doth lie

Till bloody bullet get him wrongful prey.

So tyrant he no fitter place could spy,

Nor so fair level in so secret stay,

As that sweet black which veils the heav'nly eye;

There himself with his shot he close doth lay.

Poor passenger, pass now thereby I did,

And stay'd, pleas'd with the prospect of the place,

While that black hue from me the bad guest hid;

But straight I saw motions of lightning grace

And then descried the glist'ring of his dart:

But ere I could fly thence it pierc'd my heart./CONTENT"	NAME/Astrophil and Stella 20: Fly, fly, my friends, I have my death wound, fly/NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/SIR PHILIP SIDNEY/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/The curious wits, seeing dull pensiveness

Bewray itself in my long-settl'd eyes,

Whence those same fumes of melancholy rise,

With idle pains and missing aim do guess.

Some, that know how my spring I did address,

Deem that my Muse some fruit of knowledge plies;

Others, because the prince my service tries,

Think that I think state errors to redress;

But harder judges judge ambition's ragei

Scourge of itself, still climbing slipp'ry placei

Holds my young brain captiv'd in golden cage.

O fool or over-wise! alas, the race

Of all my thoughts hath neither stop nor start

But only Stella's eyes and Stella's heart./CONTENT"	NAME/Astrophil and Stella 23: The curious wits, seeing dull pensiveness/NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/SIR PHILIP SIDNEY/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/Let dainty wits cry on the sisters nine,

That, bravely mask'd, their fancies may be told;

Or, Pindar's apes, flaunt they in phrases fine,

Enam'ling with pied flowers their thoughts of gold.

Or else let them in statelier glory shine,

Ennobling newfound tropes with problems old;

Or with strange similes enrich each line,

Of herbs or beasts which Ind or Afric hold.

For me, in sooth, no Muse but one I know;

Phrases and problems from my reach do grow,

And strange things cost too dear for my poor sprites.

How then? even thus: in Stella's face I read

What love and beauty be; then all my deed

But copying is, what in her Nature writes./CONTENT"	NAME/Astrophil and Stella 3: Let dainty wits cry on the sisters nine/NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/SIR PHILIP SIDNEY/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/With how sad steps, O Moon, thou climb'st the skies!

How silently, and with how wan a face!

What, may it be that even in heav'nly place

That busy archer his sharp arrows tries!

Sure, if that long-with love-acquainted eyes

Can judge of love, thou feel'st a lover's case,

I read it in thy looks; thy languish'd grace

To me, that feel the like, thy state descries.

Then, ev'n of fellowship, O Moon, tell me,

Is constant love deem'd there but want of wit?

Are beauties there as proud as here they be?

Do they above love to be lov'd, and yet

Those lovers scorn whom that love doth possess?

Do they call virtue there ungratefulness?/CONTENT"	NAME/Astrophil and Stella 31: With how sad steps, O Moon, thou climb'st the skies/NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/SIR PHILIP SIDNEY/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/I might!unhappy wordO me, I might,

And then would not, or could not, see my bliss;

Till now wrapt in a most infernal night,

I find how heav'nly day, wretch! I did miss.

Heart, rend thyself, thou dost thyself but right;

No lovely Paris made thy Helen his,

No force, no fraud robb'd thee of thy delight,

Nor Fortune of thy fortune author is;

But to myself myself did give the blow,

While too much wit, forsooth, so troubled me

That I respects for both our sakes must show:

And yet could not by rising morn foresee

How fair a day was near: O punish'd eyes,

That I had been more foolish,or more wise!/CONTENT"	NAME/Astrophil and Stella 33: I might!unhappy wordO me, I might/NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/SIR PHILIP SIDNEY/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/Come Sleep! O Sleep, the certain knot of peace,

The baiting-place of wit, the balm of woe,

The poor man's wealth, the prisoner's release,

Th' indifferent judge between the high and low.

With shield of proof shield me from out the prease

Of those fierce darts despair at me doth throw:

O make in me those civil wars to cease;

I will good tribute pay, if thou do so.

Take thou of me smooth pillows, sweetest bed,

A chamber deaf to noise and blind to light,

A rosy garland and a weary head:

And if these things, as being thine by right,

Move not thy heavy grace, thou shalt in me,

Livelier than elsewhere, Stella's image see./CONTENT"	NAME/Astrophil and Stella 39: Come Sleep! O Sleep, the certain knot of peace/NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/SIR PHILIP SIDNEY/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/Having this day my horse, my hand, my lance

Guided so well that I obtain'd the prize,

Both by the judgment of the English eyes

And of some sent from that sweet enemy France;

Horsemen my skill in horsemanship advance,

Town folks my strength; a daintier judge applies

His praise to sleight which from good use doth rise;

Some lucky wits impute it but to chance;

Others, because of both sides I do take

My blood from them who did excel in this,

Think Nature me a man of arms did make.

How far they shot awry! The true cause is,

Stella look'd on, and from her heav'nly face

Sent forth the beams which made so fair my race./CONTENT"	NAME/Astrophil and Stella 41: Having this day my horse, my hand, my lance /NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/SIR PHILIP SIDNEY/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/No more, my dear, no more these counsels try;

Oh, give my passions leave to run their race;

Let Fortune lay on me her worst disgrace;

Let folk o'ercharg'd with brain against me cry;

Let clouds bedim my face, break in mine eye;

Let me no steps but of lost labour trace;

Let all the earth with scorn recount my case,

But do not will me from my love to fly.

I do not envy Aristotle's wit,

Nor do aspire to Caesar's bleeding fame;

Nor aught do care though some above me sit;

Nor hope nor wish another course to frame,

But that which once may win thy cruel heart:

Thou art my wit, and thou my virtue art./CONTENT"	NAME/Astrophil and Stella 64: No more, my dear, no more these counsels try/NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/SIR PHILIP SIDNEY/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/When Nature made her chief work, Stella's eyes,

In colour black why wrapt she beams so bright?

Would she in beamy black, like painter wise,

Frame daintiest lustre, mix'd of shades and light?

Or did she else that sober hue devise,

In object best to knit and strength our sight;

Lest, if no veil these brave gleams did disguise,

They, sunlike, should more dazzle than delight?

Or would she her miraculous power show,

That, whereas black seems beauty's contrary,

She even in black doth make all beauties flow?

Both so, and thus, she, minding Love should be

Plac'd ever there, gave him this mourning weed

To honour all their deaths who for her bleed./CONTENT"	NAME/Astrophil and Stella 7: When Nature made her chief work, Stella's eyes/NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/SIR PHILIP SIDNEY/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/Who will in fairest book of nature know

How virtue may best lodg'd in beauty be,

Let him but learn of love to read in thee,

Stella, those fair lines which true goodness show.

There shall he find all vices' overthrow,

Not by rude force, but sweetest sovereignty

Of reason, from whose light those night-birds fly;

That inward sun in thine eyes shineth so.

And, not content to be perfection's heir

Thyself, dost strive all minds that way to move,

Who mark in thee what is in thee most fair.

So while thy beauty draws thy heart to love,

As fast thy virtue bends that love to good:

But ""Ah,"" Desire still cries, ""Give me some food!""/CONTENT"	NAME/Astrophil and Stella 71: Who will in fairest book of nature know /NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/SIR PHILIP SIDNEY/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/Highway, since you my chief Parnassus be,

And that my Muse, to some ears not unsweet,

Tempers her words to trampling horses' feet

More oft than to a chamber melody.

Now, blessed you bear onward blessed me

To her, where I my heart, safe-left, shall meet:

My Muse and I must you of duty greet

With thanks and wishes, wishing thankfully.

Be you still fair, honour'd by public heed;

By no encroachment wrong'd, nor time forgot,

Nor blam'd for blood, nor sham'd for sinful deed;

And that you know I envy you no lot

Of highest wish, I wish you so much bliss,i

Hundreds of years you Stella's feet may kiss./CONTENT"	NAME/Astrophil and Stella 84: Highway, since you my chief Parnassus be/NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/SIR PHILIP SIDNEY/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/Be your words made, good sir, of Indian ware,

That you allow me them by so small rate?

Or do you cutted Spartans imitate?

Or do you mean my tender ears to spare,

That to my questions you so total are?

When I demand of Phoenix Stella's state,

You say, forsooth, you left her well of late:

O God, think you that satisfies my care?

I would know whether she did sit or walk;

How cloth'd, how waited on; sigh'd she, or smil'd;

Whereof, with whom, how often did she talk;

With what pastime time's journey she beguiled;

If her lips deign'd to sweeten my poor name.

Say all; and all well said, still say the same./CONTENT"	NAME/Astrophil and Stella 92: Be your words made, good sir, of Indian ware/NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/SIR THOMAS WYATT/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/Avising the bright beams of these fair eyes

Where he is that mine oft moisteth and washeth,

The wearied mind straight from the heart departeth

For to rest in his worldly paradise

And find the sweet bitter under this guise.

What webs he hath wrought well he perceiveth

Whereby with himself on love he plaineth

That spurreth with fire and bridleth with ice.

Thus is it in such extremity brought,

In frozen thought, now and now it standeth in flame.

Twixt misery and wealth, twixt earnest and game,

But few glad, and many diverse thought

With sore repentance of his hardiness.

Of such a root cometh fruit fruitless./CONTENT"	NAME/Avising the Bright Beams/NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/JOHN DONNE/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/Come live with me, and be my love,

And we will some new pleasures prove

Of golden sands, and crystal brooks,

With silken lines, and silver hooks.



There will the river whispering run

Warm'd by thy eyes, more than the sun;

And there the 'enamour'd fish will stay,

Begging themselves they may betray.



When thou wilt swim in that live bath,

Each fish, which every channel hath,

Will amorously to thee swim,

Gladder to catch thee, than thou him.



If thou, to be so seen, be'st loth,

By sun or moon, thou dark'nest both,

And if myself have leave to see,

I need not their light having thee.



Let others freeze with angling reeds,

And cut their legs with shells and weeds,

Or treacherously poor fish beset,

With strangling snare, or windowy net.



Let coarse bold hands from slimy nest

The bedded fish in banks out-wrest;

Or curious traitors, sleeve-silk flies,

Bewitch poor fishes' wand'ring eyes.



For thee, thou need'st no such deceit,

For thou thyself art thine own bait:

That fish, that is not catch'd thereby,

Alas, is wiser far than I./CONTENT"	NAME/The Bait/NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/JOHN DONNE/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/For God's sake hold your tongue, and let me love,

         Or chide my palsy, or my gout,

My five gray hairs, or ruined fortune flout,

         With wealth your state, your mind with arts improve,

                Take you a course, get you a place,

                Observe his honor, or his grace,

Or the king's real, or his stamped face

         Contemplate; what you will, approve,

         So you will let me love.



Alas, alas, who's injured by my love?

         What merchant's ships have my sighs drowned?

Who says my tears have overflowed his ground?

         When did my colds a forward spring remove?

                When did the heats which my veins fill

                Add one more to the plaguy bill?

Soldiers find wars, and lawyers find out still

         Litigious men, which quarrels move,

         Though she and I do love.



Call us what you will, we are made such by love;

         Call her one, me another fly,

We're tapers too, and at our own cost die,

         And we in us find the eagle and the dove.

                The phnix riddle hath more wit

                By us; we two being one, are it.

So, to one neutral thing both sexes fit.

         We die and rise the same, and prove

         Mysterious by this love.



We can die by it, if not live by love,

         And if unfit for tombs and hearse

Our legend be, it will be fit for verse;

         And if no piece of chronicle we prove,

                We'll build in sonnets pretty rooms;

                As well a well-wrought urn becomes

The greatest ashes, as half-acre tombs,

         And by these hymns, all shall approve

         Us canonized for Love.



And thus invoke us: ""You, whom reverend love

         Made one another's hermitage;

You, to whom love was peace, that now is rage;

         Who did the whole world's soul contract, and drove

                Into the glasses of your eyes

                (So made such mirrors, and such spies,

That they did all to you epitomize)

         Countries, towns, courts: beg from above

         A pattern of your love!""/CONTENT"	NAME/The Canonization/NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/EN JONSON/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/Let it not your wonder move,

Less your laughter, that I love.

Though I now write fifty years,

I have had, and have, my peers;

Poets, though divine, are men,

Some have lov'd as old again.

And it is not always face,

Clothes, or fortune, gives the grace;

Or the feature, or the youth.

But the language and the truth,

With the ardour and the passion,

Gives the lover weight and fashion.

If you then will read the story,

First prepare you to be sorry

That you never knew till now

Either whom to love or how;

But be glad, as soon with me,

When you know that this is she

Of whose beauty it was sung;

She shall make the old man young,

Keep the middle age at stay,

And let nothing high decay,

Till she be the reason why

All the world for love may die./CONTENT"	NAME/A Celebration of Charis: I. His Excuse for Loving/NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/EN JONSON/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/See the chariot at hand here of Love,

Wherein my lady rideth!

Each that draws is a swan or a dove,

And well the car Love guideth.

As she goes, all hearts do duty

Unto her beauty;

And enamour'd, do wish, so they might

But enjoy such a sight,

That they still were to run by her side,

Through swords, through seas, whither she would ride.



Do but look on her eyes, they do light

All that Love's world compriseth!

Do but look on her hair, it is bright

As Love's star when it riseth!

Do but mark, her forehead's smoother

Than words that soothe her;

And from her arched brows, such a grace

Sheds itself through the face

As alone there triumphs to the life

All the gain, all the good, of the elements' strife.



Have you seen but a bright lily grow,

Before rude hands have touch'd it?

Ha' you mark'd but the fall o' the snow

Before the soil hath smutch'd it?

Ha' you felt the wool o' the beaver?

Or swan's down ever?

Or have smelt o' the bud o' the briar?

Or the nard in the fire?

Or have tasted the bag of the bee?

Oh so white! Oh so soft! Oh so sweet is she!/CONTENT"	NAME/A Celebration of Charis: IV. Her Triumph/NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/GEORGE CHAPMAN/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/Muses that sing love's sensual empery,

And lovers kindling your enraged fires

At Cupid's bonfires burning in the eye,

Blown with the empty breath of vain desires;

You that prefer the painted cabinet

Before the wealthy jewels it doth store ye,

That all your joys in dying figures set,

And stain the living substance of your glory;

Abjure those joys, abhor their memory,

And let my love the honour'd subject be

Of love, and honour's complete history.

Your eyes were never yet let in to see

The majesty and riches of the mind,

But dwell in darkness; for your god is blind./CONTENT"	NAME/A Coronet for his Mistress, Philosophy/NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/JOHN DONNE/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/Dear love, for nothing less than thee

Would I have broke this happy dream;

            It was a theme

For reason, much too strong for fantasy,

Therefore thou wak'd'st me wisely; yet

My dream thou brok'st not, but continued'st it.

Thou art so true that thoughts of thee suffice

To make dreams truths, and fables histories;

Enter these arms, for since thou thought'st it best,

Not to dream all my dream, let's act the rest.



   As lightning, or a taper's light,

Thine eyes, and not thy noise wak'd me;

            Yet I thought thee

(For thou lovest truth) an angel, at first sight;

But when I saw thou sawest my heart,

And knew'st my thoughts, beyond an angel's art,

When thou knew'st what I dreamt, when thou knew'st when

Excess of joy would wake me, and cam'st then,

I must confess, it could not choose but be

Profane, to think thee any thing but thee.



   Coming and staying show'd thee, thee,

But rising makes me doubt, that now

            Thou art not thou.

That love is weak where fear's as strong as he;

'Tis not all spirit, pure and brave,

If mixture it of fear, shame, honour have;

Perchance as torches, which must ready be,

Men light and put out, so thou deal'st with me;

Thou cam'st to kindle, goest to come; then I

Will dream that hope again, but else would die./CONTENT"	NAME/The Dream/NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/JOHN DONNE/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/Where, like a pillow on a bed

         A pregnant bank swell'd up to rest

The violet's reclining head,

         Sat we two, one another's best.

Our hands were firmly cemented

         With a fast balm, which thence did spring;

Our eye-beams twisted, and did thread

         Our eyes upon one double string;

So to'intergraft our hands, as yet

         Was all the means to make us one,

And pictures in our eyes to get

         Was all our propagation.

As 'twixt two equal armies fate

         Suspends uncertain victory,

Our souls (which to advance their state

         Were gone out) hung 'twixt her and me.

And whilst our souls negotiate there,

         We like sepulchral statues lay;

All day, the same our postures were,

         And we said nothing, all the day.

If any, so by love refin'd

         That he soul's language understood,

And by good love were grown all mind,

         Within convenient distance stood,

He (though he knew not which soul spake,

         Because both meant, both spake the same)

Might thence a new concoction take

         And part far purer than he came.

This ecstasy doth unperplex,

         We said, and tell us what we love;

We see by this it was not sex,

         We see we saw not what did move;

But as all several souls contain

         Mixture of things, they know not what,

Love these mix'd souls doth mix again

         And makes both one, each this and that.

A single violet transplant,

         The strength, the colour, and the size,

(All which before was poor and scant)

         Redoubles still, and multiplies.

When love with one another so

         Interinanimates two souls,

That abler soul, which thence doth flow,

         Defects of loneliness controls.

We then, who are this new soul, know

         Of what we are compos'd and made,

For th' atomies of which we grow

         Are souls, whom no change can invade.

But oh alas, so long, so far,

         Our bodies why do we forbear?

They'are ours, though they'are not we; we are

         The intelligences, they the spheres.

We owe them thanks, because they thus

         Did us, to us, at first convey,

Yielded their senses' force to us,

         Nor are dross to us, but allay.

On man heaven's influence works not so,

         But that it first imprints the air;

So soul into the soul may flow,

            Though it to body first repair.

As our blood labors to beget

         Spirits, as like souls as it can,

Because such fingers need to knit

         That subtle knot which makes us man,

So must pure lovers' souls descend

         T' affections, and to faculties,

Which sense may reach and apprehend,

         Else a great prince in prison lies.

To'our bodies turn we then, that so

         Weak men on love reveal'd may look;

Love's mysteries in souls do grow,

         But yet the body is his book.

And if some lover, such as we,

         Have heard this dialogue of one,

Let him still mark us, he shall see

         Small change, when we'are to bodies gone./CONTENT"	NAME/The Ecstasy/NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/JOHN DONNE/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/No spring nor summer beauty hath such grace

         As I have seen in one autumnal face.

Young beauties force our love, and that's a rape,

         This doth but counsel, yet you cannot scape.

If 'twere a shame to love, here 'twere no shame;

         Affection here takes reverence's name.

Were her first years the golden age? That's true,

         But now she's gold oft tried and ever new.

That was her torrid and inflaming time,

         This is her tolerable tropic clime.

Fair eyes, who asks more heat than comes from hence,

         He in a fever wishes pestilence.

Call not these wrinkles, graves; if graves they were,

         They were Love's graves, for else he is no where.

Yet lies not Love dead here, but here doth sit

         Vow'd to this trench, like an anachorit;

And here till hers, which must be his death, come,

         He doth not dig a grave, but build a tomb.

Here dwells he; though he sojourn ev'rywhere

         In progress, yet his standing house is here:

Here where still evening is, not noon nor night,

         Where no voluptuousness, yet all delight.

In all her words, unto all hearers fit,

         You may at revels, you at council, sit.

This is Love's timber, youth his underwood;

         There he, as wine in June, enrages blood,

Which then comes seasonabliest when our taste

         And appetite to other things is past.

Xerxes' strange Lydian love, the platan tree,

         Was lov'd for age, none being so large as she,

Or else because, being young, nature did bless

         Her youth with age's glory, barrenness.

If we love things long sought, age is a thing

         Which we are fifty years in compassing;

If transitory things, which soon decay,

         Age must be loveliest at the latest day.

But name not winter faces, whose skin's slack,

         Lank as an unthrift's purse, but a soul's sack;

Whose eyes seek light within, for all here's shade;

         Whose mouths are holes, rather worn out than made;

Whose every tooth to a several place is gone,

         To vex their souls at resurrection:

Name not these living death's-heads unto me,

         For these, not ancient, but antique be.

I hate extremes, yet I had rather stay

         With tombs than cradles, to wear out a day.

Since such love's natural lation is, may still

         My love descend, and journey down the hill,

Not panting after growing beauties. So,

         I shall ebb on with them who homeward go./CONTENT"	NAME/Elegy IX: The Autumnal/NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/JOHN DONNE/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/Here take my picture; though I bid farewell

Thine, in my heart, where my soul dwells, shall dwell.

'Tis like me now, but I dead, 'twill be more

When we are shadows both, than 'twas before.

When weather-beaten I come back, my hand

Perhaps with rude oars torn, or sun beams tann'd,

My face and breast of haircloth, and my head

With care's rash sudden storms being o'erspread,

My body'a sack of bones, broken within,

And powder's blue stains scatter'd on my skin;

If rival fools tax thee to'have lov'd a man

So foul and coarse as, oh, I may seem then,

This shall say what I was, and thou shalt say,

""Do his hurts reach me? doth my worth decay?

Or do they reach his judging mind, that he

Should now love less, what he did love to see?

That which in him was fair and delicate,

Was but the milk which in love's childish state

Did nurse it; who now is grown strong enough

To feed on that, which to disus'd tastes seems tough.""/CONTENT"	NAME/Elegy V: His Picture/NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/SIR PHILIP SIDNEY/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/""Who is it that this dark night

Underneath my window plaineth?""

It is one who from thy sight

Being, ah, exil'd, disdaineth

Every other vulgar light.



""Why, alas, and are you he?

Be not yet those fancies changed?""

Dear, when you find change in me,

Though from me you be estranged,

Let my change to ruin be.



""Well, in absence this will die;

Leave to see, and leave to wonder.""

Absence sure will help, if I

Can learn how myself to sunder

From what in my heart doth lie.



""But time will these thoughts remove;

Time doth work what no man knoweth.""

Time doth as the subject prove;

With time still the affection groweth

In the faithful turtle-dove.



""What if you new beauties see?

Will not they stir new affection?""

I will think they pictures be,

Image-like, of saints' perfection,

Poorly counterfeiting thee.



""But your reason's purest light

Bids you leave such minds to nourish.""

Dear, do reason no such spite;

Never doth thy beauty flourish

More than in my reason's sight.



""But the wrongs love bears will make

Love at length leave undertaking.""

No, the more fools it do shake,

In a ground of so firm making

Deeper still they drive the stake.



""Peace, I think that some give ear!

Come no more, lest I get anger!""

Bliss, I will my bliss forbear;

Fearing, sweet, you to endanger;

But my soul shall harbour there.



""Well, begone; begone, I say,

Lest that Argus' eyes perceive you!""

Oh, unjust Fortune's sway,

Which can make me thus to leave you;

And from louts to run away./CONTENT"	NAME/Eleventh Song/NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/SIR THOMAS WYATT/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/Farewell love and all thy laws forever;

Thy baited hooks shall tangle me no more.

Senec and Plato call me from thy lore

To perfect wealth, my wit for to endeavour.

In blind error when I did persever,

Thy sharp repulse, that pricketh aye so sore,

Hath taught me to set in trifles no store

And scape forth, since liberty is lever.

Therefore farewell; go trouble younger hearts

And in me claim no more authority.

With idle youth go use thy property

And thereon spend thy many brittle darts,

For hitherto though I have lost all my time,

Me lusteth no lenger rotten boughs to climb./CONTENT"	NAME/Farewell Love and all thy Laws for ever/NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/THOMAS CAMPION/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/Follow thy fair sun, unhappy shadow,

Though thou be black as night

And she made all of light,

Yet follow thy fair sun unhappy shadow.



Follow her whose light thy light depriveth,

Though here thou livst disgraced,

And she in heaven is placed,

Yet follow her whose light the world reviveth.



Follow those pure beams whose beauty burneth,

That so have scorched thee,

As thou still black must be,

Till Her kind beams thy black to brightness turneth.



Follow her while yet her glory shineth,

There comes a luckless night,

That will dim all her light,

And this the black unhappy shade divineth.



Follow still since so thy fates ordained,

The Sun must have his shade,

Till both at once do fade,

The Sun still proved, the shadow still disdained.









Poetry Out Loud Note: In the print anthology, this poem is titled ""Follow thy fair sun, unhappy shadow."" The student may give either title during the recitation./CONTENT"	NAME/Follow Thy Fair Sun/NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/THOMAS CAMPION/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/Follow your saint, follow with accents sweet;

Haste you, sad notes, fall at her flying feet.

There, wrapp'd in cloud of sorrow, pity move,

And tell the ravisher of my soul I perish for her love:

But if she scorns my never-ceasing pain,

Then burst with sighing in her sight and ne'er return again.



All that I sung still to her praise did tend,

Still she was first; still she my songs did end;

Yet she my love and music both doth fly,

The music that her echo is and beauty's sympathy.

Then let my notes pursue her scornful flight:

It shall suffice that they were breath'd and died for her delight./CONTENT"	NAME/Follow Your Saint/NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/SIR THOMAS WYATT/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/Forget not yet the tried intent

Of such a truth as I have meant;

My great travail so gladly spent,

            Forget not yet.



   Forget not yet when first began

The weary life ye know, since whan

The suit, the service, none tell can;

            Forget not yet.



   Forget not yet the great assays,

The cruel wrong, the scornful ways;

The painful patience in denays,

            Forget not yet.



   Forget not yet, forget not this,

How long ago hath been and is

The mind that never meant amiss;

            Forget not yet.



   Forget not then thine own approved,

The which so long hath thee so loved,

Whose steadfast faith yet never moved;

            Forget not this./CONTENT"	NAME/Forget not Yet the Tried Intent/NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/JOHN DONNE/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/Whoever comes to shroud me, do not harm

         Nor question much

That subtle wreath of hair, which crowns my arm;

The mystery, the sign, you must not touch,

         For 'tis my outward soul,

Viceroy to that, which then to heaven being gone,

         Will leave this to control

And keep these limbs, her provinces, from dissolution.



For if the sinewy thread my brain lets fall

         Through every part

Can tie those parts, and make me one of all,

Those hairs which upward grew, and strength and art

         Have from a better brain,

Can better do'it; except she meant that I

         By this should know my pain,

As prisoners then are manacled, when they'are condemn'd to die.



Whate'er she meant by'it, bury it with me,

         For since I am

Love's martyr, it might breed idolatry,

If into other hands these relics came;

         As 'twas humility

To afford to it all that a soul can do,

         So, 'tis some bravery,

That since you would have none of me, I bury some of you./CONTENT"	NAME/The Funeral/NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/JOHN DONNE/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/I wonder, by my troth, what thou and I

Did, till we loved? Were we not weaned till then?

But sucked on country pleasures, childishly?

Or snorted we in the Seven Sleepers den?

Twas so; but this, all pleasures fancies be.

If ever any beauty I did see,

Which I desired, and got, twas but a dream of thee.



And now good-morrow to our waking souls,

Which watch not one another out of fear;

For love, all love of other sights controls,

And makes one little room an everywhere.

Let sea-discoverers to new worlds have gone,

Let maps to other, worlds on worlds have shown,

Let us possess one world, each hath one, and is one.



My face in thine eye, thine in mine appears,

And true plain hearts do in the faces rest;

Where can we find two better hemispheres,

Without sharp north, without declining west?

Whatever dies, was not mixed equally;

If our two loves be one, or, thou and I

Love so alike, that none do slacken, none can die./CONTENT"	NAME/The Good-Morrow/NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/SIR THOMAS WYATT/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/The heart and service to you proffer'd

With right good will full honestly,

Refuse it not, since it is offer'd,

But take it to you gentlely.



And though it be a small present,

Yet good, consider graciously

The thought, the mind, and the intent

Of him that loves you faithfully.



It were a thing of small effect

To work my woe thus cruelly,

For my good will to be abject:

Therefore accept it lovingly.



Pain or travel, to run or ride,

I undertake it pleasantly;

Bid ye me go, and straight I glide

At your commandement humbly.



Pain or pleasure, now may you plant

Even which it please you steadfastly;

Do which you list, I shall not want

To be your servant secretly.



And since so much I do desire

To be your own assuredly,

For all my service and my hire

Reward your servant liberally./CONTENT"	NAME/The Heart and Service/NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/CHRISTOPHER MARLOWE/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/On Hellespont, guilty of true love's blood,

In view and opposite two cities stood,

Sea-borderers, disjoin'd by Neptune's might;

The one Abydos, the other Sestos hight.

At Sestos Hero dwelt; Hero the fair,

Whom young Apollo courted for her hair,

And offer'd as a dower his burning throne,

Where she could sit for men to gaze upon.

The outside of her garments were of lawn,

The lining purple silk, with gilt stars drawn;

Her wide sleeves green, and border'd with a grove,

Where Venus in her naked glory strove

To please the careless and disdainful eyes

Of proud Adonis, that before her lies;

Her kirtle blue, whereon was many a stain,

Made with the blood of wretched lovers slain.

Upon her head she ware a myrtle wreath,

From whence her veil reach'd to the ground beneath;

Her veil was artificial flowers and leaves,

Whose workmanship both man and beast deceives;

Many would praise the sweet smell as she past,

When 'twas the odour which her breath forth cast;

And there for honey bees have sought in vain,

And beat from thence, have lighted there again.

About her neck hung chains of pebble-stone,

Which lighten'd by her neck, like diamonds shone.

She ware no gloves; for neither sun nor wind

Would burn or parch her hands, but, to her mind,

Or warm or cool them, for they took delight

To play upon those hands, they were so white.

Buskins of shells, all silver'd, used she,

And branch'd with blushing coral to the knee;

Where sparrows perch'd, of hollow pearl and gold,

Such as the world would wonder to behold:

Those with sweet water oft her handmaid fills,

Which as she went, would chirrup through the bills.

Some say, for her the fairest Cupid pin'd,

And looking in her face, was strooken blind.

But this is true; so like was one the other,

As he imagin'd Hero was his mother;

And oftentimes into her bosom flew,

About her naked neck his bare arms threw,

And laid his childish head upon her breast,

And with still panting rock'd there took his rest.

So lovely-fair was Hero, Venus' nun,

As Nature wept, thinking she was undone,

Because she took more from her than she left,

And of such wondrous beauty her bereft:

Therefore, in sign her treasure suffer'd wrack,

Since Hero's time hath half the world been black.



         Amorous Leander, beautiful and young

(Whose tragedy divine Musus sung),

Dwelt at Abydos; since him dwelt there none

For whom succeeding times make greater moan.

His dangling tresses, that were never shorn,

Had they been cut, and unto Colchos borne,

Would have allur'd the vent'rous youth of Greece

To hazard more than for the golden fleece.

Fair Cynthia wish'd his arms might be her sphere;

Grief makes her pale, because she moves not there.

His body was as straight as Circe's wand;

Jove might have sipt out nectar from his hand.

Even as delicious meat is to the taste,

So was his neck in touching, and surpast

The white of Pelops' shoulder: I could tell ye,

How smooth his breast was, and how white his belly;

And whose immortal fingers did imprint

That heavenly path with many a curious dint

That runs along his back; but my rude pen

Can hardly blazon forth the loves of men,

Much less of powerful gods: let it suffice

That my slack Muse sings of Leander's eyes;

Those orient cheeks and lips, exceeding his

That leapt into the water for a kiss

Of his own shadow, and, despising many,

Died ere he could enjoy the love of any.

Had wild Hippolytus Leander seen,

Enamour'd of his beauty had he been.

His presence made the rudest peasant melt,

That in the vast uplandish country dwelt;

The barbarous Thracian soldier, mov'd with nought,

Was mov'd with him, and for his favour sought.

Some swore he was a maid in man's attire,

For in his looks were all that men desire,

A pleasant smiling cheek, a speaking eye,

A brow for love to banquet royally;

And such as knew he was a man, would say,

""Leander, thou art made for amorous play;

Why art thou not in love, and lov'd of all?

Though thou be fair, yet be not thine own thrall.""



         The men of wealthy Sestos every year,

For his sake whom their goddess held so dear,

Rose-cheek'd Adonis, kept a solemn feast.

Thither resorted many a wandering guest

To meet their loves; such as had none at all

Came lovers home from this great festival;

For every street, like to a firmament,

Glister'd with breathing stars, who, where they went,

Frighted the melancholy earth, which deem'd

Eternal heaven to burn, for so it seem'd

As if another Pha{""e}ton had got

The guidance of the sun's rich chariot.

But far above the loveliest, Hero shin'd,

And stole away th' enchanted gazer's mind;

For like sea-nymphs' inveigling harmony,

So was her beauty to the standers-by;

Nor that night-wandering, pale, and watery star

(When yawning dragons draw her thirling car

From Latmus' mount up to the gloomy sky,

Where, crown'd with blazing light and majesty,

She proudly sits) more over-rules the flood

Than she the hearts of those that near her stood.

Even as when gaudy nymphs pursue the chase,

Wretched Ixion's shaggy-footed race,

Incens'd with savage heat, gallop amain

From steep pine-bearing mountains to the plain,

So ran the people forth to gaze upon her,

And all that view'd her were enamour'd on her.

And as in fury of a dreadful fight,

Their fellows being slain or put to flight,

Poor soldiers stand with fear of death dead-strooken,

So at her presence all surpris'd and tooken,

Await the sentence of her scornful eyes;

He whom she favours lives; the other dies.

There might you see one sigh, another rage,

And some, their violent passions to assuage,

Compile sharp satires; but, alas, too late,

For faithful love will never turn to hate.

And many, seeing great princes were denied,

Pin'd as they went, and thinking on her, died.

On this feast-dayO cursed day and hour!

Went Hero thorough Sestos, from her tower

To Venus' temple, where unhappily,

As after chanc'd, they did each other spy.

So fair a church as this had Venus none:

The walls were of discolour'd jasper-stone,

Wherein was Proteus carved; and over-head

A lively vine of green sea-agate spread,

Where by one hand light-headed Bacchus hung,

And with the other wine from grapes out-wrung.

Of crystal shining fair the pavement was;

The town of Sestos call'd it Venus' glass:

There might you see the gods in sundry shapes,

Committing heady riots, incest, rapes:

For know, that underneath this radiant flower

Was Danae's statue in a brazen tower,

Jove slyly stealing from his sister's bed,

To dally with Idalian Ganimed,

And for his love Europa bellowing loud,

And tumbling with the rainbow in a cloud;

Blood-quaffing Mars heaving the iron net,

Which limping Vulcan and his Cyclops set;

Love kindling fire, to burn such towns as Troy,

Sylvanus weeping for the lovely boy

That now is turn'd into a cypress tree,

Under whose shade the wood-gods love to be.

And in the midst a silver altar stood:

There Hero, sacrificing turtles' blood,

Vail'd to the ground, veiling her eyelids close;

And modestly they opened as she rose.

Thence flew Love's arrow with the golden head;

And thus Leander was enamoured.

Stone-still he stood, and evermore he gazed,

Till with the fire that from his count'nance blazed

Relenting Hero's gentle heart was strook:

Such force and virtue hath an amorous look.



         It lies not in our power to love or hate,

For will in us is over-rul'd by fate.

When two are stript, long ere the course begin,

We wish that one should lose, the other win;

And one especially do we affect

Of two gold ingots, like in each respect:

The reason no man knows, let it suffice,

What we behold is censur'd by our eyes.

Where both deliberate, the love is slight:

Who ever lov'd, that lov'd not at first sight?/CONTENT"	NAME/Hero and Leander/NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/JOHN DONNE/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/Show me dear Christ, thy spouse so bright and clear.

What! is it she which on the other shore

Goes richly painted? or which, robb'd and tore,

Laments and mourns in Germany and here?

Sleeps she a thousand, then peeps up one year?

Is she self-truth, and errs? now new, now outwore?

Doth she, and did she, and shall she evermore

On one, on seven, or on no hill appear?

Dwells she with us, or like adventuring knights

First travel we to seek, and then make love?

Betray, kind husband, thy spouse to our sights,

And let mine amorous soul court thy mild Dove,

Who is most true and pleasing to thee then

When she'is embrac'd and open to most men./CONTENT"	NAME/Holy Sonnets: Show me dear Christ, thy spouse so bright and clear/NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/JOHN DONNE/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/Since she whom I lov'd hath paid her last debt

To nature, and to hers, and my good is dead,

And her soul early into heaven ravished,

Wholly in heavenly things my mind is set.

Here the admiring her my mind did whet

To seek thee, God; so streams do show the head;

But though I have found thee, and thou my thirst hast fed,

A holy thirsty dropsy melts me yet.

But why should I beg more love, whenas thou

Dost woo my soul, for hers off'ring all thine,

And dost not only fear lest I allow

My love to saints and angels, things divine,

But in thy tender jealousy dost doubt

Lest the world, flesh, yea devil put thee out./CONTENT"	NAME/Holy Sonnets: Since she whom I lov'd hath paid her last debt/NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/SIR THOMAS WYATT/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/I find no peace, and all my war is done.

I fear and hope. I burn and freeze like ice.

I fly above the wind, yet can I not arise;

And nought I have, and all the world I season.

That loseth nor locketh holdeth me in prison

And holdeth me notyet can I scape no wise

Nor letteth me live nor die at my device,

And yet of death it giveth me occasion.

Without eyen I see, and without tongue I plain.

I desire to perish, and yet I ask health.

I love another, and thus I hate myself.

I feed me in sorrow and laugh in all my pain;

Likewise displeaseth me both life and death,

And my delight is causer of this strife./CONTENT"	NAME/I Find no Peace/NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/EDMUND SPENSER/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/Unhappy verse, the witness of my unhappy state,

Make thy self flutt'ring wings of thy fast flying

Thought, and fly forth unto my love, wheresoever she be:

Whether lying restless in heavy bed, or else

Sitting so cheerless at the cheerful board, or else

Playing alone careless on her heavenly virginals.

If in bed, tell her, that my eyes can take no rest:

If at board, tell her, that my mouth can eat no meat:

If at her virginals, tell her, I can hear no mirth.

Asked why? say: waking love suffereth no sleep:

Say that raging love doth appal the weak stomach:

Say, that lamenting love marreth the musical.

Tell her, that her pleasures were wont to lull me asleep:

Tell her, that her beauty was wont to feed mine eyes:

Tell her, that her sweet tongue was wont to make me mirth.

Now do I nightly waste, wanting my kindly rest:

Now do I daily starve, wanting my lively food:

Now do I always die, wanting thy timely mirth.

And if I waste, who will bewail my heavy chance?

And if I starve, who will record my cursed end?

And if I die, who will say: ""This was Immerito""?/CONTENT"	NAME/Iambicum Trimetrum/NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/JOHN DONNE/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/I can love both fair and brown,

Her whom abundance melts, and her whom want betrays,

Her who loves loneness best, and her who masks and plays,

Her whom the country formed, and whom the town,

Her who believes, and her who tries,

Her who still weeps with spongy eyes,

And her who is dry cork, and never cries;

I can love her, and her, and you, and you,

I can love any, so she be not true.



Will no other vice content you?

Will it not serve your turn to do as did your mothers?

Or have you all old vices spent, and now would find out others?

Or doth a fear that men are true torment you?

O we are not, be not you so;

Let me, and do you, twenty know.

Rob me, but bind me not, and let me go.

Must I, who came to travail thorough you,

Grow your fixed subject, because you are true?



Venus heard me sigh this song,

And by love's sweetest part, variety, she swore,

She heard not this till now; and that it should be so no more.

She went, examined, and returned ere long,

And said, Alas! some two or three

Poor heretics in love there be,

Which think to stablish dangerous constancy.

But I have told them, Since you will be true,

You shall be true to them who are false to you./CONTENT"	NAME/The Indifferent/NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/SIR PHILIP SIDNEY/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/Leave me, O Love, which reachest but to dust;

And thou, my mind, aspire to higher things;

Grow rich in that which never taketh rust;

Whatever fades but fading pleasure brings.

Draw in thy beams and humble all thy might

To that sweet yoke where lasting freedoms be;

Which breaks the clouds and opens forth the light,

That both doth shine and give us sight to see.

O take fast hold; let that light be thy guide

In this small course which birth draws out to death,

And think how evil becometh him to slide,

Who seeketh heav'n, and comes of heav'nly breath.

Then farewell, world; thy uttermost I see:

Eternal Love, maintain thy life in me./CONTENT"	NAME/"Leave me, O Love, which reachest but to dust"/NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/JOHN DONNE/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/Stand still, and I will read to thee

A lecture, love, in love's philosophy.

         These three hours that we have spent,

         Walking here, two shadows went

Along with us, which we ourselves produc'd.

But, now the sun is just above our head,

         We do those shadows tread,

         And to brave clearness all things are reduc'd.

So whilst our infant loves did grow,

Disguises did, and shadows, flow

From us, and our cares; but now 'tis not so.

That love has not attain'd the high'st degree,

Which is still diligent lest others see.



Except our loves at this noon stay,

We shall new shadows make the other way.

         As the first were made to blind

         Others, these which come behind

Will work upon ourselves, and blind our eyes.

If our loves faint, and westwardly decline,

         To me thou, falsely, thine,

         And I to thee mine actions shall disguise.

The morning shadows wear away,

But these grow longer all the day;

But oh, love's day is short, if love decay.

Love is a growing, or full constant light,

And his first minute, after noon, is night./CONTENT"	NAME/A Lecture upon the Shadow/NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/SIR THOMAS WYATT/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/The longe love that in my thought doth harbour

And in mine hert doth keep his residence,

Into my face presseth with bold pretence

And therein campeth, spreading his banner.

She that me learneth to love and suffer

And will that my trust and lustes negligence

Be rayned by reason, shame, and reverence,

With his hardiness taketh displeasure.

Wherewithall unto the hert's forest he fleeth,

Leaving his enterprise with pain and cry,

And there him hideth and not appeareth.

What may I do when my master feareth

But in the field with him to live and die?

For good is the life ending faithfully./CONTENT"	NAME/The Long Love that in my Thought doth Harbour/NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/JOHN DONNE/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/Some that have deeper digg'd love's mine than I,

Say, where his centric happiness doth lie;

         I have lov'd, and got, and told,

But should I love, get, tell, till I were old,

I should not find that hidden mystery.

         Oh, 'tis imposture all!

And as no chemic yet th'elixir got,

         But glorifies his pregnant pot

         If by the way to him befall

Some odoriferous thing, or medicinal,

         So, lovers dream a rich and long delight,

         But get a winter-seeming summer's night.



Our ease, our thrift, our honour, and our day,

Shall we for this vain bubble's shadow pay?

         Ends love in this, that my man

Can be as happy'as I can, if he can

Endure the short scorn of a bridegroom's play?

         That loving wretch that swears

'Tis not the bodies marry, but the minds,

         Which he in her angelic finds,

         Would swear as justly that he hears,

In that day's rude hoarse minstrelsy, the spheres.

         Hope not for mind in women; at their best

         Sweetness and wit, they'are but mummy, possess'd./CONTENT"	NAME/Love's Alchemy/NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/JOHN DONNE/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/I long to talk with some old lover's ghost,

      Who died before the god of love was born.

I cannot think that he, who then lov'd most,

      Sunk so low as to love one which did scorn.

But since this god produc'd a destiny,

And that vice-nature, custom, lets it be,

      I must love her, that loves not me.



   Sure, they which made him god, meant not so much,

      Nor he in his young godhead practis'd it.

But when an even flame two hearts did touch,

      His office was indulgently to fit

Actives to passives. Correspondency

Only his subject was; it cannot be

      Love, till I love her, that loves me.



   But every modern god will now extend

      His vast prerogative as far as Jove.

To rage, to lust, to write to, to commend,

      All is the purlieu of the god of love.

O! were we waken'd by this tyranny

To ungod this child again, it could not be

      I should love her, who loves not me.



   Rebel and atheist too, why murmur I,

      As though I felt the worst that love could do?

Love might make me leave loving, or might try

      A deeper plague, to make her love me too;

Which, since she loves before, I'am loth to see.

Falsehood is worse than hate; and that must be,

      If she whom I love, should love me./CONTENT"	NAME/Love's Deity/NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/JOHN DONNE/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/If yet I have not all thy love,

Dear, I shall never have it all;

I cannot breathe one other sigh, to move,

Nor can intreat one other tear to fall;

And all my treasure, which should purchase thee

Sighs, tears, and oaths, and lettersI have spent.

Yet no more can be due to me,

Than at the bargain made was meant;

If then thy gift of love were partial,

That some to me, some should to others fall,

         Dear, I shall never have thee all.



Or if then thou gavest me all,

All was but all, which thou hadst then;

But if in thy heart, since, there be or shall

New love created be, by other men,

Which have their stocks entire, and can in tears,

In sighs, in oaths, and letters, outbid me,

This new love may beget new fears,

For this love was not vow'd by thee.

And yet it was, thy gift being general;

The ground, thy heart, is mine; whatever shall

         Grow there, dear, I should have it all.



Yet I would not have all yet,

He that hath all can have no more;

And since my love doth every day admit

New growth, thou shouldst have new rewards in store;

Thou canst not every day give me thy heart,

If thou canst give it, then thou never gavest it;

Love's riddles are, that though thy heart depart,

It stays at home, and thou with losing savest it;

But we will have a way more liberal,

Than changing hearts, to join them; so we shall

         Be one, and one another's all./CONTENT"	NAME/Lovers' Infiniteness/NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/SIR THOMAS WYATT/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/Madam, withouten many words

    Once I am sure ye will or no ...

And if ye will, then leave your bourds

    And use your wit and show it so,

And with a beck ye shall me call;

    And if of one that burneth alway

Ye have any pity at all,

    Answer him fair with & {.} or nay.

If it be &, {.} I shall be fain;

    If it be nay, friends as before;

Ye shall another man obtain,

    And I mine own and yours no more./CONTENT"	NAME/Madam, withouten many Words/NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/SIR THOMAS WYATT/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/My lute awake! perform the last

Labour that thou and I shall waste,

And end that I have now begun;

For when this song is sung and past,

My lute be still, for I have done.



As to be heard where ear is none,

As lead to grave in marble stone,

My song may pierce her heart as soon;

Should we then sigh or sing or moan?

No, no, my lute, for I have done.



The rocks do not so cruelly

Repulse the waves continually,

As she my suit and affection;

So that I am past remedy,

Whereby my lute and I have done.



Proud of the spoil that thou hast got

Of simple hearts thorough Love's shot,

By whom, unkind, thou hast them won,

Think not he hath his bow forgot,

Although my lute and I have done.



Vengeance shall fall on thy disdain

That makest but game on earnest pain.

Think not alone under the sun

Unquit to cause thy lovers plain,

Although my lute and I have done.



Perchance thee lie wethered and old

The winter nights that are so cold,

Plaining in vain unto the moon;

Thy wishes then dare not be told;

Care then who list, for I have done.



And then may chance thee to repent

The time that thou hast lost and spent

To cause thy lovers sigh and swoon;

Then shalt thou know beauty but lent,

And wish and want as I have done.



Now cease, my lute; this is the last

Labour that thou and I shall waste,

And ended is that we begun.

Now is this song both sung and past:

My lute be still, for I have done./CONTENT"	NAME/My Lute Awake/NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/EN JONSON/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/I now think Love is rather deaf than blind,

For else it could not be

That she,

Whom I adore so much, should so slight me

And cast my love behind.

I'm sure my language to her was as sweet,

And every close did meet

In sentence of as subtle feet,

As hath the youngest He

That sits in shadow of Apollo's tree.



O, but my conscious fears,

That fly my thoughts between,

Tell me that she hath seen

My hundred of gray hairs,

Told seven and forty years

Read so much waste, as she cannot embrace

My mountain belly and my rocky face;

And all these through her eyes have stopp'd her ears./CONTENT"	NAME/My Picture Left in Scotland/NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/CHRISTOPHER MARLOWE/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/Come live with me and be my love,

And we will all the pleasures prove,

That Valleys, groves, hills, and fields,

Woods, or steepy mountain yields.



And we will sit upon the Rocks,

Seeing the Shepherds feed their flocks,

By shallow Rivers to whose falls

Melodious birds sing Madrigals.



And I will make thee beds of Roses

And a thousand fragrant posies,

A cap of flowers, and a kirtle

Embroidered all with leaves of Myrtle;



A gown made of the finest wool

Which from our pretty Lambs we pull;

Fair lined slippers for the cold,

With buckles of the purest gold;



A belt of straw and Ivy buds,

With Coral clasps and Amber studs:

And if these pleasures may thee move,

Come live with me, and be my love.



The Shepherds Swains shall dance and sing

For thy delight each May-morning:

If these delights thy mind may move,

Then live with me, and be my love./CONTENT"	NAME/The Passionate Shepherd to His Love/NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/JOHN DONNE/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/When my grave is broke up again

       Some second guest to entertain,

       (For graves have learn'd that woman head,

       To be to more than one a bed)

                And he that digs it, spies

A bracelet of bright hair about the bone,

                Will he not let'us alone,

And think that there a loving couple lies,

Who thought that this device might be some way

To make their souls, at the last busy day,

Meet at this grave, and make a little stay?



         If this fall in a time, or land,

         Where mis-devotion doth command,

         Then he, that digs us up, will bring

         Us to the bishop, and the king,

                To make us relics; then

Thou shalt be a Mary Magdalen, and I

                A something else thereby;

All women shall adore us, and some men;

And since at such time miracles are sought,

I would have that age by this paper taught

What miracles we harmless lovers wrought.



         First, we lov'd well and faithfully,

         Yet knew not what we lov'd, nor why;

         Difference of sex no more we knew

         Than our guardian angels do;

                Coming and going, we

Perchance might kiss, but not between those meals;

                Our hands ne'er touch'd the seals

Which nature, injur'd by late law, sets free;

These miracles we did, but now alas,

All measure, and all language, I should pass,

Should I tell what a miracle she was./CONTENT"	NAME/The Relic/NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/SIR PHILIP SIDNEY/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/Ring out your bells, let mourning shows be spread;

For Love is dead

All love is dead, infected

With plague of deep disdain;

Worth, as nought worth, rejected,

And Faith fair scorn doth gain.

From so ungrateful fancy,

From such a female franzy,

From them that use men thus,

Good Lord, deliver us!



Weep, neighbours, weep; do you not hear it said

That Love is dead?

His death-bed, peacock's folly;

His winding-sheet is shame;

His will, false-seeming holy;

His sole exec'tor, blame.

From so ungrateful fancy,

From such a female franzy,

From them that use men thus,

Good Lord, deliver us!



Let dirge be sung and trentals rightly read,

For Love is dead;

Sir Wrong his tomb ordaineth

My mistress' marble heart,

Which epitaph containeth,

""Her eyes were once his dart.""

From so ungrateful fancy,

From such a female franzy,

From them that use men thus,

Good Lord, deliver us!



Alas, I lie, rage hath this error bred;

Love is not dead;

Love is not dead, but sleepeth

In her unmatched mind,

Where she his counsel keepeth,

Till due desert she find.

Therefore from so vile fancy,

To call such wit a franzy,

Who Love can temper thus,

Good Lord, deliver us!/CONTENT"	NAME/Ring Out Your Bells/NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/THOMAS CAMPION/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/Rose-cheek'd Laura, come,

Sing thou smoothly with thy beauty's

Silent music, either other

Sweetly gracing.



Lovely forms do flow

From concent divinely framed;

Heav'n is music, and thy beauty's

Birth is heavenly.



These dull notes we sing

Discords need for helps to grace them;

Only beauty purely loving

Knows no discord,



But still moves delight,

Like clear springs renew'd by flowing,

Ever perfect, ever in them-

Selves eternal./CONTENT"	NAME/Rose-Cheeked Laura/NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/SIR THOMAS WYATT/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/Since so ye please to hear me plain,

And that ye do rejoice my smart,

Me list no lenger to remain

To such as be so overthwart.



But cursed be that cruel heart

Which hath procurd a careless mind

For me and mine unfeigned smart,

And forceth me such faults to find.



More than too much I am assured

Of thine intent, whereto to trust;

A speedless proof I have endured,

And now I leave it to them that lust./CONTENT"	NAME/Since ye so Please/NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/SIR PHILIP SIDNEY/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/My true-love hath my heart and I have his,

By just exchange one for the other given:

I hold his dear, and mine he cannot miss;

There never was a bargain better driven.

His heart in me keeps me and him in one;

My heart in him his thoughts and senses guides:

He loves my heart, for once it was his own;

I cherish his because in me it bides.

His heart his wound received from my sight;

My heart was wounded with his wounded heart;

For as from me on him his hurt did light,

So still, methought, in me his hurt did smart:

Both equal hurt, in this change sought our bliss,

My true love hath my heart and I have his./CONTENT"	NAME/Song from Arcadia: My True Love Hath My Heart/NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/JOHN DONNE/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/Go and catch a falling star,

    Get with child a mandrake root,

Tell me where all past years are,

    Or who cleft the devil's foot,

Teach me to hear mermaids singing,

Or to keep off envy's stinging,

            And find

            What wind

Serves to advance an honest mind.



If thou be'st born to strange sights,

    Things invisible to see,

Ride ten thousand days and nights,

    Till age snow white hairs on thee,

Thou, when thou return'st, wilt tell me,

All strange wonders that befell thee,

            And swear,

            No where

Lives a woman true, and fair.



If thou find'st one, let me know,

    Such a pilgrimage were sweet;

Yet do not, I would not go,

    Though at next door we might meet;

Though she were true, when you met her,

And last, till you write your letter,

            Yet she

            Will be

False, ere I come, to two, or three.











Poetry Out Loud Note: In the print anthology, this poem is titled simply ""Song."" The student may give either title during the recitation. /CONTENT"	NAME/Song: Go and catch a falling star/NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/WILLIAM SHAKESPEARE/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/O Mistress mine where are you roaming?

O stay and hear, your true love's coming,

      That can sing both high and low.

Trip no further pretty sweeting.

Journeys end in lovers' meeting,

      Every wise man's son doth know.



What is love, 'tis not hereafter,

Present mirth, hath present laughter:

      What's to come, is still unsure.

In delay there lies no plenty,

Then come kiss me sweet and twenty:

      Youth's a stuff will not endure./CONTENT"	NAME/Song: O Mistress mine where are you roaming?/NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/JOHN DONNE/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/Sweetest love, I do not go,

         For weariness of thee,

Nor in hope the world can show

         A fitter love for me;

                But since that I

Must die at last, 'tis best

To use myself in jest

         Thus by feign'd deaths to die.



Yesternight the sun went hence,

         And yet is here today;

He hath no desire nor sense,

         Nor half so short a way:

                Then fear not me,

But believe that I shall make

Speedier journeys, since I take

         More wings and spurs than he.



O how feeble is man's power,

         That if good fortune fall,

Cannot add another hour,

         Nor a lost hour recall!

                But come bad chance,

And we join to'it our strength,

And we teach it art and length,

         Itself o'er us to'advance.



When thou sigh'st, thou sigh'st not wind,

         But sigh'st my soul away;

When thou weep'st, unkindly kind,

         My life's blood doth decay.

                It cannot be

That thou lov'st me, as thou say'st,

If in thine my life thou waste,

         That art the best of me.



Let not thy divining heart

         Forethink me any ill;

Destiny may take thy part,

         And may thy fears fulfil;

                But think that we

Are but turn'd aside to sleep;

They who one another keep

         Alive, ne'er parted be./CONTENT"	NAME/Song: Sweetest love, I do not go/NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/WILLIAM SHAKESPEARE/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/Take, oh take those lips away,

      That so sweetly were forsworn,

And those eyes: the breake of day,

      Lights that do mislead the Morn;

But my kisses bring again, bring again,

Seals of love, but sealed in vain, sealed in vain./CONTENT"	NAME/Song: Take, oh take those lips away/NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/EN JONSON/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/Drink to me only with thine eyes,

         And I will pledge with mine;

Or leave a kiss but in the cup,

         And Ill not look for wine.

The thirst that from the soul doth rise

         Doth ask a drink divine;

But might I of Joves nectar sup,

         I would not change for thine.



I sent thee late a rosy wreath,

         Not so much honouring thee

As giving it a hope, that there

         It could not withered be.

But thou thereon didst only breathe,

         And sentst it back to me;

Since when it grows, and smells, I swear,

         Not of itself, but thee./CONTENT"	NAME/Song: to Celia [Drink to me only with thine eyes]/NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/WILLIAM SHAKESPEARE/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/When I consider everything that grows

Holds in perfection but a little moment,

That this huge stage presenteth nought but shows

Whereon the stars in secret influence comment;

When I perceive that men as plants increase,

Cheered and check'd even by the selfsame sky,

Vaunt in their youthful sap, at height decrease,

And wear their brave state out of memory;

Then the conceit of this inconstant stay

Sets you most rich in youth before my sight,

Where wasteful Time debateth with Decay

To change your day of youth to sullied night;

And all in war with Time for love of you,

As he takes from you, I engraft you new./CONTENT"	NAME/Sonnet 15: When I consider everything that grows/NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/WILLIAM SHAKESPEARE/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/Devouring Time, blunt thou the lion's paws,

And make the earth devour her own sweet brood;

Pluck the keen teeth from the fierce tiger's jaws,

And burn the long-liv'd Phoenix in her blood;

Make glad and sorry seasons as thou fleets,

And do whate'er thou wilt, swift-footed Time,

To the wide world and all her fading sweets;

But I forbid thee one more heinous crime:

O, carve not with the hours my love's fair brow,

Nor draw no lines there with thine antique pen!

Him in thy course untainted do allow

For beauty's pattern to succeeding men.

Yet do thy worst, old Time! Despite thy wrong

My love shall in my verse ever live young./CONTENT"	NAME/Sonnet 19: Devouring Time, blunt thou the lion's paws/NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/WILLIAM SHAKESPEARE/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/Let those who are in favour with their stars

Of public honour and proud titles boast,

Whilst I, whom fortune of such triumph bars,

Unlook'd for joy in that I honour most.

Great princes' favourites their fair leaves spread

But as the marigold at the sun's eye,

And in themselves their pride lies buried,

For at a frown they in their glory die.

The painful warrior famoused for fight,

After a thousand victories once foil'd,

Is from the book of honour razed quite,

And all the rest forgot for which he toil'd:

Then happy I, that love and am beloved

Where I may not remove nor be removed./CONTENT"	NAME/Sonnet 25: Let those who are in favour with their stars/NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/WILLIAM SHAKESPEARE/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/When, in disgrace with fortune and mens eyes,

I all alone beweep my outcast state,

And trouble deaf heaven with my bootless cries,

And look upon myself and curse my fate,

Wishing me like to one more rich in hope,

Featured like him, like him with friends possessed,

Desiring this mans art and that mans scope,

With what I most enjoy contented least;

Yet in these thoughts myself almost despising,

Haply I think on thee, and then my state,

(Like to the lark at break of day arising

From sullen earth) sings hymns at heavens gate;

       For thy sweet love remembered such wealth brings

       That then I scorn to change my state with kings./CONTENT"	NAME/Sonnet 29: When, in disgrace with fortune and mens eyes/NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/WILLIAM SHAKESPEARE/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/When to the sessions of sweet silent thought

I summon up remembrance of things past,

I sigh the lack of many a thing I sought,

And with old woes new wail my dear time's waste:

Then can I drown an eye, unus'd to flow,

For precious friends hid in death's dateless night,

And weep afresh love's long since cancell'd woe,

And moan th' expense of many a vanish'd sight;

Then can I grieve at grievances foregone,

And heavily from woe to woe tell o'er

The sad account of fore-bemoaned moan,

Which I new pay as if not paid before.

But if the while I think on thee, dear friend,

All losses are restor'd, and sorrows end./CONTENT"	NAME/Sonnet 30: When to the sessions of sweet silent thought/NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/WILLIAM SHAKESPEARE/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/If thou survive my well-contented day,

When that churl Death my bones with dust shall cover,

And shalt by fortune once more re-survey

These poor rude lines of thy deceased lover,

Compare them with the bettering of the time,

And though they be outstripp'd by every pen,

Reserve them for my love, not for their rhyme,

Exceeded by the height of happier men.

O then vouchsafe me but this loving thought:

""Had my friend's Muse grown with this growing age

A dearer birth than this his love had brought,

To march in ranks of better equipage:

But since he died and poets better prove,

Theirs for their style I'll read, his for his love.""/CONTENT"	NAME/Sonnet 32: If thou survive my well-contented day/NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/WILLIAM SHAKESPEARE/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/Full many a glorious morning have I seen

Flatter the mountain-tops with sovereign eye,

Kissing with golden face the meadows green,

Gilding pale streams with heavenly alchemy;

Anon permit the basest clouds to ride

With ugly rack on his celestial face

And from the forlorn world his visage hide,

Stealing unseen to west with this disgrace.

Even so my sun one early morn did shine

With all-triumphant splendour on my brow;

But out, alack! he was but one hour mine;

The region cloud hath mask'd him from me now.

Yet him for this my love no whit disdaineth;

Suns of the world may stain when heaven's sun staineth./CONTENT"	NAME/Sonnet 33: Full many a glorious morning have I seen/NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/WILLIAM SHAKESPEARE/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/What is your substance, whereof are you made,

That millions of strange shadows on you tend?

Since every one hath, every one, one shade,

And you, but one, can every shadow lend.

Describe Adonis, and the counterfeit

Is poorly imitated after you;

On Helen's cheek all art of beauty set,

And you in Grecian tires are painted new.

Speak of the spring and foison of the year:

The one doth shadow of your beauty show,

The other as your bounty doth appear;

And you in every blessed shape we know.

    In all external grace you have some part,

    But you like none, none you, for constant heart./CONTENT"	NAME/Sonnet 53: What is your substance, whereof are you made/NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/WILLIAM SHAKESPEARE/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/When I have seen by Time's fell hand defac'd

The rich proud cost of outworn buried age;

When sometime lofty towers I see down-ras'd

And brass eternal slave to mortal rage;

When I have seen the hungry ocean gain

Advantage on the kingdom of the shore,

And the firm soil win of the wat'ry main,

Increasing store with loss and loss with store;

When I have seen such interchange of state,

Or state itself confounded to decay;

Ruin hath taught me thus to ruminate,

That Time will come and take my love away.

This thought is as a death, which cannot choose

But weep to have that which it fears to lose./CONTENT"	NAME/Sonnet 64: When I have seen by Time's fell hand defac'd/NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/WILLIAM SHAKESPEARE/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/Tir'd with all these, for restful death I cry,

As, to behold desert a beggar born,

And needy nothing trimm'd in jollity,

And purest faith unhappily forsworn,

And gilded honour shamefully misplac'd,

And maiden virtue rudely strumpeted,

And right perfection wrongfully disgrac'd,

And strength by limping sway disabled,

And art made tongue-tied by authority,

And folly, doctor-like, controlling skill,

And simple truth miscall'd simplicity,

And captive good attending captain ill.

Tir'd with all these, from these would I be gone,

Save that, to die, I leave my love alone./CONTENT"	NAME/Sonnet 66: Tir'd with all these, for restful death I cry/NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/WILLIAM SHAKESPEARE/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/No longer mourn for me when I am dead

Than you shall hear the surly sullen bell

Give warning to the world that I am fled

From this vile world with vilest worms to dwell;

Nay, if you read this line, remember not

The hand that writ it; for I love you so,

That I in your sweet thoughts would be forgot,

If thinking on me then should make you woe.

O, if (I say) you look upon this verse,

When I (perhaps) compounded am with clay,

Do not so much as my poor name rehearse,

But let your love even with my life decay,

Lest the wise world should look into your moan,

And mock you with me after I am gone./CONTENT"	NAME/Sonnet 71: No longer mourn for me when I am dead/NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/WILLIAM SHAKESPEARE/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/That time of year thou mayst in me behold

When yellow leaves, or none, or few, do hang

Upon those boughs which shake against the cold,

Bare ruin'd choirs, where late the sweet birds sang.

In me thou see'st the twilight of such day

As after sunset fadeth in the west,

Which by and by black night doth take away,

Death's second self, that seals up all in rest.

In me thou see'st the glowing of such fire

That on the ashes of his youth doth lie,

As the death-bed whereon it must expire,

Consum'd with that which it was nourish'd by.

This thou perceiv'st, which makes thy love more strong,

To love that well which thou must leave ere long./CONTENT"	NAME/Sonnet 73: That time of year thou mayst in me behold/NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/WILLIAM SHAKESPEARE/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/Not mine own fears, nor the prophetic soul

Of the wide world dreaming on things to come,

Can yet the lease of my true love control,

Suppos'd as forfeit to a confin'd doom.

The mortal moon hath her eclipse endur'd

And the sad augurs mock their own presage;

Incertainties now crown themselves assur'd

And peace proclaims olives of endless age.

Now with the drops of this most balmy time

My love looks fresh, and Death to me subscribes,

Since, spite of him, I'll live in this poor rhyme,

While he insults o'er dull and speechless tribes;

And thou in this shalt find thy monument,

When tyrants' crests and tombs of brass are spent./CONTENT"	NAME/Sonnet 107: Not mine own fears, nor the prophetic soul/NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/WILLIAM SHAKESPEARE/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/Alas, 'tis true I have gone here and there

And made myself a motley to the view,

Gor'd mine own thoughts, sold cheap what is most dear,

Made old offences of affections new.

Most true it is that I have look'd on truth

Askance and strangely: but, by all above,

These blenches gave my heart another youth,

And worse essays prov'd thee my best of love.

Now all is done, have what shall have no end!

Mine appetite, I never more will grind

On newer proof, to try an older friend,

A god in love, to whom I am confin'd.

Then give me welcome, next my heaven the best,

Even to thy pure and most most loving breast./CONTENT"	NAME/Sonnet 110: Alas, 'tis true I have gone here and there/NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/WILLIAM SHAKESPEARE/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/Let me not to the marriage of true minds

Admit impediments. Love is not love

Which alters when it alteration finds,

Or bends with the remover to remove.

O no! it is an ever-fixed mark

That looks on tempests and is never shaken;

It is the star to every wand'ring bark,

Whose worth's unknown, although his height be taken.

Love's not Time's fool, though rosy lips and cheeks

Within his bending sickle's compass come;

Love alters not with his brief hours and weeks,

But bears it out even to the edge of doom.

If this be error and upon me prov'd,

I never writ, nor no man ever lov'd./CONTENT"	NAME/Sonnet 116: Let me not to the marriage of true minds/NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/WILLIAM SHAKESPEARE/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/Th' expense of spirit in a waste of shame

Is lust in action; and till action, lust

Is perjured, murd'rous, bloody, full of blame,

Savage, extreme, rude, cruel, not to trust,

Enjoyed no sooner but despised straight,

Past reason hunted; and, no sooner had

Past reason hated as a swallowed bait

On purpose laid to make the taker mad;

Mad in pursuit and in possession so,

Had, having, and in quest to have, extreme;

A bliss in proof and proved, a very woe;

Before, a joy proposed; behind, a dream.

    All this the world well knows; yet none knows well

    To shun the heaven that leads men to this hell./CONTENT"	NAME/Sonnet 129: Th'expense of spirit in a waste of shame/NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/WILLIAM SHAKESPEARE/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/My mistress' eyes are nothing like the sun;

Coral is far more red than her lips' red;

If snow be white, why then her breasts are dun;

If hairs be wires, black wires grow on her head.

I have seen roses damasked, red and white,

But no such roses see I in her cheeks;

And in some perfumes is there more delight

Than in the breath that from my mistress reeks.

I love to hear her speak, yet well I know

That music hath a far more pleasing sound;

I grant I never saw a goddess go;

My mistress, when she walks, treads on the ground.

   And yet, by heaven, I think my love as rare

   As any she belied with false compare./CONTENT"	NAME/Sonnet 130: My mistress' eyes are nothing like the sun/NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/WILLIAM SHAKESPEARE/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/Poor soul, the centre of my sinful earth,

[......] these rebel powers that thee array,

Why dost thou pine within and suffer dearth,

Painting thy outward walls so costly gay?

Why so large cost, having so short a lease,

Dost thou upon thy fading mansion spend?

Shall worms, inheritors of this excess,

Eat up thy charge? Is this thy body's end?

Then soul, live thou upon thy servant's loss

And let that pine to aggravate thy store;

Buy terms divine in selling hours of dross;

Within be fed, without be rich no more.

So shalt thou feed on Death, that feeds on men,

And, Death once dead, there's no more dying then./CONTENT"	NAME/Sonnet 146: Poor soul, the centre of my sinful earth,/NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/EN JONSON/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/Still to be neat, still to be dressed,

As you were going to a feast;

Still to be powdered, still perfumed;

Lady, it is to be presumed,

Though art's hid causes are not found,

All is not sweet, all is not sound.



Give me a look, give me a face,

That makes simplicity a grace;

Robes loosely flowing, hair as free;

Such sweet neglect more taketh me

                       Than all th'adulteries of art.

They strike mine eyes, but not my heart./CONTENT"	NAME/Still to be neat, still to be dressed/NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/JOHN DONNE/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/               Busy old fool, unruly sun,

               Why dost thou thus,

Through windows, and through curtains call on us?

Must to thy motions lovers' seasons run?

               Saucy pedantic wretch, go chide

               Late school boys and sour prentices,

         Go tell court huntsmen that the king will ride,

         Call country ants to harvest offices,

Love, all alike, no season knows nor clime,

Nor hours, days, months, which are the rags of time.



               Thy beams, so reverend and strong

               Why shouldst thou think?

I could eclipse and cloud them with a wink,

But that I would not lose her sight so long;

               If her eyes have not blinded thine,

               Look, and tomorrow late, tell me,

         Whether both th' Indias of spice and mine

         Be where thou leftst them, or lie here with me.

Ask for those kings whom thou saw'st yesterday,

And thou shalt hear, All here in one bed lay.



               She's all states, and all princes, I,

               Nothing else is.

Princes do but play us; compared to this,

All honor's mimic, all wealth alchemy.

               Thou, sun, art half as happy as we,

               In that the world's contracted thus.

         Thine age asks ease, and since thy duties be

         To warm the world, that's done in warming us.

Shine here to us, and thou art everywhere;

This bed thy center is, these walls, thy sphere./CONTENT"	NAME/The Sun Rising/NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/THOMAS CAMPION/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/There is a garden in her face

Where roses and white lilies grow;

A heav'nly paradise is that place

Wherein all pleasant fruits do flow.

There cherries grow which none may buy,

Till ""Cherry ripe"" themselves do cry.



Those cherries fairly do enclose

Of orient pearl a double row,

Which when her lovely laughter shows,

They look like rose-buds fill'd with snow;

Yet them nor peer nor prince can buy,

Till ""Cherry ripe"" themselves do cry.



Her eyes like angels watch them still,

Her brows like bended bows do stand,

Threat'ning with piercing frowns to kill

All that attempt with eye or hand

Those sacred cherries to come nigh,

Till ""Cherry ripe"" themselves do cry./CONTENT"	NAME/There Is A Garden In Her Face/NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/SIR THOMAS WYATT/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/They flee from me that sometime did me seek

With naked foot, stalking in my chamber.

I have seen them gentle, tame, and meek,

That now are wild and do not remember

That sometime they put themself in danger

To take bread at my hand; and now they range,

Busily seeking with a continual change.



Thanked be fortune it hath been otherwise

Twenty times better; but once in special,

In thin array after a pleasant guise,

When her loose gown from her shoulders did fall,

And she me caught in her arms long and small;

Therewithall sweetly did me kiss

And softly said, Dear heart, how like you this?



It was no dream: I lay broad waking.

But all is turned thorough my gentleness

Into a strange fashion of forsaking;

And I have leave to go of her goodness,

And she also, to use newfangleness.

But since that I so kindly am served

I would fain know what she hath deserved./CONTENT"	NAME/They Flee From Me/NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/THOMAS CAMPION/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/Thrice toss these oaken ashes in the air,

Thrice sit thou mute in this enchanted chair,

Then thrice three times tie up this true love's knot,

And murmur soft ""She will, or she will not.""



Go burn these pois'nous weeds in yon blue fire,

These screech-owl's feathers and this prickling briar,

This cypress gathered at a dead man's grave,

That all my fears and cares an end may have.



Then come, you fairies! dance with me a round;

Melt her hard heart with your melodious sound.

In vain are all the charms I can devise:

She hath an art to break them with her eyes./CONTENT"	NAME/Thrice Toss These Oaken Ashes/NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/SIR THOMAS WYATT/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/   Unstable dream, according to the place,

Be steadfast once, or else at least be true.

By tasted sweetness make me not to rue

The sudden loss of thy false feigned grace.

By good respect in such a dangerous case

Thou broughtest not her into this tossing mew

But madest my sprite live, my care to renew,

My body in tempest her succour to embrace.

The body dead, the sprite had his desire,

Painless was th'one, th'other in delight.

Why then, alas, did it not keep it right,

Returning, to leap into the fire?

     And where it was at wish, it could not remain,

     Such mocks of dreams they turn to deadly pain./CONTENT"	NAME/Unstable Dream/NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/JOHN DONNE/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/As virtuous men pass mildly away,

   And whisper to their souls to go,

Whilst some of their sad friends do say

   The breath goes now, and some say, No:



So let us melt, and make no noise,

   No tear-floods, nor sigh-tempests move;

'Twere profanation of our joys

   To tell the laity our love.



Moving of th' earth brings harms and fears,

   Men reckon what it did, and meant;

But trepidation of the spheres,

   Though greater far, is innocent.



Dull sublunary lovers' love

   (Whose soul is sense) cannot admit

Absence, because it doth remove

   Those things which elemented it.



But we by a love so much refined,

   That our selves know not what it is,

Inter-assured of the mind,

   Care less, eyes, lips, and hands to miss.



Our two souls therefore, which are one,

   Though I must go, endure not yet

A breach, but an expansion,

   Like gold to airy thinness beat.



If they be two, they are two so

   As stiff twin compasses are two;

Thy soul, the fixed foot, makes no show

   To move, but doth, if the other do.



And though it in the center sit,

   Yet when the other far doth roam,

It leans and hearkens after it,

   And grows erect, as that comes home.



Such wilt thou be to me, who must,

   Like th' other foot, obliquely run;

Thy firmness makes my circle just,

   And makes me end where I begun./CONTENT"	NAME/A Valediction: Forbidding Mourning/NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/JOHN DONNE/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/          Let me pour forth

My tears before thy face, whilst I stay here,

For thy face coins them, and thy stamp they bear,

And by this mintage they are something worth,

         For thus they be

         Pregnant of thee;

Fruits of much grief they are, emblems of more,

When a tear falls, that thou falls which it bore,

So thou and I are nothing then, when on a diverse shore.



         On a round ball

A workman that hath copies by, can lay

An Europe, Afric, and an Asia,

And quickly make that, which was nothing, all;

         So doth each tear

         Which thee doth wear,

A globe, yea world, by that impression grow,

Till thy tears mix'd with mine do overflow

This world; by waters sent from thee, my heaven dissolved so.



         O more than moon,

Draw not up seas to drown me in thy sphere,

Weep me not dead, in thine arms, but forbear

To teach the sea what it may do too soon;

         Let not the wind

         Example find,

To do me more harm than it purposeth;

Since thou and I sigh one another's breath,

Whoe'er sighs most is cruellest, and hastes the other's death./CONTENT"	NAME/A Valediction: of Weeping/NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/SIR THOMAS WYATT/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/What needeth these threnning words and wasted wind?

All this cannot make me restore my prey.

To rob your good, iwis, is not my mind,

Nor causeless your fair hand did I display.

Let love be judge or else whom next we meet

That may both hear what you and I can say:

She took from me an heart, and I a glove from her.

Let us see now if th'one be worth th'other./CONTENT"	NAME/What Needeth these Threat'ning Words/NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/SIR THOMAS WYATT/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/What should I say,

Since faith is dead,

And truth away

From you is fled?

Should I be led

With doubleness?

Nay, nay, mistress!



I promised you,

And you promised me,

To be as true

As I would be.

But since I see

Your double heart,

Farewell my part!



Though for to take

It is not my mind,

But to forsake

[One so unkind]

And as I find,

So will I trust:

Farewell, unjust!



Can ye say nay?

But you said

That I alway

Should be obeyed?

And thus betrayed

Or that I wiste

Farewell, unkissed./CONTENT"	NAME/What should I Say/NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/THOMAS CAMPION/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/When thou must home to shades of underground,

And there arriv'd, a new admired guest,

The beauteous spirits do engirt thee round,

White Iope, blithe Helen, and the rest,

To hear the stories of thy finish'd love

From that smooth tongue whose music hell can move;



Then wilt thou speak of banqueting delights,

Of masques and revels which sweet youth did make,

Of tourneys and great challenges of knights,

And all these triumphs for thy beauty's sake:

When thou hast told these honours done to thee,

Then tell, O tell, how thou didst murder me./CONTENT"	NAME/When Thou Must Home to Shades of Underground/NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/SIR THOMAS WYATT/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/Whoso list to hunt, I know where is an hind,

But as for me, helas, I may no more.

The vain travail hath wearied me so sore,

I am of them that farthest cometh behind.

Yet may I by no means my wearied mind

Draw from the deer, but as she fleeth afore

Fainting I follow. I leave off therefore,

Sithens in a net I seek to hold the wind.

Who list her hunt, I put him out of doubt,

As well as I may spend his time in vain.

And graven with diamonds in letters plain

There is written, her fair neck round about:

Noli me tangere, for Caesar's I am,

And wild for to hold, though I seem tame./CONTENT"	NAME/Whoso List to Hunt, I Know where is an Hind/NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/SIR THOMAS WYATT/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/Ye old mule that think yourself so fair,

Leave off with craft your beauty to repair,

For it is true, without any fable,

No man setteth more by riding in your saddle.

Too much travail so do your train appair.

        Ye old mule

With false savour though you deceive th'air,

Whoso taste you shall well perceive your lair

Savoureth somewhat of a Kappurs stable.

        Ye old mule

Ye must now serve to market and to fair,

All for the burden, for panniers a pair.

For since gray hairs been powdered in your sable,

The thing ye seek for, you must yourself enable

To purchase it by payment and by prayer,

        Ye old mule./CONTENT"	NAME/Ye Old Mule/NAME	AGE/Renaissance/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/EDGAR LEE MASTERS/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/I leaned against the mantel, sick, sick,

Thinking of my failure, looking into the abysm,

Weak from the noon-day heat.

A church bell sounded mournfully far away,

I heard the cry of a baby,

And the coughing of John Yarnell,

Bed-ridden, feverish, feverish, dying,

Then the violent voice of my wife:

""Watch out, the potatoes are burning!""

I smelled them ... then there was irresistible disgust.

I pulled the trigger ... blackness ... light ...

Unspeakable regret ... fumbling for the world again.

Too late! Thus I came here,

With lungs for breathing ... one cannot breathe here with lungs,

Though one must breathe

Of what use is it To rid one's self of the world,

When no soul may ever escape the eternal destiny of life?/CONTENT"	NAME/Harold Arnett/NAME	AGE/Modern/AGE	TYPE/Mythology & Folklore/TYPE
AUTHOR/EDGAR LEE MASTERS/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/I was the first fruits of the battle of Missionary Ridge.

When I felt the bullet enter my heart

I wished I had staid at home and gone to jail

For stealing the hogs of Curl Trenary,

Instead of running away and joining the army.

Rather a thousand times the county jail

Than to lie under this marble figure with wings,

And this granite pedestal Bearing the words, Pro Patria.

What do they mean, anyway?/CONTENT"	NAME/Knowlt Hoheimer/NAME	AGE/Modern/AGE	TYPE/Mythology & Folklore/TYPE
AUTHOR/EDGAR LEE MASTERS/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/I was only eight years old;

And before I grew up and knew what it meant

I had no words for it, except

That I was frightened and told my

Mother; And that my Father got a pistol

And would have killed Charlie, who was a big boy,

Fifteen years old, except for his Mother.

Nevertheless the story clung to me.

But the man who married me, a widower of thirty-five,

Was a newcomer and never heard it

Till two years after we were married.

Then he considered himself cheated,

And the village agreed that I was not really a virgin.

Well, he deserted me, and I died

The following winter./CONTENT"	NAME/Nellie Clark/NAME	AGE/Modern/AGE	TYPE/Mythology & Folklore/TYPE
AUTHOR/WILLIAM BUTLER YEATS/AUTHOR	CONTENT/W. B. Yeats, Lapis Lazuli from The Poems of W. B. Yeats: A New Edition, edited by Richard J. Finneran. Copyright 1933 by Macmillan Publishing Company, renewed  1961 by Georgie Yeats. Reprinted with the permission of A. P. Watt, Ltd. on behalf of Michael Yeats./CONTENT	NAME/Lapis Lazuli/NAME	AGE/Modern/AGE	TYPE/Mythology & Folklore/TYPE
AUTHOR/WILLIAM BUTLER YEATS/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/Why should I blame her that she filled my days

With misery, or that she would of late

Have taught to ignorant men most violent ways,

Or hurled the little streets upon the great,

Had they but courage equal to desire?

What could have made her peaceful with a mind

That nobleness made simple as a fire,

With beauty like a tightened bow, a kind

That is not natural in an age like this,

Being high and solitary and most stern?

Why, what could she have done, being what she is?

Was there another Troy for her to burn?/CONTENT"	NAME/No Second Troy/NAME	AGE/Modern/AGE	TYPE/Mythology & Folklore/TYPE
AUTHOR/FORD MADOX FORD/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/I

GLOOM!

An October like November;

August a hundred thousand hours,

And all September,

A hundred thousand, dragging sunlit days,

And half October like a thousand years . . .

And doom!

That then was Antwerp. . .

                              In the name of God,

How could they do it?

Those souls that usually dived

Into the dirty caverns of mines;

Who usually hived

In whitened hovels; under ragged poplars;

Who dragged muddy shovels, over the grassy mud,

Lumbering to work over the greasy sods. . .

Those men there, with the appearance of clods

Were the bravest men that a usually listless priest of God

Ever shrived. . .

And it is not for us to make them an anthem.

If we found words there would come no wind that would fan them

To a tune that the trumpets might blow it,

Shrill through the heaven that's ours or yet Allah's,

Or the wide halls of any Valhallas.

We can make no such anthem. So that all that is ours

For inditing in sonnets, pantoums, elegiacs, or lays

Is this:

In the name of God, how could they do it?





II

For there is no new thing under the sun,

Only this uncomely man with a smoking gun

In the gloom. . .

What the devil will he gain by it?

Digging a hole in the mud and standing all day in the rain by it

Waiting his doom;

The sharp blow, the swift outpouring of the blood,

Till the trench of gray mud

Is turned to a brown purple drain by it.

Well, there have been scars

Won in many wars . . .

Punic,

Lacedmonian, wars of Napoleon, wars for faith, wars for honour, for love, for possession,

But this Belgian man in his ugly tunic,

His ugly round cap, shooting on, in a sort of obsession,

Overspreading his miserable land,

Standing with his wet gun in his hand . . .

Doom!

He finds that in a sudden scrimmage,

And lies, an unsightly lump on the sodden grass . . .

An image that shall take long to pass!





III

For the white-limbed heroes of Hellas ride by upon their horses

Forever through our brains.

The heroes of Cressy ride by upon their stallions;

And battalions and battalions and battalions

The Old Guard, the Young Guard, the men of Minden and of Waterloo,

Pass, for ever staunch,

Stand, for ever true;

And the small man with the large paunch,

And the gray coat, and the large hat, and the hands behind the back,

Watches them pass

In our minds for ever . . .

But that clutter of sodden corses

On the sodden Belgian grass

That is a strange new beauty.





IV

With no especial legends of marchings or triumphs or duty,

Assuredly that is the way of it,

The way of beauty . . .

And that is the highest word you can find to say of it.

For you cannot praise it with words

Compounded of lyres and swords,

But the thought of the gloom and the rain

And the ugly coated figure, standing beside a drain,

Shall eat itself into your brain:

And you will say of all heroes, They fought like the Belgians!

And you will say: He wrought like a Belgian his fate out of gloom.

And you will say: He bought like a Belgian his doom.

And that shall be an honourable name;

Belgian shall be an honourable word;

As honourable as the fame of the sword,

As honourable as the mention of the many-chorded lyre,

And his old coat shall seem as beautiful as the fabrics woven in Tyre.





V

And what in the world did they bear it for?

I don't know.

And what in the world did they dare it for?

Perhaps that is not for the likes of me to understand.

They could very well have watched a hundred legions go

Over their fields and between their cities

Down into more southerly regions.

They could very well have let the legions pass through their woods,

And have kept their lives and their wives and their children and cattle and goods.

I don't understand.

Was it just love of their land?

Oh, poor dears!

Can any man so love his land?

Give them a thousand thousand pities

And rivers and rivers of tears

To wash off the blood from the cities of Flanders.





VI

This is Charing Cross;

It is midnight;

There is a great crowd

And no light.

A great crowd, all black that hardly whispers aloud.

Surely, that is a dead womana dead mother!

She has a dead face;

She is dressed all in black;

She wanders to the bookstall and back,

At the back of the crowd;

And back again and again back,

She sways and wanders.



This is Charing Cross;

It is one o'clock.

There is still a great cloud, and very little light;

Immense shafts of shadows over the black crowd

That hardly whispers aloud. . .

And now! .  . That is another dead mother,

And there is another and another and another. . .

And little children, all in black,

All with dead faces, waiting in all the waiting-places,

Wandering from the doors of the waiting-room

In the dim gloom.

These are the women of Flanders.

They await the lost.

They await the lost that shall never leave the dock;

They await the lost that shall never again come by the train

To the embraces of all these women with dead faces;

They await the lost who lie dead in trench and barrier and foss,

In the dark of the night.

This is Charing Cross; it is past one of the clock;

There is very little light.



There is so much pain.





LEnvoi

And it was for this that they endured this gloom;

This October like November,

That August like a hundred thousand hours,

And that September,

A hundred thousand dragging sunlit days,

And half October like a thousand years. . .

Oh, poor dears!/CONTENT"	NAME/In October 1914 [Antwerp]/NAME	AGE/Modern/AGE	TYPE/Mythology & Folklore/TYPE
AUTHOR/IVOR GURNEY/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/As I went up by Ovillers

   In mud and water cold to the knee,

There went three jeering, fleering spectres,

   That walked abreast and talked of me.



The first said, Heres a right brave soldier

   That walks the dark unfearingly;

Soon hell come back on a fine stretcher,

   And laughing for a nice Blighty.



The second, Read his face, old comrade,

   No kind of lucky chance I see;

One day hell freeze in mud to the marrow,

   Then look his last on Picardie.



Though bitter the word of these first twain

   Curses the third spat venomously;

Hell stay untouched till the wars last dawning

   Then live one hour of agony.



Liars the first two were. Behold me

   At sloping arms by one  two  three;

Waiting the time I shall discover

   Whether the third spake verity./CONTENT"	NAME/Ballad of the Three Spectres/NAME	AGE/Modern/AGE	TYPE/Mythology & Folklore/TYPE
AUTHOR/IVOR GURNEY/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/She was a village

Of lovely knowledge

The high roads left her aside, she was forlorn, a maid

Water ran there, dusk hid her, she climbed four-wayed.

Brown-gold windows showed last folk not yet asleep;

Water ran, was a centre of silence deep,

Fathomless deeps of pricked sky, almost fathomless

Hallowed an upward gaze in pale satin of blue.

And I was happy indeed, of mind, soul, body even

Having got given

A sign undoubtful of a dear England few

Doubt, not many have seen,

That Will Squele he knew and was so shriven.

Home of Twelfth Night  Edward Thomas by Arras fallen,

Borrow and Hardy, Sussex tales out of Roman heights callen.

No madrigals or field-songs to my all reverent whim;

Till I got back I was dumb./CONTENT"	NAME/I Saw England  July Night/NAME	AGE/Modern/AGE	TYPE/Mythology & Folklore/TYPE
AUTHOR/IVOR GURNEY/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/If it were not for England, who would bear

This heavy servitude one moment more?

To keep a brothel, sweep and wash the floor

Of filthiest hovels were noble to compare

With this brass-cleaning life. Now here, now there

Harried in foolishness, scanned curiously o'er

By fools made brazen by conceit, and store

Of antique witticisms thin and bare.



Only the love of comrades sweetens all,

Whose laughing spirit will not be outdone.

As night-watching men wait for the sun

To hearten them, so wait I on such boys

As neither brass nor Hell-fire may appal,

Nor guns, nor sergeant-major's bluster and noise./CONTENT"	NAME/Servitude/NAME	AGE/Modern/AGE	TYPE/Mythology & Folklore/TYPE
AUTHOR/IVOR GURNEY/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/Only the wanderer

   Knows England's graces,

Or can anew see clear

   Familiar faces.



And who loves joy as he

   That dwells in shadows?

Do not forget me quite,

   O Severn meadows./CONTENT"	NAME/Song [Only the wanderer]/NAME	AGE/Modern/AGE	TYPE/Mythology & Folklore/TYPE
AUTHOR/IVOR GURNEY/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/Little did I dream, England, that you bore me

Under the Cotswold hills beside the water meadows,

To do you dreadful service, here, beyond your borders

And your enfolding seas.



I was a dreamer ever, and bound to your dear service,

Meditating deep, I thought on your secret beauty,

As through a child's face one may see the clear spirit

Miraculously shining.



Your hills not only hills, but friends of mine and kindly,

Your tiny knolls and orchards hidden beside the river

Muddy and strongly flowing, with shy and tiny streamlets

Safe in its bosom.



Now these are memories only, and your skies and rushy sky-pools

Fragile mirrors easily broken by moving airs ...

But deep in my heart for ever goes on your daily being,

And uses consecrate.



Think on me too, O Mother, who wrest my soul to serve you

In strange and fearful ways beyond your encircling waters;

None but you can know my heart, its tears and sacrifice;

None, but you, repay./CONTENT"	NAME/Strange Service/NAME	AGE/Modern/AGE	TYPE/Mythology & Folklore/TYPE
AUTHOR/IVOR GURNEY/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/He's gone, and all our plans

   Are useless indeed.

We'll walk no more on Cotswold

   Where the sheep feed

   Quietly and take no heed.



His body that was so quick

   Is not as you

Knew it, on Severn river

   Under the blue

   Driving our small boat through.



You would not know him now ...

   But still he died

Nobly, so cover him over

   With violets of pride

   Purple from Severn side.



Cover him, cover him soon!

   And with thick-set

Masses of memoried flowers

   Hide that red wet

   Thing I must somehow forget./CONTENT"	NAME/To His Love/NAME	AGE/Modern/AGE	TYPE/Mythology & Folklore/TYPE
AUTHOR/IVOR GURNEY/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/Now, youth, the hour of thy dread passion comes;

Thy lovely things must all be laid away;

And thou, as others, must face the riven day

Unstirred by rattle of the rolling drums,

Or bugles' strident cry. When mere noise numbs

The sense of being, the sick soul doth sway,

Remember thy great craft's honour, that they may say

Nothing in shame of poets. Then the crumbs

Of praise the little versemen joyed to take

Shall be forgotten; then they must know we are,

For all our skill in words, equal in might

And strong of mettle as those we honoured; make

The name of poet terrible in just war,

And like a crown of honour upon the fight./CONTENT"	NAME/To the Poet Before Battle/NAME	AGE/Modern/AGE	TYPE/Mythology & Folklore/TYPE
AUTHOR/IVOR GURNEY/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/When I remember plain heroic strength

And shining virtue shown by Ypres pools,

Then read the blither written by knaves for fools

In praise of English soldiers lying at length,

Who purely dream what England shall be made

Gloriously new, free of the old stains

By us, who pay the price that must be paid,

Will freeze all winter over Ypres plains.

Our silly dreams of peace you put aside

And brotherhood of man, for you will see

An armed mistress, braggart of the tide,

Her children slaves, under your mastery.

We'll have a word there too, and forge a knife,

Will cut the cancer threatens England's life./CONTENT"	NAME/To the Prussians of England/NAME	AGE/Modern/AGE	TYPE/Mythology & Folklore/TYPE
AUTHOR/CARL SANDBURG/AUTHOR	CONTENT/Doors, from Wind Song, is copyright  1957 by Carl Sandburg, and renewed 1985 by Margaret Sandburg, Janet Sandburg, and Helga Sandburg Crile, reprinted by permission of Houghton Mifflin Harcourt Publishing Company./CONTENT	NAME/Doors/NAME	AGE/Modern/AGE	TYPE/Mythology & Folklore/TYPE
AUTHOR/EZRA POUND/AUTHOR	CONTENT/Ezra Pound, "Canto I" from The Cantos of Ezra Pound. Copyright  1993 by Ezra Pound. Reprinted by permission of New Directions Publishing Corporation./CONTENT	NAME/Canto I/NAME	AGE/Modern/AGE	TYPE/Mythology & Folklore/TYPE
AUTHOR/EZRA POUND/AUTHOR	CONTENT/Ezra Pound, "Canto III" from The Cantos of Ezra Pound. Copyright  1993 by Ezra Pound. Reprinted by permission of New Directions Publishing Corporation./CONTENT	NAME/Canto III/NAME	AGE/Modern/AGE	TYPE/Mythology & Folklore/TYPE
AUTHOR/EZRA POUND/AUTHOR	CONTENT/Ezra Pound, "Canto IV" from The Cantos of Ezra Pound. Copyright  1993 by Ezra Pound. Reprinted by permission of New Directions Publishing Corporation./CONTENT	NAME/Canto IV/NAME	AGE/Modern/AGE	TYPE/Mythology & Folklore/TYPE
AUTHOR/EZRA POUND/AUTHOR	CONTENT/Ezra Pound, "Canto LXXXI" from The Cantos of Ezra Pound. Copyright  1993 by Ezra Pound. Reprinted by permission of New Directions Publishing Corporation./CONTENT	NAME/Canto LXXXI/NAME	AGE/Modern/AGE	TYPE/Mythology & Folklore/TYPE
AUTHOR/EZRA POUND/AUTHOR	CONTENT/Ezra Pound, "Canto XLV " from The Cantos of Ezra Pound. Copyright  1993 by Ezra Pound. Reprinted by permission of New Directions Publishing Corporation./CONTENT	NAME/Canto XLV/NAME	AGE/Modern/AGE	TYPE/Mythology & Folklore/TYPE
AUTHOR/EZRA POUND/AUTHOR	CONTENT/Ezra Pound, "Canto XXXVI" from The Cantos of Ezra Pound. Copyright  1993 by Ezra Pound. Reprinted by permission of New Directions Publishing Corporation./CONTENT	NAME/Canto XXXVI/NAME	AGE/Modern/AGE	TYPE/Mythology & Folklore/TYPE
AUTHOR/EDGAR LEE MASTERS/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/   So in Pieria, from the wedded bliss

Of Time and Memory, the Muses came

To be the means of rich oblivion,

And rest from cares.  And when the Thunderer

Took heaven, then the Titans warred on him

For pity of mankind. But the great law,

Which is the law of music, not of bread,

Set Atlas for a pillar, manacled

His brother to the rocks of the Scythia,

And under Aetna fixed the furious Typhon.

So should thought rule, not force. And Amphion,

Pursuing justice, entered Thebes and slew

His mother's spouse; but when he would make sure

And fortify the city, then he took

The lyre that Hermes gave, and played, and watched

The stones move and assemble, till a wall

Engirded Thebes and kept the citadel

Beyond the reach of arrows and of fire.

What other power but harmony can build

A city, and what gift so magical

As that by which a city lifts its walls?

So men, in years to come, shall feel the power

Of this man moving through the high-ranged thought

Which plans for beauty, builds for larger life.

The stones shall rise in towers to answer him./CONTENT"	NAME/In Memory of Bryan Lathrop/NAME	AGE/Modern/AGE	TYPE/Mythology & Folklore/TYPE
AUTHOR/ELINOR WYLIE/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/My bands of silk and miniver

Momently grew heavier;

The black gauze was beggarly thin;

The ermine muffled mouth and chin;

I could not suck the moonlight in.



Harlequin in lozenges

Of love and hate, I walked in these

Striped and ragged rigmaroles;

Along the pavement my footsoles

Trod warily on living coals.



Shouldering the thoughts I loathed,

In their corrupt disguises clothed,

Morality I could not tear

From my ribs, to leave them bare

Ivory in silver air.



There I walked, and there I raged;

The spiritual savage caged

Within my skeleton, raged afresh

To feel, behind a carnal mesh,

The clean bones crying in the flesh./CONTENT"	NAME/Full Moon/NAME	AGE/Modern/AGE	TYPE/Mythology & Folklore/TYPE
AUTHOR/GEORGE SANTAYANA/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/                                    I



Behoild Pelides with his yellow hair,

Proud child of Thetis, hero loved of Jove;

Above the frowning of his brows of wove

A crown of gold, well combed, with Spartan care.

Who might have seen him, sullen, great, and fair,

As with the wrongful world he proudly strove,

And by high deeds his wilder passion shrove,

Mastering love, resentment, and despair.

He knew his end, and Phoebus arrow sure

He braved for fame immortal and a friend,

Despising life; and we, who know our end,

Know that in our decay he shall endure

And all our childrens hearts to grief inure,

With whose first bitter battles his shall blend.



                                    II



Who brought thee forth, immortal vision, who

In Phthia or in Tempe brought thee forth?

Out of the sunlight and the sapful earth

What god the simples of thy spirit drew?

A goddess rose from the green waves, and threw

Her arms about a king, to give thee birth;

A centaur, patron of thy boyish mirth,

Over the meadows in thy footsteps flew.

Now Thessaly forgets thee, and the deep

Thy keeled bark furrowed answers not thy prayer;

But far away new generations keep

Thy laurels fresh; where branching Isis hems

The lawns of Oxford round about, or where

Enchanted Eton sits by pleasant Thames.



                                    III



I gaze on thee as Phidias of old

Or Polyclitus gazed, when first he saw

These hard and shining limbs, without a flaw,

And cast his wonder in heroic mould.

Unhappy me who only may behold,

Nor make immutable and fix in awe

A fair immortal form no worm shall gnaw,

A tempered mind whose faith was never told!

The godlike mien, the lions lock and eye,

The well-knit sinew, utter a brave heart

Better than many words that part by part

Spell in strange symbols what serene and whole

In nature lives, nor can in marble die.

The perfect body itself the soul./CONTENT"	NAME/Before a Statue of Achilles/NAME	AGE/Modern/AGE	TYPE/Mythology & Folklore/TYPE
AUTHOR/LOUISE BOGAN/AUTHOR	CONTENT/Louise Bogan, Cassandra from The Blue Estuaries: Poems 1923-1968. Copyright  1968 by Louise Bogan. Used by permission of Farrar, Straus & Giroux, LLC, http://us.macmillan.com/fsg. All rights reserved./CONTENT	NAME/Cassandra/NAME	AGE/Modern/AGE	TYPE/Mythology & Folklore/TYPE
AUTHOR/KENNETH SLESSOR/AUTHOR	CONTENT/Kenneth Slessor, In A/C with Ghosts from Selected Poems, published by HarperCollins Publishers Australia. Used by permission./CONTENT	NAME/In A/C with Ghosts/NAME	AGE/Modern/AGE	TYPE/Mythology & Folklore/TYPE
AUTHOR/LOUISE BOGAN/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/I had come to the house, in a cave of trees,

Facing a sheer sky.

Everything moved,a bell hung ready to strike,

Sun and reflection wheeled by.



When the bare eyes were before me

And the hissing hair,

Held up at a window, seen through a door.

The stiff bald eyes, the serpents on the forehead

Formed in the air.



This is a dead scene forever now.

Nothing will ever stir.

The end will never brighten it more than this,

Nor the rain blur.



The water will always fall, and will not fall,

And the tipped bell make no sound.

The grass will always be growing for hay

Deep on the ground.



And I shall stand here like a shadow

Under the great balanced day,

My eyes on the yellow dust, that was lifting in the wind,

And does not drift away./CONTENT"	NAME/Medusa/NAME	AGE/Modern/AGE	TYPE/Mythology & Folklore/TYPE
AUTHOR/GEORGE SANTAYANA/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/There may be chaos still around the world,

This little world that in my thinking lies;

For mine own bosom is the paradise

Where all my lifes fair visions are unfurled.

Within my natures shell I slumber curled,

Unmindful of the changing outer skies,

Where now, perchance, some new-born Eros flies,

Or some old Cronos from his throne is hurled.

I heed them not; or if the subtle night

Haunt me with deities I never saw,

I soon mine eyelids drowsy curtain draw

To hide their myriad faces from my sight.

They threat in vain; the whirlwind cannot awe

A happy snow-flake dancing in the flaw./CONTENT"	NAME/There may be Chaos still around the World/NAME	AGE/Modern/AGE	TYPE/Mythology & Folklore/TYPE
AUTHOR/EZRA POUND/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/Canto III appeared in the July, 1917 issue of Poetry. Originally part of what scholars call the ""Ur-Cantos,"" this version of Canto III was later edited by Pound to become Canto I of his collected Cantos. The section that eventually became Canto I is highlighted in blue in the poem below.

THE EDITORS





III



Another's a half-cracked fellowJohn Heydon,

Worker of miracles, dealer in levitation,

In thoughts upon pure form, in alchemy,

Seer of pretty visions (""servant of God and secretary of nature"");

Full of plaintive charm, like Botticelli's,

With half-transparent forms, lacking the vigor of gods.

Thus Heydon, in a trance, at Bulverton,

Had such a sight:

Decked all in green, with sleeves of yellow silk

Slit to the elbow, slashed with various purples.

Her eyes were green as glass, her foot was leaf-like.

She was adorned with choicest emeralds,

And promised him the way of holy wisdom.

""Pretty green bank,"" began the half-lost poem.

Take the old way, say I met John Heydon,

Sought out the place,

Lay on the bank, was ""plunged deep in swevyn;""

And saw the companyLayamon, Chaucer

Pass each in his appropriate robes;

Conversed with each, observed the varying fashion.

And then comes Heydon.

                                 ""I have seen John Heydon.""

Let us hear John Heydon!

                                 ""Omniformis

Omnis intellectus est""thus he begins, by spouting half of Psellus.

(Then comes a note, my assiduous commentator:

Not Psellus De Daemonibus, but Porphyry's Chances,

In the thirteenth chapter, that ""every intellect is omni-form."")

Magnifico Lorenzo used the dodge,

Says that he met Ficino

In some Wordsworthian, false-pastoral manner,

And that they walked along, stopped at a well-head,

And heard deep platitudes about contentment

From some old codger with an endless beard.

""A daemon is not a particular intellect,

But is a substance differed from intellect,""

Breaks in Ficino,

""Placed in the latitude or locus of souls""

That's out of Proclus, take your pick of them.

Valla, more earth and sounder rhetoric

Prefacing praise to his Pope Nicholas:

""A man of parts, skilled in the subtlest sciences;

A patron of the arts, of poetry; and of a fine discernment.""

Then comes a catalogue, his jewels of conversation.

No, you've not read your Elegantiae

A dull book?shook the church.

The prefaces, cut clear and hard:

""Know then the Roman speech, a sacrament,""

Spread for the nations, eucharist of wisdom,

Bread of the liberal arts.

                                 Ha! Sir Blancatz,

Sordello would have your heart to give to all the princes;

Valla, the heart of Rome,

Sustaining speech, set out before the people.

""Nec bonus Christianus ac bonus

                                 Tullianus.""

Marius, Du Bellay, wept for the buildings,

Baldassar Castiglione saw Raphael

""Lead back the soul into its dead, waste dwelling,""

Corpore laniato; and Lorenzo Valla,

""Broken in middle life? bent to submission?

Took a fat living from the Papacy""

(That's in Villari, but Burckhardt's statement is different)

""More than the Roman city, the Roman speech""

(Holds fast its part among the ever-living).

""Not by the eagles only was Rome measured.""

""Wherever the Roman speech was, there was Rome,""

Wherever the speech crept, there was mastery

Spoke with the law's voice while your Greek, logicians...

More Greeks than one! Doughty's ""divine Homeros""

Came before sophistry. Justinopolitan

Uncatalogued Andreas Divus,

Gave him in Latin, 1538 in my edition, the rest uncertain,

Caught up his cadence, word and syllable:

""Down to the ships we went, set mast and sail,

Black keel and beasts for bloody sacrifice,

Weeping we went.""

I've strained my ear for -ensa, -ombra, and -ensa

And cracked my wit on delicate canzoni

                   Here's but rough meaning:



""And then went down to the ship, set keel to breakers,

Forth on the godly sea;

We set up mast and sail on the swarthy ship,

Sheep bore we aboard her, and our bodies also

Heavy with weeping. And winds from sternward

Bore us out onward with bellying canvas

Circe's this craft, the trim-coifed goddess.

Then sat we amidships, wind jamming the tiller.

Thus with stretched sail

                   We went over sea till day's end:

Sun to his slumber, shadows o'er all the ocean.

Came we then to the bounds of deepest water,

To the Kimmerian lands and peopled cities

Covered with close-webbed mist, unpierced ever

With glitter of sun-rays,

Nor with stars stretched, nor looking back from heaven,

Swartest night stretched over wretched men there.

Thither we in that ship, unladed sheep there,

The ocean flowing backward, came we through to the place

Aforesaid by Circe.

Here did they rites, Perimedes and Eurylochus,

And drawing sword from my hip

I dug the ell-square pitkin, poured we libations unto each the dead,

First mead and then sweet wine,

Water mixed with white flour.

Then prayed I many a prayer to the sickly death's-heads

As set in Ithaca, sterile bulls of the best,

For sacrifice, heaping the pyre with goods.

Sheep, to Tiresias only,

Black, and a bell sheep;

Dark blood flowed in the fosse.

Souls out of Erebus, cadaverous dead

Of brides, of youths, and of many passing old,

Virgins tender, souls stained with recent tears,

Many men mauled with bronze lance-heads,

Battle spoil, bearing yet dreary arms:

These many crowded about me,

With shouting, pallor upon me, cried to my men for more beasts;

Slaughtered the herdssheep slain of bronze,

Poured ointment, cried to the gods,

To Pluto the strong, and praised Proserpine.

Unsheathed the narrow steel,

I sat to keep off the impetuous, impotent dead

Till I should hear Tiresias.

But first Elpenor came, our friend Elpenor,

Unburied, cast on the wide earth

Limbs that we left in the house of Circe,

Unwept, unwrapped in sepulchre, since toils urged other,

Pitiful spiritand I cried in hurried speech:

'Elpenor, how art thou come to this dark coast?

Cam'st thou afoot, outstripping seamen?' And he in heavy speech:

'Ill fate and abundant wine! I slept in Circe's ingle,

Going down the long ladder unguarded, I fell against the buttress,

Shattered the nape-nerve, the soul sought Avernus.

But thou, O King, I bid remember me, unwept, unburied!

Heap up mine arms, be tomb by the sea-board, and inscribed,

A man of no fortune and with a name to come;

And set my oar up, that I swung 'mid fellows.'

Came then another ghost, whom I beat off, Anticlea,

And then Tiresias, Theban,

Holding his golden wand, knew me and spoke first:

'Man of ill hour, why come a second time,

Leaving the sunlight, facing the sunless dead and this joyless region?

Stand from the fosse, move back, leave me my bloody bever,

And I will speak you true speeches.'

                                                       ""And I stepped back,

Sheathing the yellow sword. Dark blood he drank then

And spoke: 'Lustrous Odysseus, shalt

Return through spiteful Neptune, over dark seas,

Lose all companions.' Foretold me the ways and the signs.

Came then Anticlea, to whom I answered:

'Fate drives me on through these deeps; I sought Tiresias.'

I told her news of Troy, and thrice her shadow

Faded in my embrace.

Then had I news of many faded women

Tyro, Alcmena, Chloris

Heard out their tales by that dark fosse, and sailed

By sirens and thence outward and away,

And unto Circe buried Elpenor's corpse.""



Lie quiet, Divus.

                                 In Officina Wechli, Paris,

M. D. three X's, Eight, with Aldus on the Frogs,

And a certain Cretan's

                                 Hymni Deorum:

(The thin clear Tuscan stuff

                      Gives way before the florid mellow phrase.)

Take we the Goddess, Venus:

                                                       Venerandam,

Aurean coronam habentem, pulchram,

Cypri munimenta sortita est, maritime,

Light on the foam, breathed on by zephyrs,

And air-tending hours. Mirthful, orichalci, with golden

Girdles and breast bands.

                                       Thou with dark eye-lids,

Bearing the golden bough of Argicida./CONTENT"	NAME/Three Cantos/NAME	AGE/Modern/AGE	TYPE/Mythology & Folklore/TYPE
AUTHOR/HART CRANE/AUTHOR	CONTENT/Hart Crane, At Melvilles Tomb from The Complete Poems of Hart Crane by Hart Crane, edited by Marc SImon. Copyright  1933, 1958, 1966 by Liveright Publishing Corporation. Copyright  1986 by Marc Simon. Used by permission of Liveright Publishing./CONTENT	NAME/At Melvilles Tomb/NAME	AGE/Modern/AGE	TYPE/Mythology & Folklore/TYPE
AUTHOR/D. H. LAWRENCE/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/My love looks like a girl to-night,

      But she is old.

The plaits that lie along her pillow

      Are not gold,

But threaded with filigree silver,

      And uncanny cold.



She looks like a young maiden, since her brow

      Is smooth and fair,

Her cheeks are very smooth, her eyes are closed.

      She sleeps a rare

Still winsome sleep, so still, and so composed.



Nay, but she sleeps like a bride, and dreams her dreams

      Of perfect things.

She lies at last, the darling, in the shape of her dream,

      And her dead mouth sings

By its shape, like the thrushes in clear evenings./CONTENT"	NAME/The Bride/NAME	AGE/Modern/AGE	TYPE/Mythology & Folklore/TYPE
AUTHOR/HART CRANE/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/I



The mind has shown itself at times

Too much the baked and labeled dough

Divided by accepted multitudes.

Across the stacked partitions of the day

Across the memoranda, baseball scores,

The stenographic smiles and stock quotations

Smutty wings flash out equivocations.



The mind is brushed by sparrow wings;

Numbers, rebuffed by asphalt, crowd

The margins of the day, accent the curbs,

Convoying divers dawns on every corner

To druggist, barber and tobacconist,

Until the graduate opacities of evening

Take them away as suddenly to somewhere

Virginal perhaps, less fragmentary, cool.



         There is the world dimensional for

       those untwisted by the love of things

       irreconcilable ...



And yet, suppose some evening I forgot

The fare and transfer, yet got by that way

Without recall,lost yet poised in traffic.

Then I might find your eyes across an aisle,

Still flickering with those prefigurations

Prodigal, yet uncontested now,

Half-riant before the jerky window frame.



There is some way, I think, to touch

Those hands of yours that count the nights

Stippled with pink and green advertisements.

And now, before its arteries turn dark

I would have you meet this bartered blood.

Imminent in his dream, none better knows

The white wafer cheek of love, or offers words

Lightly as moonlight on the eaves meets snow.



Reflective conversion of all things

At your deep blush, when ecstasies thread

The limbs and belly, when rainbows spread

Impinging on the throat and sides ...

Inevitable, the body of the world

Weeps in inventive dust for the hiatus

That winks above it, bluet in your breasts.



The earth may glide diaphanous to death;

But if I lift my arms it is to bend

To you who turned away once, Helen, knowing

The press of troubled hands, too alternate

With steel and soil to hold you endlessly.

I meet you, therefore, in that eventual flame

You found in final chains, no captive then

Beyond their million brittle, bloodshot eyes;

White, through white cities passed on to assume

That world which comes to each of us alone.

Accept a lone eye riveted to your plane,

Bent axle of devotion along companion ways

That beat, continuous, to hourless days

One inconspicuous, glowing orb of praise.





       II



Brazen hypnotics glitter here;

Glee shifts from foot to foot,

Magnetic to their tremulo.

This crashing opera bouffe,

Blest excursion! this ricochet

From roof to roof

Know, Olympians, we are breathless

While nigger cupids scour the stars!



A thousand light shrugs balance us

Through snarling hails of melody.

White shadows slip across the floor

Splayed like cards from a loose hand;

Rhythmic ellipses lead into canters

Until somewhere a rooster banters.



Greet naivelyyet intrepidly

New soothings, new amazements

That cornets introduce at every turn

And you may fall downstairs with me

With perfect grace and equanimity.

Or, plaintively scud past shores

Where, by strange harmonic laws

All relatives, serene and cool,

Sit rocked in patent armchairs.



O,I have known metallic paradises

Where cuckoos clucked to finches

Above the deft catastrophes of drums.

While titters hailed the groans of death

Beneath gyrating awnings I have seen

The incunabula of the divine grotesque.

This music has a reassuring way.



The siren of the springs of guilty song

Let us take her on the incandescent wax

Striated with nuances, nervosities

That we are heir to: she is still so young,

We cannot frown upon her as she smiles,

Dipping here in this cultivated storm

Among slim skaters of the gardened skies.





       III



Capped arbiter of beauty in this street

That narrows darkly into motor dawn,

You, here beside me, delicate ambassador

Of intricate slain numbers that arise

In whispers, naked of steel;

                                       religious gunman!

Who faithfully, yourself, will fall too soon,

And in other ways than as the wind settles

On the sixteen thrifty bridges of the city:

Let us unbind our throats of fear and pity.



                                             We even,

Who drove speediest destruction

In corymbulous formations of mechanics,

Who hurried the hill breezes, spouting malice

Plangent over meadows, and looked down

On rifts of torn and empty houses

Like old women with teeth unjubilant

That waited faintly, briefly and in vain:



We know, eternal gunman, our flesh remembers

The tensile boughs, the nimble blue plateaus,

The mounted, yielding cities of the air!



That saddled sky that shook down vertical

Repeated play of fireno hypogeum

Of wave or rock was good against one hour.

We did not ask for that, but have survived,

And will persist to speak again before

All stubble streets that have not curved

To memory, or known the ominous lifted arm

That lowers down the arc of Helens brow

To saturate with blessing and dismay.



A goose, tobacco and cologne

Three winged and gold-shod prophecies of heaven,

The lavish heart shall always have to leaven

And spread with bells and voices, and atone

The abating shadows of our conscript dust.



Anchises navel, dripping of the sea,

The hands Erasmus dipped in gleaming tides,

Gathered the voltage of blown blood and vine;

Delve upward for the new and scattered wine,

O brother-thief of time, that we recall.

Laugh out the meager penance of their days

Who dare not share with us the breath released,

The substance drilled and spent beyond repair

For golden, or the shadow of gold hair.



Distinctly praise the years, whose volatile

Blamed bleeding hands extend and thresh the height

The imagination spans beyond despair,

Outpacing bargain, vocable and prayer./CONTENT"	NAME/For The Marriage of Faustus and Helen/NAME	AGE/Modern/AGE	TYPE/Mythology & Folklore/TYPE
AUTHOR/HUGH MACDIARMID/AUTHOR	CONTENT/Hugh MacDiarmid, Gairmscoile from Selected Poetry. Copyright  1992 by Alan Riach and Michael Grieve. Reprinted with the permission of New Directions Publishing Corporation./CONTENT	NAME/Gairmscoile/NAME	AGE/Modern/AGE	TYPE/Mythology & Folklore/TYPE
AUTHOR/E. E. CUMMINGS/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/in Just-

spring          when the world is mud-

luscious the little

lame balloonman



whistles          far          and wee



and eddieandbill come

running from marbles and

piracies and it's

spring



when the world is puddle-wonderful



the queer

old balloonman whistles

far          and             wee

and bettyandisbel come dancing



from hop-scotch and jump-rope and



it's

spring

and



         the



                  goat-footed



balloonMan          whistles

far

and

wee/CONTENT"	NAME/[in Just-]/NAME	AGE/Modern/AGE	TYPE/Mythology & Folklore/TYPE
AUTHOR/LOUIS UNTERMEYER/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/We passed old farmer Boothby in the field.

Rugged and straight he stood; his body steeled

With stubbornness and age. We met his eyes

That never flinched or turned to compromise,

And Luck, he cried, good luck!and waved an arm,

Knotted and sailor-like, such as no farm

In all of Maine could boast of; and away

He turned again to pitch his new-cut hay...

We walked on leisurely until a bend

Showed him once more, now working toward the end

Of one great path; wearing his eighty years

Like banners lifted in a wind of cheers.



Then we turned off abruptlytook the road

Cutting the village, the one with the commanding

View of the river. And we strode

More briskly now to the long pier that showed

Where the frail boats were kept at Indian Landing.

In the canoe we stepped; our paddles dipped

Leisurely downwards, and the slim bark slipped

More on than in the water. Smoothly then

We shot its nose against the rippling current,

Feeling the rising rivers half-deterrent

Pull on the paddle as we turned the blade

To keep from swerving round; while we delayed

To watch the curious wave-eaten locks;

Or pass, with lazy turns, the picnic-rocks....

Blue eels flew under us, and fishes darted

A thousand ways; the once broad channel shrunk.

And over us the wise and noble-hearted

Twilight leaned down; the sunset mists were parted,

And we, with thoughts on tiptoe, slunk

Down the green, twisting alleys of the Kennebunk,



Motionless in the meadows

The trees, the rocks, the cows...

And quiet dripped from the shadows

Like rain from heavy boughs.



The tree-toads started ringing

Their ceaseless silver bells;

A land-locked breeze came swinging

Its censer of earthy smells.



The rivers tiny canon

Stretched into dusky lands;

Like a dark and silent companion

Evening held out her hands.



Hushed were the dawns bravados;

Loud noon was a silenced cry

And quiet slipped from the shadows

As stars slip out of the sky...



It must have been an hour more, or later,

When, tramping homeward through the piney wood,

We felt the years fly back; the brotherhood

Of forests took usand we saw the satyr!

There in a pool, up to his neck, he stood

And grinned to see us stare, incredulous

Too startled to remember fear or flight.

Feeling the menace in the crafty night,

We turned to runwhen lo, he called to us!

Using our very names he called. We drew

With creaking courage down the avenue

Of birches till we saw, with clearing sight,

(No longer through a tricky, pale-green light)

Familiar turns and shrubs, the friendly path,

And Farmer Boothby in his woodland bath!

The woods became his background; every tree

Seemed part of him, and stood erect, and shared

The beauty of that gnarled serenity;

The quiet vigor of age that smiled and squared

Its shoulders against Time ... And even night

Flowed in and out of him, as though content

With such a native element;

Happy to move about a spirit quite

As old, as placid and as confident...

Sideways we turned. Still glistening and unclad

He leaped up on the bank, light as a lad,

His body in the moonlight dripping stars...



We went on homeward, through the pasture-bars./CONTENT"	NAME/Magic/NAME	AGE/Modern/AGE	TYPE/Mythology & Folklore/TYPE
AUTHOR/WALLACE STEVENS/AUTHOR	CONTENT/Wallace Stevens, A Rabbit as the King of Ghosts from Collected Poems. Copyright 1954 by Wallace Stevens and copyright renewed 1982 by Holly Stevens. Used by permission of Alfred A. Knopf, an imprint of the Knopf Doubleday Publishing Group, a division of Penguin Random House LLC. All rights reserved./CONTENT	NAME/A Rabbit as King of the Ghosts/NAME	AGE/Modern/AGE	TYPE/Mythology & Folklore/TYPE
AUTHOR/MARJORIE PICKTHALL/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/Living, I had no might

To make you hear,

Now, in the inmost night,

I am so near

No whisper, falling light,

Divides us, dear.



Living, I had no claim

On your great hours.

Now the thin candle-flame,

The closing flowers,

Wed summer with my name,

And these are ours.



Your shadow on the dust,

Strength, and a cry,

Delight, despair, mistrust,

All these am I.

Dawn, and the far hills thrust

To a far sky.



Living, I had no skill

To stay your tread,

Now all that was my will

Silence has said.

We are one for good and ill

Since I am dead./CONTENT"	NAME/The Wife/NAME	AGE/Modern/AGE	TYPE/Mythology & Folklore/TYPE
AUTHOR/CARL SANDBURG/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/Momus is the name men give your face,

The brag of its tone, like a long low steamboat whistle

Finding a way mid mist on a shoreland,

Where gray rocks let the salt water shatter spray Against horizons purple, silent.



Yes, Momus,

Men have flung your face in bronze

To gaze in gargoyle downward on a street-whirl of folk.

They were artists did this, shaped your sad mouth,

Gave you a tall forehead slanted with calm, broad wisdom;

All your lips to the corners and your cheeks to the high bones

Thrown over and through with a smile that forever wishes and wishes, purple, silent, fled from all the iron things of life, evaded like a sought bandit, gone into dreams, by God.



I wonder, Momus,

Whether shadows of the dead sit somewhere and look with deep laughter

On men who play in terrible earnest the old, known, solemn repetitions of history.

A droning monotone soft as sea laughter hovers from your kindliness of bronze,

You give me the human ease of a mountain peak, purple, silent;

Granite shoulders heaving above the earth curves,

Careless eye-witness of the spawning tides of men and women

Swarming always in a drift of millions to the dust of toil, the salt of tears,

And blood drops of undiminishing war./CONTENT"	NAME/Momus/NAME	AGE/Modern/AGE	TYPE/Mythology & Folklore/TYPE
AUTHOR/RICHARD ALDINGTON/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/Potuia, potuia

White grave goddess,

Pity my sadness,

O silence of Paros.



I am not of these about thy feet,

These garments and decorum;

I am thy brother,

Thy lover of aforetime crying to thee,

And thou hearest me not.



I have whispered thee in thy solitudes

Of our loves in Phrygia,

The far ecstasy of burning noons

When the fragile pipes

Ceased in the cypress shade,

And the brown fingers of the shepherd

Moved over slim shoulders;

And only the cicada sang.



I have told thee of the hills

And the lisp of reeds

And the sun upon thy breasts,



And thou hearest me not,

Potuia, potuia

Thou hearest me not./CONTENT"	NAME/To a Greek Marble/NAME	AGE/Modern/AGE	TYPE/Mythology & Folklore/TYPE
AUTHOR/RICHARD ALDINGTON/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/The ancient songs

Pass deathward mournfully.



Cold lips that sing no more, and withered wreaths,

Regretful eyes, and drooping breasts and wings

Symbols of ancient songs

Mournfully passing

Down to the great white surges,

Watched of none         - -

Save the frail sea-birds

And the lithe pale girls,

Daughters of Okeanos.



And the songs pass

From the green land

Which lies upon the waves as a leaf

On the flowers of hyacinth;

And they pass from the waters,

The manifold winds and the dim moon,

And they come,

Silently winging through soft Kimmerian dusk,

To the quiet level lands

That she keeps for us all,

That she wrought for us all for sleep

In the silver days of the earth's dawning

Proserpine, daughter of Zeus.



And we turn from the Kuprian's breasts,

And we turn from thee,

Phoibos Apollon,

And we turn from the music of old

And the hills that we loved and the meads,

And we turn from the fiery day,

And the lips that were over-sweet;

For silently

Brushing the fields with red-shod feet,

With purple robe

Searing the flowers as with a sudden flame,

Death,

Thou hast come upon us.



And of all the ancient songs

Passing to the swallow-blue halls

By the dark streams of Persephone,

This only remains:

That in the end we turn to thee,

Death,

That we turn to thee, singing

One last song.



O Death,

Thou art an healing wind

That blowest over white flowers

A-tremble with dew;

Thou art a wind flowing

Over long leagues of lonely sea;

Thou art the dusk and the fragrance;

Thou art the lips of love mournfully smiling;

Thou art the pale peace of one

Satiate with old desires;

Thou art the silence of beauty,

And we look no more for the morning;

We yearn no more for the sun,

Since with thy white hands,

Death,

Thou crownest us with the pallid chaplets,

The slim colorless poppies

Which in thy garden alone

Softly thou gatherest.



And silently;

And with slow feet approaching;

And with bowed head and unlit eyes,

We kneel before thee:

And thou, leaning towards us, Caressingly layest upon us

Flowers from thy thin cold hands,

And, smiling as a chaste woman Knowing love in her heart,

Thou sealest our eyes

And the illimitable quietude

Comes gently upon us./CONTENT"	NAME//NAME	AGE/Modern/AGE	TYPE/Mythology & Folklore/TYPE
AUTHOR/GUILLAUME APOLLINAIRE/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/Knock knock He has closed his door

The gardens lilies have started to rot

So who is the corpse being carried from the house



You just knocked on his door



And trot trot



Trot goes little lady mouse



Translated from the French /CONTENT"	NAME/The Lady/NAME	AGE/Modern/AGE	TYPE/Nature/TYPE
AUTHOR/GUILLAUME APOLLINAIRE/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/I have built a house in the middle of the Ocean

Its windows are the rivers flowing from my eyes

Octopi are crawling all over where the walls are

Hear their triple hearts beat and their beaks peck against the windowpanes



House of dampness

House of burning

Seasons fastness

Season singing

The airplanes are laying eggs

Watch out for the dropping of the anchor



Watch out for the shooting black ichor

It would be good if you were to come from the sky

The skys honeysuckle is climbing

The earthly octopi are throbbing

And so very many of us have become our own gravediggers

Pale octopi of the chalky waves O octopi with pale beaks

Around the house is this ocean that you know well

  And is never still





Translated from the French /CONTENT"	NAME/Ocean of Earth/NAME	AGE/Modern/AGE	TYPE/Nature/TYPE
AUTHOR/WALLACE STEVENS/AUTHOR	CONTENT/Wallace Stevens, "Of Mere Being" from The Palm at the End of the Mind: Selected Poems and a Play. Copyright  1967, 1969, 1971 by Holly Stevens.  Used by permission of Alfred A. Knopf, an imprint of the Knopf Doubleday Publishing Group, a division of Random House LLC. All rights reserved./CONTENT	NAME/Of Mere Being/NAME	AGE/Modern/AGE	TYPE/Nature/TYPE
AUTHOR/WILLIAM BUTLER YEATS/AUTHOR	CONTENT/W. B. Yeats, A Dialogue of Self and Soul from The Poems of W. B. Yeats: A New Edition, edited by Richard J. Finneran. Copyright 1933 by Macmillan Publishing Company, renewed  1961 by Georgie Yeats. Reprinted with the permission of A. P. Watt, Ltd. on behalf of Michael Yeats./CONTENT	NAME/A Dialogue of Self and Soul/NAME	AGE/Modern/AGE	TYPE/Nature/TYPE
AUTHOR/WILLIAM BUTLER YEATS/AUTHOR	CONTENT/W. B. Yeats, Byzantium from The Poems of W. B. Yeats: A New Edition, edited by Richard J. Finneran. Copyright 1933 by Macmillan Publishing Company, renewed  1961 by Georgie Yeats. Reprinted with the permission of A. P. Watt, Ltd. on behalf of Michael Yeats./CONTENT	NAME/Byzantium/NAME	AGE/Modern/AGE	TYPE/Nature/TYPE
AUTHOR/WILLIAM BUTLER YEATS/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/O sweet everlasting Voices, be still;

Go to the guards of the heavenly fold

And bid them wander obeying your will,

Flame under flame, till Time be no more;

Have you not heard that our hearts are old,

That you call in birds, in wind on the hill,

In shaken boughs, in tide on the shore?

O sweet everlasting Voices, be still./CONTENT"	NAME/The Everlasting Voices/NAME	AGE/Modern/AGE	TYPE/Nature/TYPE
AUTHOR/WILLIAM BUTLER YEATS/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/Although you hide in the ebb and flow

Of the pale tide when the moon has set,

The people of coming days will know

About the casting out of my net,

And how you have leaped times out of mind

Over the little silver cords,

And think that you were hard and unkind,

And blame you with many bitter words./CONTENT"	NAME/The Fish/NAME	AGE/Modern/AGE	TYPE/Nature/TYPE
AUTHOR/WILLIAM BUTLER YEATS/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/She that but little patience knew,

From childhood on, had now so much

A grey gull lost its fear and flew

Down to her cell and there alit,

And there endured her fingers' touch

And from her fingers ate its bit.



Did she in touching that lone wing

Recall the years before her mind

Became a bitter, an abstract thing,

Her thought some popular enmity:

Blind and leader of the blind

Drinking the foul ditch where they lie?



When long ago I saw her ride

Under Ben Bulben to the meet,

The beauty of her country-side

With all youth's lonely wildness stirred,

She seemed to have grown clean and sweet

Like any rock-bred, sea-borne bird:



Sea-borne, or balanced in the air

When first it sprang out of the nest

Upon some lofty rock to stare

Upon the cloudy canopy,

While under its storm-beaten breast

Cried out the hollows of the sea./CONTENT"	NAME/On a Political Prisoner/NAME	AGE/Modern/AGE	TYPE/Nature/TYPE
AUTHOR/WILLIAM BUTLER YEATS/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/There was a man whom Sorrow named his friend,

And he, of his high comrade Sorrow dreaming,

Went walking with slow steps along the gleaming

And humming sands, where windy surges wend:

And he called loudly to the stars to bend

From their pale thrones and comfort him, but they

Among themselves laugh on and sing alway:

And then the man whom Sorrow named his friend

Cried out, Dim sea, hear my most piteous story!

The sea swept on and cried her old cry still,

Rolling along in dreams from hill to hill.

He fled the persecution of her glory

And, in a far-off, gentle valley stopping,

Cried all his story to the dewdrops glistening.

But naught they heard, for they are always listening,

The dewdrops, for the sound of their own dropping.

And then the man whom Sorrow named his friend

Sought once again the shore, and found a shell,

And thought, I will my heavy story tell

Till my own words, re-echoing, shall send

Their sadness through a hollow, pearly heart;

And my own tale again for me shall sing,

And my own whispering words be comforting,

And lo! my ancient burden may depart.

Then he sang softly nigh the pearly rim;

But the sad dweller by the sea-ways lone

Changed all he sang to inarticulate moan

Among her wildering whirls, forgetting him./CONTENT"	NAME/The Sad Shepherd/NAME	AGE/Modern/AGE	TYPE/Nature/TYPE
AUTHOR/WILLIAM BUTLER YEATS/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/The woods of Arcady are dead,

And over is their antique joy;

Of old the world on dreaming fed;

Grey Truth is now her painted toy;

Yet still she turns her restless head:

But O, sick children of the world,

Of all the many changing things

In dreary dancing past us whirled,

To the cracked tune that Chronos sings,

Words alone are certain good.

Where are now the warring kings,

Word be-mockers?  By the Rood

Where are now the warring kings?

An idle word is now their glory,

By the stammering schoolboy said,

Reading some entangled story:

The kings of the old time are dead;

The wandering earth herself may be

Only a sudden flaming word,

In clanging space a moment heard,

Troubling the endless reverie.



Then nowise worship dusty deeds,

Nor seek, for this is also sooth,

To hunger fiercely after truth,

Lest all thy toiling only breeds

New dreams, new dreams; there is no truth

Saving in thine own heart. Seek, then,

No learning from the starry men,

Who follow with the optic glass

The whirling ways of stars that pass

Seek, then, for this is also sooth,

No word of theirs  the cold star-bane

Has cloven and rent their hearts in twain,

And dead is all their human truth.

Go gather by the humming sea

Some twisted, echo-harbouring shell,

And to its lips thy story tell,

And they thy comforters will be,

Rewarding in melodious guile

Thy fretful words a little while,

Till they shall singing fade in ruth

And die a pearly brotherhood;

For words alone are certain good:

Sing, then, for this is also sooth.



I must be gone: there is a grave

Where daffodil and lily wave,

And I would please the hapless faun,

Buried under the sleepy ground,

With mirthful songs before the dawn.

His shouting days with mirth were crowned;

And still I dream he treads the lawn,

Walking ghostly in the dew,

Pierced by my glad singing through,

My songs of old earth's dreamy youth:

But ah! she dreams not now; dream thou!

For fair are poppies on the brow:

Dream, dream, for this is also sooth./CONTENT"	NAME/The Song of the Happy Shepherd/NAME	AGE/Modern/AGE	TYPE/Nature/TYPE
AUTHOR/WALLACE STEVENS/AUTHOR	CONTENT/Wallace Stevens, "The Poem that Took the Place of a Mountain" from The Collected Poems. Copyright  1954 by Wallace Stevens.  Reprinted by permission of Random House, Inc./CONTENT	NAME/The Poem that Took the Place of a Mountain/NAME	AGE/Modern/AGE	TYPE/Nature/TYPE
AUTHOR/IVOR GURNEY/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/Only the wanderer

   Knows England's graces,

Or can anew see clear

   Familiar faces.



And who loves joy as he

   That dwells in shadows?

Do not forget me quite,

   O Severn meadows./CONTENT"	NAME/Song [Only the wanderer]/NAME	AGE/Modern/AGE	TYPE/Nature/TYPE
AUTHOR/IVOR GURNEY/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/He's gone, and all our plans

   Are useless indeed.

We'll walk no more on Cotswold

   Where the sheep feed

   Quietly and take no heed.



His body that was so quick

   Is not as you

Knew it, on Severn river

   Under the blue

   Driving our small boat through.



You would not know him now ...

   But still he died

Nobly, so cover him over

   With violets of pride

   Purple from Severn side.



Cover him, cover him soon!

   And with thick-set

Masses of memoried flowers

   Hide that red wet

   Thing I must somehow forget./CONTENT"	NAME/To His Love/NAME	AGE/Modern/AGE	TYPE/Nature/TYPE
AUTHOR/SAMUEL GREENBERG/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/By a peninsula the painter sat and

Sketched the uneven valley groves.

The apostle gave alms to the

Meek. The volcano burst

In fusive sulphur and hurled

Rocks and ore into the air

Heavens sudden change at

The drawing tempestuous,

Darkening shade of dense clouded hues.

The wanderer soon chose

His spot of rest; they bore the

Chosen hero upon their shoulders,

Whom they strangely admired, as

The beach-tide summer of people desired./CONTENT"	NAME/Conduct/NAME	AGE/Modern/AGE	TYPE/Nature/TYPE
AUTHOR/SAMUEL GREENBERG/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/Is this the river East I heard?

Where the ferries, tugs and sailboats stirred

And the reaching wharves from the inner land

Ourstretched, like the harmless receiving hand



And the silvery tinge that sparkles aloud

Like the brilliant white demons, which a tide has towed

From the rays of the morning sun

Which it doth ceaselessly shine upon.



But look at the depth of the drippling tide

The dripples, reripples like the locusts astride;

As the boat turns upon the silvery spread

It leavesstrangea shadow dead.



And the very charms from the reflective river

And from the stacks of the floating boat

There seemeth the quality neer to dissever

Like the ruffles from the mystified smoke./CONTENT"	NAME/East Rivers Charm/NAME	AGE/Modern/AGE	TYPE/Nature/TYPE
AUTHOR/SAMUEL GREENBERG/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/The motion of gathering loops of water

Must either burst or remain in a moment.

The violet colors through the glass

Throw up little swellings that appear

And spatter as soon as another strikes

And is born; so pure are they of colored

Hues, that we feel the absent strength

Of its power. When they begin they gather

Like sand on the beach: each bubble

Contains a complete eye of water./CONTENT"	NAME/The Glass Bubbles/NAME	AGE/Modern/AGE	TYPE/Nature/TYPE
AUTHOR/WILLIAM BUTLER YEATS/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/I went out to the hazel wood,

Because a fire was in my head,

And cut and peeled a hazel wand,

And hooked a berry to a thread;

And when white moths were on the wing,

And moth-like stars were flickering out,

I dropped the berry in a stream

And caught a little silver trout.



When I had laid it on the floor

I went to blow the fire a-flame,

But something rustled on the floor,

And someone called me by my name:

It had become a glimmering girl

With apple blossom in her hair

Who called me by my name and ran

And faded through the brightening air.



Though I am old with wandering

Through hollow lands and hilly lands,

I will find out where she has gone,

And kiss her lips and take her hands;

And walk among long dappled grass,

And pluck till time and times are done,

The silver apples of the moon,

The golden apples of the sun./CONTENT"	NAME/The Song of Wandering Aengus/NAME	AGE/Modern/AGE	TYPE/Nature/TYPE
AUTHOR/STEPHEN SPENDER/AUTHOR	CONTENT/Stephen Spender, The Truly Great from Collected Poems 1928-1953. Copyright  1955 by Stephen Spender. Reprinted by permission of Ed Victor Ltd./CONTENT	NAME/The Truly Great/NAME	AGE/Modern/AGE	TYPE/Nature/TYPE
AUTHOR/EZRA POUND/AUTHOR	CONTENT/Ezra Pound, "Canto IV" from The Cantos of Ezra Pound. Copyright  1993 by Ezra Pound. Reprinted by permission of New Directions Publishing Corporation./CONTENT	NAME/Canto IV/NAME	AGE/Modern/AGE	TYPE/Nature/TYPE
AUTHOR/WALLACE STEVENS/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/Barque of phosphor

On the palmy beach,



Move outward into heaven,

Into the alabasters

And night blues.



Foam and cloud are one.

Sultry moon-monsters

Are dissolving.



Fill your black hull

With white moonlight.



There will never be an end

To this droning of the surf./CONTENT"	NAME/Fabliau of Florida/NAME	AGE/Modern/AGE	TYPE/Nature/TYPE
AUTHOR/WALLACE STEVENS/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/The trade-wind jingles the rings in the nets around the racks by the docks on Indian River.

It is the same jingle of the water among roots under the banks of the palmettoes,

It is the same jingle of the red-bird breasting the orange-treesout of the cedars.

Yet there is no spring in Florida, neither in boskage perdu, nor on the nunnery beaches./CONTENT"	NAME/Indian River/NAME	AGE/Modern/AGE	TYPE/Nature/TYPE
AUTHOR/WALLACE STEVENS/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/Her terrace was the sand

And the palms and the twilight.



She made of the motions of her wrist

The grandiose gestures

Of her thought.



The rumpling of the plumes

Of this creature of the evening

Came to be sleights of sails

Over the sea.



And thus she roamed

In the roamings of her fan,



Partaking of the sea,

And of the evening,

As they flowed around

And uttered their subsiding sound./CONTENT"	NAME/Infanta Marina/NAME	AGE/Modern/AGE	TYPE/Nature/TYPE
AUTHOR/WALLACE STEVENS/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/As the immense dew of Florida

Brings forth

The big-finned palm

And green vine angering for life,



As the immense dew of Florida

Brings forth hymn and hymn

From the beholder,

Beholding all these green sides

And gold sides of green sides,



And blessed mornings,

Meet for the eye of the young alligator,

And lightning colors

So, in me, come flinging

Forms, flames, and the flakes of flames./CONTENT"	NAME/Nomad Exquisite/NAME	AGE/Modern/AGE	TYPE/Nature/TYPE
AUTHOR/EDITH SITWELL/AUTHOR	CONTENT/from Coterie, 1919/CONTENT	NAME/At the Fair/NAME	AGE/Modern/AGE	TYPE/Nature/TYPE
AUTHOR/EDITH SITWELL/AUTHOR	CONTENT/from Coterie, 1919/CONTENT	NAME/What the Goose-Girl Said About the Dean/NAME	AGE/Modern/AGE	TYPE/Nature/TYPE
AUTHOR/PAUL LAURENCE DUNBAR/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/The moon has left the sky, love,

The stars are hiding now,

And frowning on the world, love,

Night bares her sable brow.



The snow is on the ground, love,

And cold and keen the air is.

Im singing here to you, love;

Youre dreaming there in Paris.



But this is Natures law, love,

Though just it may not seem,

That men should wake to sing, love;

While maidens sleep and dream.



Them care may not molest, love,

Nor stir them from their slumbers,

Though midnight find the swain, love.

Still halting oer his numbers.



I watch the rosy dawn, love,

Come stealing up the east,

While all things round rejoice, love,

That Night her reign has ceased.



The lark will soon be heard, love,

And on his way be winging;

When Natures poets, wake, love,

Why should a man be singing?/CONTENT"	NAME/Night of Love/NAME	AGE/Modern/AGE	TYPE/Nature/TYPE
AUTHOR/CARL SANDBURG/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/The buffaloes are gone.

And those who saw the buffaloes are gone.

Those who saw the buffaloes by thousands and how they pawed the prairie sod into dust with their hoofs, their great heads down pawing on in a great pageant of dusk,

Those who saw the buffaloes are gone.

And the buffaloes are gone./CONTENT"	NAME/Buffalo Dusk/NAME	AGE/Modern/AGE	TYPE/Nature/TYPE
AUTHOR/CARL SANDBURG/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/There is a wolf in me . . . fangs pointed for tearing gashes . . . a red tongue for raw meat . . . and the hot lapping of bloodI keep this wolf because the wilderness gave it to me and the wilderness will not let it go.



There is a fox in me . . . a silver-gray fox . . . I sniff and guess . . . I pick things out of the wind and air . . . I nose in the dark night and take sleepers and eat them and hide the feathers . . . I circle and loop and double-cross.



There is a hog in me . . . a snout and a belly . . . a machinery for eating and grunting . . . a machinery for sleeping satisfied in the sunI got this too from the wilderness and the wilderness will not let it go.



There is a fish in me . . . I know I came from salt-blue water-gates . . . I scurried with shoals of herring . . . I blew waterspouts with porpoises . . . before land was . . . before the water went down . . . before Noah . . . before the first chapter of Genesis.



There is a baboon in me . . . clambering-clawed . . . dog-faced . . . yawping a galoots hunger . . . hairy under the armpits . . . here are the hawk-eyed hankering men . . . here are the blonde and blue-eyed women . . . here they hide curled asleep waiting . . . ready to snarl and kill . . . ready to sing and give milk . . . waitingI keep the baboon because the wilderness says so.



There is an eagle in me and a mockingbird . . . and the eagle flies among the Rocky Mountains of my dreams and fights among the Sierra crags of what I want . . . and the mockingbird warbles in the early forenoon before the dew is gone, warbles in the underbrush of my Chattanoogas of hope, gushes over the blue Ozark foothills of my wishesAnd I got the eagle and the mockingbird from the wilderness.



O, I got a zoo, I got a menagerie, inside my ribs, under my bony head, under my red-valve heartand I got something else: it is a man-child heart, a woman-child heart: it is a father and mother and lover: it came from God-Knows-Where: it is going to God-Knows-WhereFor I am the keeper of the zoo: I say yes and no: I sing and kill and work: I am a pal of the world: I came from the wilderness./CONTENT"	NAME/Wilderness/NAME	AGE/Modern/AGE	TYPE/Nature/TYPE
AUTHOR/CARL SANDBURG/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/The sea-wash never ends.

The sea-wash repeats, repeats.

Only old songs? Is that all the sea knows?

             Only the old strong songs?

             Is that all?

The sea-wash repeats, repeats./CONTENT"	NAME/Sea-Wash/NAME	AGE/Modern/AGE	TYPE/Nature/TYPE
AUTHOR/SARA TEASDALE/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/I went out at night alone;

 The young blood flowing beyond the sea

Seemed to have drenched my spirits wings

 I bore my sorrow heavily.



But when I lifted up my head

 From shadows shaken on the snow,

I saw Orion in the east

 Burn steadily as long ago.



From windows in my fathers house,

 Dreaming my dreams on winter nights,

I watched Orion as a girl

 Above another citys lights.



Years go, dreams go, and youth goes too,

 The worlds heart breaks beneath its wars,

All things are changed, save in the east

 The faithful beauty of the stars./CONTENT"	NAME/Winter Stars/NAME	AGE/Modern/AGE	TYPE/Nature/TYPE
AUTHOR/MINA LOY/AUTHOR	CONTENT/Mina Loy, The Song of the Nightingale is Like the Scent of Syringa from Lunar Baedeker and Times-Tables (Highlands, NC: Jonathan Williams Publisher, 1958). Copyright 1958 by Mina Loy. Reprinted with the permission of Roger L. Conover for the Estate of Mina Loy./CONTENT	NAME/The Song of the Nightingale is Like the Scent of Syringa/NAME	AGE/Modern/AGE	TYPE/Nature/TYPE
AUTHOR/MARIANNE MOORE/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/Openly, yes,

         With the naturalness

         Of the hippopotamus or the alligator

When it climbs out on the bank to experience the



Sun, I do these

Things which I do, which please

         No one but myself.  Now I breathe and now I am sub-

         Merged; the blemishes stand up and shout when the object



In view was a

Renaissance; shall I say

         The contrary?  The sediment of the river which

         Encrusts my joints, makes me very gray but I am used



To it, it may

Remain there; do away

         With it and I am myself done away with, for the

         Patina of circumstance can but enrich what was



There to begin

With.  This elephant skin

         Which I inhabit, fibered over like the shell of

         The coco-nut, this piece of black glass through which no light



Can filtercut

Into checkers by rut

         Upon rut of unpreventable experience

         It is a manual for the peanut-tongued and the



Hairy toed.  Black

But beautiful, my back

         Is full of the history of power.  Of power?  What

         Is powerful and what is not?  My soul shall never



Be cut into

By a wooden spear; through-

         Out childhood to the present time, the unity of

         Life and death has been expressed by the circumference



Described by my

Trunk; nevertheless, I

         Perceive feats of strength to be inexplicable after

         All; and I am on my guard; external poise, it



Has its centre

Well nurturedwe know

         Wherein pride, but spiritual poise, it has its centre where ?

         My ears are sensitized to more than the sound of



The wind.  I see

And I hear, unlike the

         Wandlike body of which one hears so much, which was made

         To see and not to see; to hear and not to hear,



That tree trunk without

Roots, accustomed to shout

         Its own thoughts to itself like a shell, maintained intact

         By who knows what strange pressure of the  atmosphere; that



Spiritual

Brother to the coral

         Plant, absorbed into which, the equable sapphire light

         Becomes a nebulous green.  The I of each is to



The I of each,

A kind of fretful speech

         Which sets a limit on itself; the elephant is?

         Black earth preceded by a tendril?  It is to that



Phenomenon

The above formation,

         Translucent like the atmospherea cortex merely

         That on which darts cannot strike decisively the first



Time, a substance

Needful as an instance

         Of the indestructibility of matter; it

         Has looked at the electricity and at the earth-



Quake and is still

Here; the name means thick.  Will

         Depth be depth, thick skin be thick, to one who can see no

         Beautiful element of unreason under it?/CONTENT"	NAME/Black Earth/NAME	AGE/Modern/AGE	TYPE/Nature/TYPE
AUTHOR/MARIANNE MOORE/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/Man, looking into the sea

taking the view from those who have as much right to it as you have it to yourself

it is human nature to stand in the middle of a thing

but you cannot stand in the middle of this:

the sea has nothing to give but a well excavated grave.

The firs stand in a processioneach with an emerald turkey-foot at the top

reserved as their contours, saying nothing;

repression, however, is not the most obvious characteristic of the sea;

the sea is a collector, quick to return a rapacious look.

There are others besides you who have worn that look

whose expression is no longer a protest; the fish no longer investigate them

for their bones have not lasted;

men lower nets, unconscious of the fact that they are desecrating a grave,

and row quickly awaythe blades of the oars

moving together like the feet of water-spiders as if there were no such thing as death.

The wrinkles progress upon themselves in a phalanxbeautiful under networks of foam,

and fade breathlessly while the sea rustles in and out of the seaweed;

the birds swim through the air at top speed, emitting cat-calls as heretofore

the tortoise-shell scourges about the feet of the cliffs, in motion beneath them

and the ocean, under the pulsation of light-houses and noise of bell-buoys,

advances as usual, looking as if it were not that ocean in which dropped things are bound to sink

in which if they turn and twist, it is neither with volition nor consciousness./CONTENT"	NAME/A Graveyard/NAME	AGE/Modern/AGE	TYPE/Nature/TYPE
AUTHOR/ELINOR WYLIE/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/My bands of silk and miniver

Momently grew heavier;

The black gauze was beggarly thin;

The ermine muffled mouth and chin;

I could not suck the moonlight in.



Harlequin in lozenges

Of love and hate, I walked in these

Striped and ragged rigmaroles;

Along the pavement my footsoles

Trod warily on living coals.



Shouldering the thoughts I loathed,

In their corrupt disguises clothed,

Morality I could not tear

From my ribs, to leave them bare

Ivory in silver air.



There I walked, and there I raged;

The spiritual savage caged

Within my skeleton, raged afresh

To feel, behind a carnal mesh,

The clean bones crying in the flesh./CONTENT"	NAME/Full Moon/NAME	AGE/Modern/AGE	TYPE/Nature/TYPE
AUTHOR/ELINOR WYLIE/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/                                  1



When the world turns completely upside down

You say well emigrate to the Eastern Shore

Aboard a river-boat from Baltimore;

Well live among wild peach trees, miles from town,

Youll wear a coonskin cap, and I a gown

Homespun, dyed butternuts dark gold color.

Lost, like your lotus-eating ancestor,

Well swim in milk and honey till we drown.



The winter will be short, the summer long,

The autumn amber-hued, sunny and hot,

Tasting of cider and of scuppernong;

All seasons sweet, but autumn best of all.

The squirrels in their silver fur will fall

Like falling leaves, like fruit, before your shot.





                                  2



The autumn frosts will lie upon the grass

Like bloom on grapes of purple-brown and gold.

The misted early mornings will be cold;

The little puddles will be roofed with glass.

The sun, which burns from copper into brass,

Melts these at noon, and makes the boys unfold

Their knitted mufflers; full as they can hold

Fat pockets dribble chestnuts as they pass.



Peaches grow wild, and pigs can live in clover;

A barrel of salted herrings lasts a year;

The spring begins before the winters over.

By February you may find the skins

Of garter snakes and water moccasins

Dwindled and harsh, dead-white and cloudy-clear.





                                  3



When April pours the colors of a shell

Upon the hills, when every little creek

Is shot with silver from the Chesapeake

In shoals new-minted by the ocean swell,

When strawberries go begging, and the sleek

Blue plums lie open to the blackbirds beak,

We shall live well  we shall live very well.



The months between the cherries and the peaches

Are brimming cornucopias which spill

Fruits red and purple, sombre-bloomed and black;

Then, down rich fields and frosty river beaches

Well trample bright persimmons, while you kill

Bronze partridge, speckled quail, and canvasback.





                                  4



Down to the Puritan marrow of my bones

Theres something in this richness that I hate.

I love the look, austere, immaculate,

Of landscapes drawn in pearly monotones.

Theres something in my very blood that owns

Bare hills, cold silver on a sky of slate,

A thread of water, churned to milky spate

Streaming through slanted pastures fenced with stones.



I love those skies, thin blue or snowy gray,

Those fields sparse-planted, rendering meagre sheaves;

That spring, briefer than apple-blossoms breath,

Summer, so much too beautiful to stay,

Swift autumn, like a bonfire of leaves,

And sleepy winter, like the sleep of death./CONTENT"	NAME/Wild Peaches/NAME	AGE/Modern/AGE	TYPE/Nature/TYPE
AUTHOR/ASIL BUNTING/AUTHOR	CONTENT/Basil Bunting, 13. Fearful Symmetry from Complete Poems, edited by Richard Caddel. Reprinted with the permission of Bloodaxe Books Ltd., www.bloodaxebooks.com./CONTENT	NAME/from Fearful Symmetry/NAME	AGE/Modern/AGE	TYPE/Nature/TYPE
AUTHOR/WALLACE STEVENS/AUTHOR	CONTENT/Wallace Stevens, "The Snow Man" from The Collected Poems of Wallace Stevens. Copyright  1954 by Wallace Stevens and renewed 1982 by Holly Stevens. Used by permission of Alfred A. Knopf, an imprint of the Knopf Doubleday Publishing Group, a division of Random House LLC. All rights reserved. /CONTENT	NAME/The Snow Man/NAME	AGE/Modern/AGE	TYPE/Nature/TYPE
AUTHOR/WALLACE STEVENS/AUTHOR	CONTENT/"Not Ideas About the Thing but the Thing Itself", from The Collected Poems of Wallace Stevens, copyright 1954 by Wallace Stevens and renewed 1982 by Holly Stevens. Used by permission of Alfred A. Knopf, a division of Random House, Inc./CONTENT	NAME/Not Ideas About the Thing but the Thing Itself/NAME	AGE/Modern/AGE	TYPE/Nature/TYPE
AUTHOR/MICHAEL ANANIA/AUTHOR	CONTENT/Michael Anania, Afternoons from Selected Poems. Copyright  1994 by Michael Anania. Used by permission of Asphodel Press/Acorn Alliance./CONTENT	NAME/Afternoons/NAME	AGE/Modern/AGE	TYPE/Nature/TYPE
AUTHOR/HART CRANE/AUTHOR	CONTENT/Hart Crane, "The Air Plant" from The Complete Poems of Hart Crane, edited by Marc Simon. Copyright  1933, 1958, 1966 by Liveright Publishing Corporation. Copyright  1986 by Marc Simon. Used by permission of Publishing Corporation./CONTENT	NAME/The Air Plant/NAME	AGE/Modern/AGE	TYPE/Nature/TYPE
AUTHOR/ARCHIBALD MACLEISH/AUTHOR	CONTENT/Archibald MacLeish, Ancestral from Collected Poems 1917-1982. Copyright  1985 by The Estate of Archibald MacLeish. Reprinted with the permission of Houghton Mifflin Company. All rights reserved./CONTENT	NAME/Ancestral/NAME	AGE/Modern/AGE	TYPE/Nature/TYPE
AUTHOR/HART CRANE/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/Perspective never withers from their eyes;

They keep that docile edict of the Spring

That blends March with August Antarctic skies:

These are but cows that see no other thing

Than grass and snow, and their own inner being

Through the rich halo that they do not trouble

Even to cast upon the seasons fleeting

Though they should thin and die on last years stubble.



And they are awkward, ponderous and uncoy . . .

While we who press the cider mill, regarding them

We, who with pledges taste the bright annoy

Of friendships acid wine, retarding phlegm,

Shifting reprisals (til who shall tell us when

The jest is too sharp to be kindly?) boast

Much of our store of faith in other men

Who would, ourselves, stalk down the merriest ghost.



Above them old Mizzentop, palatial white

Hostelryfloor by floor to cinquefoil dormer

Portholes the ceilings stack their stoic height.

Long tiers of windows staring out toward former

Facesloose panes crown the hill and gleam

At sunset with a silent, cobwebbed patience . . .



See them, like eyes that still uphold some dream

Through mapled vistas, cancelled reservations!



High from the central cupola, they say

Ones glance could cross the borders of three states;

But I have seen deaths stare in slow survey

From four horizons that no one relates . . .

Weekenders avid of their turf-won scores,

Here three hours from the semaphores, the Czars

Of golf, by twos and threes in plaid plusfours

Alight with sticks abristle and cigars.



This was the Promised Land, and still it is

To the persuasive suburban land agent

In bootleg roadhouses where the gin fizz

Bubbles in time to Hollywoods new love-nest pageant.

Fresh from the radio in the old Meeting House

(Now the New Avalon Hotel) volcanoes roar

A welcome to highsteppers that no mouse

Who saw the Friends there ever heard before.



What cunning neighbors history has in fine!

The woodlouse mortgages the ancient deal

Table that Powitzky buys for only nine-

Ty-five at Adams auction,eats the seal,

The spinster polish of antiquity . . .

Who holds the lease on time and on disgrace?

What eats the pattern with ubiquity?

Where are my kinsmen and the patriarch race?



The resigned factions of the dead preside.

Dead rangers bled their comfort on the snow;

But I must ask slain Iroquois to guide

Me farther than scalped Yankees knew to go:

Shoulder the curse of sundered parentage,

Wait for the postman driving from Birch Hill

With birthright by blackmail, the arrant page

That unfolds a new destiny to fill . . . .



So, must we from the hawks far stemming view,

Must we descend as worms eye to construe

Our love of all we touch, and take it to the Gate

As humbly as a guest who knows himself too late,

His news already told? Yes, while the heart is wrung,

Ariseyes, take this sheaf of dust upon your tongue!

In one last angelus lift throbbing throat

Listen, transmuting silence with that stilly note



Of pain that Emily, that Isadora knew!

While high from dim elm-chancels hung with dew,

That triple-noted clause of moonlight

Yes, whip-poor-will, unhusks the heart of fright,

Breaks us and saves, yes, breaks the heart, yet yields

That patience that is armour and that shields

Love from despairwhen love forsees the end

Leaf after autumnal leaf

                                    break off,

                                                   descend

                                                               descend/CONTENT"	NAME/from The Bridge: Quaker Hill/NAME	AGE/Modern/AGE	TYPE/Nature/TYPE
AUTHOR/HART CRANE/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/I wanted you, nameless Woman of the South,

No wraith, but utterlyas still more alone

The Southern Cross takes night

And lifts her girdles from her, one by one

High, cool,

wide from the slowly smoldering fire

Of lower heavens,

vaporous scars!



Eve! Magdalene!

or Mary, you?



Whatever callfalls vainly on the wave.

O simian Venus, homeless Eve,

Unwedded, stumbling gardenless to grieve

Windswept guitars on lonely decks forever;

Finally to answer all within one grave!



And this long wake of phosphor,

iridescent

Furrow of all our traveltrailed derision!

Eyes crumble at its kiss. Its long-drawn spell

Incites a yell. Slid on that backward vision

The mind is churned to spittle, whispering hell.



I wanted you . . . The embers of the Cross

Climbed by aslant and huddling aromatically.

It is blood to remember; it is fire

To stammer back . . . It is

Godyour namelessness. And the wash



All night the water combed you with black

Insolence. You crept out simmering, accomplished.

Water rattled that stinging coil, your

Rehearsed hairdocile, alas, from many arms.

Yes, Evewraith of my unloved seed!



The Cross, a phantom, buckleddropped below the dawn.

Light drowned the lithic trillions of your spawn./CONTENT"	NAME/from The Bridge: Southern Cross/NAME	AGE/Modern/AGE	TYPE/Nature/TYPE
AUTHOR/ASIL BUNTING/AUTHOR	CONTENT/Basil Bunting, Briggflatts (Part 1) from Complete Poems, edited by Richard Caddel. Reprinted with the permission of Bloodaxe Books Ltd., www.bloodaxebooks.com./CONTENT	NAME/from Briggflatts: An Autobiography/NAME	AGE/Modern/AGE	TYPE/Nature/TYPE
AUTHOR/GEORGE SANTAYANA/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/The low sandy beach and the thin scrub pine,

The wide reach of bay and the long sky line,

O, I am sick for home!



The salt, salt smell of the thick sea air,

And the smooth round stones that the ebbtides wear,

When will the good ship come?



The wretched stumps all charred and burned,

And the deep soft rut where the cartwheel turned,

Why is the world so old?



The lapping wave, and the broad gray sky

Where the cawing crows and the slow gulls fly,

Where are the dead untold?



The thin, slant willows by the flooded bog,

The huge stranded hulk and the floating log,

Sorrow with life began!



And among the dark pines, and along the flat shore,

O the wind, and the wind, for evermore!

What will become of man?/CONTENT"	NAME/Cape Cod/NAME	AGE/Modern/AGE	TYPE/Nature/TYPE
AUTHOR/GUILLAUME APOLLINAIRE/AUTHOR	CONTENT/Guillaume Apollinaire. Clotilde from Alcools, English translation copyright 1995 Donald Revell and reprinted by permission of Wesleyan University Press./CONTENT	NAME/Clotilde/NAME	AGE/Modern/AGE	TYPE/Nature/TYPE
AUTHOR/ELINOR WYLIE/AUTHOR	CONTENT/Elinor Wylie, Epitaph from Selected Works of Elinor Wylie, edited by Evelyn Helmick Hively. Used with the permission of The Kent State University Press, http://upress.kent.edu/books/Hively2.htm./CONTENT	NAME/Epitaph/NAME	AGE/Modern/AGE	TYPE/Nature/TYPE
AUTHOR/CONRAD AIKEN/AUTHOR	CONTENT/Conrad Aiken, Exile from Collected Poems. Copyright 1953 by Conrad Aiken. Used by permission of Brandt & Hochman Literary Agents, Inc. Any electronic copying or distribution of this text is expressly forbidden./CONTENT	NAME/Exile/NAME	AGE/Modern/AGE	TYPE/Nature/TYPE
AUTHOR/MICHAEL ANANIA/AUTHOR	CONTENT/Michael Anania, The Finality of a Poem from Selected Poems. Copyright  1994 by Michael Anania. Used by permission of Asphodel Press/Acorn Alliance./CONTENT	NAME/The Finality of a Poem/NAME	AGE/Modern/AGE	TYPE/Nature/TYPE
AUTHOR/KENNETH SLESSOR/AUTHOR	CONTENT/Kenneth Slessor, Five Visions of Captain Cook from Selected Poems, published by HarperCollins Publishers Australia. Used by permission./CONTENT	NAME/Five Visions of Captain Cook/NAME	AGE/Modern/AGE	TYPE/Nature/TYPE
AUTHOR/MICHAEL ANANIA/AUTHOR	CONTENT/Michael Anania, A Hanging Screen from Selected Poems. Copyright  1994 by Michael Anania. Used by permission of Asphodel Press/Acorn Alliance./CONTENT	NAME/A Hanging Screen/NAME	AGE/Modern/AGE	TYPE/Nature/TYPE
AUTHOR/WALLACE STEVENS/AUTHOR	CONTENT/Wallace Stevens, The Idea of Order at Key West from Collected Poems. Copyright 1923, 1951, 1954 by Wallace Stevens. Reprinted with the permission of Alfred A. Knopf, a division of Random House, Inc./CONTENT	NAME/The Idea of Order at Key West/NAME	AGE/Modern/AGE	TYPE/Nature/TYPE
AUTHOR/ARCHIBALD MACLEISH/AUTHOR	CONTENT/Archibald MacLeish, Immortal Autumn from Collected Poems 1917-1982. Copyright  1985 by The Estate of Archibald MacLeish. Reprinted with the permission of Houghton Mifflin Company. All rights reserved./CONTENT	NAME/Immortal Autumn/NAME	AGE/Modern/AGE	TYPE/Nature/TYPE
AUTHOR/MALCOLM COWLEY/AUTHOR	CONTENT/Malcolm Cowley, The Long Voyage from Blue Juniata: A Life. Copyright  1985 by Malcolm Cowley. Used by permission of Viking Penguin, a division of Penguin Group (USA) Inc./CONTENT	NAME/The Long Voyage/NAME	AGE/Modern/AGE	TYPE/Nature/TYPE
AUTHOR/MICHAEL ANANIA/AUTHOR	CONTENT/Michael Anania, Memorial Day from Selected Poems. Copyright  1994 by Michael Anania. Used by permission of Asphodel Press/Acorn Alliance./CONTENT	NAME/Memorial Day/NAME	AGE/Modern/AGE	TYPE/Nature/TYPE
AUTHOR/MICHAEL ANANIA/AUTHOR	CONTENT/Michael Anania, Motet from Selected Poems. Copyright  1994 by Michael Anania. Used by permission of Asphodel Press/Acorn Alliance./CONTENT	NAME/Motet/NAME	AGE/Modern/AGE	TYPE/Nature/TYPE
AUTHOR/EZRA POUND/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/While my hair was still cut straight across my forehead

I played about the front gate, pulling flowers.

You came by on bamboo stilts, playing horse,

You walked about my seat, playing with blue plums.

And we went on living in the village of Chokan:

Two small people, without dislike or suspicion.

At fourteen I married My Lord you.

I never laughed, being bashful.

Lowering my head, I looked at the wall.

Called to, a thousand times, I never looked back.



At fifteen I stopped scowling,

I desired my dust to be mingled with yours

Forever and forever, and forever.

Why should I climb the look out?



At sixteen you departed

You went into far Ku-to-en, by the river of swirling eddies,

And you have been gone five months.

The monkeys make sorrowful noise overhead.



You dragged your feet when you went out.

By the gate now, the moss is grown, the different mosses,

Too deep to clear them away!

The leaves fall early this autumn, in wind.

The paired butterflies are already yellow with August

Over the grass in the West garden;

They hurt me.

I grow older.

If you are coming down through the narrows of the river Kiang,

Please let me know beforehand,

And I will come out to meet you

As far as Cho-fu-Sa./CONTENT"	NAME/The River-Merchants Wife: A Letter/NAME	AGE/Modern/AGE	TYPE/Nature/TYPE
AUTHOR/SARA TEASDALE/AUTHOR	CONTENT/Originally published in Poetry, March 1914./CONTENT	NAME/September Midnight/NAME	AGE/Modern/AGE	TYPE/Nature/TYPE
AUTHOR/SARA TEASDALE/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/Since there is no escape, since at the end

My body will be utterly destroyed,

This hand I love as I have loved a friend,

This body I tended, wept with and enjoyed;

Since there is no escape even for me

Who love life with a love too sharp to bear:

The scent of orchards in the rain, the sea

And hours alone too still and sure for prayer

Since darkness waits for me, then all the more

Let me go down as waves sweep to the shore

In pride, and let me sing with my last breath;

In these few hours of light I lift my head;

Life is my loverI shall leave the dead

If there is any way to baffle death./CONTENT"	NAME/Since There Is No Escape/NAME	AGE/Modern/AGE	TYPE/Nature/TYPE
AUTHOR/KENNETH SLESSOR/AUTHOR	CONTENT/Kenneth Slessor, South Country from Selected Poems, published by HarperCollins Publishers Australia. Used by permission./CONTENT	NAME/South Country/NAME	AGE/Modern/AGE	TYPE/Nature/TYPE
AUTHOR/LOUISE BOGAN/AUTHOR	CONTENT/Louise Bogan, Statue and Birds from The Blue Estuaries: Poems 1923-1968. Copyright  1968 by Louise Bogan. Used by permission of Farrar, Straus & Giroux, LLC, http://us.macmillan.com/fsg. All rights reserved./CONTENT	NAME/Statue and Birds/NAME	AGE/Modern/AGE	TYPE/Nature/TYPE
AUTHOR/MICHAEL ANANIA/AUTHOR	CONTENT/Michael Anania, Of the River Itself from Selected Poems. Copyright  1994 by Michael Anania. Used by permission of Asphodel Press/Acorn Alliance./CONTENT	NAME/from Stops Along the Western Bank of the Missouri River: Of the River Itself/NAME	AGE/Modern/AGE	TYPE/Nature/TYPE
AUTHOR/MICHAEL ANANIA/AUTHOR	CONTENT/Michael Anania, A Stratagem from Selected Poems. Copyright  1994 by Michael Anania. Used by permission of Asphodel Press/Acorn Alliance./CONTENT	NAME/A Strategem/NAME	AGE/Modern/AGE	TYPE/Nature/TYPE
AUTHOR/CONRAD AIKEN/AUTHOR	CONTENT/Conrad Aiken, Summer from Collected Poems. Copyright  1953 by Conrad Aiken. Reprinted with the permission of Brandt & Hochman Literary Agents, Inc./CONTENT	NAME/Summer/NAME	AGE/Modern/AGE	TYPE/Nature/TYPE
AUTHOR/PAUL LAURENCE DUNBAR/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/I know what the caged bird feels, alas!

    When the sun is bright on the upland slopes;

When the wind stirs soft through the springing grass,

And the river flows like a stream of glass;

    When the first bird sings and the first bud opes,

And the faint perfume from its chalice steals

I know what the caged bird feels!



I know why the caged bird beats his wing

    Till its blood is red on the cruel bars;

For he must fly back to his perch and cling

When he fain would be on the bough a-swing;

    And a pain still throbs in the old, old scars

And they pulse again with a keener sting

I know why he beats his wing!



I know why the caged bird sings, ah me,

    When his wing is bruised and his bosom sore,

When he beats his bars and he would be free;

It is not a carol of joy or glee,

    But a prayer that he sends from his hearts deep core,

But a plea, that upward to Heaven he flings

I know why the caged bird sings!/CONTENT"	NAME/Sympathy/NAME	AGE/Modern/AGE	TYPE/Nature/TYPE
AUTHOR/KENNETH SLESSOR/AUTHOR	CONTENT/Kenneth Slessor, Talbingo from Selected Poems, published by HarperCollins Publishers Australia. Used by permission./CONTENT	NAME/Talbingo/NAME	AGE/Modern/AGE	TYPE/Nature/TYPE
AUTHOR/GEORGE SANTAYANA/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/There may be chaos still around the world,

This little world that in my thinking lies;

For mine own bosom is the paradise

Where all my lifes fair visions are unfurled.

Within my natures shell I slumber curled,

Unmindful of the changing outer skies,

Where now, perchance, some new-born Eros flies,

Or some old Cronos from his throne is hurled.

I heed them not; or if the subtle night

Haunt me with deities I never saw,

I soon mine eyelids drowsy curtain draw

To hide their myriad faces from my sight.

They threat in vain; the whirlwind cannot awe

A happy snow-flake dancing in the flaw./CONTENT"	NAME/There may be Chaos still around the World/NAME	AGE/Modern/AGE	TYPE/Nature/TYPE
AUTHOR/WALLACE STEVENS/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/I

Among twenty snowy mountains,

The only moving thing

Was the eye of the blackbird.



II

I was of three minds,

Like a tree

In which there are three blackbirds.



III

The blackbird whirled in the autumn winds.

It was a small part of the pantomime.



IV

A man and a woman

Are one.

A man and a woman and a blackbird

Are one.



V

I do not know which to prefer,

The beauty of inflections

Or the beauty of innuendoes,

The blackbird whistling

Or just after.



VI

Icicles filled the long window

With barbaric glass.

The shadow of the blackbird

Crossed it, to and fro.

The mood

Traced in the shadow

An indecipherable cause.



VII

O thin men of Haddam,

Why do you imagine golden birds?

Do you not see how the blackbird

Walks around the feet

Of the women about you?



VIII

I know noble accents

And lucid, inescapable rhythms;

But I know, too,

That the blackbird is involved

In what I know.



IX

When the blackbird flew out of sight,

It marked the edge

Of one of many circles.



X

At the sight of blackbirds

Flying in a green light,

Even the bawds of euphony

Would cry out sharply.



XI

He rode over Connecticut

In a glass coach.

Once, a fear pierced him,

In that he mistook

The shadow of his equipage

For blackbirds.



XII

The river is moving.

The blackbird must be flying.



XIII

It was evening all afternoon.

It was snowing

And it was going to snow.

The blackbird sat

In the cedar-limbs./CONTENT"	NAME/Thirteen Ways of Looking at a Blackbird/NAME	AGE/Modern/AGE	TYPE/Nature/TYPE
AUTHOR/GEORGE SANTAYANA/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/I



Calm was the sea to which your course you kept,

Oh, how much calmer than all southern seas!

Many your nameless mates, whom the keen breeze

Wafted from mothers that of old have wept.

All souls of children taken as they slept

Are your companions, partners of your ease,

And the green souls of all these autumn trees

Are with you through the silent spaces swept.

Your virgin body gave its gentle breath

Untainted to the gods. Why should we grieve,

But that we merit not your holy death?

We shall not loiter long, your friends and I;

Living you made it goodlier to live,

Dead you will make it easier to die.



II



With you a part of me hath passed away;

For in the peopled forest of my mind

A tree made leafless by this wintry wind

Shall never don again its green array.

Chapel and fireside, country road and bay,

Have something of their friendliness resigned;

Another, if I would, I could not find,

And I am grown much older in a day.

But yet I treasure in my memory

Your gift of charity, your mellow ease,

And the dear honour of your amity;

For these once mine, my life is rich with these.

And I scarce know which part may greater be,

What I keep of you, or you rob of me.



III



Your bark lies anchored in the peaceful bight

Until a kinder wind unfurl her sail;

Your docile spirit, winged by this gale,

Hath at the dawning fled into the light.

And I half know why heaven deemed it right

Your youth, and this my joy in youth, should fail;

God hath them still, for ever they avail,

Eternity hath borrowed that delight.

For long ago I taught my thoughts to run

Where all the great things live that lived of yore,

And in eternal quiet float and soar;

There all my loves are gathered into one,

Where change is not, nor parting any more,

Nor revolution of the moon and sun.



IV



In my deep heart these chimes would still have rung

To toll your passing, had you not been dead;

For time a sadder mask than death may spread

Over the face that ever should be young.

The bough that falls with all its trophies hung

Falls not too soon, but lays its flower-crowned head

Most royal in the dust, with no leaf shed

Unhallowed or unchiselled or unsung.

And though the after world will never hear

The happy name of one so gently true,

Nor chronicles write large this fatal year,

Yet we who loved you, though we be but few,

Keep you in whatsoeer is good, and rear

In our weak virtues monuments to you./CONTENT"	NAME/To. W. P./NAME	AGE/Modern/AGE	TYPE/Nature/TYPE
AUTHOR/MICHAEL ANANIA/AUTHOR	CONTENT/Michael Anania, Tracings from Selected Poems. Copyright  1994 by Michael Anania. Used by permission of Asphodel Press/Acorn Alliance./CONTENT	NAME/Tracings/NAME	AGE/Modern/AGE	TYPE/Nature/TYPE
AUTHOR/KATHERINE MANSFIELD/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/But then there comes that moment rare

When, for no cause that I can find,

The little voices of the air

Sound above all the sea and wind.



The sea and wind do then obey

And sighing, sighing double notes

Of double basses, content to play

A droning chord for the little throats



The little throats that sing and rise

Up into the light with lovely ease

And a kind of magical, sweet surprise

To hear and know themselves for these



For these little voices: the bee, the fly,

The leaf that taps, the pod that breaks,

The breeze on the grass-tops bending by,

The shrill quick sound that the insect makes./CONTENT"	NAME/Voices of the Air/NAME	AGE/Modern/AGE	TYPE/Nature/TYPE
AUTHOR/MICHAEL ANANIA/AUTHOR	CONTENT/Michael Anania, Waiting There from Selected Poems. Copyright  1994 by Michael Anania. Used by permission of Asphodel Press/Acorn Alliance./CONTENT	NAME/Waiting There/NAME	AGE/Modern/AGE	TYPE/Nature/TYPE
AUTHOR/ARCHIBALD MACLEISH/AUTHOR	CONTENT/Archibald MacLeish, Way-Station from Collected Poems 1917-1982. Copyright  1985 by The Estate of Archibald MacLeish. Reprinted with the permission of Houghton Mifflin Company. All rights reserved./CONTENT	NAME/Way-Station/NAME	AGE/Modern/AGE	TYPE/Nature/TYPE
AUTHOR/CONRAD AIKEN/AUTHOR	CONTENT/Conrad Aiken, When You Are Not Surprised from Collected Poems. Copyright  1953 by Conrad Aiken. Reprinted with the permission of Brandt & Hochman Literary Agents, Inc./CONTENT	NAME/When You Are Not Surprised/NAME	AGE/Modern/AGE	TYPE/Nature/TYPE
AUTHOR/KENNETH SLESSOR/AUTHOR	CONTENT/Kenneth Slessor, Winter Dawn from Selected Poems, published by HarperCollins Publishers Australia. Used by permission./CONTENT	NAME/Winter Dawn/NAME	AGE/Modern/AGE	TYPE/Nature/TYPE
AUTHOR/D. H. LAWRENCE/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/Even iron can put forth,

Even iron.



This is the iron age,

But let us take heart

Seeing iron break and bud,

Seeing rusty iron puff with clouds of blossom.



The almond-tree,

December's bare iron hooks sticking out of earth.



The almond-tree,

That knows the deadliest poison, like a snake

In supreme bitterness.



Upon the iron, and upon the steel,

Odd flakes as if of snow, odd bits of snow,

Odd crumbs of melting snow.



But you mistake, it is not from the sky;

From out the iron, and from out the steel,

Flying not down from heaven, but storming up,

Strange storming up from the dense under-earth

Along the iron, to the living steel

In rose-hot tips, and flakes of rose-pale snow

Setting supreme annunciation to the world.



Nay, what a heart of delicate super-faith,

Iron-breaking,

The rusty swords of almond-trees.



Trees suffer, like races, down the long ages.

They wander and are exiled, they live in exile through long ages

Like drawn blades never sheathed, hacked and gone black,

The alien trees in alien lands: and yet

The heart of blossom,

The unquenchable heart of blossom!



Look at the many-cicatrised frail vine, none more scarred and frail,

Yet see him fling himself abroad in fresh abandon

From the small wound-stump.



Even the wilful, obstinate, gummy fig-tree

Can be kept down, but he'll burst like a polyp into prolixity.



And the almond-tree, in exile, in the iron age!



This is the ancient southern earth whence the vases were baked, amphoras, craters, cantharus, oenochoe, and open-hearted cylix,

Bristling now with the iron of almond-trees



Iron, but unforgotten,

Iron, dawn-hearted,

Ever-beating dawn-heart, enveloped in iron against the exile, against the ages.



See it come forth in blossom

From the snow-remembering heart

In long-nighted January,

In the long dark nights of the evening star, and Sirius, and the Etna snow-wind through the long night.



Sweating his drops of blood through the long-nighted Gethsemane

Into blossom, into pride, into honey-triumph, into most exquisite splendour.

Oh, give me the tree of life in blossom

And the Cross sprouting its superb and fearless flowers!



Something must be reassuring to the almond, in the evening star, and the snow-wind, and the long, long, nights,

Some memory of far, sun-gentler lands,

So that the faith in his heart smiles again

And his blood ripples with that untenable delight of once-more-vindicated faith,

And the Gethsemane blood at the iron pores unfolds, unfolds,

Pearls itself into tenderness of bud

And in a great and sacred forthcoming steps forth, steps out in one stride

A naked tree of blossom, like a bridegroom bathing in dew, divested of cover,

Frail-naked, utterly uncovered

To the green night-baying of the dog-star, Etna's snow-edged wind

And January's loud-seeming sun.



Think of it, from the iron fastness

Suddenly to dare to come out naked, in perfection of blossom, beyond the sword-rust.

Think, to stand there in full-unfolded nudity, smiling,

With all the snow-wind, and the sun-glare, and the dog-star baying epithalamion.



Oh, honey-bodied beautiful one,

Come forth from iron,

Red your heart is.

Fragile-tender, fragile-tender life-body,

More fearless than iron all the time,

And so much prouder, so disdainful of reluctances.



In the distance like hoar-frost, like silvery ghosts communing on a green hill,

Hoar-frost-like and mysterious.



In the garden raying out

With a body like spray, dawn-tender, and looking about

With such insuperable, subtly-smiling assurance,

Sword-blade-born.



Unpromised,

No bounds being set.

Flaked out and come unpromised,

The tree being life-divine,

Fearing nothing, life-blissful at the core

Within iron and earth.



Knots of pink, fish-silvery

In heaven, in blue, blue heaven,

Soundless, bliss-full, wide-rayed, honey-bodied,

Red at the core,

Red at the core,

Knotted in heaven upon the fine light.



Open,

Open,

Five times wide open,

Six times wide open,

And given, and perfect;

And red at the core with the last sore-heartedness,

Sore-hearted-looking./CONTENT"	NAME/Almond Blossom/NAME	AGE/Modern/AGE	TYPE/Nature/TYPE
AUTHOR/WALLACE STEVENS/AUTHOR	CONTENT/Wallace Stevens, "Anecdote of a Jar" from Collected Poems.  Copyright 1923, 1951, 1954 by Wallace Stevens. Used by permission of Alfred A. Knopf, an imprint of the Knopf Doubleday Publishing Group, a division of Random House LLC. All rights reserved. /CONTENT	NAME/Anecdote of the Jar/NAME	AGE/Modern/AGE	TYPE/Nature/TYPE
AUTHOR/ARCHIBALD MACLEISH/AUTHOR	CONTENT/Archibald MacLeish, Ars Poetica from Collected Poems 1917-1982. Copyright  1985 by The Estate of Archibald MacLeish. Reprinted with the permission of Houghton Mifflin Company. All rights reserved./CONTENT	NAME/Ars Poetica/NAME	AGE/Modern/AGE	TYPE/Nature/TYPE
AUTHOR/HART CRANE/AUTHOR	CONTENT/Hart Crane, At Melvilles Tomb from The Complete Poems of Hart Crane by Hart Crane, edited by Marc SImon. Copyright  1933, 1958, 1966 by Liveright Publishing Corporation. Copyright  1986 by Marc Simon. Used by permission of Liveright Publishing./CONTENT	NAME/At Melvilles Tomb/NAME	AGE/Modern/AGE	TYPE/Nature/TYPE
AUTHOR/D. H. LAWRENCE/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/At evening, sitting on this terrace,

When the sun from the west, beyond Pisa, beyond the mountains of Carrara

Departs, and the world is taken by surprise ...



When the tired flower of Florence is in gloom beneath the glowing

Brown hills surrounding ...



When under the arches of the Ponte Vecchio

A green light enters against stream, flush from the west,

Against the current of obscure Arno ...



Look up, and you see things flying

Between the day and the night;

Swallows with spools of dark thread sewing the shadows together.



A circle swoop, and a quick parabola under the bridge arches

Where light pushes through;

A sudden turning upon itself of a thing in the air.

A dip to the water.



And you think:

""The swallows are flying so late!""



Swallows?



Dark air-life looping

Yet missing the pure loop ...

A twitch, a twitter, an elastic shudder in flight

And serrated wings against the sky,

Like a glove, a black glove thrown up at the light,

And falling back.



Never swallows!

Bats!

The swallows are gone.



At a wavering instant the swallows gave way to bats

By the Ponte Vecchio ...

Changing guard.



Bats, and an uneasy creeping in one's scalp

As the bats swoop overhead!

Flying madly.



Pipistrello!

Black piper on an infinitesimal pipe.

Little lumps that fly in air and have voices indefinite, wildly vindictive;



Wings like bits of umbrella.



Bats!



Creatures that hang themselves up like an old rag, to sleep;

And disgustingly upside down.



Hanging upside down like rows of disgusting old rags

And grinning in their sleep.

Bats!



In China the bat is symbol for happiness.



Not for me!/CONTENT"	NAME/Bat/NAME	AGE/Modern/AGE	TYPE/Nature/TYPE
AUTHOR/HART CRANE/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/Notes:

Then you shall see her truly--your blood remembering its first invasion of her secrecy, its first encounters with her kind, her chieftain lover...his shade that haunts the lakes and hills/CONTENT"	NAME/from The Bridge: The Dance/NAME	AGE/Modern/AGE	TYPE/Nature/TYPE
AUTHOR/CARL SANDBURG/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/I

The bronze General Grant riding a bronze horse in Lincoln Park

Shrivels in the sun by day when the motor cars whirr by in long processions going somewhere to keep apppointment for dinner and matinees and buying and selling

Though in the dusk and nightfall when high waves are piling

On the slabs of the promenade along the lake shore near by

   I have seen the general dare the combers come closer

And make to ride his bronze horse out into the hoofs and guns of the storm.



II

I cross Lincoln Park on a winter night when the snow is falling.

Lincoln in bronze stands among the white lines of snow, his bronze forehead meeting soft echoes of the newsies crying forty thousand men are dead along the Yser, his bronze ears listening to the mumbled roar of the city at his bronze feet.

A lithe Indian on a bronze pony, Shakespeare seated with long legs in bronze, Garibaldi in a bronze cape, they hold places in the cold, lonely snow to-night on their pedestals and so they will hold them past midnight and into the dawn./CONTENT"	NAME/Bronzes/NAME	AGE/Modern/AGE	TYPE/Nature/TYPE
AUTHOR/ELINOR WYLIE/AUTHOR	CONTENT/Elinor Wylie, Cold Blooded Creatures from Selected Works of Elinor Wylie, edited by Evelyn Helmick Hively (Kent, Ohio: The Kent State University Press, 2005). Reprinted with the permission of The Kent State University Press./CONTENT	NAME/Cold Blooded Creatures/NAME	AGE/Modern/AGE	TYPE/Nature/TYPE
AUTHOR/EDGAR LEE MASTERS/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/Not in that wasted garden

Where bodies are drawn into grass

That feeds no flocks, and into evergreens

That bear no fruit

There where along the shaded walks

Vain sighs are heard,

And vainer dreams are dreamed

Of close communion with departed souls

But here under the apple tree

I loved and watched and pruned

With gnarled hands

In the long, long years;

Here under the roots of this northern-spy

To move in the chemic change and circle of life,

Into the soil and into the flesh of the tree,

And into the living epitaphs

Of redder apples!/CONTENT"	NAME/Conrad Siever/NAME	AGE/Modern/AGE	TYPE/Nature/TYPE
AUTHOR/D. H. LAWRENCE/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/What large, dark hands are those at the window

Lifted, grasping the golden light

Which weaves its way through the creeper leaves

       To my heart's delight?



Ah, only the leaves! But in the west,

In the west I see a redness come

Over the evening's burning breast

        'Tis the wound of love goes home!



The woodbine creeps abroad

Calling low to her lover:

The sun-lit flirt who all the day

Has poised above her lips in play

And stolen kisses, shallow and gay

Of pollen, now has gone away

 She woos the moth with her sweet, low word,

And when above her his broad wings hover

Then her bright breast she will uncover

And yield her honey-drop to her lover.



Into the yellow, evening glow

Saunters a man from the farm below,

Leans, and looks in at the low-built shed

Where hangs the swallow's marriage bed.

The bird lies warm against the wall.

She glances quick her startled eyes

Towards him, then she turns away

Her small head, making warm display

Of red upon the throat. His terrors sway

Her out of the nest's warm, busy ball,

Whose plaintive cry is heard as she flies

In one blue stoop from out the sties

Into the evening's empty hall.



Oh, water-hen, beside the rushes

Hide your quaint, unfading blushes,

Still your quick tail, and lie as dead,

Till the distance folds over his ominous tread.



The rabbit presses back her ears,

Turns back her liquid, anguished eyes

And crouches low: then with wild spring

Spurts from the terror of his oncoming

To be choked back, the wire ring

Her frantic effort throttling:

Piteous brown ball of quivering fears!



Ah soon in his large, hard hands she dies,

And swings all loose to the swing of his walk.

Yet calm and kindly are his eyes

And ready to open in brown surprise

Should I not answer to his talk

Or should he my tears surmise.



I hear his hand on the latch, and rise from my chair

Watching the door open: he flashes bare

His strong teeth in a smile, and flashes his eyes

In a smile like triumph upon me; then careless-wise

He flings the rabbit soft on the table board

And comes towards me: ah, the uplifted sword

Of his hand against my bosom, and oh, the broad

Blade of his hand that raises my face to applaud

His coming: he raises up my face to him

And caresses my mouth with his fingers, which still smell grim

Of the rabbit's fur! God, I am caught in a snare!

I know not what fine wire is round my throat,

I only know I let him finger there

My pulse of life, letting him nose like a stoat

Who sniffs with joy before he drinks the blood:

And down his mouth comes to my mouth, and down

His dark bright eyes descend like a fiery hood

Upon my mind: his mouth meets mine, and a flood

Of sweet fire sweeps across me, so I drown

Within him, die, and find death good./CONTENT"	NAME/Cruelty and Love /NAME	AGE/Modern/AGE	TYPE/Nature/TYPE
AUTHOR/HART CRANE/AUTHOR	CONTENT/Hart Crane, "Cutty Sark" from The Complete Poems of Hart Crane, edited by Marc SImon. Copyright  1933, 1958, 1966 by Liveright Publishing Corporation. Copyright  1986 by Marc Simon. Used by permission of Liveright Publishing./CONTENT	NAME/from Cutty Sark/NAME	AGE/Modern/AGE	TYPE/Nature/TYPE
AUTHOR/MARJORIE PICKTHALL/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/See, the grass is full of stars,

Fallen in their brightness;

Hearts they have of shining gold,

Rays of shining whiteness.



Buttercups have honeyed hearts,

Bees they love the clover,

But I love the daisies' dance

All the meadow over.



Blow, O blow, you happy winds,

Singing summer's praises,

Up the field and down the field

A-dancing with the daisies./CONTENT"	NAME/Daisy Time/NAME	AGE/Modern/AGE	TYPE/Nature/TYPE
AUTHOR/ARCHIBALD MACLEISH/AUTHOR	CONTENT/Archibald MacLeish, Definition of the Frontiers from Collected Poems 1917-1982. Copyright  1985 by The Estate of Archibald MacLeish. Reprinted with the permission of Houghton Mifflin Company. All rights reserved./CONTENT	NAME/Definition of the Frontiers/NAME	AGE/Modern/AGE	TYPE/Nature/TYPE
AUTHOR/HUGH MACDIARMID/AUTHOR	CONTENT/Hugh MacDiarmid, The Eemis Stane from Selected Poetry. Copyright  1992 by Alan Riach and Michael Grieve. Reprinted with the permission of New Directions Publishing Corporation./CONTENT	NAME/The Eemis Stane/NAME	AGE/Modern/AGE	TYPE/Nature/TYPE
AUTHOR/D. H. LAWRENCE/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/This spring as it comes bursts up in bonfires green,

Wild puffing of emerald trees, and flame-filled bushes,

Thorn-blossom lifting in wreaths of smoke between

Where the wood fumes up and the watery, flickering rushes.



I am amazed at this spring, this conflagration

Of green fires lit on the soil of the earth, this blaze

Of growing, and sparks that puff in wild gyration,

Faces of people streaming across my gaze.



And I, what fountain of fire am I among

This leaping combustion of spring? My spirit is tossed

About like a shadow buffeted in the throng

Of flames, a shadow that's gone astray, and is lost./CONTENT"	NAME/The Enkindled Spring/NAME	AGE/Modern/AGE	TYPE/Nature/TYPE
AUTHOR/LOUIS UNTERMEYER/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/I never knew the earth had so much gold

The fields run over with it, and this hill

Hoary and old,

Is young with buoyant blooms that flame and thrill.



Such golden fires, such yellowlo, how good

This spendthrift world, and what a lavish God!

This fringe of wood,

Blazing with buttercup and goldenrod.



You too, beloved, are changed. Again I see

Your face grow mystical, as on that night

You turned to me,

And all the trembling worldand youwere white.



Aye, you are touched; your singing lips grow dumb;

The fields absorb you, color you entire . . .

And you become

A goddess standing in a world of fire!/CONTENT"	NAME/Feuerzauber/NAME	AGE/Modern/AGE	TYPE/Nature/TYPE
AUTHOR/CARL SANDBURG/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/The fog comes

on little cat feet.



It sits looking

over harbor and city

on silent haunches

and then moves on./CONTENT"	NAME/Fog/NAME	AGE/Modern/AGE	TYPE/Nature/TYPE
AUTHOR/HUGH MACDIARMID/AUTHOR	CONTENT/Hugh MacDiarmid, Gairmscoile from Selected Poetry. Copyright  1992 by Alan Riach and Michael Grieve. Reprinted with the permission of New Directions Publishing Corporation./CONTENT	NAME/Gairmscoile/NAME	AGE/Modern/AGE	TYPE/Nature/TYPE
AUTHOR/D. H. LAWRENCE/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/When she rises in the morning

I linger to watch her;

She spreads the bath-cloth underneath the window

And the sunbeams catch her

Glistening white on the shoulders,

While down her sides the mellow

Golden shadow glows as

She stoops to the sponge, and her swung breasts

Sway like full-blown yellow

Gloire de Dijon roses.



She drips herself with water, and her shoulders

Glisten as silver, they crumple up

Like wet and falling roses, and I listen

For the sluicing of their rain-dishevelled petals.

In the window full of sunlight

Concentrates her golden shadow

Fold on fold, until it glows as

Mellow as the glory roses./CONTENT"	NAME/Gloire de Dijon/NAME	AGE/Modern/AGE	TYPE/Nature/TYPE
AUTHOR/PAUL LAURENCE DUNBAR/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/Pray why are you so bare, so bare,

   Oh, bough of the old oak-tree;

And why, when I go through the shade you throw,

   Runs a shudder over me?



My leaves were green as the best, I trow,

   And sap ran free in my veins,

But I say in the moonlight dim and weird

   A guiltless victim's pains.



I bent me down to hear his sigh;

   I shook with his gurgling moan,

And I trembled sore when they rode away,

   And left him here alone.



They'd charged him with the old, old crime,

   And set him fast in jail:

Oh, why does the dog howl all night long,

   And why does the night wind wail?



He prayed his prayer and he swore his oath,

   And he raised his hand to the sky;

But the beat of hoofs smote on his ear,

   And the steady tread drew nigh.



Who is it rides by night, by night,

   Over the moonlit road?

And what is the spur that keeps the pace,

   What is the galling goad?



And now they beat at the prison door,

   ""Ho, keeper, do not stay!

We are friends of him whom you hold within,

   And we fain would take him away



""From those who ride fast on our heels

   With mind to do him wrong;

They have no care for his innocence,

   And the rope they bear is long.""



They have fooled the jailer with lying words,

   They have fooled the man with lies;

The bolts unbar, the locks are drawn,

   And the great door open flies.



Now they have taken him from the jail,

   And hard and fast they ride,

And the leader laughs low down in his throat,

   As they halt my trunk beside.



Oh, the judge, he wore a mask of black,

   And the doctor one of white,

And the minister, with his oldest son,

   Was curiously bedight.



Oh, foolish man, why weep you now?

   'Tis but a little space,

And the time will come when these shall dread

   The mem'ry of your face.



I feel the rope against my bark,

   And the weight of him in my grain,

I feel in the throe of his final woe

   The touch of my own last pain.



And never more shall leaves come forth

   On the bough that bears the ban;

I am burned with dread, I am dried and dead,

   From the curse of a guiltless man.



And ever the judge rides by, rides by,

   And goes to hunt the deer,

And ever another rides his soul

   In the guise of a mortal fear.



And ever the man he rides me hard,

   And never a night stays he;

For I feel his curse as a haunted bough,

   On the trunk of a haunted tree./CONTENT"	NAME/The Haunted Oak/NAME	AGE/Modern/AGE	TYPE/Nature/TYPE
AUTHOR/SARA TEASDALE/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/When I am dead and over me bright April

Shakes out her rain-drenched hair,

Tho' you should lean above me broken-hearted,

I shall not care.



I shall have peace, as leafy trees are peaceful

When rain bends down the bough,

And I shall be more silent and cold-hearted

Than you are now./CONTENT"	NAME/I Shall not Care/NAME	AGE/Modern/AGE	TYPE/Nature/TYPE
AUTHOR/E. E. CUMMINGS/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/in Just-

spring          when the world is mud-

luscious the little

lame balloonman



whistles          far          and wee



and eddieandbill come

running from marbles and

piracies and it's

spring



when the world is puddle-wonderful



the queer

old balloonman whistles

far          and             wee

and bettyandisbel come dancing



from hop-scotch and jump-rope and



it's

spring

and



         the



                  goat-footed



balloonMan          whistles

far

and

wee/CONTENT"	NAME/[in Just-]/NAME	AGE/Modern/AGE	TYPE/Nature/TYPE
AUTHOR/WILLIAM BUTLER YEATS/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/I will arise and go now, and go to Innisfree,

And a small cabin build there, of clay and wattles made;

Nine bean-rows will I have there, a hive for the honey-bee,

And live alone in the bee-loud glade.



And I shall have some peace there, for peace comes dropping slow,

Dropping from the veils of the morning to where the cricket sings;

There midnights all a glimmer, and noon a purple glow,

And evening full of the linnets wings.



I will arise and go now, for always night and day

I hear lake water lapping with low sounds by the shore;

While I stand on the roadway, or on the pavements grey,

I hear it in the deep hearts core./CONTENT"	NAME/The Lake Isle of Innisfree/NAME	AGE/Modern/AGE	TYPE/Nature/TYPE
AUTHOR/ARCHIBALD MACLEISH/AUTHOR	CONTENT/Archibald MacLeish, Lines for a Prologue from Collected Poems 1917-1982. Copyright  1985 by The Estate of Archibald MacLeish. Reprinted with the permission of Houghton Mifflin Company. All rights reserved./CONTENT	NAME/Lines for a Prologue/NAME	AGE/Modern/AGE	TYPE/Nature/TYPE
AUTHOR/E. E. CUMMINGS/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/little tree

little silent Christmas tree

you are so little

you are more like a flower



who found you in the green forest

and were you very sorry to come away?

see          i will comfort you

because you smell so sweetly



i will kiss your cool bark

and hug you safe and tight

just as your mother would,

only don't be afraid



look          the spangles

that sleep all the year in a dark box

dreaming of being taken out and allowed to shine,

the balls the chains red and gold the fluffy threads,



put up your little arms

and i'll give them all to you to hold

every finger shall have its ring

and there won't be a single place dark or unhappy



then when you're quite dressed

you'll stand in the window for everyone to see

and how they'll stare!

oh but you'll be very proud



and my little sister and i will take hands

and looking up at our beautiful tree

we'll dance and sing

""Noel Noel""/CONTENT"	NAME/[little tree]/NAME	AGE/Modern/AGE	TYPE/Nature/TYPE
AUTHOR/MINA LOY/AUTHOR	CONTENT/Copyright  1996 by the Estate of Mina Loy. All rights reserved./CONTENT	NAME/Lunar Baedeker/NAME	AGE/Modern/AGE	TYPE/Nature/TYPE
AUTHOR/LOUIS UNTERMEYER/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/We passed old farmer Boothby in the field.

Rugged and straight he stood; his body steeled

With stubbornness and age. We met his eyes

That never flinched or turned to compromise,

And Luck, he cried, good luck!and waved an arm,

Knotted and sailor-like, such as no farm

In all of Maine could boast of; and away

He turned again to pitch his new-cut hay...

We walked on leisurely until a bend

Showed him once more, now working toward the end

Of one great path; wearing his eighty years

Like banners lifted in a wind of cheers.



Then we turned off abruptlytook the road

Cutting the village, the one with the commanding

View of the river. And we strode

More briskly now to the long pier that showed

Where the frail boats were kept at Indian Landing.

In the canoe we stepped; our paddles dipped

Leisurely downwards, and the slim bark slipped

More on than in the water. Smoothly then

We shot its nose against the rippling current,

Feeling the rising rivers half-deterrent

Pull on the paddle as we turned the blade

To keep from swerving round; while we delayed

To watch the curious wave-eaten locks;

Or pass, with lazy turns, the picnic-rocks....

Blue eels flew under us, and fishes darted

A thousand ways; the once broad channel shrunk.

And over us the wise and noble-hearted

Twilight leaned down; the sunset mists were parted,

And we, with thoughts on tiptoe, slunk

Down the green, twisting alleys of the Kennebunk,



Motionless in the meadows

The trees, the rocks, the cows...

And quiet dripped from the shadows

Like rain from heavy boughs.



The tree-toads started ringing

Their ceaseless silver bells;

A land-locked breeze came swinging

Its censer of earthy smells.



The rivers tiny canon

Stretched into dusky lands;

Like a dark and silent companion

Evening held out her hands.



Hushed were the dawns bravados;

Loud noon was a silenced cry

And quiet slipped from the shadows

As stars slip out of the sky...



It must have been an hour more, or later,

When, tramping homeward through the piney wood,

We felt the years fly back; the brotherhood

Of forests took usand we saw the satyr!

There in a pool, up to his neck, he stood

And grinned to see us stare, incredulous

Too startled to remember fear or flight.

Feeling the menace in the crafty night,

We turned to runwhen lo, he called to us!

Using our very names he called. We drew

With creaking courage down the avenue

Of birches till we saw, with clearing sight,

(No longer through a tricky, pale-green light)

Familiar turns and shrubs, the friendly path,

And Farmer Boothby in his woodland bath!

The woods became his background; every tree

Seemed part of him, and stood erect, and shared

The beauty of that gnarled serenity;

The quiet vigor of age that smiled and squared

Its shoulders against Time ... And even night

Flowed in and out of him, as though content

With such a native element;

Happy to move about a spirit quite

As old, as placid and as confident...

Sideways we turned. Still glistening and unclad

He leaped up on the bank, light as a lad,

His body in the moonlight dripping stars...



We went on homeward, through the pasture-bars./CONTENT"	NAME/Magic/NAME	AGE/Modern/AGE	TYPE/Nature/TYPE
AUTHOR/HART CRANE/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/Moonmoth and grasshopper that flee our page

And still wing on, untarnished of the name

We pinion to your bodies to assuage

Our envy of your freedomwe must maim



Because we are usurpers, and chagrined

And take the wing and scar it in the hand.

Names we have, even, to clap on the wind;

But we must die, as you, to understand.



I dreamed that all men dropped their names, and sang

As only they can praise, who build their days

With fin and hoof, with wing and sweetened fang

Struck free and holy in one Name always./CONTENT"	NAME/A Name for All/NAME	AGE/Modern/AGE	TYPE/Nature/TYPE
AUTHOR/HART CRANE/AUTHOR	CONTENT/Hart Crane, "O Carib Isle!" from The Complete Poems of Hart Crane, edited by Marc SImon. Copyright  1933, 1958, 1966 by Liveright Publishing Corporation. Copyright  1986 by Marc Simon. Used by permission of Liveright Publishing./CONTENT	NAME/O Carib Isle!/NAME	AGE/Modern/AGE	TYPE/Nature/TYPE
AUTHOR/HUGH MACDIARMID/AUTHOR	CONTENT/Hugh MacDiarmid, excerpt from On a Raised Beach from Selected Poetry. Copyright  1992 by Alan Riach and Michael Grieve. Reprinted with the permission of New Directions Publishing Corporation./CONTENT	NAME/from On a Raised Beach/NAME	AGE/Modern/AGE	TYPE/Nature/TYPE
AUTHOR/LOUISE BOGAN/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/She has no need to fear the fall

Of harvest from the laddered reach

Of orchards, nor the tide gone ebbing

      From the steep beach.



Nor hold to pain's effrontery

Her body's bulwark, stern and savage,

Nor be a glass, where to forsee

      Another's ravage.



What she has gathered, and what lost,

She will not find to lose again.

She is possessed by time, who once

      Was loved by men./CONTENT"	NAME/Portrait/NAME	AGE/Modern/AGE	TYPE/Nature/TYPE
AUTHOR/T. S. ELIOT/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/I

The winter evening settles down

With smell of steaks in passageways.

Six oclock.

The burnt-out ends of smoky days.

And now a gusty shower wraps

The grimy scraps

Of withered leaves about your feet

And newspapers from vacant lots;

The showers beat

On broken blinds and chimney-pots,

And at the corner of the street

A lonely cab-horse steams and stamps.



And then the lighting of the lamps.



II

The morning comes to consciousness

Of faint stale smells of beer

From the sawdust-trampled street

With all its muddy feet that press

To early coffee-stands.

With the other masquerades

That time resumes,

One thinks of all the hands

That are raising dingy shades

In a thousand furnished rooms.



III

You tossed a blanket from the bed,

You lay upon your back, and waited;

You dozed, and watched the night revealing

The thousand sordid images

Of which your soul was constituted;

They flickered against the ceiling.

And when all the world came back

And the light crept up between the shutters

And you heard the sparrows in the gutters,

You had such a vision of the street

As the street hardly understands;

Sitting along the beds edge, where

You curled the papers from your hair,

Or clasped the yellow soles of feet

In the palms of both soiled hands.



IV

His soul stretched tight across the skies

That fade behind a city block,

Or trampled by insistent feet

At four and five and six oclock;

And short square fingers stuffing pipes,

And evening newspapers, and eyes

Assured of certain certainties,

The conscience of a blackened street

Impatient to assume the world.



I am moved by fancies that are curled

Around these images, and cling:

The notion of some infinitely gentle

Infinitely suffering thing.



Wipe your hand across your mouth, and laugh;

The worlds revolve like ancient women

Gathering fuel in vacant lots./CONTENT"	NAME/Preludes/NAME	AGE/Modern/AGE	TYPE/Nature/TYPE
AUTHOR/HART CRANE/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/The willows carried a slow sound,

A sarabande the wind mowed on the mead.

I could never remember

That seething, steady leveling of the marshes

Till age had brought me to the sea.



Flags, weeds. And remembrance of steep alcoves

Where cypresses shared the noons

Tyranny; they drew me into hades almost.

And mammoth turtles climbing sulphur dreams

Yielded, while sun-silt rippled them

Asunder ...



How much I would have bartered! the black gorge

And all the singular nestings in the hills

Where beavers learn stitch and tooth.

The pond I entered once and quickly fled

I remember now its singing willow rim.



And finally, in that memory all things nurse;

After the city that I finally passed

With scalding unguents spread and smoking darts

The monsoon cut across the delta

At gulf gates ... There, beyond the dykes



I heard wind flaking sapphire, like this summer,

And willows could not hold more steady sound./CONTENT"	NAME/Repose of Rivers/NAME	AGE/Modern/AGE	TYPE/Nature/TYPE
AUTHOR/T. S. ELIOT/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/Twelve o'clock.

Along the reaches of the street

Held in a lunar synthesis,

Whispering lunar incantations

Dissolve the floors of memory

And all its clear relations,

Its divisions and precisions,

Every street lamp that I pass

Beats like a fatalistic drum,

And through the spaces of the dark

Midnight shakes the memory

As a madman shakes a dead geranium.



Half-past one,

The street lamp sputtered,

The street lamp muttered,

The street lamp said, ""Regard that woman

Who hesitates towards you in the light of the door

Which opens on her like a grin.

You see the border of her dress

Is torn and stained with sand,

And you see the corner of her eye

Twists like a crooked pin.""



The memory throws up high and dry

A crowd of twisted things;

A twisted branch upon the beach

Eaten smooth, and polished

As if the world gave up

The secret of its skeleton,

Stiff and white.

A broken spring in a factory yard,

Rust that clings to the form that the strength has left

Hard and curled and ready to snap.



Half-past two,

The street lamp said,

""Remark the cat which flattens itself in the gutter,

Slips out its tongue

And devours a morsel of rancid butter.""

So the hand of a child, automatic,

Slipped out and pocketed a toy that was running along the quay.

I could see nothing behind that child's eye.

I have seen eyes in the street

Trying to peer through lighted shutters,

And a crab one afternoon in a pool,

An old crab with barnacles on his back,

Gripped the end of a stick which I held him.



Half-past three,

The lamp sputtered,

The lamp muttered in the dark.



The lamp hummed:

""Regard the moon,

La lune ne garde aucune rancune,

She winks a feeble eye,

She smiles into corners.

She smoothes the hair of the grass.

The moon has lost her memory.

A washed-out smallpox cracks her face,

Her hand twists a paper rose,

That smells of dust and old Cologne,

She is alone

With all the old nocturnal smells

That cross and cross across her brain.""

The reminiscence comes

Of sunless dry geraniums

And dust in crevices,

Smells of chestnuts in the streets,

And female smells in shuttered rooms,

And cigarettes in corridors

And cocktail smells in bars.""



The lamp said,

""Four o'clock,

Here is the number on the door.

Memory!

You have the key,

The little lamp spreads a ring on the stair,

Mount.

The bed is open; the tooth-brush hangs on the wall,

Put your shoes at the door, sleep, prepare for life.""



The last twist of the knife./CONTENT"	NAME/Rhapsody on a Windy Night/NAME	AGE/Modern/AGE	TYPE/Nature/TYPE
AUTHOR/ARCHIBALD MACLEISH/AUTHOR	CONTENT/Archibald MacLeish, The Rock in the Sea from Collected Poems 1917-1982. Copyright  1985 by The Estate of Archibald MacLeish. Reprinted with the permission of Houghton Mifflin Company. All rights reserved./CONTENT	NAME/The Rock in the Sea/NAME	AGE/Modern/AGE	TYPE/Nature/TYPE
AUTHOR/MARJORIE PICKTHALL/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/Out of the winds' and the waves' riot,

Out of the loud foam,

He has put in to a great quiet

And a still home.



Here he may lie at ease and wonder

Why the old ship waits,

And hark for the surge and the strong thunder

Of the full Straits,



And look for the fishing fleet at morning,

Shadows like lost souls,

Slide through the fog where the seal's warning

Betrays the shoals,



And watch for the deep-sea liner climbing

Out of the bright West,

With a salmon-sky and her wake shining

Like a tern's breast,



And never know he is done for ever

With the old sea's pride,

Borne from the fight and the full endeavour

On an ebb tide./CONTENT"	NAME/The Sailor's Grave at Clo-oose, V.I./NAME	AGE/Modern/AGE	TYPE/Nature/TYPE
AUTHOR/EDGAR LEE MASTERS/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/Maurice, weep not, I am not here under this pine tree.

The balmy air of spring whispers through the sweet grass,

The stars sparkle, the whippoorwill calls,

But thou grievest, while my soul lies rapturous

In the blest Nirvana of eternal light!

Go to the good heart that is my husband,

Who broods upon what he calls our guilty love: i

Tell him that my love for you, no less than my love for him

Wrought out my destiny i that through the flesh

I won spirit, and through spirit, peace.

There is no marriage in heaven,

But there is love./CONTENT"	NAME/Sarah Brown/NAME	AGE/Modern/AGE	TYPE/Nature/TYPE
AUTHOR/HUGH MACDIARMID/AUTHOR	CONTENT/Hugh MacDiarmid, The Sauchs in the Reuch Heuch Hauch from Selected Poetry. Copyright  1992 by Alan Riach and Michael Grieve. Reprinted with the permission of New Directions Publishing Corporation./CONTENT	NAME/The Sauchs in the Reuch Heuch Hauch/NAME	AGE/Modern/AGE	TYPE/Nature/TYPE
AUTHOR/MARJORIE PICKTHALL/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/The earth builds on the earth

Castles and towers;

The earth saith of the earth:

All shall be ours.



Yea, though they plan and reap

The rye and the corn,

Lo, they were bond to Sleep

Ere they were born.



Yea, though the blind earth sows

For the fruit and the sheaf,

They shall harvest the leaf of the rose

And the dust of the leaf.



Pride of the sword and power

Are theirs at their need

Who shall rule but the root of the flower

The fall of the seed.



They who follow the flesh

In splendour and tears,

They shall rest and clothe them afresh

In the fulness of years.



From the dream of the dust they came

As the dawn set free.

They shall pass as the flower of the flame

Or the foam of the sea.



The earth builds on the earth

Castles and towers.

The earth saith of the earth:

All shall be ours./CONTENT"	NAME/A Saxon Epitaph/NAME	AGE/Modern/AGE	TYPE/Nature/TYPE
AUTHOR/EZRA POUND/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/May I for my own self song's truth reckon,

Journey's jargon, how I in harsh days

Hardship endured oft.

Bitter breast-cares have I abided,

Known on my keel many a care's hold,

And dire sea-surge, and there I oft spent

Narrow nightwatch nigh the ship's head

While she tossed close to cliffs. Coldly afflicted,

My feet were by frost benumbed.

Chill its chains are; chafing sighs

Hew my heart round and hunger begot

Mere-weary mood. Lest man know not

That he on dry land loveliest liveth,

List how I, care-wretched, on ice-cold sea,

Weathered the winter, wretched outcast

Deprived of my kinsmen;

Hung with hard ice-flakes, where hail-scur flew,

There I heard naught save the harsh sea

And ice-cold wave, at whiles the swan cries,

Did for my games the gannet's clamour,

Sea-fowls, loudness was for me laughter,

The mews' singing all my mead-drink.

Storms, on the stone-cliffs beaten, fell on the stern

In icy feathers; full oft the eagle screamed

With spray on his pinion.

Not any protector

May make merry man faring needy.

This he little believes, who aye in winsome life

Abides 'mid burghers some heavy business,

Wealthy and wine-flushed, how I weary oft

Must bide above brine.

Neareth nightshade, snoweth from north,

Frost froze the land, hail fell on earth then

Corn of the coldest. Nathless there knocketh now

The heart's thought that I on high streams

The salt-wavy tumult traverse alone.

Moaneth alway my mind's lust

That I fare forth, that I afar hence

Seek out a foreign fastness.

For this there's no mood-lofty man over earth's midst,

Not though he be given his good, but will have in his youth greed;

Nor his deed to the daring, nor his king to the faithful

But shall have his sorrow for sea-fare

Whatever his lord will.

He hath not heart for harping, nor in ring-having

Nor winsomeness to wife, nor world's delight

Nor any whit else save the wave's slash,

Yet longing comes upon him to fare forth on the water.

Bosque taketh blossom, cometh beauty of berries,

Fields to fairness, land fares brisker,

All this admonisheth man eager of mood,

The heart turns to travel so that he then thinks

On flood-ways to be far departing.

Cuckoo calleth with gloomy crying,

He singeth summerward, bodeth sorrow,

The bitter heart's blood. Burgher knows not

He the prosperous man  what some perform

Where wandering them widest draweth.

So that but now my heart burst from my breast-lock,

My mood 'mid the mere-flood,

Over the whale's acre, would wander wide.

On earth's shelter cometh oft to me,

Eager and ready, the crying lone-flyer,

Whets for the whale-path the heart irresistibly,

O'er tracks of ocean; seeing that anyhow

My lord deems to me this dead life

On loan and on land, I believe not

That any earth-weal eternal standeth

Save there be somewhat calamitous

That, ere a man's tide go, turn it to twain.

Disease or oldness or sword-hate

Beats out the breath from doom-gripped body.

And for this, every earl whatever, for those speaking after

Laud of the living, boasteth some last word,

That he will work ere he pass onward,

Frame on the fair earth 'gainst foes his malice,

Daring ado, ...

So that all men shall honour him after

And his laud beyond them remain 'mid the English,

Aye, for ever, a lasting life's-blast,

Delight mid the doughty.

Days little durable,

And all arrogance of earthen riches,

There come now no kings nor Csars

Nor gold-giving lords like those gone.

Howe'er in mirth most magnified,

Whoe'er lived in life most lordliest,

Drear all this excellence, delights undurable!

Waneth the watch, but the world holdeth.

Tomb hideth trouble. The blade is layed low.

Earthly glory ageth and seareth.

No man at all going the earth's gait,

But age fares against him, his face paleth,

Grey-haired he groaneth, knows gone companions,

Lordly men are to earth o'ergiven,

Nor may he then the flesh-cover, whose life ceaseth,

Nor eat the sweet nor feel the sorry,

Nor stir hand nor think in mid heart,

And though he strew the grave with gold,

His born brothers, their buried bodies

Be an unlikely treasure hoard./CONTENT"	NAME/The Seafarer/NAME	AGE/Modern/AGE	TYPE/Nature/TYPE
AUTHOR/PAUL LAURENCE DUNBAR/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/Out in the sky the great dark clouds are massing;

I look far out into the pregnant night,

Where I can hear a solemn booming gun

And catch the gleaming of a random light,

That tells me that the ship I seek is passing, passing.



My tearful eyes my soul's deep hurt are glassing;

For I would hail and check that ship of ships.

I stretch my hands imploring, cry aloud,

My voice falls dead a foot from mine own lips,

And but its ghost doth reach that vessel, passing, passing.



O Earth, O Sky, O Ocean, both surpassing,

O heart of mine, O soul that dreads the dark!

Is there no hope for me? Is there no way

That I may sight and check that speeding bark

Which out of sight and sound is passing, passing?/CONTENT"	NAME/Ships that Pass in the Night/NAME	AGE/Modern/AGE	TYPE/Nature/TYPE
AUTHOR/PAUL LAURENCE DUNBAR/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/Air a-gittin' cool an' coolah,

   Frost a-comin' in de night,

Hicka' nuts an' wa'nuts fallin',

   Possum keepin' out o' sight.

Tu'key struttin' in de ba'nya'd,

   Nary step so proud ez his;

Keep on struttin', Mistah Tu'key,

   Yo' do' know whut time it is.



Cidah press commence a-squeakin'

   Eatin' apples sto'ed away,

Chillun swa'min' 'roun' lak ho'nets,

   Huntin' aigs ermung de hay.

Mistah Tu'key keep on gobblin'

   At de geese a-flyin' souf,

Oomph! dat bird do' know whut's comin';

   Ef he did he'd shet his mouf.



Pumpkin gittin' good an' yallah

   Mek me open up my eyes;

Seems lak it's a-lookin' at me

   Jes' a-la'in' dah sayin' ""Pies.""

Tu'key gobbler gwine 'roun' blowin',

   Gwine 'roun' gibbin' sass an' slack;

Keep on talkin', Mistah Tu'key,

   You ain't seed no almanac.



Fa'mer walkin' th'oo de ba'nya'd

   Seein' how things is comin' on,

Sees ef all de fowls is fatt'nin'

   Good times comin' sho's you bo'n.

Hyeahs dat tu'key gobbler braggin',

   Den his face break in a smile

Nebbah min', you sassy rascal,

   He's gwine nab you atter while.



Choppin' suet in de kitchen,

   Stonin' raisins in de hall,

Beef a-cookin' fu' de mince meat,

   Spices groun'I smell 'em all.

Look hyeah, Tu'key, stop dat gobblin',

   You ain' luned de sense ob feah,

You ol' fool, yo' naik's in dangah,

   Do' you know Thanksgibbin's hyeah?/CONTENT"	NAME/Signs of the Times/NAME	AGE/Modern/AGE	TYPE/Nature/TYPE
AUTHOR/PAUL LAURENCE DUNBAR/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/Wintah, summah, snow er shine,

Hit's all de same to me,

Ef only I kin call you mine,

An' keep you by my knee.



Ha'dship, frolic, grief er caih,

Content by night an' day,

Ef only I kin see you whaih

You wait beside de way.



Livin', dyin', smiles er teahs,

My soul will still be free,

Ef only thoo de comin' yeahs

You walk de worl' wid me.



Bird-song, breeze-wail, chune er moan,

What puny t'ings dey'll be,

Ef w'en I's seemin' all erlone,

I knows yo' hea't's wid me./CONTENT"	NAME/Song (Wintah, summah, snow er shine)/NAME	AGE/Modern/AGE	TYPE/Nature/TYPE
AUTHOR/WILLIAM BUTLER YEATS/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/The brawling of a sparrow in the eaves,

The brilliant moon and all the milky sky,

And all that famous harmony of leaves,

Had blotted out man's image and his cry.



A girl arose that had red mournful lips

And seemed the greatness of the world in tears,

Doomed like Odysseus and the labouring ships

And proud as Priam murdered with his peers;



Arose, and on the instant clamorous eaves,

A climbing moon upon an empty sky,

And all that lamentation of the leaves,

Could but compose man's image and his cry./CONTENT"	NAME/The Sorrow of Love/NAME	AGE/Modern/AGE	TYPE/Nature/TYPE
AUTHOR/MARJORIE PICKTHALL/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/Now in the West the slender moon lies low,

And now Orion glimmers through the trees,

Clearing the earth with even pace and slow,

And now the stately-moving Pleiades,

In that soft infinite darkness overhead

Hang jewel-wise upon a silver thread.



And all the lonelier stars that have their place,

Calm lamps within the distant southern sky,

And planet-dust upon the edge of space,

Look down upon the fretful world, and I

Look up to outer vastness unafraid

And see the stars which sang when earth was made./CONTENT"	NAME/Stars/NAME	AGE/Modern/AGE	TYPE/Nature/TYPE
AUTHOR/HUGH MACDIARMID/AUTHOR	CONTENT/Hugh MacDiarmid, Stony Limits from Selected Poetry. Copyright  1992 by Alan Riach and Michael Grieve. Reprinted with the permission of New Directions Publishing Corporation./CONTENT	NAME/Stony Limits/NAME	AGE/Modern/AGE	TYPE/Nature/TYPE
AUTHOR/CARL SANDBURG/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/I spot the hills

With yellow balls in autumn.

I light the prairie cornfields

Orange and tawny gold clusters

And I am called pumpkins.

On the last of October

When dusk is fallen

Children join hands

And circle round me

Singing ghost songs

And love to the harvest moon;

I am a jack-o'-lantern

With terrible teeth

And the children know

I am fooling./CONTENT"	NAME/Theme in Yellow/NAME	AGE/Modern/AGE	TYPE/Nature/TYPE
AUTHOR/LOUIS UNTERMEYER/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/Green miles of leafy peace are spread

Over these ranks, unseen and serried;

Screening the trenches with their dead

And living men already buried.

The rains beat down, the torrents flow

Into each cold and huddling cave;

And over them the beet-fields grow,

A fortress gentle as a grave.



Morose, impatient, sick at heart,

With rasping nerves and twitching muscles,

We cannot even sleep; we start

With every twig that snaps or rustles.

Sought always by an unseen foe

Over our heads the bullets fly;

But more than these, we fear the snow,

The silent shrapnel of the sky.



Yonder our colonel stalks and grieves,

Meeting the storm with thoughts more stormy;

But we, we sit and watch the leaves

Fall down, a torn and crumpled army.

We mourn for every leaf that lies,

As though it were a comrade slain;

Each was a shelter from the eyes

Of every prying aeroplane. . .



And in its cloudy uniform,

Stilling the cannons earthly thunder,

The huge artillery of the storm

Plows through the land and pulls it under.

The rain beats down, until the slow

And slipping earth resists no more. . .

And over them the beets will grow

Ranker and redder than before./CONTENT"	NAME/The Victory of the Beet-Fields/NAME	AGE/Modern/AGE	TYPE/Nature/TYPE
AUTHOR/HART CRANE/AUTHOR	CONTENT/Hart Crane, "Voyages I, II, III, IV, V, VI" from The Complete Poems of Hart Crane, edited by Marc Simon. Copyright  1933, 1958, 1966 by Liveright Publishing Corporation. Copyright  1986 by Marc Simon. Used by permission of Liveright Publishing./CONTENT	NAME/Voyages/NAME	AGE/Modern/AGE	TYPE/Nature/TYPE
AUTHOR/HUGH MACDIARMID/AUTHOR	CONTENT/Hugh MacDiarmid, The Watergaw from Selected Poetry. Copyright  1992 by Alan Riach and Michael Grieve. Reprinted with the permission of New Directions Publishing Corporation./CONTENT	NAME/The Watergaw/NAME	AGE/Modern/AGE	TYPE/Nature/TYPE
AUTHOR/D. H. LAWRENCE/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/[Version 1: 1921]

The quick sparks on the gorse bushes are leaping,

Little jets of sunlight-texture imitating flame;

Above them, exultant, the peewits are sweeping:

They are lords of the desolate wastes of sadness their screamings proclaim.



Rabbits, handfuls of brown earth, lie

Low-rounded on the mournful grass they have bitten down to the quick.

Are they asleep?  Are they alive?  Now see, when I

Move my arms the hill bursts and heaves under their spurting kick.



The common flaunts bravely; but below, from the rushes

Crowds of glittering king-cups surge to challenge the blossoming bushes;

There the lazy streamlet pushes

Its curious course mildly; here it wakes again, leaps, laughs, and gushes.



Into a deep pond, an old sheep-dip,

Dark, overgrown with willows, cool, with the brook ebbing through so slow,

Naked on the steep, soft lip

Of the bank I stand watching my own white shadow quivering to and fro.



What if the gorse flowers shrivelled and kissing were lost?

Without the pulsing waters, where were the marigolds and the songs of the brook!

If my veins and my breasts with love embossed

Withered, my insolent soul would be gone like flowers that the hot wind took.



So my soul like a passionate woman turns,

Filled with remorseful terror to the man she scorned, and her love

For myself in my own eyes' laughter burns,

Runs ecstatic over the pliant folds rippling down to my belly from the breast-lights above.



Over my sunlit skin the warm, clinging air,

Rich with the songs of seven larks singing at once, goes kissing me glad.

And the soul of the wind and my blood compare

Their wandering happiness, and the wind, wasted in liberty, drifts on and is sad.



Oh but the water loves me and folds me,

Plays with me, sways me, lifts me and sinks me as though it were living blood,

Blood of a heaving woman who holds me,

Owning my supple body a rare glad thing, supremely good.



[Version 2: 1928]

The quick sparks on the gorse-bushes are leaping

Little jets of sunlight texture imitating flame;

Above them, exultant, the peewits are sweeping:

They have triumphed again o'er the ages, their screamings proclaim.



Rabbits, handfuls of brown earth, lie

Low-rounded on the mournful turf they have bitten down to the quick.

Are they asleep?  are they living?  Now see, when I

Lift my arms, the hill bursts and heaves under their spurting kick!



The common flaunts bravely; but below, from the rushes

Crowds of glittering king-cups surge to challenge the blossoming bushes;

There the lazy streamlet pushes

His bent course mildly; here wakes again, leaps, laughs, and gushes



Into a deep pond, an old sheep-dip,

Dark, overgrown with willows, cool, with the brook ebbing through so slow;

Naked on the steep, soft lip

Of the turf I stand watching my own white shadow quivering to and fro.



What if the gorse-flowers shrivelled, and I were gone?

What if the waters ceased, where were the marigolds then, and the gudgeon?

What is this thing that I look down upon?

White on the water wimples my shadow, strains like a dog on a string, to run on.



How it looks back, like a white dog to its master!

I on the bank all substance, my shadow all shadow looking up to me, looking back!

And the water runs, and runs faster, runs faster,

And the white dog dances and quivers, I am holding his cord quite slack.



But how splendid it is to be substance, here!

My shadow is neither here nor there; but I, I am royally here!

I am here! I am here! screams the peewit; the may-blobs burst out in a laugh as they hear!

Here! flick the rabbits. Here! pants the gorse. Here! say the insects far and near.



Over my skin in the sunshine, the warm, clinging air

Flushed with the songs of seven larks singing at once, goes kissing me glad.

You are here! You are here! We have found you! Everywhere

We sought you substantial, you touchstone of caresses, you naked lad!



Oh but the water loves me and folds me,

Plays with me, sways me, lifts me and sinks me, murmurs: Oh marvellous stuff!

No longer shadow!  and it holds me

Close, and it rolls me, enfolds me, touches me, as if never it could touch me enough.



Sun, but in substance, yellow water-blobs!

Wings and feathers on the crying, mysterious ages, peewits wheeling!

All that is right, all that is good; all that is God takes substance! a rabbit lobs

In confirmation, I hear sevenfold lark-songs pealing./CONTENT"	NAME/The Wild Common/NAME	AGE/Modern/AGE	TYPE/Nature/TYPE
AUTHOR/WILLIAM BUTLER YEATS/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/The trees are in their autumn beauty,

The woodland paths are dry,

Under the October twilight the water

Mirrors a still sky;

Upon the brimming water among the stones

Are nine-and-fifty swans.



The nineteenth autumn has come upon me

Since I first made my count;

I saw, before I had well finished,

All suddenly mount

And scatter wheeling in great broken rings

Upon their clamorous wings.



I have looked upon those brilliant creatures,

And now my heart is sore.

All's changed since I, hearing at twilight,

The first time on this shore,

The bell-beat of their wings above my head,

Trod with a lighter tread.



Unwearied still, lover by lover,

They paddle in the cold

Companionable streams or climb the air;

Their hearts have not grown old;

Passion or conquest, wander where they will,

Attend upon them still.



But now they drift on the still water,

Mysterious, beautiful;

Among what rushes will they build,

By what lake's edge or pool

Delight men's eyes when I awake some day

To find they have flown away?/CONTENT"	NAME/The Wild Swans at Coole/NAME	AGE/Modern/AGE	TYPE/Nature/TYPE
AUTHOR/CARL SANDBURG/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/Give me hunger,

O you gods that sit and give

The world its orders.

Give me hunger, pain and want,

Shut me out with shame and failure

From your doors of gold and fame,

Give me your shabbiest, weariest hunger!



But leave me a little love,

A voice to speak to me in the day end,

A hand to touch me in the dark room

Breaking the long loneliness.

In the dusk of day-shapes

Blurring the sunset,

One little wandering, western star

Thrust out from the changing shores of shadow.

Let me go to the window,

Watch there the day-shapes of dusk

And wait and know the coming

Of a little love./CONTENT"	NAME/At a Window/NAME	AGE/Modern/AGE	TYPE/Nature/TYPE
AUTHOR/CARL SANDBURG/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/Passing through huddled and ugly walls,

By doorways where women haggard

Looked from their hunger-deep eyes,

Haunted with shadows of hunger-hands,

Out from the huddled and ugly walls,

I came sudden, at the city's edge,

On a blue burst of lake,

Long lake waves breaking under the sun

On a spray-flung curve of shore;

And a fluttering storm of gulls,

Masses of great gray wings

And flying white bellies

Veering and wheeling free in the open./CONTENT"	NAME/The Harbor/NAME	AGE/Modern/AGE	TYPE/Nature/TYPE
AUTHOR/CARL SANDBURG/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/Desolate and lone

All night long on the lake

Where fog trails and mist creeps,

The whistle of a boat

Calls and cries unendingly,

Like some lost child

In tears and trouble

Hunting the harbor's breast

And the harbor's eyes./CONTENT"	NAME/Lost/NAME	AGE/Modern/AGE	TYPE/Nature/TYPE
AUTHOR/CARL SANDBURG/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/Momus is the name men give your face,

The brag of its tone, like a long low steamboat whistle

Finding a way mid mist on a shoreland,

Where gray rocks let the salt water shatter spray Against horizons purple, silent.



Yes, Momus,

Men have flung your face in bronze

To gaze in gargoyle downward on a street-whirl of folk.

They were artists did this, shaped your sad mouth,

Gave you a tall forehead slanted with calm, broad wisdom;

All your lips to the corners and your cheeks to the high bones

Thrown over and through with a smile that forever wishes and wishes, purple, silent, fled from all the iron things of life, evaded like a sought bandit, gone into dreams, by God.



I wonder, Momus,

Whether shadows of the dead sit somewhere and look with deep laughter

On men who play in terrible earnest the old, known, solemn repetitions of history.

A droning monotone soft as sea laughter hovers from your kindliness of bronze,

You give me the human ease of a mountain peak, purple, silent;

Granite shoulders heaving above the earth curves,

Careless eye-witness of the spawning tides of men and women

Swarming always in a drift of millions to the dust of toil, the salt of tears,

And blood drops of undiminishing war./CONTENT"	NAME/Momus/NAME	AGE/Modern/AGE	TYPE/Nature/TYPE
AUTHOR/CARL SANDBURG/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/I shall foot it

Down the roadway in the dusk,

Where shapes of hunger wander

And the fugitives of pain go by.



I shall foot it

In the silence of the morning,

See the night slur into dawn,

Hear the slow great winds arise

Where tall trees flank the way

And shoulder toward the sky.



The broken boulders by the road

Shall not commemorate my ruin.

Regret shall be the gravel under foot.

I shall watch for

Slim birds swift of wing

That go where wind and ranks of thunder

Drive the wild processionals of rain.



The dust of the travelled road

Shall touch my hands and face./CONTENT"	NAME/The Road and the End/NAME	AGE/Modern/AGE	TYPE/Nature/TYPE
AUTHOR/RICHARD ALDINGTON/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/I have sat here happy in the gardens,

Watching the still pool and the reeds

And the dark clouds

Which the wind of the upper air

Tore like the green leafy boughs

Of the divers-hued trees of late summer;

But though I greatly delight

In these and the water-lilies,

That which sets me nighest to weeping

Is the rose and white color of the smooth flag-stones,

And the pale yellow grasses

Among them./CONTENT"	NAME/Au Vieux Jardin/NAME	AGE/Modern/AGE	TYPE/Nature/TYPE
AUTHOR/RICHARD ALDINGTON/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/Potuia, potuia

White grave goddess,

Pity my sadness,

O silence of Paros.



I am not of these about thy feet,

These garments and decorum;

I am thy brother,

Thy lover of aforetime crying to thee,

And thou hearest me not.



I have whispered thee in thy solitudes

Of our loves in Phrygia,

The far ecstasy of burning noons

When the fragile pipes

Ceased in the cypress shade,

And the brown fingers of the shepherd

Moved over slim shoulders;

And only the cicada sang.



I have told thee of the hills

And the lisp of reeds

And the sun upon thy breasts,



And thou hearest me not,

Potuia, potuia

Thou hearest me not./CONTENT"	NAME/To a Greek Marble/NAME	AGE/Modern/AGE	TYPE/Nature/TYPE
AUTHOR/RICHARD ALDINGTON/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/The ancient songs

Pass deathward mournfully.



Cold lips that sing no more, and withered wreaths,

Regretful eyes, and drooping breasts and wings

Symbols of ancient songs

Mournfully passing

Down to the great white surges,

Watched of none         - -

Save the frail sea-birds

And the lithe pale girls,

Daughters of Okeanos.



And the songs pass

From the green land

Which lies upon the waves as a leaf

On the flowers of hyacinth;

And they pass from the waters,

The manifold winds and the dim moon,

And they come,

Silently winging through soft Kimmerian dusk,

To the quiet level lands

That she keeps for us all,

That she wrought for us all for sleep

In the silver days of the earth's dawning

Proserpine, daughter of Zeus.



And we turn from the Kuprian's breasts,

And we turn from thee,

Phoibos Apollon,

And we turn from the music of old

And the hills that we loved and the meads,

And we turn from the fiery day,

And the lips that were over-sweet;

For silently

Brushing the fields with red-shod feet,

With purple robe

Searing the flowers as with a sudden flame,

Death,

Thou hast come upon us.



And of all the ancient songs

Passing to the swallow-blue halls

By the dark streams of Persephone,

This only remains:

That in the end we turn to thee,

Death,

That we turn to thee, singing

One last song.



O Death,

Thou art an healing wind

That blowest over white flowers

A-tremble with dew;

Thou art a wind flowing

Over long leagues of lonely sea;

Thou art the dusk and the fragrance;

Thou art the lips of love mournfully smiling;

Thou art the pale peace of one

Satiate with old desires;

Thou art the silence of beauty,

And we look no more for the morning;

We yearn no more for the sun,

Since with thy white hands,

Death,

Thou crownest us with the pallid chaplets,

The slim colorless poppies

Which in thy garden alone

Softly thou gatherest.



And silently;

And with slow feet approaching;

And with bowed head and unlit eyes,

We kneel before thee:

And thou, leaning towards us, Caressingly layest upon us

Flowers from thy thin cold hands,

And, smiling as a chaste woman Knowing love in her heart,

Thou sealest our eyes

And the illimitable quietude

Comes gently upon us./CONTENT"	NAME//NAME	AGE/Modern/AGE	TYPE/Nature/TYPE
AUTHOR/STEPHEN SPENDER/AUTHOR	CONTENT/Stephen Spender, "Song" from New Collected Poems, published by Faber. Copyright  2004. Reprinted by kind permission of the Estate of Stephen Spender./CONTENT	NAME/Song/NAME	AGE/Modern/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/EDGAR LEE MASTERS/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/Knowlt Hoheimer ran away to the war

The day before Curl Trenary

Swore out a warrant through Justice Arnett

For stealing hogs.

But that's not the reason he turned a soldier.

He caught me running with Lucius Atherton.

We quarreled and I told him never again

To cross my path.

Then he stole the hogs and went to the war

Back of every soldier is a woman./CONTENT"	NAME/Lydia Puckett/NAME	AGE/Modern/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/EDGAR LEE MASTERS/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/He protested all his life long

The newspapers lied about him villainously;

That he was not at fault for Minerva's fall,

But only tried to help her.

Poor soul so sunk in sin he could not see

That even trying to help her, as he called it,

He had broken the law human and divine.

Passers by, an ancient admonition to you:

If your ways would be ways of pleasantness,

And all your pathways peace,

Love God and keep his commandments./CONTENT"	NAME/Mrs. Meyers/NAME	AGE/Modern/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/WILLIAM BUTLER YEATS/AUTHOR	CONTENT/W. B. Yeats, "Politics" from Last Poems (1938-1939). Copyright  1939 by W. B. Yeats.  Reprinted by permission of Scribner (Simon & Schuster, Inc.)./CONTENT	NAME/Politics/NAME	AGE/Modern/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/WILLIAM BUTLER YEATS/AUTHOR	CONTENT/W. B. Yeats, The Circus Animals Desertion from The Poems of W. B. Yeats: A New Edition, edited by Richard J. Finneran. Copyright 1933 by Macmillan Publishing Company, renewed  1961 by Georgie Yeats. Reprinted with the permission of A. P. Watt, Ltd. on behalf of Michael Yeats./CONTENT	NAME/The Circus Animals Desertion/NAME	AGE/Modern/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/WILLIAM BUTLER YEATS/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/Were you but lying cold and dead,

And lights were paling out of the West,

You would come hither, and bend your head,

And I would lay my head on your breast;

And you would murmur tender words,

Forgiving me, because you were dead:

Nor would you rise and hasten away,

Though you have the will of wild birds,

But know your hair was bound and wound

About the stars and moon and sun:

O would, beloved, that you lay

Under the dock-leaves in the ground,

While lights were paling one by one./CONTENT"	NAME/He wishes his Beloved were Dead/NAME	AGE/Modern/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/WILLIAM BUTLER YEATS/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/Never give all the heart, for love

Will hardly seem worth thinking of

To passionate women if it seem

Certain, and they never dream

That it fades out from kiss to kiss;

For everything thats lovely is

But a brief, dreamy, kind delight.

O never give the heart outright,

For they, for all smooth lips can say,

Have given their hearts up to the play.

And who could play it well enough

If deaf and dumb and blind with love?

He that made this knows all the cost,

For he gave all his heart and lost./CONTENT"	NAME/Never give all the Heart/NAME	AGE/Modern/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/WILLIAM BUTLER YEATS/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/Why should I blame her that she filled my days

With misery, or that she would of late

Have taught to ignorant men most violent ways,

Or hurled the little streets upon the great,

Had they but courage equal to desire?

What could have made her peaceful with a mind

That nobleness made simple as a fire,

With beauty like a tightened bow, a kind

That is not natural in an age like this,

Being high and solitary and most stern?

Why, what could she have done, being what she is?

Was there another Troy for her to burn?/CONTENT"	NAME/No Second Troy/NAME	AGE/Modern/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/WILLIAM BUTLER YEATS/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/Some may have blamed you that you took away

The verses that could move them on the day

When, the ears being deafened, the sight of the eyes blind

With lightning, you went from me, and I could find

Nothing to make a song about but kings,

Helmets, and swords, and half-forgotten things

That were like memories of youbut now

We'll out, for the world lives as long ago;

And while we're in our laughing, weeping fit,

Hurl helmets, crowns, and swords into the pit.

But, dear, cling close to me; since you were gone,

My barren thoughts have chilled me to the bone./CONTENT"	NAME/Reconciliation/NAME	AGE/Modern/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/WILLIAM BUTLER YEATS/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/Shy one, shy one,

Shy one of my heart,

She moves in the firelight

Pensively apart.



She carries in the dishes,

And lays them in a row.

To an isle in the water

With her would I go.



She carries in the candles,

And lights the curtained room,

Shy in the doorway

And shy in the gloom;



And shy as a rabbit,

Helpful and shy.

To an isle in the water

With her would I fly./CONTENT"	NAME/To an Isle in the Water/NAME	AGE/Modern/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/SARA TEASDALE/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/I feel the spring far off, far off,

    The faint, far scent of bud and leaf

Oh, how can spring take heart to come

    To a world in grief,

    Deep grief?



The sun turns north, the days grow long,

    Later the evening star grows bright

How can the daylight linger on

    For men to fight,

    Still fight?



The grass is waking in the ground,

    Soon it will rise and blow in waves

How can it have the heart to sway

    Over the graves,

    New graves?



Under the boughs where lovers walked

    The apple-blooms will shed their breath

But what of all the lovers now

    Parted by Death,

    Grey Death?/CONTENT"	NAME/Spring in War-Time/NAME	AGE/Modern/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/IVOR GURNEY/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/Lying in dug-outs, joking idly, wearily;

   Watching the candle guttering in the draught;

Hearing the great shells go high over us, eerily

   Singing; how often have I turned over, and laughed



With pity and pride, photographs of all colours,

   All sizes, subjects: khaki brothers in France;

Or mother's faces worn with countless dolours;

   Or girls whose eyes were challenging and must dance,



Though in a picture only, a common cheap

   Ill-taken card; and childrenfrozen, some

(Babies) waiting on Dicky-bird to peep

   Out of the handkerchief that is his home



(But he's so shy!). And some with bright looks, calling

   Delight across the miles of land and sea,

That not the dread of barrage suddenly falling

   Could quite blot outnot mud nor lethargy.



Smiles and triumphant careless laughter. O

   The pain of them, wide Earth's most sacred things!

Lying in dug-outs, hearing the great shells slow

   Sailing mile-high, the heart mounts higher and sings.



But onceO why did he keep that bitter token

   Of a dead Love?that boy, who, suddenly moved,

Showed me, his eyes wet, his low talk broken,

   A girl who better had not been beloved./CONTENT"	NAME/Photographs/NAME	AGE/Modern/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/WILLIAM BUTLER YEATS/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/I went out to the hazel wood,

Because a fire was in my head,

And cut and peeled a hazel wand,

And hooked a berry to a thread;

And when white moths were on the wing,

And moth-like stars were flickering out,

I dropped the berry in a stream

And caught a little silver trout.



When I had laid it on the floor

I went to blow the fire a-flame,

But something rustled on the floor,

And someone called me by my name:

It had become a glimmering girl

With apple blossom in her hair

Who called me by my name and ran

And faded through the brightening air.



Though I am old with wandering

Through hollow lands and hilly lands,

I will find out where she has gone,

And kiss her lips and take her hands;

And walk among long dappled grass,

And pluck till time and times are done,

The silver apples of the moon,

The golden apples of the sun./CONTENT"	NAME/The Song of Wandering Aengus/NAME	AGE/Modern/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/LOUISE BOGAN/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/Now that I know

That passion warms little

Of flesh in the mold,

And treasure is brittle,



Ill lie here and learn

How, over their ground,

Trees make a long shadow

And a light sound.





August 1922/CONTENT"	NAME/Knowledge/NAME	AGE/Modern/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/GERTRUDE STEIN/AUTHOR	CONTENT/Gertrude Stein, Idem the Same: A Valentine to Sherwood Anderson from A Stein Reader. Copyright  1993 by Gertrude Stein. Reprinted by permission of David Higham: Estate of Gertrude Stein ./CONTENT	NAME/Idem the Same: A Valentine to Sherwood Anderson/NAME	AGE/Modern/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/EZRA POUND/AUTHOR	CONTENT/Ezra Pound, "Canto IV" from The Cantos of Ezra Pound. Copyright  1993 by Ezra Pound. Reprinted by permission of New Directions Publishing Corporation./CONTENT	NAME/Canto IV/NAME	AGE/Modern/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/EZRA POUND/AUTHOR	CONTENT/Ezra Pound, "Canto XXXVI" from The Cantos of Ezra Pound. Copyright  1993 by Ezra Pound. Reprinted by permission of New Directions Publishing Corporation./CONTENT	NAME/Canto XXXVI/NAME	AGE/Modern/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/JAMES JOYCE/AUTHOR	CONTENT/from Dana, 1904/CONTENT	NAME/Song/NAME	AGE/Modern/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/PAUL LAURENCE DUNBAR/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/The moon has left the sky, love,

The stars are hiding now,

And frowning on the world, love,

Night bares her sable brow.



The snow is on the ground, love,

And cold and keen the air is.

Im singing here to you, love;

Youre dreaming there in Paris.



But this is Natures law, love,

Though just it may not seem,

That men should wake to sing, love;

While maidens sleep and dream.



Them care may not molest, love,

Nor stir them from their slumbers,

Though midnight find the swain, love.

Still halting oer his numbers.



I watch the rosy dawn, love,

Come stealing up the east,

While all things round rejoice, love,

That Night her reign has ceased.



The lark will soon be heard, love,

And on his way be winging;

When Natures poets, wake, love,

Why should a man be singing?/CONTENT"	NAME/Night of Love/NAME	AGE/Modern/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/PAUL LAURENCE DUNBAR/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/Thou art my lute, by thee I sing,

     My being is attuned to thee.

Thou settest all my words a-wing,

     And meltest me to melody.



Thou art my life, by thee I live,

     From thee proceed the joys I know;

Sweetheart, thy hand has power to give

     The meed of lovethe cup of woe.



Thou art my love, by thee I lead

     My soul the paths of light along,

From vale to vale, from mead to mead,

     And home it in the hills of song.



My song, my soul, my life, my all,

     Why need I pray or make my plea,

Since my petition cannot fall;

     For Im already one with thee!/CONTENT"	NAME/Thou Art My Lute/NAME	AGE/Modern/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/WILLIAM BUTLER YEATS/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/Wine comes in at the mouth

And love comes in at the eye;

Thats all we shall know for truth

Before we grow old and die.

I lift the glass to my mouth,

I look at you, and I sigh./CONTENT"	NAME/A Drinking Song/NAME	AGE/Modern/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/CARL SANDBURG/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/Bilbea, I was in Babylon on Saturday night.

I saw nothing of you anywhere.

I was at the old place and the other girls were there,

But no Bilbea.



Have you gone to another house? or city?

Why dont you write?

I was sorry. I walked home half-sick.



Tell me how it goes.

Send me some kind of a letter.

And take care of yourself./CONTENT"	NAME/Bilbea/NAME	AGE/Modern/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/CARL SANDBURG/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/How much do you love me, a million bushels?

Oh, a lot more than that, Oh, a lot more.



And tomorrow maybe only half a bushel?

Tomorrow maybe not even a half a bushel.



And is this your heart arithmetic?

This is the way the wind measures the weather./CONTENT"	NAME/How Much?/NAME	AGE/Modern/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/E. E. CUMMINGS/AUTHOR	CONTENT/E.E. Cummings, [as freedom is a breakfastfood] from Complete Poems 1904-1962, edited by George J. Firmage. Copyright 1926, 1954, 1991 by the Trustees for the E.E. Cummings Trust. Copyright  1985 by George James Firmage. Reprinted with the permission of Liveright Publishing Corporation./CONTENT	NAME/[as freedom is a breakfastfood]/NAME	AGE/Modern/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/E. E. CUMMINGS/AUTHOR	CONTENT/E.E. Cummings, [love is more thicker than forget] from Complete Poems 1904-1962, edited by George J. Firmage. Copyright 1926, 1954, 1991 by the Trustees for the E.E. Cummings Trust. Copyright  1985 by George James Firmage. Reprinted with the permission of Liveright Publishing Corporation./CONTENT	NAME/[love is more thicker than forget]/NAME	AGE/Modern/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/ELINOR WYLIE/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/                                  1



When the world turns completely upside down

You say well emigrate to the Eastern Shore

Aboard a river-boat from Baltimore;

Well live among wild peach trees, miles from town,

Youll wear a coonskin cap, and I a gown

Homespun, dyed butternuts dark gold color.

Lost, like your lotus-eating ancestor,

Well swim in milk and honey till we drown.



The winter will be short, the summer long,

The autumn amber-hued, sunny and hot,

Tasting of cider and of scuppernong;

All seasons sweet, but autumn best of all.

The squirrels in their silver fur will fall

Like falling leaves, like fruit, before your shot.





                                  2



The autumn frosts will lie upon the grass

Like bloom on grapes of purple-brown and gold.

The misted early mornings will be cold;

The little puddles will be roofed with glass.

The sun, which burns from copper into brass,

Melts these at noon, and makes the boys unfold

Their knitted mufflers; full as they can hold

Fat pockets dribble chestnuts as they pass.



Peaches grow wild, and pigs can live in clover;

A barrel of salted herrings lasts a year;

The spring begins before the winters over.

By February you may find the skins

Of garter snakes and water moccasins

Dwindled and harsh, dead-white and cloudy-clear.





                                  3



When April pours the colors of a shell

Upon the hills, when every little creek

Is shot with silver from the Chesapeake

In shoals new-minted by the ocean swell,

When strawberries go begging, and the sleek

Blue plums lie open to the blackbirds beak,

We shall live well  we shall live very well.



The months between the cherries and the peaches

Are brimming cornucopias which spill

Fruits red and purple, sombre-bloomed and black;

Then, down rich fields and frosty river beaches

Well trample bright persimmons, while you kill

Bronze partridge, speckled quail, and canvasback.





                                  4



Down to the Puritan marrow of my bones

Theres something in this richness that I hate.

I love the look, austere, immaculate,

Of landscapes drawn in pearly monotones.

Theres something in my very blood that owns

Bare hills, cold silver on a sky of slate,

A thread of water, churned to milky spate

Streaming through slanted pastures fenced with stones.



I love those skies, thin blue or snowy gray,

Those fields sparse-planted, rendering meagre sheaves;

That spring, briefer than apple-blossoms breath,

Summer, so much too beautiful to stay,

Swift autumn, like a bonfire of leaves,

And sleepy winter, like the sleep of death./CONTENT"	NAME/Wild Peaches/NAME	AGE/Modern/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/KENNETH FEARING/AUTHOR	CONTENT/Kenneth Fearing, "Aphrodite Metropolis (2)" from Collected Poems of Kenneth Fearing. Published by Random House, 1940. Reprinted by the permission of Russell & Volkening, Inc., as agents for the author. Copyright  1994 by Jubal Fearing and Phoebe Fearing./CONTENT	NAME/Aphrodite Metropolis (2)/NAME	AGE/Modern/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/KENNETH FEARING/AUTHOR	CONTENT/Kenneth Fearing, "X Minus X" from Collected Poems of Kenneth Fearing. Published by Random House, 1940. Reprinted by the permission of Russell & Volkening, Inc., as agents for the author. Copyright  1994 by Jubal Fearing and Phoebe Fearing./CONTENT	NAME/X Minus X/NAME	AGE/Modern/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/EZRA POUND/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/Suddenly discovering in the eyes of the very beautiful

                            Normande cocotte

The eyes of the very learned British Museum assistant./CONTENT"	NAME/Pagani's, November 8/NAME	AGE/Modern/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/WILLIAM BUTLER YEATS/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/We sat together at one summers end,

That beautiful mild woman, your close friend,

And you and I, and talked of poetry.

I said, A line will take us hours maybe;

Yet if it does not seem a moments thought,

Our stitching and unstitching has been naught.

Better go down upon your marrow-bones

And scrub a kitchen pavement, or break stones

Like an old pauper, in all kinds of weather;

For to articulate sweet sounds together

Is to work harder than all these, and yet

Be thought an idler by the noisy set

Of bankers, schoolmasters, and clergymen

The martyrs call the world.

                                          And thereupon

That beautiful mild woman for whose sake

Theres many a one shall find out all heartache

On finding that her voice is sweet and low

Replied, To be born woman is to know

Although they do not talk of it at school

That we must labour to be beautiful.

I said, Its certain there is no fine thing

Since Adams fall but needs much labouring.

There have been lovers who thought love should be

So much compounded of high courtesy

That they would sigh and quote with learned looks

Precedents out of beautiful old books;

Yet now it seems an idle trade enough.



We sat grown quiet at the name of love;

We saw the last embers of daylight die,

And in the trembling blue-green of the sky

A moon, worn as if it had been a shell

Washed by times waters as they rose and fell

About the stars and broke in days and years.



I had a thought for no ones but your ears:

That you were beautiful, and that I strove

To love you in the old high way of love;

That it had all seemed happy, and yet wed grown

As weary-hearted as that hollow moon./CONTENT"	NAME/Adam's Curse/NAME	AGE/Modern/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/HART CRANE/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/I wanted you, nameless Woman of the South,

No wraith, but utterlyas still more alone

The Southern Cross takes night

And lifts her girdles from her, one by one

High, cool,

wide from the slowly smoldering fire

Of lower heavens,

vaporous scars!



Eve! Magdalene!

or Mary, you?



Whatever callfalls vainly on the wave.

O simian Venus, homeless Eve,

Unwedded, stumbling gardenless to grieve

Windswept guitars on lonely decks forever;

Finally to answer all within one grave!



And this long wake of phosphor,

iridescent

Furrow of all our traveltrailed derision!

Eyes crumble at its kiss. Its long-drawn spell

Incites a yell. Slid on that backward vision

The mind is churned to spittle, whispering hell.



I wanted you . . . The embers of the Cross

Climbed by aslant and huddling aromatically.

It is blood to remember; it is fire

To stammer back . . . It is

Godyour namelessness. And the wash



All night the water combed you with black

Insolence. You crept out simmering, accomplished.

Water rattled that stinging coil, your

Rehearsed hairdocile, alas, from many arms.

Yes, Evewraith of my unloved seed!



The Cross, a phantom, buckleddropped below the dawn.

Light drowned the lithic trillions of your spawn./CONTENT"	NAME/from The Bridge: Southern Cross/NAME	AGE/Modern/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/SARA TEASDALE/AUTHOR	CONTENT/Originally published in Poetry, March 1914./CONTENT	NAME/Debt/NAME	AGE/Modern/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/WILLIAM BUTLER YEATS/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/Down by the salley gardens

   my love and I did meet;

She passed the salley gardens

   with little snow-white feet.

She bid me take love easy,

   as the leaves grow on the tree;

But I, being young and foolish,

   with her would not agree.



In a field by the river

   my love and I did stand,

And on my leaning shoulder

   she laid her snow-white hand.

She bid me take life easy,

   as the grass grows on the weirs;

But I was young and foolish,

   and now am full of tears.

 /CONTENT"	NAME/Down By the Salley Gardens/NAME	AGE/Modern/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/LOUISE BOGAN/AUTHOR	CONTENT/Louise Bogan, Epitaph for a Romantic Woman from Body of this Death: Poems (New York: Robert M. McBride, 1923). Copyright 1923 by Louise Bogan. Reprinted with the permission of the Estate of Louise Bogan./CONTENT	NAME/Epitaph for a Romantic Woman/NAME	AGE/Modern/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/GERTRUDE STEIN/AUTHOR	CONTENT/Gertrude Stein, [The house was twinkling in the moon light] from Baby Precious Always Shines: Selected Love Notes Between Gertrude Stein and Alice B. Toklas (St. Martins Press, 1999). Reprinted with the permission of the Estate of Gertrude Stein./CONTENT	NAME/[The house was just twinkling in the moon light]/NAME	AGE/Modern/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/WALLACE STEVENS/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/You dweller in the dark cabin,

To whom the watermelon is always purple,

Whose garden is wind and moon,



Of the two dreams, night and day,

What lover, what dreamer, would choose

The one obscured by sleep?



Here is the plantain by your door

And the best cock of red feather

That crew before the clocks.



A feme may come, leaf-green,

Whose coming may give revel

Beyond revelries of sleep,



Yes, and the blackbird spread its tail,

So that the sun may speckle,

While it creaks hail.



You dweller in the dark cabin,

Rise, since rising will not waken,

And hail, cry hail, cry hail./CONTENT"	NAME/Hymn from a Watermelon Pavilion/NAME	AGE/Modern/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/E. E. CUMMINGS/AUTHOR	CONTENT/[i carry your heart with me(i carry it in] Copyright 1952,  1980, 1991 by the Trustees for the E. E. Cummings Trust, from Complete Poems: 1904-1962 by E. E. Cummings, edited by George J. Firmage. Used by permission of Liveright Publishing Corporation./CONTENT	NAME/[i carry your heart with me(i carry it in]/NAME	AGE/Modern/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/PAUL LAURENCE DUNBAR/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/Come when the nights are bright with stars

Or come when the moon is mellow;

Come when the sun his golden bars

Drops on the hay-field yellow.

Come in the twilight soft and gray,

Come in the night or come in the day,

Come, O love, wheneer you may,

And you are welcome, welcome.



You are sweet, O Love, dear Love,

You are soft as the nesting dove.

Come to my heart and bring it to rest

As the bird flies home to its welcome nest.



Come when my heart is full of grief

Or when my heart is merry;

Come with the falling of the leaf

Or with the reddning cherry.

Come when the years first blossom blows,

Come when the summer gleams and glows,

Come with the winters drifting snows,

And you are welcome, welcome./CONTENT"	NAME/Invitation to Love/NAME	AGE/Modern/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/LOUISE BOGAN/AUTHOR	CONTENT/Louise Bogan, Juans Song from The Blue Estuaries: Poems 1923-1968. Copyright  1968 by Louise Bogan. Used by permission of Farrar, Straus & Giroux, LLC, http://us.macmillan.com/fsg. All rights reserved./CONTENT	NAME/Juans Song/NAME	AGE/Modern/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/EZRA POUND/AUTHOR	CONTENT/Originally published in Poetry, August 1914./CONTENT	NAME/Ladies/NAME	AGE/Modern/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/LOUISE BOGAN/AUTHOR	CONTENT/Originally published in Poetry, August 1922./CONTENT	NAME/Leave-Taking/NAME	AGE/Modern/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/MICHAEL ANANIA/AUTHOR	CONTENT/Michael Anania, Motet from Selected Poems. Copyright  1994 by Michael Anania. Used by permission of Asphodel Press/Acorn Alliance./CONTENT	NAME/Motet/NAME	AGE/Modern/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/KENNETH SLESSOR/AUTHOR	CONTENT/Kenneth Slessor, New Magic from Selected Poems, published by HarperCollins Publishers Australia. Used by permission./CONTENT	NAME/New Magic/NAME	AGE/Modern/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/ASIL BUNTING/AUTHOR	CONTENT/Basil Bunting, 30. The Orotava Road from Complete Poems, edited by Richard Caddel. Reprinted with the permission of Bloodaxe Books Ltd., www.bloodaxebooks.com./CONTENT	NAME/from Odes: 30. The Orotava Road/NAME	AGE/Modern/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/SARA TEASDALE/AUTHOR	CONTENT/Originally published in Poetry, March 1914./CONTENT	NAME/Old Love and New/NAME	AGE/Modern/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/SARA TEASDALE/AUTHOR	CONTENT/Originally published in Poetry, March 1914./CONTENT	NAME/Over the Roofs/NAME	AGE/Modern/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/EZRA POUND/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/While my hair was still cut straight across my forehead

I played about the front gate, pulling flowers.

You came by on bamboo stilts, playing horse,

You walked about my seat, playing with blue plums.

And we went on living in the village of Chokan:

Two small people, without dislike or suspicion.

At fourteen I married My Lord you.

I never laughed, being bashful.

Lowering my head, I looked at the wall.

Called to, a thousand times, I never looked back.



At fifteen I stopped scowling,

I desired my dust to be mingled with yours

Forever and forever, and forever.

Why should I climb the look out?



At sixteen you departed

You went into far Ku-to-en, by the river of swirling eddies,

And you have been gone five months.

The monkeys make sorrowful noise overhead.



You dragged your feet when you went out.

By the gate now, the moss is grown, the different mosses,

Too deep to clear them away!

The leaves fall early this autumn, in wind.

The paired butterflies are already yellow with August

Over the grass in the West garden;

They hurt me.

I grow older.

If you are coming down through the narrows of the river Kiang,

Please let me know beforehand,

And I will come out to meet you

As far as Cho-fu-Sa./CONTENT"	NAME/The River-Merchants Wife: A Letter/NAME	AGE/Modern/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/SARA TEASDALE/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/Since there is no escape, since at the end

My body will be utterly destroyed,

This hand I love as I have loved a friend,

This body I tended, wept with and enjoyed;

Since there is no escape even for me

Who love life with a love too sharp to bear:

The scent of orchards in the rain, the sea

And hours alone too still and sure for prayer

Since darkness waits for me, then all the more

Let me go down as waves sweep to the shore

In pride, and let me sing with my last breath;

In these few hours of light I lift my head;

Life is my loverI shall leave the dead

If there is any way to baffle death./CONTENT"	NAME/Since There Is No Escape/NAME	AGE/Modern/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/LOUISE BOGAN/AUTHOR	CONTENT/Louise Bogan, Song for the Last Act from The Blue Estuaries: Poems 1923-1968. Copyright  1968 by Louise Bogan. Used by permission of Farrar, Straus & Giroux, LLC, http://us.macmillan.com/fsg. All rights reserved./CONTENT	NAME/Song for the Last Act/NAME	AGE/Modern/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/D. H. LAWRENCE/AUTHOR	CONTENT/Originally published in Poetry, December 1914./CONTENT	NAME/Song (Love has crept...)/NAME	AGE/Modern/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/LOUISE BOGAN/AUTHOR	CONTENT/Originally published in Poetry, August 1922./CONTENT	NAME/To a Dead Lover/NAME	AGE/Modern/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/JAMES JOYCE/AUTHOR	CONTENT/Originally published in Poetry, May 1917./CONTENT	NAME/Tutto Sciolto/NAME	AGE/Modern/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/ELINOR WYLIE/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/Too high, too high to pluck

My heart shall swing.

A fruit no bee shall suck,

No wasp shall sting.



If on some night of cold

It falls to ground

In apple-leaves of gold

Ill wrap it round.



And I shall seal it up

With spice and salt,

In a carven silver cup,

In a deep vault.



Before my eyes are blind

And my lips mute,

I must eat core and rind

Of that same fruit.



Before my heart is dust

At the end of all,

Eat it I must, I must

Were it bitter gall.



But I shall keep it sweet

By some strange art;

Wild honey I shall eat

When I eat my heart.



O honey cool and chaste

As clovers breath!

Sweet Heaven I shall taste

Before my death./CONTENT"	NAME/Valentine/NAME	AGE/Modern/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/MARJORIE PICKTHALL/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/When the first dark had fallen around them

And the leaves were weary of praise,

In the clear silence Beauty found them

And shewed them all her ways.



In the high noon of the heavenly garden

Where the angels sunned with the birds,

Beauty, before their hearts could harden,

Had taught them heavenly words.



When they fled in the burning weather

And nothing dawned but a dream,

Beauty fasted their hands together

And cooled them at her stream.



And when day wearied and night grew stronger,

And they slept as the beautiful must,

Then she bided a little longer,

And blossomed from their dust./CONTENT"	NAME/Adam and Eve/NAME	AGE/Modern/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/D. H. LAWRENCE/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/My love looks like a girl to-night,

      But she is old.

The plaits that lie along her pillow

      Are not gold,

But threaded with filigree silver,

      And uncanny cold.



She looks like a young maiden, since her brow

      Is smooth and fair,

Her cheeks are very smooth, her eyes are closed.

      She sleeps a rare

Still winsome sleep, so still, and so composed.



Nay, but she sleeps like a bride, and dreams her dreams

      Of perfect things.

She lies at last, the darling, in the shape of her dream,

      And her dead mouth sings

By its shape, like the thrushes in clear evenings./CONTENT"	NAME/The Bride/NAME	AGE/Modern/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/WILLIAM BUTLER YEATS/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/The jester walked in the garden:

The garden had fallen still;

He bade his soul rise upward

And stand on her window-sill.



It rose in a straight blue garment,

When owls began to call:

It had grown wise-tongued by thinking

Of a quiet and light footfall;



But the young queen would not listen;

She rose in her pale night-gown;

She drew in the heavy casement

And pushed the latches down.



He bade his heart go to her,

When the owls called out no more;

In a red and quivering garment

It sang to her through the door.



It had grown sweet-tongued by dreaming

Of a flutter of flower-like hair;

But she took up her fan from the table

And waved it off on the air.



'I have cap and bells, he pondered,

'I will send them to her and die;

And when the morning whitened

He left them where she went by.



She laid them upon her bosom,

Under a cloud of her hair,

And her red lips sang them a love-song

Till stars grew out of the air.



She opened her door and her window,

And the heart and the soul came through,

To her right hand came the red one,

To her left hand came the blue.



They set up a noise like crickets,

A chattering wise and sweet,

And her hair was a folded flower

And the quiet of love in her feet./CONTENT"	NAME/The Cap and Bells/NAME	AGE/Modern/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/D. H. LAWRENCE/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/What large, dark hands are those at the window

Lifted, grasping the golden light

Which weaves its way through the creeper leaves

       To my heart's delight?



Ah, only the leaves! But in the west,

In the west I see a redness come

Over the evening's burning breast

        'Tis the wound of love goes home!



The woodbine creeps abroad

Calling low to her lover:

The sun-lit flirt who all the day

Has poised above her lips in play

And stolen kisses, shallow and gay

Of pollen, now has gone away

 She woos the moth with her sweet, low word,

And when above her his broad wings hover

Then her bright breast she will uncover

And yield her honey-drop to her lover.



Into the yellow, evening glow

Saunters a man from the farm below,

Leans, and looks in at the low-built shed

Where hangs the swallow's marriage bed.

The bird lies warm against the wall.

She glances quick her startled eyes

Towards him, then she turns away

Her small head, making warm display

Of red upon the throat. His terrors sway

Her out of the nest's warm, busy ball,

Whose plaintive cry is heard as she flies

In one blue stoop from out the sties

Into the evening's empty hall.



Oh, water-hen, beside the rushes

Hide your quaint, unfading blushes,

Still your quick tail, and lie as dead,

Till the distance folds over his ominous tread.



The rabbit presses back her ears,

Turns back her liquid, anguished eyes

And crouches low: then with wild spring

Spurts from the terror of his oncoming

To be choked back, the wire ring

Her frantic effort throttling:

Piteous brown ball of quivering fears!



Ah soon in his large, hard hands she dies,

And swings all loose to the swing of his walk.

Yet calm and kindly are his eyes

And ready to open in brown surprise

Should I not answer to his talk

Or should he my tears surmise.



I hear his hand on the latch, and rise from my chair

Watching the door open: he flashes bare

His strong teeth in a smile, and flashes his eyes

In a smile like triumph upon me; then careless-wise

He flings the rabbit soft on the table board

And comes towards me: ah, the uplifted sword

Of his hand against my bosom, and oh, the broad

Blade of his hand that raises my face to applaud

His coming: he raises up my face to him

And caresses my mouth with his fingers, which still smell grim

Of the rabbit's fur! God, I am caught in a snare!

I know not what fine wire is round my throat,

I only know I let him finger there

My pulse of life, letting him nose like a stoat

Who sniffs with joy before he drinks the blood:

And down his mouth comes to my mouth, and down

His dark bright eyes descend like a fiery hood

Upon my mind: his mouth meets mine, and a flood

Of sweet fire sweeps across me, so I drown

Within him, die, and find death good./CONTENT"	NAME/Cruelty and Love /NAME	AGE/Modern/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/SARA TEASDALE/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/Supper comes at five o'clock,

At six, the evening star,

My lover comes at eight o'clock

But eight o'clock is far.



How could I bear my pain all day

Unless I watched to see

The clock-hands laboring to bring

Eight o'clock to me./CONTENT"	NAME/Eight O'Clock/NAME	AGE/Modern/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/EZRA POUND/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/Go, dumb-born book,

Tell her that sang me once that song of Lawes:

Hadst thou but song

As thou hast subjects known,

Then were there cause in thee that should condone

Even my faults that heavy upon me lie

And build her glories their longevity.



Tell her that sheds

Such treasure in the air,

Recking naught else but that her graces give

Life to the moment,

I would bid them live

As roses might, in magic amber laid,

Red overwrought with orange and all made

One substance and one colour

Braving time.



Tell her that goes

With song upon her lips

But sings not out the song, nor knows

The maker of it, some other mouth,

May be as fair as hers,

Might, in new ages, gain her worshippers,

When our two dusts with Wallers shall be laid,

Siftings on siftings in oblivion,

Till change hath broken down

All things save Beauty alone./CONTENT"	NAME/Envoi/NAME	AGE/Modern/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/SARA TEASDALE/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/They came to tell your faults to me,

They named them over one by one;

I laughed aloud when they were done,

I knew them all so well before,

Oh, they were blind, too blind to see

Your faults had made me love you more./CONTENT"	NAME/Faults/NAME	AGE/Modern/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/LOUIS UNTERMEYER/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/I never knew the earth had so much gold

The fields run over with it, and this hill

Hoary and old,

Is young with buoyant blooms that flame and thrill.



Such golden fires, such yellowlo, how good

This spendthrift world, and what a lavish God!

This fringe of wood,

Blazing with buttercup and goldenrod.



You too, beloved, are changed. Again I see

Your face grow mystical, as on that night

You turned to me,

And all the trembling worldand youwere white.



Aye, you are touched; your singing lips grow dumb;

The fields absorb you, color you entire . . .

And you become

A goddess standing in a world of fire!/CONTENT"	NAME/Feuerzauber/NAME	AGE/Modern/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/D. H. LAWRENCE/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/When she rises in the morning

I linger to watch her;

She spreads the bath-cloth underneath the window

And the sunbeams catch her

Glistening white on the shoulders,

While down her sides the mellow

Golden shadow glows as

She stoops to the sponge, and her swung breasts

Sway like full-blown yellow

Gloire de Dijon roses.



She drips herself with water, and her shoulders

Glisten as silver, they crumple up

Like wet and falling roses, and I listen

For the sluicing of their rain-dishevelled petals.

In the window full of sunlight

Concentrates her golden shadow

Fold on fold, until it glows as

Mellow as the glory roses./CONTENT"	NAME/Gloire de Dijon/NAME	AGE/Modern/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/LOUIS UNTERMEYER/AUTHOR	CONTENT/Louis Untermeyer, Infidelity from The New Poetry: An Anthology of Twentieth Century Verse in English, ed. Harriet Monroe (New York: Macmillan, 1936). Permission is granted by arrangement with the Estate of Louis Untermeyer, Norma Anchin Untermeyer c/o Professional Publishing Services. The reprint is granted with the expressed permission by Laurence S. Untermeyer./CONTENT	NAME/Infidelity/NAME	AGE/Modern/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/D. H. LAWRENCE/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/Version 1 (1921)

Yours is the shame and sorrow,

But the disgrace is mine;

Your love was dark and thorough,

Mine was the love of the sun for a flower

He creates with his shine.



I was diligent to explore you,

Blossom you stalk by stalk,

Till my fire of creation bore you

Shrivelling down in the final dour

Anguish  then I suffered a balk.



I knew your pain, and it broke

My fine, craftsman's nerve;

Your body quailed at my stroke,

And my courage failed to give you the last

Fine torture you did deserve.



You are shapely, you are adorned,

But opaque and dull in the flesh,

Who, had I but pierced with the thorned

Fire-threshing anguish, were fused and cast

In a lovely illumined mesh.



Like a painted window: the best

Suffering burnt through your flesh,

Undrossed it and left it blest

With a quivering sweet wisdom of grace: but now

Who shall take you afresh?



Now who will burn you free

From your body's terrors and dross,

Since the fire has failed in me?

What man will stoop in your flesh to plough

The shrieking cross?



A mute, nearly beautiful thing

Is your face, that fills me with shame

As I see it hardening,

Warping the perfect image of God,

And darkening my eternal fame.



Version 2 (1928)

Yours is the sullen sorrow,

The disgrace is also mine;

Your love was intense and thorough,

Mine was the love of a growing flower

For the sunshine.



You had the power to explore me,

Blossom me stalk by stalk;

You woke my spirit, you bore me

To consciousness, you gave me the dour

Awareness  then I suffered a balk.



Body to body I could not

Love you, although I would.

We kissed, we kissed though we should not.

You yielded, we threw the last cast,

And it was no good.



You only endured, and it broke

My craftsman's nerve.

No flesh responded to my stroke;

So I failed to give you the last

Fine torture you did deserve.



You are shapely, you are adorned

But opaque and null in the flesh;

Who, had I but pierced with the thorned

Full anguish, perhaps had been cast

In a lovely illuinined mesh



Like a painted window; the best

Fire passed through your flesh,

Undrossed it, and left it blest

In clean new awareness. But now

Who shall take you afresh?



Now who will burn you free

From your body's deadness and dross?

Since the fire has failed in me,

What man will stoop in your flesh to plough

The shrieking cross?



A mute, nearly beautiful thing

Is your face, that fills me with shame

As I see it hardening;

I should have been cruel enough to bring

You through the flame./CONTENT"	NAME/Last Words to Miriam/NAME	AGE/Modern/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/SARA TEASDALE/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/Strephon kissed me in the spring,

Robin in the fall,

But Colin only looked at me

And never kissed at all.



Strephon's kiss was lost in jest,

Robin's lost in play,

But the kiss in Colin's eyes

Haunts me night and day./CONTENT"	NAME/The Look/NAME	AGE/Modern/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/T. S. ELIOT/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/Let us go then, you and I,

When the evening is spread out against the sky

Like a patient etherized upon a table;

Let us go, through certain half-deserted streets,

The muttering retreats

Of restless nights in one-night cheap hotels

And sawdust restaurants with oyster-shells:

Streets that follow like a tedious argument

Of insidious intent

To lead you to an overwhelming question ...

Oh, do not ask, What is it?

Let us go and make our visit.



In the room the women come and go

Talking of Michelangelo.



The yellow fog that rubs its back upon the window-panes,

The yellow smoke that rubs its muzzle on the window-panes,

Licked its tongue into the corners of the evening,

Lingered upon the pools that stand in drains,

Let fall upon its back the soot that falls from chimneys,

Slipped by the terrace, made a sudden leap,

And seeing that it was a soft October night,

Curled once about the house, and fell asleep.



And indeed there will be time

For the yellow smoke that slides along the street,

Rubbing its back upon the window-panes;

There will be time, there will be time

To prepare a face to meet the faces that you meet;

There will be time to murder and create,

And time for all the works and days of hands

That lift and drop a question on your plate;

Time for you and time for me,

And time yet for a hundred indecisions,

And for a hundred visions and revisions,

Before the taking of a toast and tea.



In the room the women come and go

Talking of Michelangelo.



And indeed there will be time

To wonder, Do I dare? and, Do I dare?

Time to turn back and descend the stair,

With a bald spot in the middle of my hair

(They will say: How his hair is growing thin!)

My morning coat, my collar mounting firmly to the chin,

My necktie rich and modest, but asserted by a simple pin

(They will say: But how his arms and legs are thin!)

Do I dare

Disturb the universe?

In a minute there is time

For decisions and revisions which a minute will reverse.



For I have known them all already, known them all:

Have known the evenings, mornings, afternoons,

I have measured out my life with coffee spoons;

I know the voices dying with a dying fall

Beneath the music from a farther room.

               So how should I presume?



And I have known the eyes already, known them all

The eyes that fix you in a formulated phrase,

And when I am formulated, sprawling on a pin,

When I am pinned and wriggling on the wall,

Then how should I begin

To spit out all the butt-ends of my days and ways?

               And how should I presume?



And I have known the arms already, known them all

Arms that are braceleted and white and bare

(But in the lamplight, downed with light brown hair!)

Is it perfume from a dress

That makes me so digress?

Arms that lie along a table, or wrap about a shawl.

               And should I then presume?

               And how should I begin?



Shall I say, I have gone at dusk through narrow streets

And watched the smoke that rises from the pipes

Of lonely men in shirt-sleeves, leaning out of windows? ...



I should have been a pair of ragged claws

Scuttling across the floors of silent seas.



And the afternoon, the evening, sleeps so peacefully!

Smoothed by long fingers,

Asleep ... tired ... or it malingers,

Stretched on the floor, here beside you and me.

Should I, after tea and cakes and ices,

Have the strength to force the moment to its crisis?

But though I have wept and fasted, wept and prayed,

Though I have seen my head (grown slightly bald) brought in upon a platter,

I am no prophet  and heres no great matter;

I have seen the moment of my greatness flicker,

And I have seen the eternal Footman hold my coat, and snicker,

And in short, I was afraid.



And would it have been worth it, after all,

After the cups, the marmalade, the tea,

Among the porcelain, among some talk of you and me,

Would it have been worth while,

To have bitten off the matter with a smile,

To have squeezed the universe into a ball

To roll it towards some overwhelming question,

To say: I am Lazarus, come from the dead,

Come back to tell you all, I shall tell you all

If one, settling a pillow by her head

               Should say: That is not what I meant at all;

               That is not it, at all.



And would it have been worth it, after all,

Would it have been worth while,

After the sunsets and the dooryards and the sprinkled streets,

After the novels, after the teacups, after the skirts that trail along the floor

And this, and so much more?

It is impossible to say just what I mean!

But as if a magic lantern threw the nerves in patterns on a screen:

Would it have been worth while

If one, settling a pillow or throwing off a shawl,

And turning toward the window, should say:

               That is not it at all,

               That is not what I meant, at all.



No! I am not Prince Hamlet, nor was meant to be;

Am an attendant lord, one that will do

To swell a progress, start a scene or two,

Advise the prince; no doubt, an easy tool,

Deferential, glad to be of use,

Politic, cautious, and meticulous;

Full of high sentence, but a bit obtuse;

At times, indeed, almost ridiculous

Almost, at times, the Fool.



I grow old ... I grow old ...

I shall wear the bottoms of my trousers rolled.



Shall I part my hair behind?   Do I dare to eat a peach?

I shall wear white flannel trousers, and walk upon the beach.

I have heard the mermaids singing, each to each.



I do not think that they will sing to me.



I have seen them riding seaward on the waves

Combing the white hair of the waves blown back

When the wind blows the water white and black.

We have lingered in the chambers of the sea

By sea-girls wreathed with seaweed red and brown

Till human voices wake us, and we drown./CONTENT"	NAME/The Love Song of J. Alfred Prufrock/NAME	AGE/Modern/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/EDGAR LEE MASTERS/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/I went to the dances at Chandlerville,

And played snap-out at Winchester.

One time we changed partners,

Driving home in the moonlight of middle June,

And then I found Davis.

We were married and lived together for seventy years,

Enjoying, working, raising the twelve children,

Eight of whom we lost

Ere I had reached the age of sixty.

I spun, I wove, I kept the house, I nursed the sick,

I made the garden, and for holiday

Rambled over the fields where sang the larks,

And by Spoon River gathering many a shell,

And many a flower and medicinal weed

Shouting to the wooded hills, singing to the green valleys.

At ninety-six I had lived enough, that is all,

And passed to a sweet repose.

What is this I hear of sorrow and weariness,

Anger, discontent and drooping hopes?

Degenerate sons and daughters,

Life is too strong for you

It takes life to love Life./CONTENT"	NAME/Lucinda Matlock/NAME	AGE/Modern/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/PAUL LAURENCE DUNBAR/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/Seen my lady home las' night,

Jump back, honey, jump back.

Hel' huh han' an' sque'z it tight,

Jump back, honey, jump back.

Hyeahd huh sigh a little sigh,

Seen a light gleam f'om huh eye,

An' a smile go flittin' by

Jump back, honey, jump back.



Hyeahd de win' blow thoo de pine,

Jump back, honey, jump back.

Mockin'-bird was singin' fine,

Jump back, honey, jump back.

An' my hea't was beatin' so,

When I reached my lady's do',

Dat I could n't ba' to go

Jump back, honey, jump back.



Put my ahm aroun' huh wais',

Jump back, honey, jump back.

Raised huh lips an' took a tase,

Jump back, honey, jump back.

Love me, honey, love me true?

Love me well ez I love you?

An' she answe'd, ""'Cose I do""

Jump back, honey, jump back./CONTENT"	NAME/A Negro Love Song/NAME	AGE/Modern/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/PAUL LAURENCE DUNBAR/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/W'en daih's chillun in de house,

Dey keep on a-gittin' tall;

But de folks don' seem to see

Dat dey's growin' up at all,

'Twell dey fin' out some fine day

Dat de gals has 'menced to grow,

W'en dey notice as dey pass

Dat de front gate's saggin' low.



W'en de hinges creak an' cry,

An' de bahs go slantin' down,

You kin reckon dat hit's time

Fu' to cas' yo' eye erroun',

'Cause daih ain't no 'sputin' dis,

Hit's de trues' sign to show

Dat daih's cou'tin goin' on

W'en de ol' front gate sags low.



Oh, you grumble an' complain,

An' you prop dat gate up right;

But you notice right nex' day

Dat hit's in de same ol' plight.

So you fin' dat hit's a rule,

An' daih ain' no use to blow,

W'en de gals is growin' up,

Dat de front gate will sag low.



Den you t'ink o' yo' young days,

W'en you cou'ted Sally Jane,

An' you so't o' feel ashamed

Fu' to grumble an' complain,

'Cause yo' ricerlection says,

An' you know hits wo'ds is so,

Dat huh pappy had a time

Wid his front gate saggin' low.



So you jes' looks on an' smiles

At 'em leanin' on de gate,

Tryin' to t'ink whut he kin say

Fu' to keep him daih so late,

But you lets dat gate erlone,

Fu' yo' 'sperunce goes to show,

'Twell de gals is ma'ied off,

It gwine keep on saggin' low./CONTENT"	NAME/The Old Front Gate/NAME	AGE/Modern/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/SARA TEASDALE/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/I saw her in a Broadway car,

The woman I might grow to be;

I felt my lover look at her

And then turn suddenly to me.



Her hair was dull and drew no light

And yet its color was as mine;

Her eyes were strangely like my eyes

Tho' love had never made them shine.



Her body was a thing grown thin,

Hungry for love that never came;

Her soul was frozen in the dark

Unwarmed forever by love's flame.



I felt my lover look at her

And then turn suddenly to me,

His eyes were magic to defy

The woman I shall never be./CONTENT"	NAME/The Old Maid/NAME	AGE/Modern/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/WALLACE STEVENS/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/                                          I

Just as my fingers on these keys

Make music, so the selfsame sounds

On my spirit make a music, too.



Music is feeling, then, not sound;

And thus it is that what I feel,

Here in this room, desiring you,



Thinking of your blue-shadowed silk,

Is music. It is like the strain

Waked in the elders by Susanna:



Of a green evening, clear and warm,

She bathed in her still garden, while

The red-eyed elders, watching, felt



The basses of their beings throb

In witching chords, and their thin blood

Pulse pizzicati of Hosanna.





                                              II

In the green water, clear and warm,

Susanna lay.

She searched

The touch of springs,

And found

Concealed imaginings.

She sighed,

For so much melody.



Upon the bank, she stood

In the cool

Of spent emotions.

She felt, among the leaves,

The dew

Of old devotions.



She walked upon the grass,

Still quavering.

The winds were like her maids,

On timid feet,

Fetching her woven scarves,

Yet wavering.



A breath upon her hand

Muted the night.

She turned

A cymbal crashed,

And roaring horns.





                                           III

Soon, with a noise like tambourines,

Came her attendant Byzantines.



They wondered why Susanna cried

Against the elders by her side;



And as they whispered, the refrain

Was like a willow swept by rain.



Anon, their lamps' uplifted flame

Revealed Susanna and her shame.



And then, the simpering Byzantines

Fled, with a noise like tambourines.





                                             IV

Beauty is momentary in the mind

The fitful tracing of a portal;

But in the flesh it is immortal.



The body dies; the body's beauty lives.

So evenings die, in their green going,

A wave, interminably flowing.

So gardens die, their meek breath scenting

The cowl of winter, done repenting.

So maidens die, to the auroral

Celebration of a maiden's choral.



Susanna's music touched the bawdy strings

Of those white elders; but, escaping,

Left only Death's ironic scraping.

Now, in its immortality, it plays

On the clear viol of her memory,

And makes a constant sacrament of praise./CONTENT"	NAME/Peter Quince at the Clavier/NAME	AGE/Modern/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/T. S. ELIOT/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/I

Among the smoke and fog of a December afternoon

You have the scene arrange itself  as it will seem to do

With ""I have saved this afternoon for you"";

And four wax candles in the darkened room,

Four rings of light upon the ceiling overhead,

An atmosphere of Juliet's tomb

Prepared for all the things to be said, or left unsaid.

We have been, let us say, to hear the latest Pole

Transmit the Preludes, through his hair and finger-tips.

""So intimate, this Chopin, that I think his soul

Should be resurrected only among friends

Some two or three, who will not touch the bloom

That is rubbed and questioned in the concert room.""

And so the conversation slips

Among velleities and carefully caught regrets

Through attenuated tones of violins

Mingled with remote cornets

And begins.



""You do not know how much they mean to me, my friends,

And how, how rare and strange it is, to find

In a life composed so much, so much of odds and ends,

(For indeed I do not love it ... you knew? you are not blind!

How keen you are!)

To find a friend who has these qualities,

Who has, and gives

Those qualities upon which friendship lives.

How much it means that I say this to you

Without these friendships  life, what cauchemar!""

Among the winding of the violins

And the ariettes

Of cracked cornets

Inside my brain a dull tom-tom begins

Absurdly hammering a prelude of its own,

Capricious monotone

That is at least one definite ""false note.""

 Let us take the air, in a tobacco trance,

Admire the monuments,

Discuss the late events,

Correct our watches by the public clocks.

Then sit for half an hour and drink our bocks.



II

Now that lilacs are in bloom

She has a bowl of lilacs in her room

And twists one in her fingers while she talks.

""Ah, my friend, you do not know, you do not know

What life is, you who hold it in your hands"";

(Slowly twisting the lilac stalks)

""You let it flow from you, you let it flow,

And youth is cruel, and has no remorse

And smiles at situations which it cannot see.""

I smile, of course,

And go on drinking tea.

""Yet with these April sunsets, that somehow recall

My buried life, and Paris in the Spring,

I feel immeasurably at peace, and find the world

To be wonderful and youthful, after all.""



The voice returns like the insistent out-of-tune

Of a broken violin on an August afternoon:

""I am always sure that you understand

My feelings, always sure that you feel,

Sure that across the gulf you reach your hand.



You are invulnerable, you have no Achilles' heel.

You will go on, and when you have prevailed

You can say: at this point many a one has failed.



But what have I, but what have I, my friend,

To give you, what can you receive from me?

Only the friendship and the sympathy

Of one about to reach her journey's end.



I shall sit here, serving tea to friends ....""



I take my hat: how can I make a cowardly amends

For what she has said to me?

You will see me any morning in the park

Reading the comics and the sporting page.

Particularly I remark.

An English countess goes upon the stage.

A Greek was murdered at a Polish dance,

Another bank defaulter has confessed.

I keep my countenance,

I remain self-possessed

Except when a street-piano, mechanical and tired

Reiterates some worn-out common song

With the smell of hyacinths across the garden

Recalling things that other people have desired.

Are these ideas right or wrong?



III

The October night comes down; returning as before

Except for a slight sensation of being ill at ease

I mount the stairs and turn the handle of the door

And feel as if I had mounted on my hands and knees.

""And so you are going abroad; and when do you return?

But that's a useless question.

You hardly know when you are coming back,

You will find so much to learn.""

My smile falls heavily among the bric-a-brac.



""Perhaps you can write to me.""

My self-possession flares up for a second;

This is as I had reckoned.

""I have been wondering frequently of late

(But our beginnings never know our ends!)

Why we have not developed into friends.""

I feel like one who smiles, and turning shall remark

Suddenly, his expression in a glass.

My self-possession gutters; we are really in the dark.



""For everybody said so, all our friends,

They all were sure our feelings would relate

So closely! I myself can hardly understand.

We must leave it now to fate.

You will write, at any rate.

Perhaps it is not too late.

I shall sit here, serving tea to friends.""

And I must borrow every changing shape

To find expression ... dance, dance

Like a dancing bear,

Cry like a parrot, chatter like an ape.

Let us take the air, in a tobacco trance

Well! and what if she should die some afternoon,

Afternoon grey and smoky, evening yellow and rose;

Should die and leave me sitting pen in hand

With the smoke coming down above the housetops;

Doubtful, for quite a while

Not knowing what to feel or if I understand

Or whether wise or foolish, tardy or too soon ...

Would she not have the advantage, after all?

This music is successful with a ""dying fall""

Now that we talk of dying

And should I have the right to smile?/CONTENT"	NAME/Portrait of a Lady/NAME	AGE/Modern/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/EDGAR LEE MASTERS/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/Maurice, weep not, I am not here under this pine tree.

The balmy air of spring whispers through the sweet grass,

The stars sparkle, the whippoorwill calls,

But thou grievest, while my soul lies rapturous

In the blest Nirvana of eternal light!

Go to the good heart that is my husband,

Who broods upon what he calls our guilty love: i

Tell him that my love for you, no less than my love for him

Wrought out my destiny i that through the flesh

I won spirit, and through spirit, peace.

There is no marriage in heaven,

But there is love./CONTENT"	NAME/Sarah Brown/NAME	AGE/Modern/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/MARJORIE PICKTHALL/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/I shall not go with pain

Whether you hold me, whether you forget

My little loss and my immortal gain.

O flower unseen, O fountain sealed apart!

Give me one look, one look remembering yet,

Sweet heart.



I shall not go with grief,

Whether you call me, whether you deny

The crowning vintage and the golden sheaf.

O, April hopes that blossom but to close!

Give me one look, one look and so good-bye,

Red rose.



I shall not go with sighs,

But as full-crowned the warrior leaves the fight,

Dawn on his shield and death upon his eyes.

O, life so bitter-sweet and heaven so far!

Give me one look, one look and so good night,

My star./CONTENT"	NAME/Song/NAME	AGE/Modern/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/PAUL LAURENCE DUNBAR/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/Wintah, summah, snow er shine,

Hit's all de same to me,

Ef only I kin call you mine,

An' keep you by my knee.



Ha'dship, frolic, grief er caih,

Content by night an' day,

Ef only I kin see you whaih

You wait beside de way.



Livin', dyin', smiles er teahs,

My soul will still be free,

Ef only thoo de comin' yeahs

You walk de worl' wid me.



Bird-song, breeze-wail, chune er moan,

What puny t'ings dey'll be,

Ef w'en I's seemin' all erlone,

I knows yo' hea't's wid me./CONTENT"	NAME/Song (Wintah, summah, snow er shine)/NAME	AGE/Modern/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/LOUISE BOGAN/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/This youth too long has heard the break

Of waters in a land of change.

He goes to see what suns can make

From soil more indurate and strange.



He cuts what holds his days together

And shuts him in, as lock on lock:

The arrowed vane announcing weather,

The tripping racket of a clock;



Seeking, I think, a light that waits

Still as a lamp upon a shelf,

A land with hills like rocky gates

Where no sea leaps upon itself.



But he will find that nothing dares

To be enduring, save where, south

Of hidden deserts, torn fire glares

On beauty with a rusted mouth,



Where something dreadful and another

Look quietly upon each other./CONTENT"	NAME/A Tale/NAME	AGE/Modern/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/D. H. LAWRENCE/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/Making his advances

He does not look at her, nor sniff at her,

No, not even sniff at her, his nose is blank.



Only he senses the vulnerable folds of skin

That work beneath her while she sprawls along

In her ungainly pace,

Her folds of skin that work and row

Beneath the earth-soiled hovel in which she moves.



And so he strains beneath her housey walls

And catches her trouser-legs in his beak

Suddenly, or her skinny limb,

And strange and grimly drags at her

Like a dog,

Only agelessly silent, with a reptile's awful persistency.



Grim, gruesome gallantry, to which he is doomed.

Dragged out of an eternity of silent isolation

And doomed to partiality, partial being,

Ache, and want of being,

Want,

Self-exposure, hard humiliation, need to add himself on to her.



Born to walk alone,

Forerunner,

Now suddenly distracted into this mazy side-track,

This awkward, harrowing pursuit,

This grim necessity from within.



Does she know

As she moves eternally slowly away?

Or is he driven against her with a bang, like a bird flying in the dark against a window,

All knowledgeless?



The awful concussion,

And the still more awful need to persist, to follow, follow, continue,

Driven, after ons of pristine, fore-god-like singleness and oneness,

At the end of some mysterious, red-hot iron,

Driven away from himself into her tracks,

Forced to crash against her.



Stiff, gallant, irascible, crook-legged reptile,

Little gentleman,

Sorry plight,

We ought to look the other way.



Save that, having come with you so far,

We will go on to the end./CONTENT"	NAME/Tortoise Gallantry/NAME	AGE/Modern/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/D. H. LAWRENCE/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/I thought he was dumb,

I said he was dumb,

Yet I've heard him cry.



First faint scream,

Out of life's unfathomable dawn,

Far off, so far, like a madness, under the horizon's dawning rim,

Far, far off, far scream.



Tortoise in extremis.



Why were we crucified into sex?

Why were we not left rounded off, and finished in ourselves,

As we began,

As he certainly began, so perfectly alone?



A far, was-it-audible scream,

Or did it sound on the plasm direct?



Worse than the cry of the new-born,

A scream,

A yell,

A shout,

A pan,

A death-agony,

A birth-cry,

A submission,

All tiny, tiny, far away, reptile under the first dawn.



War-cry, triumph, acute-delight, death-scream reptilian,

Why was the veil torn?

The silken shriek of the soul's torn membrane?

The male soul's membrane

Torn with a shriek half music, half horror.



Crucifixion.

Male tortoise, cleaving behind the hovel-wall of that dense female,

Mounted and tense, spread-eagle, out-reaching out of the shell

In tortoise-nakedness,

Long neck, and long vulnerable limbs extruded, spread-eagle over her house-roof,

And the deep, secret, all-penetrating tail curved beneath her walls,

Reaching and gripping tense, more reaching anguish in uttermost tension

Till suddenly, in the spasm of coition, tupping like a jerking leap, and oh!

Opening its clenched face from his outstretched neck

And giving that fragile yell, that scream,

Super-audible,

From his pink, cleft, old-man's mouth,

Giving up the ghost,

Or screaming in Pentecost, receiving the ghost.



His scream, and his moment's subsidence,

The moment of eternal silence,

Yet unreleased, and after the moment, the sudden, startling jerk of coition, and at once

The inexpressible faint yell

And so on, till the last plasm of my body was melted back

To the primeval rudiments of life, and the secret.



So he tups, and screams

Time after time that frail, torn scream

After each jerk, the longish interval,

The tortoise eternity,

Agelong, reptilian persistence,

Heart-throb, slow heart-throb, persistent for the next spasm.



I remember, when I was a boy,

I heard the scream of a frog, which was caught with his foot in the mouth of an up-starting snake;

I remember when I first heard bull-frogs break into sound in the spring;

I remember hearing a wild goose out of the throat of night

Cry loudly, beyond the lake of waters;

I remember the first time, out of a bush in the darkness, a nightingale's piercing cries and gurgles startled the depths of my soul;

I remember the scream of a rabbit as I went through a wood at midnight;

I remember the heifer in her heat, blorting and blorting through the hours, persistent and irrepressible;

I remember my first terror hearing the howl of weird, amorous cats;

I remember the scream of a terrified, injured horse, the sheet-lightning

And running away from the sound of a woman in labor, something like an owl whooing,

And listening inwardly to the first bleat of a lamb,

The first wail of an infant,

And my mother singing to herself,

And the first tenor singing of the passionate throat of a young collier, who has long since drunk himself to death,

The first elements of foreign speech

On wild dark lips.



And more than all these,

And less than all these,

This last,

Strange, faint coition yell

Of the male tortoise at extremity,

Tiny from under the very edge of the farthest far-off horizon of life.



The cross,

The wheel on which our silence first is broken,

Sex, which breaks up our integrity, our single inviolability, our deep silence

Tearing a cry from us.



Sex, which breaks us into voice, sets us calling across the deeps, calling, calling for the complement,

Singing, and calling, and singing again, being answered, having found.



Torn, to become whole again, after long seeking for what is lost,

The same cry from the tortoise as from Christ, the Osiris-cry of abandonment,

That which is whole, torn asunder,

That which is in part, finding its whole again throughout the universe./CONTENT"	NAME/Tortoise Shout/NAME	AGE/Modern/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/SARA TEASDALE/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/With the man I love who loves me not,

I walked in the street-lamps' flare;

We watched the world go home that night

In a flood through Union Square.



I leaned to catch the words he said

That were light as a snowflake falling;

Ah well that he never leaned to hear

The words my heart was calling.



And on we walked and on we walked

Past the fiery lights of the picture shows

Where the girls with thirsty eyes go by

On the errand each man knows.



And on we walked and on we walked,

At the door at last we said good-bye;

I knew by his smile he had not heard

My heart's unuttered cry.



With the man I love who loves me not

I walked in the street-lamps' flare

But oh, the girls who ask for love

In the lights of Union Square./CONTENT"	NAME/Union Square/NAME	AGE/Modern/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/HART CRANE/AUTHOR	CONTENT/Hart Crane, "Voyages I, II, III, IV, V, VI" from The Complete Poems of Hart Crane, edited by Marc Simon. Copyright  1933, 1958, 1966 by Liveright Publishing Corporation. Copyright  1986 by Marc Simon. Used by permission of Liveright Publishing./CONTENT	NAME/Voyages/NAME	AGE/Modern/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/WILLIAM BUTLER YEATS/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/When you are old and grey and full of sleep,

And nodding by the fire, take down this book,

And slowly read, and dream of the soft look

Your eyes had once, and of their shadows deep;



How many loved your moments of glad grace,

And loved your beauty with love false or true,

But one man loved the pilgrim soul in you,

And loved the sorrows of your changing face;



And bending down beside the glowing bars,

Murmur, a little sadly, how Love fled

And paced upon the mountains overhead

And hid his face amid a crowd of stars./CONTENT"	NAME/When You Are Old/NAME	AGE/Modern/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/CARL SANDBURG/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/Give me hunger,

O you gods that sit and give

The world its orders.

Give me hunger, pain and want,

Shut me out with shame and failure

From your doors of gold and fame,

Give me your shabbiest, weariest hunger!



But leave me a little love,

A voice to speak to me in the day end,

A hand to touch me in the dark room

Breaking the long loneliness.

In the dusk of day-shapes

Blurring the sunset,

One little wandering, western star

Thrust out from the changing shores of shadow.

Let me go to the window,

Watch there the day-shapes of dusk

And wait and know the coming

Of a little love./CONTENT"	NAME/At a Window/NAME	AGE/Modern/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/RICHARD ALDINGTON/AUTHOR	"CONTENT/Potuia, potuia

White grave goddess,

Pity my sadness,

O silence of Paros.



I am not of these about thy feet,

These garments and decorum;

I am thy brother,

Thy lover of aforetime crying to thee,

And thou hearest me not.



I have whispered thee in thy solitudes

Of our loves in Phrygia,

The far ecstasy of burning noons

When the fragile pipes

Ceased in the cypress shade,

And the brown fingers of the shepherd

Moved over slim shoulders;

And only the cicada sang.



I have told thee of the hills

And the lisp of reeds

And the sun upon thy breasts,



And thou hearest me not,

Potuia, potuia

Thou hearest me not./CONTENT"	NAME/To a Greek Marble/NAME	AGE/Modern/AGE	TYPE/Love/TYPE
AUTHOR/Queen/AUTHOR	NAME/Another One Bites The Dust/NAME	"CONTENT/Let's go, Steve walks warily down the street,
With the brim pulled way down low
Ain't no sound but the sound of his feet,
Machine guns ready to go

Are you ready,
Are you ready for this
Are you hanging on the edge of your seat
Out of the doorway the bullets rip
To the sound of the beat

[Chorus]
Another one bites the dust
Another one bites the dust
And another one gone, and another one gone
Another one bites the dust
Hey, I'm gonna get you too
Another one bites the dust

How do you think I'm going to get along,
Without you, when you're gone
You took me for everything that I had,
And kicked me out on my own

Are you happy, are you satisfied
How long can you stand the heat
Out of the doorway the bullets rip
To the sound of the beat

[Chorus]

Another one bites the dust
Another one bites the dust
Another one bites the dust
Another one bites the dust
There are plenty of ways you can hurt a man
And bring him to the ground
You can beat him
You can cheat him
You can treat him bad and leave him
When he's down
But I'm ready, yes I'm ready for you
I'm standing on my own two feet
Out of the doorway the bullets rip
Repeating the sound of the beat

[Chorus]

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Queen/AUTHOR	NAME/Brighton Rock/NAME	"CONTENT/Happy little day, Jimmy went away
Met his little Jenny on a public holiday
A happy pair they made, so decorously laid
'Neath the gay illuminations all along the promenade
""It's so good to know there's still a little magic in the air
I'll weave my spell""

""Jenny will you stay - tarry with me pray
Nothing 'ere need come between us tell me love, what do you say ?""
""Oh no I must away to my mum in disarray
If my mother should discover how I spent my holiday
It would be of small avail to talk of magic in the air
I'll say farewell""

O rock of ages, do not crumble, love is breathing still
O lady moon, shine down a little people magic if you will

Jenny pines away, writes a letter everyday
""We must ever be together, nothing can my love erase""
""Oh no I'm compromised, I must apologise
If my lady should discover how I spent my holidays...""
Oooh oooh oooh oooh
Ooh oh oh oh oh ha

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Queen/AUTHOR	NAME/C-lebrity/NAME	"CONTENT/Ain't got no hope
Got no idea
What to do
Or why I'm here
Wanna get my face
On your TV
I wanna be heard
I want to be seen

[Chorus]
Ain't got nothin'
No
Nothing
Nothin' to show
Make me a c-lebrity

I want to be
A face on TV
(I wanna be on your screen)
Then you can see
I'm a c-lebrity

I wanna get my features
In magazines
See this creature on every street
On every screen
Write my life story
Before I'm twenty one
I got to tell the world
They may say I'm dumb but er

[Chorus]

I want to be
A face on TV
(I wanna be on your screen)
Then you can see
I'm a c-lebrity

I wanna be a star
In a Broadway musical
They're gonna love me
I can't sing or dance at all
Some may say I'm lackadaisical
And if I was real good
I'd stand no chance at all

I want to be
A face on TV
(Yeah I wanna be on your screen)
Then you can see
I'm a c-lebrity
Then you can say
You knew me one day
Then you will see
I'm a c-lebrity

C c-lebrity
Wanna be a c c c-lebrity
Make my dream come true
C c-lebrity
Wanna be a c c c c-lebrity
I wanna be heard
I want to be seen
On every TV screen

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Queen/AUTHOR	NAME/Cosmos Rockin'/NAME	"CONTENT/What planet is this hmm?
Let there be rock 'n' roll!

It's a Saturday night and I'm home alone
With the music on quiet I'm flying solo
Then my feet start moving to the sound of the beat
Put the music up loud hear it in the street
Then the neighbors start banging on my front door
Throw the door wide open saying what's your point
Come on in let's rock this joint

We got the whole house rocking [Repeat: x5]
To the mighty power of rock 'n' roll

We dance out of the door, dance into the street
And all the people are swaying to the musical beat
We rock down the road and down to the town
And all the people stare and smile and they get down
Then the police man says ""stop this noise""
But the beat takes over now he's one of the boys
The beat's taken over now he's one of the boys

Come on down let's rock this town

We got the whole town rocking [Repeat: x5]
To the mighty power of rock 'n' roll

Let's go
Let it roll
Are you ready?
Said are you ready?
The cosmos rocks
Across seven seas through the Panama,
Now they're rockin' on beaches
And they're rockin' in bars
Don't ask me how and don't ask me why
From Miami Beach down to old Bondi
There's a rock 'n' roll fever
In every place
Next thing you know
They'll be rockin' out in space

Come on down let's rock this place
Come on down and
Sock it to me

We got the whole world rocking [Repeat: x5]
To the mighty mighty mighty power

We got the cosmos rocking
We got the cosmos rocking
We got the universe rocking
We got the cosmos rocking
We got the cosmos rocking
To the might power of rock 'n' roll

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Queen/AUTHOR	NAME/Delilah/NAME	"CONTENT/Delilah, Delilah, oh my, oh my, oh my - you're irresistible - ooh ooh ooh
You make me smile when I'm just about to cry
You bring me hope, you make me laugh - and I like it
You get away with murder, so innocent
But when you throw a moody you're all claws and you bite
That's alright!
Delilah, Delilah, oh my, oh my, oh my - you're unpredictable - ooh ooh ooh ooh
You make me so very happy
When you cuddle up and go to sleep beside me
And then you make me slightly mad
When you pee all over my Chippendale suite
Ooh ooh Delilah
Ooh ooh Delilah
Oh oh oh oh oh oh oh
You take over my house and home
You even try to answer my telephone
Delilah, you're the apple of my eyes
Meow, meow, meow,
Delilah - I love you, Delilah oh
Ooh you make me so very happy - you give me kisses
And I go out of my mind - ooh ooh
Meow, meow, meow, meow,
You're irresistible - I love you Delilah
Delilah - I love you, ha ha
You make me very happy - oooh oh yeah
I love your kisses
I love your kisses
I love your kisses
I love your kisses
I love your your your kisses
I love your kisses

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Queen/AUTHOR	NAME/Don't Try So Hard/NAME	"CONTENT/If you're searching out for something
Don't try so hard
I you're feeling kind of nothing
Don't try so hard
When your problems seem like mountains
Feel the need to find some answers
You can leave it for another day
Don't try so hard

But if you fall and take a tumble
It won't be far
If you fail you mustn't grumble
Thank your lucky stars
Just savor every mouthful
And treasure every moment
When the storms are raging round you
Stay right where you are
Oooh don't try so hard
Oooh don't take it all to heart
It's only fools they make these rules
Don't try so hard

One day you'll be a Sergeant Major
Oh you'll be so proud
Screaming out your bloody orders
Hey but not too loud
Polish all your shiny buttons
Dressed as lamb instead of mutton
But you never had to try
To stand out from the crowd

Oh what a beautiful world
Is this the life for me
Oh what a beautiful world
It's the simple life for me
Oooh

Oh don't try so hard
Oh don't take it all to heart
It's only fools they make these rules
Don't try so hard
Don't try so hard
Don't try so hard

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Queen/AUTHOR	NAME/Dragon Attack/NAME	"CONTENT/Ooh yeah, ha, yeah
Take me to the room where the red's all red
Take me out of my head -'s what I said
Yeah, ow
Hey, take me to the room where the green's all green
And from what I've seen it's hot, it's mean
Eh

Gonna use my stack
It's gotta be Mack
Gonna get me on the track
Got a dragon on my back

Take me to the room where the beat's all round
Gonna eat that sound yeah yeah yeah yeah
Take me to the room where the black's all white
And the white's all black, take me back to the shack shack

She don't take no prisoners
She gonna give me the business
Got a dragon on my back
Hey it's a dragon attack

Get down, I said so, wooh
Hey hey, alright, yeah, oh yeah eah eah eah

Low down - she don't take no prisoners
Go down - she gonna give me the business
No time - yeah chained to the rack
Show time - got a dragon on my back
Show down - go find another customer
Slow down - I gotta make my way
From me yeah oh
Oh wrong way yeah
Oh wrong way
Hey
Alright
Oh look out

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Queen/AUTHOR	NAME/Dreamers Ball/NAME	"CONTENT/Oh I used to be your baby
Used to be your pride and joy
Mmm, You used to take me dancing
Just like any other boy
But now you've found another partner
And left me like a broken toy

Oh it's someone else you're taking
Someone else you're playin' to
Honey though I'm aching
Know just what I have to do
If I can't have you when I'm wakin'
I'll go to sleep and dream I'm with you

Oh take me take me take me
To the dreamer's ball
Mmm, I'll be right on time and I'll dress so fine
You're gonna love me when you see me
I won't have to worry
Take me take me
Promise not to wake me till it's morning
It's all been true

What do you say about that then honey ?
Are you gonna take me to that dreamer's ball ?
I'd like that
Right on that forty second street
Way down down town we must go

Oh take me take me take me
I'm your plaything now
You make my life worthwhile with the slightest smile
Or destroy me with a barely perceptible whisper
Gently take me remember I'll be dreamin' of my baby
At the dreamer's ball

Oh, take me hold me
Remember what you told me
You'd meet me at the dreamer's ball
I'll meet you at the dreamer's ball
Ooh

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Queen/AUTHOR	NAME/Drowse/NAME	"CONTENT/It's the sad eyed goodbye
Yesterday's moments I remember
It's the bleak street,week kneed partings I recall
It's the mistier mists the hazier days
The brighter sun and the easier lays
There's all the more reason for laughing and crying
When you're younger and life isn't to hard at all

It's the fantastic drowse
Of the afternoon Sundays
That bored you to rages of tears
The unending pleadings
To waste all your good times
In thoughts of your middle-aged years
It's the vertical hold all the things that you're told
For the everyday hero it all turns to zero
And there's all the more reason
For living or dying when you're young
And your troubles are all very small

Out here on the street we'd gather and meet
And scuff up the sidewalk
With endlessly restless feet
Half on the time we'd broaden our minds
More in the pool hall
Than we did in the school hall
With the down town chewing gum bums
Watching the night life the lights and the fun

Never wanted to be the boy next door
Always thought I'd be something more
But it ain't easy for a small town boy
It ain't easy at all
Thinkin' it right and doin' it wrong
It's easier from an arm chair
Waves of alternatives wash over my sleepiness
Have my eggs poached for breakfast I guess

I think I'll be Clint Eastwood
Jimi Hendrix he was good
Let's try William the Conqueror
Now who else do I like

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Queen/AUTHOR	NAME/Earth/NAME	"CONTENT/I might be at a table
And suddenly I'll catch
A fleeting vision of her crystal seas
Or I might be standing in a crowded dockyard faraway
Underneath the sun I've never seen
'Cause I have seen many worlds
For what it's worth
But I'll never see again the planet earth
My earth
I might be chasing waves of light
Out towards the rim
Where stars are sparse
And the cold of space seeps in
But I might be in a bar room
Drinking methylated gin
And thinking of the places I have been
Yes I have seen many worlds
For what it's worth
But I'll never see again the planet earth
My earth
I have seen many worlds
For what it's worth
But I'll never see again the planet earth
My earth
Cast adrift amongst the stars
I float from sun to sun
Dreaming of the world that gave me birth
All the places I have been
Remind me there is none
To match the green living hills of earth
'Cause I have seen many worlds
For what it's worth
But I'll never see again the planet earth
My earth

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Queen/AUTHOR	NAME/Fat Bottomed Girls/NAME	"CONTENT/Are you gonna take me home tonight ?
Ah down beside that red firelight
Are you gonna let it all hang out ?
Fat bottomed girls
You make the rockin' world go round

Hey I was just a skinny lad
Never knew no good from bad
But I knew life before I left my nursery - huh
Left alone with big fat Fanny
She was such a naughty nanny
Heap big woman you made a bad boy out of me
Hey hey!
Wooh

I've been singing with my band
Across the wire across the land
I seen every blue eyed floozy on the way, hey
But their beauty and their style
Went kind of smooth after a while
Take me to them dirty ladies every time

C'mon
Oh won't you take me home tonight ?
Oh down beside your red firelight
Oh and you give it all you got
Fat bottomed girls you make the rockin' world go round
Fat bottomed girls you make the rockin' world go round

Hey listen here
Now I got mortgages on homes
I got stiffness in ma' bones
Ain't no beauty Queens in this locality (I tell you)
Oh but I still get my pleasure
Still get my greatest treasure
Heap big woman you gonna make a big man out of me

Now get this
Oh (I know) you gonna take me home tonight (please)
Oh down beside that red firelight
Are you gonna let it all hang out ?
Fat bottomed girls you make the rockin' world go round yeah
Fat bottomed girls you make the rockin' world go round

Get on your bikes and ride
Ooh yeah oh yeah them fat bottomed girls
Fat bottomed girls
Yeah yeah yeah
Alright, ride 'em, c'mon
Fat bottomed girls - yes yes

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Queen/AUTHOR	NAME/Father To Son/NAME	"CONTENT/A word in your ear, from father to son
Hear the word that I say
I fought with you, fought on your side
Long before you were born

Joyful the sound, the word goes around
From father to son, to son...
And the voice is so clear, time after time it keeps on
Calling you, calling you on
Don't destroy what you see, your country to be
Just keep building on the ground that's been won

Kings will be crowned, and the word goes around
From father to son, to son

Won't you hear us sing
(te de de de de de de de de de de de de de de)
Our family song
(te de de de de de de de de de de de de de de)

Father, father, father, father, ooh yeah, father, father, father, father
(te de de de de de de de de de de de de de de)
Now we hand it on
But I've heard it all before

Take this letter that I give you
Take it sonny, hold it high
You won't understand a word that's in it
But you'll write it out again before you die (yeah yeah)

A word in your ear from father to son
Funny you don't hear a single word I say
But my letter to you will stay by your side
Through the years till the loneliness is gone
Sing if you will - but the air you breathe I live to give you

Father to son, father to, father to, father to son

Joyful the sound, the word goes around
From father to son, to son...

Kings will be crowned, the word goes around
From father to son, to son

Joyful the sound, the word goes around
From father to son, to son...

Kings will be crowned, the word goes around
From father to son, to son

Joyful the sound, the word goes around
From father to son, to son...

Kings will be crowned, the word goes around
From father to son, to son

Joyful the sound, the word goes around

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Queen/AUTHOR	NAME/Flick Of The Wrist/NAME	"CONTENT/Dislocate your spine if you don't sign he says
I'll have you seeing double (double)
Mesmerize you when he's tongue-tied
Simply with those eyes, ooh ooh ooh
Synchronize your minds and see
The beast within him rise

Don't look back
Don't look back
It's a rip-off
Flick of the wrist and you're dead baby
Blow him a kiss and you're mad, ooh ooh ooh ooh
Flick of the wrist - he'll eat your heart out
A dig in the ribs and then a kick in the head
He's taken an arm and taken a leg
All this time honey
Baby you've been had

Intoxicate your brain with what I'm saying
If not you'll lie in knee-deep trouble
Prostitute yourself he says
Castrate your human pride, ooh ooh ooh
Sacrifice your leisure days
Let me squeeze you till you've dried

Don't look back
Don't look back
It's a rip-off, aah, aah, aah

Work my fingers to my bones
I scream with pain
I still make no impression
Seduce you with his money-make machine
Cross-collateralize, (big-time money money)
Reduce you to a muzak-fake machine
Then the last goodbye
It's a rip-off

Flick of the wrist and you're dead baby
Blow him a kiss and you're mad, ooh ooh ooh ooh
Flick of the wrist - he'll eat your heart out
A dig in the ribs and then a kick in the head
He's taken an arm, and taken a leg
All this time honey
Baby you've been had

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Queen/AUTHOR	NAME/Friends Will Be Friends/NAME	"CONTENT/Another red letter day
So the pound has dropped and the children are creating
The other half ran away
Taking all the cash and leaving you with the lumber
Got a pain in the chest
Doctors on strike what you need is a rest

It's not easy love, but you've got friends you can trust
Friends will be friends
When you're in need of love they give you care and attention
Friends will be friends
When you're through with life and all hope is lost
Hold out your hand 'cos friends will be friends - right till the end

Now it's a beautiful day
The postman delivered a letter from your lover
Only a 'phone call away
You tried to track him down but somebody stole his number
As a matter of fact
You're getting used to life without him in your way

It's so easy now, 'cos you got friends you can trust
Friends will be friends
When you're in need of love they give you care and attention
Friends will be friends
When you're through with life and all hope is lost
Hold out your hand 'cos friends will be friends - right till the end

It's so easy now, 'cos you got friends you can trust
Friends will be friends
When you're in need of love they give you care and attention
Friends will be friends
When you're through with life and all hope is lost
Hold out your hand - friends will be friends - right till the end

Friends will be friends
When you're in need of love they give you care and attention
Friends will be friends
When you're through with life and all hope is lost
Hold out your hand 'cos right till the end - friends will be friends
Yeah yeah

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Queen/AUTHOR	NAME/Great King Rat/NAME	"CONTENT/Great King Rat died today
Born on the twenty first of May
Died syphilis forty four on his birthday
Every second word he swore
Yes he was the son of a whore
Always wanted by the law

Wouldn't you like to know ?
Wouldn't you like to know people ?
Great King Rat was a dirty old man
And a dirty old man was he
Now what did I tell you
Would you like to see ?

Now hear this
Where will I be tomorrow ?
Will I beg ?, Will I borrow ?
I don't care, I don't care anyway
Come on, come on the time is right
The man is evil and that is right
I told you ah yes I told you
And that's no lie, oh no no

Wouldn't you like to know ?
Wouldn't you like to know ?
Wouldn't you like to know ?
Great King Rat was a dirty old man
And a dirty old man was he
Now what did I tell you
Would you like to see ?
Show me

Oooh oooh oooh oooh
Wouldn't you like to know ?
Wouldn't you like to know people people ?
Great King Rat was a dirty old man
And a dirty old man was he
Now what did I tell you
Would you like to see ?

Hit it

Now listen all you people
Put out the good and keep the bad
Don't believe all you read in the Bible
You sinners get in line
Saints you leave far behind
Very soon you're gonna be his disciple

Don't listen to what mama says
Not a word - not a word mama says
Or else you'll find yourself being the rival
Sure, the great lord before he died
Knelt sinners by his side
And said you're going to realise tomorrow, oh woh oh woh oh woh

No I'm not going to tell you
What you already know
'Cause time and time again
The old man said it all a long time ago
Come on come on the time is right
This evil man will fight
I told you once before

Hear it
No

Wouldn't you like to know ?
Wouldn't you like to know ?
Just like I said before
Great King Rat was a dirty old man
And a dirty old man was he
The last time I tell you
Would you like to see ?

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Queen/AUTHOR	NAME/Hammer To Fall/NAME	"CONTENT/Yeah
Here we stand or here we fall
History won't care at all
Make the bed, light the light
Lady mercy won't be home tonight

Yeah, you don't waste no time at all
Don't hear the bell but you answer the call
It comes to you as to us all
Hey, we're just waiting
For the hammer to fall - yeah

Oh every night, and every day
A little piece of you is falling away
But lift your face, the western way, baby
Build your muscles as your body decays

Yeah, toe your line and play their game
Yeah, let the anaesthetic cover it all
Till one day they call your name
You know it's time for the hammer to fall - yeah

Rich or poor or famous for
Your truth it's all the same - oh no - oh no
Oh lock your door but rain is pouring
Through your window pane - oh no - yeah
Baby now your struggle's all vain

Oooh oooh oooh oooh oooh

For we who grew up tall and proud
In the shadow of the mushroom cloud
Convinced our voices can't be heard
We just wanna scream it louder and louder and louder

What the hell we fighting for?
Ah, just surrender and it won't hurt at all
You just got time to say your prayers
Eh, while you're waiting for the hammer to hammer to fall
Hey, yes, it's starting to fall eh, hammer, you know
Yeah, hammer to fall, wooh, ah, hey, eh woowoo, ha eh hammer
Waiting for the hammer to fall baby
Yeah yeah while you're waiting for the hammer to fall
Give it to me one more time

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Queen/AUTHOR	NAME/I Was Born To Love You/NAME	"CONTENT/I was born to love you
With every single beat of my heart
Yes, I was born to take care of you, ha
Every single day...
Alright, hey hey

I was born to love you
With every single beat of my heart
Yes, I was born to take care of you
Every single day of my life

You are the one for me
I am the man for you
You we're made for me
You're my ecstasy
If I was given every opportunity
I'd kill for your love

So take a chance with me
Let me romance with you
I'm caught in a dream
And my dream's come true
So hard to believe
This is happening to me
An amazing feeling
Comin' through -

I was born to love you
With every single beat of my heart
Yes, I was born to take care of you, honey
Every single day of my life

I wanna love you
I love every little thing about you
I wanna love you, love you, love you
Born - to love you
Born - to love you
Yes I was born to love you
Born - to love you
Born - to love you
Every single day - day of my life
Woh

An amazing feeling
Comin' through

I was born to love you
With every single beat of my heart
Yeah, I was born to take care of you
Every single day of my life
Yeah I was born to love you
Every single day of my life

Go, woh, I love you babe, hey
Born to love you
Yes, I was born to love you hey
I wanna love you, love you, love you
I wanna love you
Yeah yeah
Ha ha ha ha ha it's magic
What ha ha ha
I get so lonely, lonely, lonely, lonely, yeah
I want to love you
It's magic
Love you, love you
Yeah, give it to me

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Queen/AUTHOR	NAME/I'm Going Slightly Mad/NAME	"CONTENT/When the outside temperature rises
And the meaning is oh so clear
One thousand and one yellow daffodils
Begin to dance in front of you - oh dear
Are they trying to tell you something ?
You're missing that one final screw
You're simply not in the pink my dear
To be honest you haven't got a clue
I'm going slightly mad
I'm going slightly mad
It finally happened - happened
It finally happened - ooh woh
It finally happened - I'm slightly mad - oh dear !
Ha ha ha ha ha

I'm one card short of a full deck
I'm not quite the shilling
One wave short of a shipwreck
I'm not my usual top billing
I'm coming down with a fever
I'm really out to sea
This kettle is boiling over
I think I'm a banana tree
Oh dear
I'm going slightly mad
I'm going slightly mad (I'm going slightly mad)
It finally happened - happened
It finally happened - uh huh
It finally happened - I'm slightly mad - oh dear!

Uh uh ah ah
Uh uh ah ah

I'm knitting with only one needle
Unraveling fast it's true
I'm driving only three wheels these days
But my dear, how about you?
I'm going slightly mad
I'm going slightly mad
It finally happened
It finally happened - oh yes
It finally happened - I'm slightly mad
Just very slightly mad!
And there you have it!

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Queen/AUTHOR	NAME/In Only Seven Days/NAME	"CONTENT/Monday the start of my holiday
Freedom for just one week
Feels good to get away ooh

Tuesday I saw her down on the beach
I stood and watched a while
And she looked and smiled at me

Wednesday I didn't see her
I hoped that she'd be back tomorrow
And then on Thursday
My luck had changed
She stood there all alone
I went and asked her name
I never thought that this could happen to me
In only seven days
It would take a hundred or more
For memories to fade

I wish Friday would last for ever
I held her close to me
I couldn't bear to leave her there

Saturday just twenty four hours
Oh no I'm going back home on Sunday

Ooh so sad alone

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Queen/AUTHOR	NAME/In The Lap Of The Gods/NAME	"CONTENT/Aaah, ooh, ooh, ah, ooh, ah
Leave it in the lap of the Gods

I live my life for you
Think all my thoughts with you, and only you
Anything you ask I do, for you

I touch your lips with mine
But in the end
I leave it to the lords
Leave it in the lap of the Gods
What more can I do ?

Leave it in the lap of the Gods
I leave it to you
Leave it in the lap of the Gods
Leave it in the lap of the Gods
I want you to, aah
Leave it in the lap of the Gods
Leave it in the lap of the Gods, aah
Leave it in the lap of the Gods
Lap of the Gods
Lap of the Gods, aah
Lap of the Gods, aah
Lap of the Gods
Lap of the Gods
Lap of the Gods
Lap of the Gods

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Queen/AUTHOR	NAME/Innuendo/NAME	"CONTENT/One two three four

Ooh ooh

While the sun hangs in the sky and the desert has sand
While the waves crash in the sea and meet the land
While there's a wind and the stars and the rainbow
Till the mountains crumble into the plain

Oh yes, we'll keep on trying
Tread that fine line
Oh, we'll keep on trying
Yeah
Just passing our time

Ooh ooh

While we live according to race, colour or creed
While we rule by blind madness and pure greed
Our lives dictated by tradition, superstition, false religion
Through the eons and on and on

Oh, yes, we'll keep on trying, yeah
We'll tread that fine line
Oh oh we'll keep on trying
Till the end of time
Till the end of time

Through the sorrow all through our splendor
Don't take offence at my innuendo

Duh duh duh duh duh duh duh
Duh duh duh duh duh duh duh duh duh duh duh

You can be anything you want to be
Just turn yourself into anything you think that you could ever be
Be free with your tempo, be free, be free
Surrender your ego - be free, be free to yourself

Ooh ooh, yeah

If there's a God or any kind of justice under the sky
If there's a point, if there's a reason to live or die
Ha, if there's an answer to the questions we feel bound to ask
Show yourself - destroy our fears - release your mask
Oh yes, we'll keep on trying
Hey, tread that fine line
(Yeah) yeah
We'll keep on smiling, yeah
(Yeah) (yeah) (yeah)
And whatever will be - will be
We'll just keep on trying
We'll just keep on trying
Till the end of time
Till the end of time
Till the end of time

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Queen/AUTHOR	NAME/It's Late/NAME	"CONTENT/You say you love me
And I hardly know your name
And if I say I love you in the candle light
There's no-one but myself to blame
But there's something inside
That's turning my mind away
Woh - how I could love you
If I could let you stay

It's late - and I'm bleeding deep inside
It's late - ooh, is it just my sickly pride?
Too late - even now the feeling seems to steal away
So late - though I'm crying I can't help but hear you say
It's late - It's late - It's late
But not too late

Mmm, yeah
The way you love me
Is the sweetest love around
But after all this time
The more I'm trying
The more I seem to let you down, yes
Now you tell me you're leaving
And I just can't believe it's true
Oh, you know that I can love you
Though I know I can't be true
Oh, you made me love you
Don't tell me that we're through

It's late - mmm, and it's driving me so mad
It's late - yes I know, but don't try and tell me that it's
Too late - save our love you can't turn out the light
So late - I've been wrong but I'll learn to be right
It's late - It's late - It's late
But not too late

Mm, I've been so long
You've been so long
We've been so long tryin' to work it out
I ain't got long
You ain't got long
We've gotta know what this life's all about, ooh
Tell me
Tryin' to work it out, yeah, ooh
Ooh too late, yeah, too late, much too late, aaah

You're staring at me
With suspicion in your eye
You say what game are you playing?
What's this that you're saying?
I know that I can't reply
If I take you tonight
Is it making my life a lie?
Oh you make me wonder
Did I live my life right?

It's late - ooh, but it's time to set me free
It's late - ooh, yes I know, but there's no way it has to be
Too late - so let the fire take our bodies this night
So late - let the waters take our guilt in the tide
It's late - It's late - It's late - It's late
It's late - It's late - It's late
Oh, It's all too late

Woah, woah, c'mon
Ooh m m m m late too late oh yeah
Waaa

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Queen/AUTHOR	NAME/Jailhouse Rock/NAME	"CONTENT/The warden threw a party in the county jail.
The prison band was there and they began to wail.
The band was jumpin' and the joint began to swing.
You should've heard those knocked out jailbirds sing.

[Chorus]
Let's rock, everybody, let's rock.
Everybody in the whole cell block
was dancin' to the Jailhouse Rock.

Spider Murphy played the tenor saxophone,
Little Joe was blowin' on the slide trombone.
The drummer boy from Illinois went crash, boom, bang,
the whole rhythm section was the Purple Gang.

[Chorus]

Number forty-seven said to number three
""You're the cutest jailbird I ever did see.
I sure would be delighted with your company,
come on and do the Jailhouse Rock with me.""

[Chorus]

The sad sack was a sittin' on a block of stone
way over in the corner weepin' all alone.
The warden said, ""Hey, buddy, don't you be no square.
If you can't find a partner use a wooden chair.""

[Chorus]

Shifty Henry said to Bugs, ""For Heaven's sake,
no one's lookin', now's our chance to make a break.""
Bugsy turned to Shifty and he said, ""Nix nix,
I wanna stick around a while and get my kicks.""

[Chorus]

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Queen/AUTHOR	NAME/Jealousy/NAME	"CONTENT/Oh how wrong can you be?
Oh to fall in love
Was my very first mistake
How was I to know
I was far too much in love to see?
Oh jealousy look at me now
Jealousy you got me somehow
You gave me no warning
Took me by surprise
Jealousy you led me on
You couldn't lose you couldn't fail
You had suspicion on my trail

How how how all my jealousy
I wasn't man enough to let you hurt my pride
Now I'm only left with my own jealousy

Oh how strong can you be
With matters of the heart?
Life is much too short
To while away with tears
If only you could see
Just what you do to me
Oh jealousy you tripped me up
Jealousy you brought me down
You bring me sorrow you cause me pain
Jealousy when will you let go?
Gotta hold of my possessive mind
Turned me into a jealous guy

How how how all my jealousy
I wasn't man enough to let you hurt my pride
Now I'm only left with my own jealousy
But now it matters not
If I should live or die
'Cause I'm only left with my own jealousy

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Queen/AUTHOR	NAME/Jesus/NAME	"CONTENT/And then I saw Him in the crowd
A lot of people had gathered round Him
The beggars shouted the lepers called Him
The old man said nothing
He just stared about him
All going down to see the Lord Jesus
All going down to see the Lord Jesus
All going down

Then came a man before His feet he fell
Unclean said the leper and rang his bell
Felt the palm of a hand touch his head
Go now go now you're a new man instead
All going down to see the Lord Jesus
All going down to see the Lord Jesus
All going down

It all began with the three wise men
Followed a star took them to Bethlehem
And made it heard throughout the land
Born was a leader of man
All going down to see the Lord Jesus
All going down to see the Lord Jesus
All going down

It all began with the three wise men
Followed a star took them to Bethlehem
And made it heard throughout the land
Born was a leader of man
All going down to see the Lord Jesus
All going down to see the Lord Jesus
All going down

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Queen/AUTHOR	NAME/Keep Passing The Open Windows/NAME	"CONTENT/This is the only life for me - yeah
Surround myself around my own fantasy
You just gotta be strong and believe in yourself
Forget all the sadness 'cause love is all you need
Love is all you need

Do you know what it's like to be alone in this world
When you're down and out on your luck and you're a failure
Wake up screaming in the middle of the night
You think it's all been a waste of time
It's been a bad year
You start believing everything's gonna be alright
Next minute you're down and you're flat on your back
A brand new day is beginning
Get that sunny feeling and you're on your way (way)

Just believe - just keep passing the open windows
Just believe - just keep passing the open windows

Do you know how it feels when you don't have friend (friend)
Without a job and no money to spend
You're a stranger

All you think about is suicide
One of these days you're gonna lose the fight
You better keep out of danger - yeah
That same old feeling just keeps burning deep inside (inside)
You keep telling yourself it's gonna be the end
Oh - get yourself together
Things are looking better everyday (day)

Just believe - just keep passing the open windows
Just believe - just keep passing the open windows

This is the only life for me - yeah
Surround myself around my own fantasy

You just gotta be strong and believe in yourselves
Forget all the sadness 'cause love is all you need

Just believe - just keep passing the open windows
Just believe - just keep passing the open windows

You just gotta be strong and believe in yourselves
Forget all the sadness 'cause love is all you need yeah
Love is all you need
Oh baby love is all you need

Just believe - just keep passing the open windows
Just believe - just keep passing the open windows

Just keep passing the open windows
Just keep passing the open windows
Just keep passing the open windows
Just keep passing the open windows
Just keep passing the open windows
Just keep passing the open windows
Keep passing the open windows

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Queen/AUTHOR	NAME/Khashoggi's Ship/NAME	"CONTENT/Who said that my party was all over
Huh huh I'm in pretty good shape
The best years of my life are like a supernova
Huh huh perpetual craze I said that
Everybody drank my wine - you get my drift
And then we took a holiday on Khashoggi's ship, well
We really had a good good time they was all so sexy
We was bad we was blitzed
All in all it was a pretty good trip

This big bad sucker with a fist as big as your head
Wanted to get me I said go away
I said kiss my ass honey
He pulled out a gun wanted to arrest me
I said uh uh uh babe
Now listen no-one stops my party
No-one stops my party
No-one no-one no-one stops my party
Just like I said
We were phased we was pissed
Just having a total eclipse

That's good

This one's on me so let us do it just right
This here one party don't get started 'till midnight

Everybody party to the left - party to the right
Do it all night alright alright
Should I lay my hands on you all right
Left, right
Left right no-one stops my

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Queen/AUTHOR	NAME/Las Palabras De Amor/NAME	"CONTENT/Guilt stains on my pillow
Blood on ny terraces
Torsos in my closet
Shadows from my past live is real
Life is real, life is real, so real
Sleeping is my leisure
Waking up in a minefield
Dream is just a pleasure dome
Love is a roulette wheel - life is real
Life is real, life is real, oh yeah
Success is my breathing space
I brought it on myself
I will price it
I will cash it
I can take it or leave it
Loneliness is my hiding place
Breastfeeding myself
What more can I say
I have swallowed the bitter pill
I can taste it, I can taste it
Life is real, life is real, life is real
Music will be my mistres
Loving like a whore
Lennon is a genius
Living in every pore
Life is real, life is real, life is real, so real
Life is cruel
Life is a bitch
Life is real - so real

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Queen/AUTHOR	NAME/Lazing On A Sunday Afternoon/NAME	"CONTENT/I go out to work on Monday morning
Tuesday I go off to honeymoon
I'll be back again before it's time for sunny-down,
I'll be lazing on a Sunday afternoon
Bicycling on every Wednesday evening
Thursday I go waltzing to the zoo
I come from London Town, I'm just an ordinary guy
Fridays I go painting in the Louvre
I'm bound to be proposing on a Saturday night
(There he goes again)
I'll be lazing on a Sunday
Lazing on a Sunday
Lazing on a Sunday afternoon

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Queen/AUTHOR	NAME/Let Me In Your Heart Again/NAME	"CONTENT/Ooh
Woohooo

Yeah

When people talk of love
I'll lead the conversation
I'll say I feel just fine
Happy with my situation

But when I look away ha
People know my mind is straying
To where I once belonged
Dreaming about your heart again

(your heart again)
Yeh
(your heart again)
Let me in your heart again

Listen to me honey

We laugh to face the blues
I give your satisfaction
(it's your heart again)
Despair was on your mind
I gave you the right direction
(it's your heart again)

Sometimes you walk away
Remember it's my heart your breaking
You forget we were in love
Now my heart is only filled with pain
(your heart again)
Oh
(your heart again)
Let me in your heart again

Oh my love
I want you to stay
Don't leave me now
Or I just fade away
All my love
Don't hurt me this way

Oh
Forgive me babe
Do not ever tell me goodbye
Woohoo
Tell me yes

Oh

Don't let me wait too long
Or I'll lose my mind

When people talk of love
I have no hesitation
(it's your heart again)
Tell me what your dreaming of
I'll hold that conversation for you best
(it's your heart again)

But when I look away ha
People know my mind is straying
Baby to where I once belonged
Just let me in your heart again
(You heart again)
(your heart again)
Oh
Let me in your heart again

Open the doors for me babe
To your heart again
Let me in

Hey live
Let me live
Woohoo
Let me live and live in your heart again

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Queen/AUTHOR	NAME/Lost Opportunity/NAME	"CONTENT/Words and music by queen

With the morning I face the sun
I lift my head and smile for everyone
Every afternoon youll find me working on
I got my new shoes on
Got to be moving on
Thats what they say
Every night Im tossed
And I shake my fevered brow
Thinking of my lost opportunity

Yes every morning I face the sun
I get so positive with everyone
Every afternoon youll find the cracks showing through
They know what Im going through
Oh yes they do
Every evening finds me
The optimist behind me
On with my lost opportunity

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Queen/AUTHOR	NAME/Love Of My Life/NAME	"CONTENT/Love of my life - you've hurt me
You've broken my heart and now you leave me
Love of my life can't you see
Bring it back, bring it back
Don't take it away from me, because you don't know
What it means to me

Love of my life don't leave me
You've taken my love, (all of my love) and now desert me
Love of my life can't you see
(Please bring it back) bring it back, bring it back (back)
Don't take it away from me (take it away from me)
Because you don't know (ooh ooh ooh know means to me)
What it means to me

Who will remember
When this is blown over
And everything's all by the way - (ooh yeah)
When I grow older
I will be there at your side to remind you
How I still love you - (i still love you)

Ooh, back - hurry back
Please bring it back home to me
Because you don't know what it means to me
Love of my life
Love of my life
Ooh, ooh

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Queen/AUTHOR	NAME/Modern Times Rock'n'Roll/NAME	"CONTENT/Had to make do with a worn out rock and roll scene
The old bop is gettin' tired need a rest
Well you know what I mean
Fifty eight that was great
But it's over now and That's all
Somethin' harder's coming up
Gonna really knock a hole in the wall
Gonna hit ya grab you hard
Make you feel ten feet tall

Well I hope this baby's gonna come along soon
You don't know it could happen any ol' rainy afternoon
With the temperature down
And the jukebox blowin' no fuse
And my musical life's feelin'
Like a long Sunday School cruise
And you know there's one thing
Every single body could use
Yeah listen to me baby
Let me tell you what it's all about
Modern times rock and roll
Modern times rock and roll

Get you high heeled guitar boots and some groovy clothes
Get a hair piece on your chest
And a ring through your nose
Find a nice little man who says
He's gonna make you a real big star
Stars in your eyes and ants in your pants
Think you should go far
Everybody in this bum sucking world
Gonna know just who you are
Look out

Modern times rock and roll

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Queen/AUTHOR	NAME/Mr. Roboto/NAME	"CONTENT/[Originally written and preformed by Styx]
Domo arigato, Mr. Roboto
Mata au hima de
Domo arigato, Mr. Roboto
Himitsu o shiri tai
You're wondering who I am (Secret secret, I've got a secret)
Machine or mannequin (Secret secret, I've got a secret)
With parts made in Japan (Secret secret, I've got a secret)
I am the modern man
I've got a secret I've been hiding under my skin
My heart is human, my blood is boiling, my brain ibm
So if you see me acting strangely, don't be surprised
I'm just a man who needed someone and somewhere to hide
To keep me alive, just keep me alive
Somewhere to hide to keep me alive
I'm not a robot without emotions, I'm not what you see
I've come to help you with your problems so we can be free
I'm not a hero, I'm not a savior, forget what you know
I'm just a man who's circumstances went beyond his control
Beyond my control, We all need control
I need control, We all need control
I am the moldren man (Secret secret, I've got a secret)
Who hides behind a mask (Secret secret, I've got a secret)
So no one else can see (Secret secret, I've got a secret)
My true identity
Domo arigato, Mr, Roboto
Domo, Domo
Domo arigato, Mr. Roboto
Domo, Domo
Domo Arigato, Mr. Roboto
Domo Arigato, Mr. Roboto
Domo Arigato, Mr. Roboto
Domo Arigato, Mr. Roboto
(Thank you very much oh Mr. Roboto
For doing the jobs that nobody wants to)
Domo Arigato, Mr. Roboto
(And thank you very much oh Mr. Roboto
For helping me escape just when I needed to)
Domo Arigato, Mr. Roboto
(Thank you thank you thank you)
Domo Arigato, Mr. Roboto
(I wanna thank you)
Domo Arigato, Mr. Roboto
(Please thank you)
The problem's plain to see
Too much technology
Machines to save our lives
Machines de-humanize
The time has come at last (Secret secret, I've got a secret)
To throw away this mask (Secret secret, I've got a secret)
Now everyone can see (Secret secret, I've got a secret)
My true identity
I'm Kilroy! Kilroy! Kilroy! Kilroy....

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Queen/AUTHOR	NAME/Mustapha/NAME	"CONTENT/Ibrahim, Ibrahim, Ibrahim,
Allah, Allah, Allah, Allah will pray for you.
Hey!

Mustapha, Mustapha, Mustapha Ibrahim.
Mustapha, Mustapha, Mustapha Ibrahim.

Mustapha Ibrahim, Mustapha Ibrahim
Allah, Allah, Allah will pray for you.
Mustapha Ibrahim, al havra kris vanin
Allah, Allah, Allah will pray for you.
Mustapha, hey! Mustapha
Mustapha Ibrahim, Mustapha Ibrahim, hey!

Allah-I, Allah-I, Allah-I,
Ibra-Ibra-Ibrahim, yeah!
Ibrahim, Ibrahim, Ibrahim,
Allah Allah Allah-I hey!

Mustapha Mustapha - Allah-I na stolei
Mustapha Mustapha - Achtar es na sholei
Mustapha Mustapha - Mochamut dei ya low eshelei
Mustapha Mustapha - ai ai ai ai ahelei
Mustapha,
Mustapha,
Ist avil ahiln avil ahiln adhim Mustapha,
Salaam Aleikum!

Mustapha Ibrahim, Mustapha Ibrahim
Allah, Allah, Allah will pray for you.
Mustapha Ibrahim, achbar ish navin
Allah, Allah, Allah will pray for you.
Mustapha, Mustapha
Mustapha Ibrahim, Mustapha Ibrahim, hey!

Allah-I, Allah-I, Allah-I,
Ibra-Ibra-Ibrahim, yeah!
Ibrahim, Ibrahim, Ibrahim,
Allah Allah Allah-I hey!

Mustapha Mustapha
Mustapha Mustapha
Mustapha Mustapha
Mustapha Mustapha
Mustapha,
Mustapha,
Vontap ist ahiln avil ahiln adhim Mustapha,
Aleikum Salaam hey!

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Queen/AUTHOR	NAME/My Baby Does Me/NAME	"CONTENT/Turn it up a bit please

My baby
Baby does
My baby does, me good
My baby does
My baby does me
My baby does me good

My lady
Understands
Understands me right

She understands me
She understands me
Understands me right
Mmmmmmm

My baby cares
She really cares
She knows what's really right for me
Does me good then she hurts me so
She winds me up then lets me go
Turns me on and then tells me no
She's just a pussy cat

My baby loves me
My baby loves me (ooh)
My baby cuffs me (ooh)
One day she'll tells me that she cares
Another day she tells me she don't love me
She really really does me
Ooh, people do you believe this ?, do you ?
Oo ooh, ah
Ooh ooh ooh
Ooh she really really really really really really aah, does me, hey

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Queen/AUTHOR	NAME/My Life Has Been Saved/NAME	"CONTENT/This is where we are today
People going separate ways
This is the way things are now
In disarray
I read it in the papers
There's death on every page
Oh Lord, I thank the Lord above
My life has been saved, eaah eah

Here we go
Tellin' lies
Here we go - here we go

We're right back where we started from
People going separate ways
This is the way things are now
In disarray - hey
I read it in the papers
There's death on every page
Aah - oh Lord, I thank you from above
My life has been saved
Ooh ooh ooh ooh my life
My life has been saved
Ooh my life
My life has been saved

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Queen/AUTHOR	NAME/Need Your Loving Tonight/NAME	"CONTENT/No I'll never look back in anger
No I'll never find me an answer
You promised me you'd keep in touch
I read your letter and it hurt me so much
I said I'd never never be angry with you

I don't want to feel like a stranger no
'Cause I'd rather stay out of danger
I read your letter so many times
I got your meaning between the lines
I said I'd never never be angry with you

I must be strong so she won't know how much I miss her
I only hope as time goes on I'll forget her
My bodies aching can't sleep at night
I'm too exhausted to start a fight
And if I see her with another guy
I'll eat my heart out 'cause I love her
Love her love her love her

Come on baby let's get together
I'll love you baby I'll love you forever
I'm trying hard to stay away
What made you change
What did I say
Ooh I need your loving tonight
Ooh I need your loving
Ooh I need your loving
Ooh I need your loving babe tonight
Hit me

Ooh I need your loving tonight

No I'll never look back in anger
No I'll never find me an answer
Can't be no warning how could I guess
I'll have to learn to forgive and forget
Ooh I need your loving
Ooh I need your loving
Ooh I need your loving tonight

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Queen/AUTHOR	NAME/One Vision/NAME	"CONTENT/God works in mysterious ways, mysterious ways
Hey, one man one goal ha, one mission
One heart one soul just one solution
One flash of light yeah, one God, One vision

One flesh one bone
One true religion
One voice one hope
One real decision
Wowowowowowo gimme one vision
Hey

No wrong no right
I'm gonna tell you there's no black and no white
No blood no stain
All we need is one world wide vision

One flesh, One bone
One true religion
One race, One hope
One real decision
Wowowowowo woh yeah oh yeah oh yeah

I had a dream
When I was young
A dream of sweet illusion
A glimpse of hope and unity
And visions of one sweet union
But a cold wind blows
And a dark rain falls
And in my heart it shows
Look what they've done to my dream, yeah

One vision
So give me your hands
Give me your hearts
I'm ready
There's only one direction
One world one nation
Yeah one vision

No hate, No fight
Just excitation
All through the night
It's a celebration
Wowowowowowo yeah
One one one one one one one
One vision hey one vision one vision one vision one vision

One flesh, One bone
One true religion
One voice, One hope
One real decision

Gimme one light, yeah
Gimme one hope, hey
Just gimme, ha
One man one man
One bar one night
One day hey hey
Just gimme gimme gimme gimme
Fried chicken vision vision vision vision vision

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Queen/AUTHOR	NAME/One Year Of Live/NAME	"CONTENT/Just one year of love
Is better than A lifetime alone
One sentimental moment in your arms
Is like A shooting star right through my heart
Its always A rainy day without you
I'm A prisoner of love inside you
I'm falling apart all around you, yeah
My heart cries out to your heart
I'm lonely but you can save me
My hand reaches out for your hand
I'm cold but you light the fire in me
My lips search for your lips
I'm hungry for your touch
Theres so much left unspoken
And all I can do is surrender
To the moment just surrender
And no one ever told me that love would hurt so much
Oooh yes it hurts
And pain is so close to pleasure
And all I can do is surrender to your love
Just surrender to your love
Just one year of love
Is better than A lifetime alone
One sentimental moment in your arms
Is like A shooting star right through my heart
Its always A rainy day without you
I'm A prisoner of love inside you
I'm falling apart all around you
And all I can do is surrender

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Queen/AUTHOR	NAME/One Year Of Love/NAME	"CONTENT/Just one year of love
Is better than a lifetime alone
One sentimental moment in your arms
Is like a shooting star right through my heart
It's always a rainy day without you
I'm a prisoner of love inside you
I'm falling apart all around you, yeah
My heart cries out to your heart
I'm lonely but you can save me
My hand reaches for to your hand
I'm cold but you light the fire in me
My lips search for your lips
I'm hungry for your touch
There's so much left unspoken
And all I can do is surrender
To the moment just surrender

And no one ever told me that love would hurt so much
Ooh yes it hurts
And pain is so close to pleasure
And all I can do is surrender to your love
Just surrender to your love
Just one year of love
Is better than a lifetime alone
One sentimental moment in your arms
Is like a shooting star right through my heart
It's always a rainy day without you
I'm a prisoner of love inside you
I'm falling apart all around you
And all I can do is surrender

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Queen/AUTHOR	NAME/Pain Is So Close To Pleasure/NAME	"CONTENT/Ooh, ooh, pain is so close to pleasure, oh yeah
Sunshine and rainy weather go hand in hand together all your life
Ooh, ooh, pain is so close to pleasure everybody knows
One day we love each other then we're fighting one another all the time
When I was young and just getting started
And people talked to me they sounded broken hearted
Then I grew up and got my imagination
And all I wanted was to start a new relation
So in love but love had a bad reaction
I was looking for some good old satisfaction
But pain is all I got when all I needed was some love and affection
Ooh, ooh, pain is so close to pleasure, yeah, yeah
Sunshine and rainy weather go hand in hand together all your life
Pain and pleasure
Ooh, ooh, pain and pleasure

When your plans go wrong - you turn out the light
But inside of your mind you put up a fight
Where are the answers that we're all searching for
There's nothing in this world to be sure of anymore
Some days you're feeling good, some days you're feeling bad
But if you're feeling happy someone else is always sad
Let the sweetness on love wipe the tears from your face
For better for worse, so let's make the best of the rest of our years
Ooh, ooh, pain is so close to pleasure, I told you so
Sunshine and rainy weather go hand in hand together all your life
Pain and pleasure, ooh, ooh, pain is so close to pleasure, yeah, yeah
Sunshine and rainy weather go hand in hand together all your life
All your life
Ooh ooh ooh
Pain - pleasure - pain - pleasure - pain - pleasure - pain - pleasure

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Queen/AUTHOR	NAME/Seven Seas Of Rhye/NAME	"CONTENT/Fear me you lord and lady preachers
I descend upon your earth from the skies
I command your very souls you unbelievers
Bring before me what is mine
The seven seas of Rhye

Can you hear me you peers and privy councilors
I stand before you naked to the eyes
I will destroy any man who dares abuse my trust
I swear that you'll be mine
At the seven seas of Rhye

Sister I live and lie for you
Mister do and I'll die
You are mine I possess you
Belong to you forever

Storm the master marathon I'll fly through
By flash and thunder fire I'll survive
I'll survive I'll survive
Then I'll defy the laws of nature
And come out alive

Begone with you you shod and shady senators
Give out the good leave out the bad evil cries
I challenge the mighty titan and his troubadours
And with a smile
I'll take you to the seven seas of Rhye

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Queen/AUTHOR	NAME/Sheer Heart Attack/NAME	"CONTENT/Well you're just seventeen - all you wanna do is disappear
You know what I mean there's a lot of space
Between your ears
The way that you touch don't feel nu nu nothin'
Hey hey hey hey, it was the D.N.A.
Hey hey hey hey, that made me this way
Do you know, do you know, do you know, just how I feel ?
Do you know, do you know, do you know, just how I feel ?

Sheer heart attack
Sheer heart attack
Real cardiac

I feel so inar, inar, inar, inar, inar, inar, inar, inar - ticulate

Gotta feelin', gotta feelin', gotta feelin', like a paralyse
It ain't no, it ain't no, it ain't no, it ain't no surprise
Turn on the T.V. let it drip right down in your eyes
Hey hey hey hey, it was the D.N.A.
Hey hey hey hey hey, that made me this way
Do you know, do you know, do you know, just how I feel ?
Do you know, do you know, do you know, just how I feel ?

Sheer heart attack
Sheer heart attack
Real cardiac

I feel so inar, inar, inar, inar, inar, inar, inar, inar - ticulate
Just how I feel
Do you know, do you know, do you know. do you know, just how I feel ?

Do you know, do you know, do you know, just how I feel ?
Do you know, do you know, do you know, do you know, just how I feel ?

Sheer heart attack
Sheer heart attack
Real cardiac

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Queen/AUTHOR	NAME/Sleeping On The Sidewalk/NAME	"CONTENT/I was nothin' but a city boy
My trumpet was my only toy
I've been blowin' my horn
Since I knew I was born
But there ain't nobody wants to know

I've been sleepin' on the sidewalk
Rollin' down the road
I may get hungry
But I sure don't want to go home

So round the corner comes a limousine
And the biggest grin I ever seen
Here sonny won't you sign
Right along the dotted line
What you sayin' are you playin'
Sure you don't mean me?

I've been sleepin' on the sidewalk
Rollin' down the road
I may get hungry
But I sure don't want to go home

(Now I tell you what happened...)

They took me to a room without a table
They said 'blow your trumpet into here'
I played around as well as I was able
And soon we had the record of the year

I was a legend all through the land
I was blowin' to a million fans
Nothin' was a missin'
All the people want to listen
You'd have thought I was a happy man

And I was sleepin' like a princess
Never touch the road
I don't get hungry
And I sure don't want to go home
(Have to have some fun...)

Now they tell me that I ain't so fashionable
An' I owe the man a million bucks a year
So I told 'em where to stick the fancy label
It's just me and the road from here

I'm back to playin' and layin'
I'm back on the game

I'm sleepin' on the sidewalk
Rollin' down the road
I sure get hungry and
I sure do want to go home
(Yeah)

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Queen/AUTHOR	NAME/Some Day One Day/NAME	"CONTENT/You never heard my song before the music was too loud
But now I think you hear me well for now we both know how
No star can light our way in this cloud of dark and fear
But some day, one day...

Funny how the pages turn and hold us in between
A misty castle awaits for you
And you shall be a Queen (you shall be a Queen)
Today the cloud, it hangs over us and all is grey
But some day, one day...

When I was you and you were me and we were very young
Together took us nearly there, the rest may not be sung
So still the cloud it hangs over us and we're alone
But some day one day...
We'll come home

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Queen/AUTHOR	NAME/Some Things That Glitter/NAME	"CONTENT/Once I loved a butterfly
Don't wonder how, don't ask me why
But I believed what I'd been told
All things that glitter can't be gold, ooh yeah
All things that glitter can't be gold
Those jealous minds conspired to say
Just let that creature fly away
How can it be she has it all?
Her pride is headed for a fall, ooh yeah
All things that glitter can't be gold
Oh Lord, what races we run
Seeking our place in the sun
Reaching and hoping
We'll find the right one
Now every day a new joy waits
My butterfly grew golden wings
It seems we find as we grow old
Some things that glitter may be gold, ooh yeah
Some things that glitter may be gold
So let us mind what's there to see
Before our hearts become too cold
In spite of all that we've been told
Some things that glitter may be gold, ooh yeah
Some things that glitter may be gold, ooh yeah
Some things that glitter may be gold

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Queen/AUTHOR	NAME/Somebody To Love/NAME	"CONTENT/Can anybody find me somebody to love
Ooh, each morning I get up I die a little
Can barely stand on my feet
(Take a look at yourself) Take a look in the mirror and cry (and cry)
Lord what you're doing to me (yeah yeah)
I have spent all my years in believing you
But I just can't get no relief, Lord!
Somebody (somebody) ooh somebody (somebody)
Can anybody find me somebody to love ?

Yeah
I work hard (he works hard) every day of my life
I work till I ache in my bones
At the end (at the end of the day)
I take home my hard earned pay all on my own
I get down (down) on my knees (knees)
And I start to pray
Till the tears run down from my eyes
Lord somebody (somebody), ooh somebody
(Please) Can anybody find me somebody to love ?

(He works hard)
Everyday (everyday) - I try and I try and I try
But everybody wants to put me down
They say I'm going crazy
They say I got a lot of water in my brain
Ah, got no common sense
I got nobody left to believe in
Yeah yeah yeah yeah

Oh Lord
Ooh somebody - ooh somebody
Can anybody find me somebody to love ?
(Can anybody find me someone to love)

Got no feel, I got no rhythm
I just keep losing my beat (You just keep losing and losing)
I'm OK, I'm alright (he's alright - he's alright)
I ain't gonna face no defeat (yeah yeah)
I just gotta get out of this prison cell
One day (someday) I'm gonna be free, Lord!

Find me somebody to love
Find me somebody to love
Find me somebody to love
Find me somebody to love
Find me somebody to love
Find me somebody to love
Find me somebody to love
Find me somebody to love love love
Find me somebody to love
Find me somebody to love somebody somebody somebody somebody
Somebody find me
Somebody find me somebody to love
Can anybody find me somebody to love ?
(Find me somebody to love)
Ooh
(Find me somebody to love)
Find me somebody, somebody (find me somebody to love) somebody, somebody to
love
(Find me somebody to love)
Find me, find me, find me, find me, find me
Ooh - somebody to love
(Find me somebody to love)
Ooh
(Find me somebody to love)
Find me, find me, find me somebody to love
(Find me somebody to love)
Anybody, anywhere, anybody find me somebody to love love love!
Wooo somebody find me, find me love.

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Queen/AUTHOR	NAME/Son And Daughter/NAME	"CONTENT/I want you woman
Tried to be a son and daughter rolled into one
You said you'd equal any man for having your fun
Ooh, now didn't you feel surprised to find
The cap just didn't fit ?
The world expects a man
To buckle down and shovel shit
What'll you do for loving
When it's only just begun ?
I want you to be a woman

Tried to be a teacher and a fisher of men
An equal people preacher
Will you lead us all the same ?
Ooh, well I travelled around the world
And found a brand new word for day
Ooh, watching the time mustn't linger behind
Pardon me I have to get away
What'll you think of heaven
If it's back from where you came
I want you to be a woman
I want you to be a woman
Yeah
Gotta save the world
Ooh, I've just begun
Alright

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Queen/AUTHOR	NAME/Spread Your Wings/NAME	"CONTENT/Sammy was low
Just watching the show
Over and over again
Knew it was time
He'd made up his mind
To leave his dead life behind
His boss said to him
""Boy you'd better begin
To get those crazy notions right out of your head
Sammy who do you think that you are
You should've been sweeping up the Emerald bar""

Spread your wings and fly away
Fly away far away
Spread your little wings and fly away
Fly away far away
Pull yourself together
'Cause you know you should do better
That's because you're a free man

He spends his evenings alone in his hotel room
Keeping his thoughts to himself he'd be leaving soon
Wishing he was miles and miles away
Nothing in this world nothing would make him stay

Since he was small
Had no luck at all
Nothing came easy to him
Now it was time
He'd made up his mind
""This could be my last chance""

His boss said to him ""now listen boy
You're always dreaming
You've got no real ambition you won't get very far
Sammy boy don't you know who you are
Why can't you be happy at the Emerald bar""

So honey
Spread your wings and fly away
Fly away far away
Spread your little wings and fly away
Fly away far away
Pull yourself together
'Cause you know you should do better
That's because you're a free man
Come on honey

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Queen/AUTHOR	NAME/Stealin'/NAME	"CONTENT/Words and music by queen

Thats the way I am
Does everybody want to know
This is the way I lead my life - you know
Wheelin and dealin
And a little bit of stealin
You know thats the way I grew up
Thats the only life I know
Thats the way my mother taught me
There you go

Stealin
I gave you the key to my home
I left you alone in charge of my heart
Hey stealin
You got me wheelin and dealin
You play with my feelin
Right from the start

Cant afford to pay my rent
I had to use my common sense
To get some money I owe - oho
This guy said look in my head
Make some easy bread
Stealin is the only way that I know

Stealin yeah only way that I know
Yeah I like stealin baby stealin
I gave you both my own on my own
Left you alone
Now youll be stealin stealin stealin
All my heart
Youre my babys heart
Uh uh

Baby let em bleed

Youre in charge of my heart
You are in charge of my heart
You are in charge
You are in charge

Da da da da da da
Da da da da da da
Da da da da da da

Yes you are in charge of my heart
I gave you the key
And turned on the bed
I gave you the key
Come on I said what have I got
What have I got

Yes
I, I got the key out of my heart
Now get that key out of my heart
? ? ? of my heart
Come on

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Queen/AUTHOR	NAME/Step On Me/NAME	"CONTENT/Know what I said when I saw you crying
Hang on that's folly
I was reeking the head I believed your lying
You're just a bad memory
My life was going to be better
My, why could I never ever see she'd step on me

Well I talked to your friend just the other day
I was gonna look and raise a smile
And she hid a smile and she ain't like you
Been asleep from all the journeys a little while
My life was going to be better

[Chorus:]
My, why could I never ever see she'd step on me
Step on me, step on me, step on me
Now it's so good I won't waste my time
On a two year old picture of you
Oh now that you're gone everything's fine

But you probably think that we're through
My life was going to be better

[Chorus]

But you probably think that we're through
My life was going to be better
My, why could I never ever see she'd step on me
Never ever see she'd step on me

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Queen/AUTHOR	NAME/Still Burning/NAME	"CONTENT/I can't wake in the mornin'
I can't sleep at night
I got a pain in my memory
That just won't sit right
You might say I'm losing my mind
What a shame, shame, shame
But I don't want and I don't need
To play the cryin' game

Music lights this flame in me
I won't let it go and it won't let me be
I'm just a happy slave and oh I can't leave it
'Cause I'm still, and I always will, be a believer

Still burnin' (Yeah)
Still yearnin' (And the wheel's)
Still turnin' (Let me tell you why)
We're jivin' (And the beat's)
Still drivin' (And we are all)
Divin' (Rock'n'roll never die)

I can't breathe in the city
Got dust in my lungs
I get mad in the country
Everythin' seem to go wrong
You might think I'm playin' around
But my heart is true
I got reason to believe
That sweet soul magic
Gonna tear my heart in two

Music makes the world go round
I've been flyin' on the wings of the sound
It feels so good from way up here
I'm still a believer
Headin' for the stars

(Still burnin')
(Still yearnin')
Still turnin' (Better than every guy)
(We're jivin')
(Still drivin')
Sky divin' (Rock'n'roll never die)

Don't say that you love me I can't go down that road
But don't think for a moment that my heart went cold
I keep thinkin' about what I lost
And what I might have found
I went to sleep and when I woke
Everything had turned around

Still burnin' (Yeah)
(Still yearnin')
Still turnin' (A new day dawnin')
(We're jivin')
(Still drivin')
Sky divin' (Early in the morning)

Still burnin' (Yeah)
Still yearnin' (And the wheel's)
Still turnin' (Better than every guy)
We're jivin' (And the beat's)
Still drivin' (And we're all)
Sky divin' (Rock'n'roll never die)

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Queen/AUTHOR	NAME/Stone Cold Crazy/NAME	"CONTENT/Sleeping very soundly on a Saturday morning
I was dreaming I was Al Capone
There's a rumor going round
Gotta clear outta town
I'm smelling like a dry fish bone
Here come the law gonna break down the door
Gonna carry me away once more
Never never I never want it anymore
Gotta get away from this stone cold floor
Crazy stone cold crazy you know

Rainy afternoon I gotta blow a typhoon
And I'm playing on my slide trombone
Anymore anymore cannot take it anymore
Gotta get away from this stone cold floor
Crazy stone cold crazy you know

Walking down the street
Shooting people that I meet
With my rubber Tommy water gun
Here come the deputy
He's gonna come and get me
I gotta get me up and run
They got the sirens loose
I ran right outta juice
They're gonna put me in a cell
If I can't go to heaven
Will they let me go to hell?
Crazy stone cold crazy you know

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Queen/AUTHOR	NAME/Stop All The Fighting/NAME	"CONTENT/Words and music by freddie mercury

Stop all stop all (stop all) the fighting
Stop all stop all stop all the fighting
Stop it stop all the fighting
We want to live in a better place (live in a better place)
We want to make a better human race
We want to live in a better place (stop all the fighting)
We want to make a better human race
Stop all the fighting stop all the fighting
Don't do that don't get all excited
You know that know that - not gonna like it
Stop all (stop all) stop all stop all the fighting
We want to live in a better place (yeah yeah yeah yeah)
We want to make a better human race
We want to live in a better place (stop all the fighting)
We want to make a better human race
Stop all the fighting stop all the fighting
Get all excited
You don't have to do that
Youre not gonna like it
That's a point of fact
We want to live in a better place
We want to make a better human race for you
We want to live in a better place
We want to make a better human race
Stop all the fighting stop all the fighting

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Queen/AUTHOR	NAME/Surf's Up... School's Out/NAME	"CONTENT/Surf's up, school's out
I got a criminal urge to twist and shout

I've been searching my whole life through
For some perfect dream imagined in my youth

(Follow that dream
Surf's up, school's out
Surf's up, school's out)

For a perfect life, find a perfect girl
You gotta follow that dream to a perfect world
I've been a searcher, an adventurer too
This ride still runs, I wanna ride with you

This ride still runs, wanna ride with you

(Follow that dream
Surf's up, school's out
Surf's up, school's out)

In the town and the country
We all lay and dreamed our dreams
Then we found the world is tough
And all is not quite what it seems
Gotta take it by the horns
Gotta seize your precious day
Gotta follow your dream

(Follow that dream
Follow that dream
Follow that dream
Surf's up, school's out
Follow that dream
Surf's up, school's out
Surf's up
Follow that dream
Surf's up, school's out
Surf's up, school's out
Follow that dream)

Follow that dream

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Queen/AUTHOR	NAME/Sweet Lady/NAME	"CONTENT/Ooh, I like it
You call me up and treat me like a dog
You call me up and tear me up inside
You've got me on a lead
Ooh, you bring me down
You shout around
You don't believe that I'm alone
Ooh, you don't believe me

Sweet lady
Sweet lady
Sweet lady sweet lady...ooh, stay sweet

You say
""You call me up and feed me all the lines
""You call me sweet like I'm some kind of cheese
""Waiting on the shelf
""You eat me up
""You hold me down
""I'm just a fool to make you a home
""Ooh, you really do me

""When you say
""Sweet lady (sweet lady)
""Sweet lady (sweet lady)
""Sweet lady...ooh, come on, stay sweet""

My sweet lady
Though it seems like we wait forever - oo ah oo
Stay sweet baby
Believe and we've got everything we need (got everything we need)
Ow

Sweet lady
Sweet lady
Sweet lady...ooh, ooh, stay sweet, stay sweet
Oh runaway, come on, yeah yeah, yeah yeah, sweet lady
Wooh

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Queen/AUTHOR	NAME/Thank God It's Christmas/NAME	"CONTENT/Oh my love we've had
Our share of tears
Oh my friends we've had
Our hopes and fears
Oh my friend it's been
A long hard year
But now it's Christmas
Yes it's Christmas
Thank God it's Christmas

The moon and stars
Seem awful cold and bright
Let's hope the snow will
Make this Christmas right

My friend the world will share
This special night
Because it's Christmas
Yes it's Christmas
Thank God it's Christmas
For one night
Thank God it's Christmas
Yeah thank God it's Christmas
Thank God it's Christmas
Can it be Christmas
Let it be Christmas every day

Oh my love we live
In troubled days
Oh my friend we have
The strangest ways
Oh my friends on this
One day of days
Thank God it's Christmas
Yes it's Christmas
Thank God it's Christmas
For one day

Thank God it's Christmas
Yes it's Christmas
Thank God it's Christmas
Wooh yeah
Thank God it's Christmas
Yeah yeah yeah yes it's Christmas
Thank God it's Christmas
For one day yeah - Christmas

A very merry Christmas to you all

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Ed Sheeran/AUTHOR	NAME/Even My Dad Does Sometimes/NAME	"CONTENT/It's alright to cry even my dad does sometimes
So don't wipe your eyes
Tears remind you you're alive
It's alright to die cause death the only thing you haven't tried
But just for tonight hold on
So live life like you're giving all
Cause you act like you are
Go ahead and just live it up
Go on and tell me your path

It's alright to shake
Even my hand does sometimes
So inside the rage Against the dying of the light
It's alright to say that death's
The only thing you haven't tried
But just for today hold on
So live life like you're giving all
Cause you act like you are
Go ahead and just live it up
Go on and tell me your path

Go ahead and just live it up
Go on and tell me your path and hold on

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Ed Sheeran/AUTHOR	NAME/Friends/NAME	"CONTENT/We're not, no we're not friends, nor have we ever been
We just try to keep those secrets in our lives
And if they find out, will it all go wrong?
I never know, no one wants it to

So I could take the back road
But your eyes'll lead me straight back home
And if you know me like I know you
You should love me, you should know

Friends just sleep in another bed
And friends don't treat me like you do
Well I know that there's a limit to everything
But my friends won't love me like you
No, my friends won't love me like you

We're not friends, we could be anything
If we tried to keep those secrets safe
No one will find out if it all went wrong
They'll never know what we've been through

So I could take the back road
But your eyes'll lead me straight back home
And if you know me like I know you
You should love me, you should know

Friends just sleep in another bed
And friends don't treat me like you do
Well I know that there's a limit to everything
But my friends won't love me like you
No, my friends won't love me like you

But then again, if we're not friends
Someone else might love you too
And then again, if we're not friends
There'd be nothing I could do, and that's why

Friends should sleep in other beds
And friends should kiss me like you do
And I know that there's a limit to everything
But my friends won't love me like you
No, my friends won't love me like you
Oh, my friends will never love me like you

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Ed Sheeran/AUTHOR	NAME/Heaven/NAME	"CONTENT/Will you recognise me, in the flashing lights
I try to keep my heart beat, but I can't get it right
Will you recognise me, when I'm laying on my back
Something's gone inside me, and it 'aint coming back, now

Oh heaven, oh heaven, I wait with good intention, now
But the day, it always lasts too long, mm, then I'm gone
Oh heaven, oh heaven, I wait with good intention, now
But the day, it always lasts too long, woah
Then I'm gone (x7) woo woo woo wooo

Will you recognise me, when I'm stealing from the poor
You're not gonna' like me, no I'm nothing like before, wow
And will you recognise me, when I lose another friend
Will you learn to leave me, or give me one more try again

Oh heaven, oh heaven, I wait with good intention, now
But the day, it always lasts too long, woah, then I'm gone
Oh heaven, oh heaven, I wait with good intention, now
But the day, it always lasts too long, now
Then I'm gone (x7) now woo woo woo wooo

Baby be mine, now, mm, mm, mmm

Oh heaven, oh heaven, I wait with good intention, now
But the day, it always lasts too long, mm, then I'm gone
Oh heaven, oh heaven, I wait with good intention, now
But the day, it always lasts too long, wow
Then I'm gone (x19)

Baby be mine, oh, woah, wow

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Ed Sheeran/AUTHOR	NAME/Homeless/NAME	"CONTENT/Could I wake up next to you when it's hitting double figures?
Look into your eyes like I'm looking into double mirrors
Could you make it any clearer? Everything's such a blur
It's not my turn, it's hers to get hurt
On a late night coming home from way too many train rides
Lace not as red as my face, I'm home at the same time
Highbury Estate's fine, smoking like a dragon but don't chase lines

Hey, I haven't slept for the past week
And two hours ain't enough for me
I feel inspired, at quarter to three A.M.
I haven't changed since our last meet
I'm still getting all my meals for free
I think I'm being shunned by my feet again

'Cause it's not a homeless life for me
It's just I'm home less than I'd like to be
And it's not a homeless life for me
It's just I'm home less than I'd like to be
And it's not a homeless life for me
It's just I'm home less than I'd like to be
And it's not a homeless life for me, yeah

And now I'm sitting on a night bus flicking through my iPod
Feeling kinda tired so I try to close my eyes up, driver turn the lights
Off
Lights on, on stage, mics on, song plays, nice one
Gotta keep my hype strong, truth be, never went to Uni
People see right through me but I'm not a fool, see
I'm never gonna do one, gonna live past 22,
Done everything I need to, except get a 2:1

I haven't slept for the past week
And two hours ain't enough for me
I feel inspired, at quarter to three A.M.
I haven't changed since our last meet
I'm still getting all my meals for free
I think I'm being shunned by my feet again

'Cause it's not a homeless life for me
It's just I'm home less than I'd like to be
And it's not a homeless life for me
It's just I'm home less than I'd like to be
And it's not a homeless life for me
It's just I'm home less than I'd like to be
And it's not a homeless life for me, yeah

When I feel cold, you keep me warm
And I'm not looking for some loose change
Just wanna find a true mate
Who wants to be my duvet, hey

It's not a homeless life for me
It's just I'm home less than I'd like to be

And it's not a homeless life for me
It's just I'm home less than I'd like to be
And it's not a homeless life for me
It's just I'm home less than I'd like to be
And it's not a homeless life for me
It's just I'm home less than I'd like to be
And it's not a homeless life for me
It's just I'm home less than I'd like to be
And it's not a homeless life for me
It's just I'm home less than I'd like to be
And it's not a homeless life for me
It's just I'm home less than I'd like to be

And it's not a homeless life for me, yeah

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Ed Sheeran/AUTHOR	NAME/Make It Rain/NAME	"CONTENT/[Verse 1]
When the sins of my father
Weigh down in my soul
And the pain of my mother
Will not let me go
Well, I know there can come fire from the sky
To refine the purest of kings
And even though I know this fire brings me pain
Even so, and just the same

[Chorus x2]
Make it rain
Make it rain down, lord
Make it rain
Oh, make it rain

[Verse 2]
Well, a seed needs the water
Before it grows out of the ground
But it just keeps on getting hard
Hunger more profound
Well, I know they can't count tears from the eye
But they may as well be in vain
And even though I know these tears come with pain
Even so, and just the same

[Chorus x2]

[Verse 3]
The seas are full of water
Stops by the shore
It's like the riches of grandeur
Never reach the poor
And let the clouds fill with thunderous applause
And let lightning be the veins
And fill the sky with all that they can draw
When it's time to make a change

[Chorus x4]

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Ed Sheeran/AUTHOR	NAME/Nina/NAME	"CONTENT/I met you when I was a teen but then you were one as well
And I could play the guitar just like ringing a bell
Sometimes I wonder
And any other summer could you have been my part time lover
To me listening to Stevie Wonder
Under the covers where we used to lay
And re-stacks is what the speakers play
I'll be on tour almost every day
When I was home up in my flat is where we used to stay
Just watching the dvd, smoking illegal weed
Getting high as two kites, and we needed to breathe
We used each other's air just for the people to see
And stay up all night like when we needed to sleep
We go anywhere, our minds would take us
And also you are beautiful without your make-up
And you don't even need to worry about your weight 'cause
We can all be loved the way God made us
And time's the only reason that we could break up
Cause you would always tell me away too much
Distance is relative to the time that it takes to get on a plane
Or make a mistake, say it again

Oh Nina, you should go Nina
'Cause I ain't never coming home
Nina oh, won't you leave me now
And I've been living on the road Nina
And then again you should know Nina
Cause that's you and me both
Nina oh, won't you leave me now
Now

And every weekend in the winter
You'd be wearing my hoodie
With draw strings pulled tight
To keep your face in the cold
Taking day trips to the local
Where we eat on the road
Cause every day when I was away
We'd only speak on the phone
Watching Blue Planet
Creating new habits
And if we were two rabbits
And then you vanish
Back to 'burgh with all the Celtics, i'd dissapear
You call me selfish, I understand
But I can't help it
I put my job before everything
Except my family and friends
But you'll be in between forever
So I guess we'll have to take a step back
Overlook the situation
Cause mixing business and feelings will only lead to complications
And I'm not saying we should be taking a break
Just re-evaluating quick before we make a mistake and it's too late
So we can either deal with the pain
Or wait to get on a plane
But in the day we'll have to say it again

Oh Nina, you should go Nina
'Cause I ain't never coming home
Nina oh, won't you leave me now
And I've been living on the road Nina
And then again you should know Nina
Cause that's you and me
Nina oh, won't you leave me now
Now

Love will come and love will go
But you can make it on your own
Sing that song, go, oh won't you leave me now
People grow, and fall apart
But you can mend your broken heart
Take it back, oh won't you leave me now

Oh Nina, you should go Nina
'Cause I ain't never coming home
Nina oh, won't you leave me now
And I've been living on the road Nina
And then again you should know Nina
Cause that's you and me both
Nina oh, won't you leave me now
Now

Oh Nina, you should go Nina
'Cause I ain't never coming home
Nina oh, won't you leave me now
And I've been living on the road Nina
Then again you should know Nina
Cause that's you and me both
Nina oh, won't you leave me now
Now

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Ed Sheeran/AUTHOR	NAME/Touch And Go/NAME	"CONTENT/[Intro]
Oh oh oh
Oh oh oh
Oh oh oh
Oh oh oh

[Verse 1]
Waking up, midnight November
And just still in my bed
It's kinda rough, cause since I met ya
There's things we've never said

[Pre-Chorus]
So if I go for a little while longer
When I'm home we can talk about the big falls of the road
If you say go, I would stop everything oh
My heart would play the role now
And act like it's never been broke

[Chorus]
Though my soul, oh oh oh
Lately I really need to know
How long, how long, can we be touch and go
Oh my soul, oh oh oh
How long, how long, can we be touch and go

[Verse 2]
It's not enough, to say I want ya
Cause I'll say anything
I'm holding out, to feel without a doubt
I had have just been questioning it

[Pre-Chorus]
If I go for a little while longer
When I'm home we can talk about the big falls of the road
If you say go, I would stop everything oh
My heart would play the role now
And act like it's never been broke

[Chorus]
Though my soul, oh oh oh
Lately I really need to know
How long, how long, can we be touch and go
Oh my soul, oh oh oh
How long, how long, can we be

[Bridge]
All of my bones, they scream I'm right
If you're taking me home to stay the night
Darling my soul would heal

[Outro]
If you say go, I would stop everything oh
My heart would play the wrong
And act like it's never been broke, though my soul
Lately I really need to know
How long, how long, can we be touch and go
Oh my soul, how long
How long, how long, can we be touch and go
How long, how long, can we be touch and go
How long, how long, can we be touch and go

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Ed Sheeran/AUTHOR	NAME/Wayfaring Stranger/NAME	"CONTENT/I am a poor, wayfaring Stranger
Traveling through this world alone
There's no sickness, toil or danger
In that bright land, to which I go
I'm going there to see my mother
I'm going there no more to roam
I'm only going over Jordan
I'm only going over home now

(Hey-ey-ey yeah...)

And I know dark clouds, will gather me
And I know my way, is rough and steep
And the beautiful fields lie just beyond me

And I know my way, is rough and steep
I'm going there to see my mother
And I'm going there no more to roam
I'm only going over Jordan
I'm only going over home now

Cause I am a poor, wayfaring Stranger
Traveling through this world alone
There's no sickness, toil or danger
In that bright land, to which I go
I'm going there to see my mother
And I'm going there no more to roam
I'm only going over Jordan
I'm only going over home now

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Ed Sheeran/AUTHOR	NAME/Where We Land/NAME	"CONTENT/Treat me beneath this clear night sky
And I will lie with you
I start to feel those butterflies
When I'm next to you

Tell me your secrets
Give me a friend
Let all the good times flood in

Do I love you? Do I hate you?
I can't make up my mind
So let's free fall
And see where we land

It's been this way since we were young
We'll fight and then make up
I'll breathe your air into my lungs
When I feel your touch

Tell me your secrets
Give me a friend
Let all the good times flood in

Do I love you? Do I hate you?
I can't make up my mind
So let's free fall
And see where we land

Da da da da
Da da da da
Da da da da

Da da da da
Da da da da
Da da da da

Tell me your secrets
Give me a friend
Let all the good times flood in

Do I love you? Do I hate you?
I can't make up my mind
So let's free fall
And see where we land

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Drake/AUTHOR	NAME/6 Man/NAME	"CONTENT/[Verse 1]
Boomin' out in South Gwinnett like Lou Will
6 man like Lou Will, 2 girls and they get along like I'm...
Like I'm Lou Will, I just got the new deal
I am in the Matrix and I just took the blue pill
No ho shit, no fuckin' ho shit, just save that for your shit
I don't need no fuckin' body, I run my own shit
Like Soulja, I thought I told yah, you didn't listen
Fieri, I'm in the kitchen, I'm a magician
I'm on it, I'm like Macgyver, I'm Michael Meyers
I kill careers and cut the lights off, this shit is frightenin'
I knew it would end up like this, I'm fuckin' psychic
Young but I'm makin' millions to work the night shift

[Hook]
Work the night shift
Young but I'm makin' millions to work the night shift
Work, work the night shift

[Verse 2]
Young but I'm gettin' every single motherfuckin' thing
I'm old, you gotta know
I'm here to fuck with niggas souls, my heart is cold
It's prolly cause I'm from the snow, with all my woes
I know they wanna see me go, I'm on a roll
I mean I'm back on this again, I'm here again
You know the truth, this not pretend, I'm not your friend
Not your guy, I'm not your buddy, show no lovin'
I might go DeMarcus Cousins out in public
I mean I'm back on this again, I'm here again
I didn't do this fuckin' tape for CNN
I am not tryna win awards, that shit looked forced
It's nothin' like this
Young but I'm makin' millions to work the night shift

[Hook]
Work the night shift
Young but I'm makin' millions to work the night shift
Work, work the night shift

[Outro]
If you were worried about where
I've been or who I saw or
What club I went to with the homies
Baby don't worry, you know that you got me
I'm never worried about where
I'm at or who I saw or
What club I went to with the homies
Baby don't worry, I know that they got me

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Drake/AUTHOR	NAME/Believe It Or Not/NAME	"CONTENT/Feat. Gucci Mane

[Gucci Mane:]
I'm so fucking dumb I wrote ""diamonds"" on my thumbs,
It's a diamond on my dick so that's a diamond on her tongue,
I can't feel you baby 'cause I'm romantically numb,
Emotionally drained I came here just so I can come,
There's nothing on the God's sun that I haven't done,
I got a lot of problems gettin pussy just isn't one,
Girls are like buses every 15 mins they run,
Now they like potato chips I just cannot have one,
And I might like you for a minute,
But I don't like your friends in my business,
And I feel like you don't deserve a visit,
Cause you ain't in the kitchen when you want a whipping,

[Chorus:]
Uh uhhhhhhh,
I know you say you love me girl,
I know you say you love me girl,
Problem is you prolly tell that shit to everybody,
So we hear you talking boo but we just don't believe you,

[Drake:]
Uh, ok I'm all about it, all for it,
I'm all-star team Jordan, small forward,
I'm never putting up a shot unless it calls for it,
No hesitation so I'm shooting if I draw for it,
How, How? Fuck is up, now man I'm in this hoe,
Life is moving fast, where the fuck do all these minutes go,
Mixtape dropped then I started getting 10 a show,
Now I get a hundred what the fuck you think I'm in it for,
Young money forever, I bet Gudda, Jae and Mack agree,
Fuck you to the haters that just spend their time attacking me,
Shout out to your girlfriend nigga lately she distracting me,
Wondering if I'm the best, Will I. Am, no Black Eyed Peas,
Girls wanna fuck ya niggas, guy don't wanna be you,
Lining up around the block so that they can get to see you,
I feel like I'll find a wife exactly when I need to,
You can say whatever girl but we just don't believe you,

[Chorus:]
Uh uhhhhhhh,
I know you say you love me girl,
I know you say you love me girl,
Problem is you prolly tell that shit to everybody,
So we hear you talking boo but we just don't believe you

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Drake/AUTHOR	NAME/Best I Ever Had/NAME	"CONTENT/You know a lot of girls be
Thinking my songs are about them
This is not to get confused
This ones for you

[Chorus]
Baby you're my everything, you're all I ever wanted
We could do it real big, bigger than you ever done it
You be up on everything, other hoes ain't never on it
I want this forever, I swear I could spend whatever on it
Cause she hold me down every time I hit her up
When I get right I promise that we gone live it up
She make me beg for it, till she give it up
And I say the same thing every single time
I say,
You da fuckin' best
You da fuckin' best
You da fuckin' best
You da fuckin' best
You the da best I ever had,
Best I ever had
Best I ever had
Best I ever had
I say you da fuckin'

Know you gotta roommate,
Call me when there's no one there,
Put the key under the mat and you know I be over there (yup)
I be over there, shawty I be over there
I be hittin' all the spots that you ain't even know was there
And you don't even have to ask twice,
You could have my heart, or we could share it like the last slice
Always felt like you were so accustomed to the fast life
Have a nigga thinking that he met you in a past life
Sweat pants, hair tied, chillin' with no make-up on
That's when you're the prettiest, I hope that you don't take it wrong
You don't even trip when friends say you ain't bringing drake along
You know that I'm working I be there soon as I make it home
And she a patient in my waiting room,
Never pay attention to the rumors and what they assume
And until em' girls prove it, I'm the one that never get confused wit

Cause

[Chorus]

Sex, love, pain, baby I be on that tank shit,
Buzz so big, I could probably sell a blank disk
When my album drop bitches will buy it for the picture
And niggas will buy two and claim they got it for they sister
Magazine paper girl but money ain't the issue
They bring dinner to my room and ask me to initial
She call me the referee cause I be so official
My shirt ain't got no stripes but I can make your pussy whistle
Like the Andy Griffith theme song,
And who told you to put them jeans on
Double cup love, you're the one I lean on
Feeling for a fix, than you should really get your fiend on
Yeah, just know my condo is the crack spot
Every single show she out there reppin' like a mascot
Get it from the back and make ya fuckin' bra strap pop
All up in your slot till a nigga hit the jack pot

Baby you're my everything, you're all I ever wanted
We could do it real big, bigger than you ever done it
You be up on everything, other hoes ain't ever on it
I want this forever I swear I could spend whatever on it
Cause she hold me down every time I hit her up
When I get right I promise that we gone live it up
She make me beg for it, till she give it up
And I say the same thing every single time
I say,
You da fuckin' best
You da fuckin' best
You da fuckin' best
You da fuckin' best
You da best I ever had,
Best I ever had
Best I ever had
Best I ever had
I say,
You da fuckin' best
You da fuckin' best
You da fuckin' best
You da fuckin' best
You da best I ever had,
Best I ever had
Best I ever had
Best I ever had

Uh, ah yea
See this the type of joint you gotta dedicate to somebody
Just make sure they that special somebody
Young money, yeah yeah
You know who you are, I got ya

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Drake/AUTHOR	NAME/Brand New/NAME	"CONTENT/This here is on some truthful shit
It seems like everything I do, your used to it
And I hate hearing stories bout who you've been with
That's when I gotta hide, what I'm feeling inside
So you still think I'm confident and damn
Is this gonna last? Your up on a pedastool
Are we moving too fast?
Feel like I'm in crazy competition with the past
That's why I gotta ask, is anything I'm doing brand new?

Brand new, brand new, brand new, brand new
Is anything I'm doing brand new?
Brand new, brand new, brand new, brand new, brand new

This here is something personal
Highly doubt this feeling is reversible
Knowledge is pain and that is why it hurts to know
That you attempt to hide, and put mistakes aside
So I don?t ever question you and damn
I can't even find, the perfect brush
So I can paint what's going through my mind
Racing against myself, but I'm a couple steps behind
That's why I gotta ask, is anything I'm doing brand new?

Brand new, brand new, brand new, brand new
Is anything I'm doing brand new?
Brand new, brand new, brand new, brand new
Brand new girl

Is anything I'm doing brand new
Is everything I'm doing too late

Did he take off your clothes off just like this
Did he give you loving just like this
Did you spend the night in his bed on the very first date
Tell me baby am I too late?

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Drake/AUTHOR	NAME/Cameras/NAME	"CONTENT/[Verse:]
Word on road, it's the clique about to blow
You ain't gotta run and tell nobody they already know
We've been living on a high, they've been talking on a low
But it's cool, know you heard it all before

[Hook:]
That's why I asked you are you me, are you me
Thought you knew about the team, (ay)
That's why I asked you are you me, are you me
Thought you knew about the team, (ay)

[Verse 2:]
Are you me, are you me, what you know about the team
Man these niggas got to stop it they be crowding up the scene
Baby girl you need to stop it all that pride and self esteem
Got you angry about this girl I'm with in all them magazines
Baby she look like a star, but only on camera
Only on camera, only on camera
It look like we in love, but only on camera
Only on camera, only on camera
Don't listen to the lies, I swear they all lies
You know I could be your knight in shining armor all tires
Trying to tell you I'm the one, come and holla at me
Before I'm on the next thing, ymcmb (ah)

[Hook:]

[Verse 3:]
Are you me, are you me, what you know about the team
You just know what you get told girl I see behind the scene
She spilled whiskey on her shirt, she gonna have to get it cleaned
She been going way to hard, someone has to intervene
Baby she look like a star, but only on camera
Only on camera, only on camera
It might look like I care, but only on camera
Only on camera, only on camera
Don't listen to the lies, I swear they all lies
You know I could be your knight in shining armor all ties
Girl they love me like I'm Prince, new kid with the crown
Bunch of underground kings, thought you knew how we get down (ah)

[Outro:]
Are you me, are you me, thought you knew about the team (ay)
Are you me, are you me, thought you knew about the team (ay)

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Drake/AUTHOR	NAME/Come Thru/NAME	"CONTENT/We had the type of nights where morning comes too soon
And nothing was the same

Watch me, going out of the way
When I should've went home
Only time of the day I get to spend on my own
I was trippin' off how I used to sleep at ya crib,
Should drive by right where you live, and pick you up on the way
We ain't spoke in so long, probably put me in the past
I can still get you wet and I can still make you laugh
You should call into work if that ain't too much to ask
I could pour you up a drink and we can burn something

Come thru, come thru, come thru, come thru
Girl you know we got thangs to do
Girl you know we got thangs to do
So get your ass in that car and come thru

Come thru, come thru, come thru, come thru
Girl you know we got thangs to do
Girl you know we got thangs to do
So get your ass in that car and come thru

Last night I brought DOA to the studio
They already had a stage and a booty pole
Its supposed to be a lot of hard working going on
But who the fuck can focus with this twerkin' going on
Someone put a order in for a chicken (For a chicken)
Told my girl to order in, I need the kitchen (Need the kitchen)
Yeah they know I got the hook-up, they just wait on me to cook up
Baby I heat up the stove, you do the dishes ya know?
Rap game, Crack game, ain't that different ya know?
Last album had it booming something vicious ya know?
And ya know I need ya back in my life
Girl ya know ya got that, know ya got that thing that I like
Girl you got that thing for real
When I was on a mission to make it
Who used to sleep on the floor with you when you lived in the basement?
Who else got all the things you need at 4am when it's late?
I always pour you up a drink and let you burn something

Come thru, come thru, come thru, come thru
Girl you know we got thangs to do
Girl you know we got thangs to do
So get your ass in that car and come thru

Come thru, come thru, come thru, come thru
Girl you know we got thangs to do
Girl you know we got thangs to do
So get your ass in that car and come thru

Why has it been so long? Why has it been so long?
Why has it been? (Why has it been so long?) Why has it been?
Who you been crying to? (Why has it been so long?) Who you been flying to?
Who's bed are you sleeping in? (Why has it been so long?) Someone's been
hiding you
(Why has it been so long?) Where have you been?
(Why has it been so long?) You deserve rounds tonight, come thru girl you
deserve rounds tonight
(Why has it been so long?) Come thru girl you deserve rounds tonight
(Why has it been so long?) Come thru girl you deserve rounds tonight
(Why has it been so long?) Rounds tonight oh, come thru girl you deserve
rounds tonight
(Why has it been so long?) Come thru girl you deserve rounds tonight
(Why has it been so long?) Come thru girl you deserve rounds tonight

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Drake/AUTHOR	NAME/Enough Said/NAME	"CONTENT/[Aaliyah]
Cause I, ooooh
Yeah yeah yeah yeah yeah yeah yeah yeaaaah
Yeah yeah yeah yeah yeah yeah yeah yeaaaah

[Aaliyah]
I can tell you something
But you tell me do you wanna talk about, talk about
You say you got a lot on your mind, sit down lets talk about it (talk about)
I hate to see you feel this way
So tell me what can I do to make it better for you
Make it better for you babe, hey...

[Chorus:]
Yeah yeah yeah yeah yeah yeah yeah yeaaaah
Yeah yeah yeah yeah yeah yeah yeah yeaaaah
(Wassup)
Yeah yeah yeah yeah yeah yeah yeah yeaaaah
(Wassup)
Yeah yeah yeah yeah yeah yeah yeah yeaaaah
(Yea wassup)

[Aaliyah]
Really tell me what I gotta do to get you to talk about (talk about)
Cause it's been getting a little too long for you not to talk about
So tell me what you would like me to do, to help you, help me, help you
Cause I don't really want to tell you without you

Yeah yeah yeah yeah yeah yeah yeah yeaaaah
Tell me why...

[Chorus:]
Yeah yeah yeah yeah yeah yeah yeah yeaaaah
Yeah yeah yeah yeah yeah yeah yeah yeaaaah
(Wassup)
Yeah yeah yeah yeah yeah yeah yeah yeaaaah
(Wassup)
Yeah yeah yeah yeah yeah yeah yeah yeaaaah
(Yea wassup)

[Drake]
Went from my nigga serving it by the tele
To venues in Manchester just swerving with Balotelli
The fuck are you trying to tell me?
Bothers me when you got to play therapist
That shit's embarrassin'
They even bring up these niggas make the comparison
They just got to forgive me, this watch is a 150
Still ain't got the time for a bitch to be acting iffy
Running through the city with niggas I'd give a kidney
Selling under 150 you niggas gotta be kidding
Is this even still a discussion?
Don't you ever wake up disgusted?
Every million I gain an enemy or a cousin
And people's feelings have changed ever since I became somethin'
Girls that becoming ladies
And my friends are having babies
And babies are dropping dead in my city
This shit is crazy
And I don't know if speaking on it helps
This the shit that's on my mind I just keep it to myself
You know

Can't you talk to me
Lets talk about it, talk about it
Tell me what you need
Just tell me baby, tell me baby

[Chorus:]
Yeah yeah yeah yeah yeah yeah yeah yeaaaah
Yeah yeah yeah yeah yeah yeah yeah yeaaaah
(Wassup)
Yeah yeah yeah yeah yeah yeah yeah yeaaaah
(Wassup)
Yeah yeah yeah yeah yeah yeah yeah yeaaaah
(Yea wassup)

Came too far to give up
Gotta try, cause I can't do it on my own
Can't you talk to me
Tell me what you need
Can't you talk to me
Tell me what you need

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Drake/AUTHOR	NAME/Furthest Thing/NAME	"CONTENT/Somewhere between psychotic and iconic
Somewhere between I want it and I got it
Somewhere between I'm sober and I'm lifted
Somewhere between a mistress and commitment
But I stay down, girl I always stay down
Get down, have her lay down
Promise to break everybody off before I break down
Everyone just wait now
So much on my plate now
People I believed in they don't even show they face now
What they got to say now?
Nothin' they can say now
Nothin' really changed but still they look at me a way now
What more can I say now?
What more can I say now?
You might feel like nothin' was the same

I still been drinkin' on the low
Mobbin' on the low
Fuckin' on the low
Smokin' on the low
I still been plottin' on the low
Schemin' on the low
The furthest thing from perfect
Like everyone I know

I just been drinkin' on the low
Mobbin' on the low
Fuckin' on the low
Smokin' on the low
I just been plottin' on the low
Schemin' on the low
The furthest thing from perfect
Like everyone I know

And I hate that you don't think I belong to ya
Just too busy runnin' shit to run home to ya
You know that paper my passion
Bittersweet celebrations, I know I can't change what happened
I can't help it
I can't help it
I was young and I was selfish
I made every woman feel like she was mine and no one else's
And now you hate me
Stop pretendin', stop that frontin'
I can't take it
Girl don't treat me like a stranger
Girl you know I seen ya naked
Girl you know that I remember, don't be a pretender
Gettin' high at the condo, that's when it all comes together
You know I stay remniscin'
And makeup sex is tradition
But you been missin' girl
And you might feel like nothin' was the same

I still been drinkin' on the low
Mobbin' on the low
Fuckin' on the low
Smokin' on the low
I still been plottin' on the low
Schemin' on the low
The furthest thing from perfect
Like everyone I know

I just been drinkin' on the low
Mobbin' on the low
Fuckin' on the low
Smokin' on the low
I just been plottin' on the low
Schemin' on the low
The furthest thing from perfect
Like everyone I know

Drinkin', smokin', fuckin', plottin'
Schemin', plottin', schemin', gettin' money
Drinkin', fuckin', smokin', plottin', schemin'
Plottin', schemin', getting money

This the life for me
My mama told me this was right for me
I got em worried, like make sure you save a slice for me
I should have Spoons, serve you up with a fork and knife for me
Your actions make us doubt you
Your lack of effort got me rapping different
This the shit I wanna go out to
Play this shit at my funeral if they catch me slippin'
Naked women swimming that's just how I'm living
Donate a million to some children, that's just how I'm feeling
A nigga filling up arenas, who the fuck can see us
I had to Derrick Rose the knee up before I got the re-up
Yours truly the boy
I just build and build more
Y'all niggas build and destroy
You niggas party too much, man I just chill and record
No filler, you feel it now if you ain't feel it before
Yes Lord, this the shit I wanna go out to, yeah
This the shit I wanna go out to

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Drake/AUTHOR	NAME/Headlines/NAME	"CONTENT/I might be too strung out on compliments
Overdosed on confidence
Started not to give a fuck and stopped fearing the consequence
Drinking every night because we drink to my accomplishments
Faded way too long I'm floating in and out of consciousness
And they sayin' I'm back, I'd agree with that
I just take my time with all this shit, I still believe in that
I had someone tell me I fell off, oh I needed that
And they wanna see me pick back up, well where'd I leave it at
I know I exaggerated things, now I got it like that
Tuck my napkin in my shirt, cause I'm just mobbin' like that
You know good and well that you don't want a problem like that
You gone make someone around me catch a body like that
No, don't do it, please don't do it, cause one of us goes in
And we all go through it
Drizzy got the money, so Drizzy gonna pay it
Those my brothers, I ain't even gotta say it
That's just something they know

[Chorus]
They know, they know, they know
They know, they know, they know
They know, they know, they know
Yeah they know yeah
That the real is on the rise
Fuck them other guys
I even gave them a chance to decide
Now it's something they know
They know, they know, they know

Yeah, I be yelling out money over everything, money on my mind
Then she wanna ask when it got so empty
Tell her I apologize it happened over time
She says they missed the old Drake, girl don't tempt me
If they don't get it, they'll be over you
That new shit that you got is overdue
You better do what you suppose to do
I'm like why I gotta be all that but still I can't deny the fact that it's
true
Listen to you expressing all them feelings
Soap opera rappers all these niggas sound like all my children
And that's who you thinking is 'bout to come and make a killing
I guess it really is just me, myself and all my millions
You know the game even got it like that
You gone hype me up and make me catch a body like that
Cause I live for this it isn't just a hobby like that
When they get my shit and play it, I ain't even gotta say it, they know

[Chorus]

I be yelling out money over everything, money on my mind (mind, mind, mind)
Tell em' I apologize it happened over time (time, time, time)
They know

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Drake/AUTHOR	NAME/Hold On We're Going Home And From Time/NAME	"CONTENT/Drake:
I got my eyes on you
You're everything that I see
I want your hot love, emotion endlessly
I can't get over you, left your mark on me
I want your hot love, emotion endlessly
Cause you're a good girl and you know it
You act so different around me
Cause you're a good girl and you know it
I know exactly who you could be
Just hold on, we're goin' home
Just hold on, we're goin' home
It's hard to do these things alone
Just hold on, we're goin' home, home

Jhene:
What's up
Been a minute since we kicked it
You been caught up
With these chicks and I don't get it, you're a star love
You shouldn't have to deal with that
I never make you feel like that
Cause I love me, I love me enough for the both of us
That's why you trust me
You been through more than most of us
So what are you, what are you, what are you so afraid of?
Darlin' you, you give but you cannot take love.

Drake:
I needed to hear that, I hate when you're submissive
Passive aggressive when we're texting, I feel the distance
I look around the peers that surround me, these boys are trippin'
I like when money makes a difference but don't make you different
Started realizin' a couple places I could take it
I want to get back to when I was that kid in the basement
I want to take it deeper than money, vacation
And influence a generation that's lackin' in patience
I've been dealin' with my dad, speakin' of lack of patience
Just me and my old man gettin' back to basics
We've been talkin' 'bout the future and time that we wasted
When he put that bottle down, girl that man is amazin'
Well, we had a couple Coronas
We might have rolled a white paper, just somethin' to hold us
We even talked about you in our couple of moments
He said we should hash it out like a couple of grown ups
You a flower child, beautiful child, I'm in your zone
Lookin' like you came from the 70's on your own
My mother is 66 and her favorite line to hit me with is
Who the fuck wants to be 70 and alone?
You don't even know what you want from love anymore
I search for somethin' I'm missin', it disappear when I'm bored
But girl, what qualities was I lookin' for before?
Who you settlin' for? Who better for you than the boy, huh?

Jhene:
I love me, I love me enough for the both of us

Drake:
I love me enough for the both of us

Jhene:
That's why you trust me
I know you been through more than most of us

Drake:
Talk to me baby

Jhene:
So what are you, what are you, what are you so afraid of?

Drake:
What are you so afraid of?

Jhene:
Darlin' you, you give but you cannot take love.

Drake:
Give but you cannot take love.

Jhene:
You cannot take love

Drake:
You need you some of this Drake love

Jhene:
None of that fake love

Drake:
Turn on to commercial break love
So that we can make love

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Drake/AUTHOR	NAME/HYFR/NAME	"CONTENT/[Drake]
All my exes live in texas like I'm george strait
Or they go to georgia state where-
Tuition is handled by some random nigga that live in atlanta
That she only see when she feels obligated
Admitted it to me the first time we dated
But she was no angel, and we never waited
I took her for sushi, she wanted to fuck
So we took it to go, told them don't even plate it
And we never talk too much after I blew up
Just only 'hello' or 'happy belated'
And I think I text her and told her I made it
And that's when she text me and told me she prayed it
And that's when I text her and told her I love it
And right after texting, told her I'm faded
She asked
What have I learned since getting richer
I learned working with the negatives could make for better pictures
I learned hennessy and enemies is one hell of a mixture
Even though it's fucked up, girl, I'm still fucking wit ya
Damn, is it the fall
Time for me to revisit the past
It's women to call
There's albums to drop, there's liquor involved
There's stories to tell, we been through it all
Interviews are like confessions
Get the fuck up out my dressing room, confusing me with questions
Like:

[Bridge: lil wayne]
Do you love this shit?
Are you high right now?
Do you ever get nervous?
Are you single?
I heard you fucked your girl, is it true?
You getting money? You think them niggas you with is wit' you?
And I say

(And I say) hell yeah
Hell yeah, hell yeah
Fuckin' right
Fuckin' right, all right
(And we say) hell yeah
Hell yeah, hell yeah
Fuckin' right
Fuckin' right, all right

[Lil wayne]
So much for being optimistic
They say love is in the air, so I
Hold my breath until my face turn purple
Keep a few bad bitches in my circle
My nuts hang like ain't no curfew
Bitch if you wave, then I will surf you
I flew jet, she flew commercial
But we still met, later that night
After my session, she came over
I was aggressive, and she was sober
I gave her pills
She started confessing and started undressing
And ask me to hold her
And so I did, but that was last month
And now she's texting me, asking for closure
Damn
She say this shit gon' catch up to me
I keep tissue paper
We eat each other whenever we at the dinner table
She say she hate that she love me
And she wish I was average
Shit, sometimes I wish the same
And I wish she wasn't married
Promises, I hope I never break 'em
Met a female dragon, had a fire conversation but
Interviews are like confessions
Get the fuck up out my bedroom confusing me with questions like

[Bridge:]
Do you love this shit?
Are you high right now?
Do you ever get nervous?
Are you single?
I heard you fucked your girl, is it true?
You getting money? You think them niggas you with is wit' you?

[Hook:]
(And I say) hell yeah
Hell yeah, hell yeah
Fuckin' right
Fuckin right, all right
(And we say) hell yeah
Hell yeah, hell yeah
Fuckin' right
Damn right, all right

[Drake]
(And we say) hell yeah
Hell yeah, hell yeah
Fuckin' right
Fuckin' right, all right
(And we say) hell yeah
Hell yeah, hell yeah
Fuckin' right
Damn right, all right
Aw yeah

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Drake/AUTHOR	NAME/I'm Ready For You/NAME	"CONTENT/R.I.P. to the girl you used to see.
Her days are over. Baby she's over.
I've decided to give you all of me.
Baby come closer, baby come closer.
I'm ready for ya!

Kill 'em all, switch it up.
Put it on, zip it up.
Let my perfume, soak into your sweater.
Say you'll be here soon, sooner the better.
No option for her, you sayin' no.
I run this game, just play your role.
Follow my lead, what you waitin' fo'?
Thought it over and decided tonight is the night.

Yeah I hear you talkin', don't know who you tryin' to flatter.
Got my mind made up. I-I-I'm ready for ya.
I'm in control, but with you bein' the man,
You don't seem to understand that I-I-I'm ready for ya.
I-I-I'm ready for ya.
I-I-I'm ready for ya.
So keep thinkin' you the man,
'Cause it's all part of my plan.
I-I-I'm ready for ya.

Nothin' on, I strut around.
I do it big, I shut it down.
I wonder if you'll be able to handle me.
Mental picture, no cameras please.

Yeah I hear you talkin', don't know who you tryin' to flatter.
Got my mind made up. I-I-I'm ready for ya.
I'm in control, but with you bein' the man,
You don't seem to understand that I-I-I'm ready for ya.
I-I-I'm ready for ya.
I-I-I'm ready for ya.
So keep thinkin' you the man,
'Cause it's all part of my plan.
I-I-I'm ready for ya.

Uh, red lipstick on the wine glass cameras in my mind,
Flash, black lingerie, white diamonds, what a contrast,
I know you get impatient as the time pass
You say you want it fast... define fast
'Cause I can speed it up, and make it last
And I could audition for this, and I could be part of the cast
And I could produce for your future, I could co-direct your past,
And make damn sure you never forget it
Committed
I'm ready, I'm with it... still here like a statue
Pink champagne, green ink in your tattoos,
You say you got baggage, well I'm packed too
Plus I got a sex pistol, pointed right at you ""BANG!""
The baddest women ever and the hardest out,
Proven over and over again that's why I'm hard to doubt
Plus I'm Young Money 'till the death, I took the carter route
I'm more than ready too, hope of something that you thought about

Yeah I hear you talkin', don't know who you tryin' to flatter.
Got my mind made up. I-I-I'm ready for ya.
I'm in control, but with you bein' the man,
You don't seem to understand that I-I-I'm ready for ya.
I-I-I'm ready for ya.
I-I-I'm ready for ya.
So keep thinkin' you the man,
'Cause it's all part of my plan.
I-I-I'm ready for ya.

R.I.P to the girl
Who used to see
Her days are over
Baby shes over

I-I-I'm ready for ya.
I-I-I'm ready for ya.
I-I-I'm ready for ya.

So keep thinkin you the man
Cause its all part of my plan

I-I-I'm ready for ya

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Drake/AUTHOR	NAME/I'm Still Fly/NAME	"CONTENT/Here we go..
I'm still fly
I'm sky high and I dare anybody tuh try and cut my wings.
I'm still pullin out the phantom and these haters can't stand me nigga I'm
still doin my thing.
I'm still fly
I'm sky high and I dare anybody tuh try and cut my wings.
I'm still shuttin cities down everytime I come around.
Nigga I'm still doin my thing.
I'm still, I'm still.
Responsible for everything you listen to my meteocre talent proceeds to try
and condition you.
Took over my city and I never asked permission to.
Started poppin bottles 'cause its ATL tradition to celebrate it by hard
Fuck a nigga so hard.
If there ain't a elevator in this its a no go.
Coldest thing droppin is these bitches wanna snowblow.
And they just gimme head while the haters gimme promoooo!
And man my dj shoulda won that.
Well listen and respect mann the city owes us one bag.
All these old hands keep their minds on one track.
And me I run Toronto holla at me when you done laps.
Roll around with nikko, party with a zukka.
Shot goes out the wonder, shot goes out the future, shot goes out the getty
mutha fucka I am ready.
And whoever got the torch just can't seem tuh hold it steady 'cause I see the
flame flickerin, ex girls bickerin, got these women jockin me from heartlake
road tuh pickerin.
I tried tuh send my nigga shorts, I'm certefied in michigan but my connects
said it'll take a minute if yer listenin.
Please start doin you.

I've been doing me and I'm a staple in my city you can never ruin me.
Rappers are emotional, critics be reviewin me but I got love for everybody
even if yer suin me.
My brotha be-rain knows we fuck with the same hoes plus he taught me how tuh
spot an officer in plain clothes.
Starin at you pussy niggas, all I see is rainbows.
Hoppin on a jet tuh every lil wayne show.
Me and lil jazzy please do not harass me just hollar if you got me and fuck
you if you had me.
Shot goes out tuh brian e, shot out tuh photo will.
Shout out tuh all our forty men boy you know the deal.
Shout out tuh mayhem. shout out tuh p plus.
The names I mention are crucial you gonna need us.
And life is good, everything is just fine.
I am so sure of my lines I can sacrifice a line like...
Nuh nuh nuh nuh nuh nuh nuh nuh nuh nuh.
Oh yeah I swear I really fuckin does it!
I had these niggas trippin on luggage.
I'm still fly
I'm sky high and I dare anybody tuh try and cut my wings.
I'm still pullin out the phantom and these haters can't stand me nigga in
still doin my thing.
I'm still fly
I'm sky high and I dare anybody tuh try and cut my wings.
I'm still shuttin cities down everytime I come around.
Nigga I'm still doin my thing.
I'm still, I'm still.

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Drake/AUTHOR	NAME/Independent Queen/NAME	"CONTENT/Bright light, city lights downtown every night,
Never has to think twice,
Only does what she likes,
What she wants, what she needs,
She's my independent queen!

All right!
She'll be jumping up and down,
Trying to fit that ass in.
Took her half an hour just to get that...
All she wanna talk about is party and the fashion,
I don't know where she's going and I do not plan on asking at all
Cause this baby is free,
And she lets nobody else in except for me!
If her basement is locked, then I swear she would agree
I'm the only one she loves, there's no copy of the key...

Chorus: (x2)
Bright light, city lights downtown every night,
Never has to think twice,
Only does what she likes,
What she wants, what she needs,
She's my independent queen!
What she wants, what she needs,
She's my independent queen!

Don't forget that fendi purse that you put all your cash in,
Kinda' hard to concentrate when the cameras are flashing.
All the dudes suffocate her, I don't wanna grasp in,
Don't know where she's going, and I do not plan on asking at all!
I've never been the type to... My connection
With niggaare that wanna fight over women, that's not right,
There's too many in the world, homie you could...
But I swear that was my girl, I swear it was my girl!

Chorus: (x2)
Bright light, city lights downtown every night,
Never has to think twice,
Only does what she likes,
What she wants, what she needs,
She's my independent queen!
What she wants, what she needs,
She's my independent queen!

Yeah, she works hard, but she plays even harder,
All-star weekend and she's been voted my favorite starter.
... On the back of a jersey, so you won't forget it,
But she shines bright, blind them light
So that... Forget it.
Just one life to live, the kind of life I will...
And if I don't see her tonight, the rest of my life I will regret it!
She's not perfect, but she's just perfect to me,
Like it's a highway, let's ride it, you know in a second with me1

Chorus: (x2)
Bright light, city lights downtown every night,
Never has to think twice,
Only does what she likes,
What she wants, what she needs,
She's my independent queen!
What she wants, what she needs,
She's my independent queen!

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Drake/AUTHOR	NAME/Juice/NAME	"CONTENT/Yeh, ah... Ah
Boy wonder... Drizzy
Ah... Ah... Uh

Yall aint really like me
I can understand
My flow is sitting right inside da pocket on ma pants
I'm still fly, you can't float
Run this ship, you same boat
A write your favorite records, aah, you singin thoses
20 thousand for a verse, is our routine quote
I'm getting rich, aah, you staying broke
Chilling if even if I'm in a goosed down coat
I cant' see you through the Mosley Tribes
So I don't even flinch when you throw me hi fives
They try to measure up, but there's no my size
Whatever 40 smokin bout to low my eyes
Beast mode on them, a never take a night off
Every single thing a nigga purchase is a write off
Grounded as the one way pavement am taking flight off
Baby go ahead and cut the lights off
Cuz It's about to go...

Beat plays

I hear ma phone ringing when they call
I aint picking up or entertaining them at all
Got your girl face down and banging on the wall
While you and all your homeboys hang at Lenox Mall
Hmmm, hmmm, hmmmmmm
I cannot relate
Riding with some tags that a got from out-a-state
Riding with a swag that a got from out-a-space
Just show me who's the hottest Ima knock him out his place
Call me homeside drizzy, about to kill your ego
I'm about ma green, puffin goody like I'm celo
You can go and take a glance at your hero
While the Houston ship a pole dancing zero
Fantasy to you, reality to me
And yeah ma g-pass is as valid as can be
I'm, I'm so fresh, a stylist would agree
Waving at your girl
While she's smiling back at me like...

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Drake/AUTHOR	NAME/Karaoke/NAME	"CONTENT/Things have been so crazy and hectic, I should have got her back by now
But you know how much I wanted to make it, It's probably better anyhow
So if you gotta go, if there's anything I should know
If the spotlight makes you nervous
If you're looking for a purpose
You put the tea in the kettle and light it
Put your hand on the metal and feel it
But do you even feel it anymore?
I remember when you thought I was joking
Now I'm off singing karaoke
Farther than I've ever been
So if you gotta go, if there's any way I can help

Isn't it ironic that the girl I wanna marry is a wedding planner?
And tells me that my life is too much and moves to Atlanta? Damn
Of all the places you could go
I just thought you'd choose somewhere that has somebody that you know
I'm always up too late, I worry about you there alone
And that place you call your home, warm nights and cold Patron
I hope you don't get known for nothing crazy
Cause no man ever wants to hear those stories about his lady
I know they say the first love is the sweetest
But that first cut is the deepest
I tried to keep us together, you were busy keeping secrets
You were telling everybody but me
Don't be fooled by the money, I'm still just young and unlucky
I'm surprised you couldn't tell

I was only trying to get ahead
I was only trying to get ahead
But the spotlight makes you nervous
And you're looking for a purpose
I was only trying to get ahead
I was only trying to get ahead
But the spotlight makes you nervous

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Drake/AUTHOR	NAME/Know Yourself/NAME	"CONTENT/[Intro]
Wallets, wallets, wallets, wallets, wallets
Y'all sleepin' in the streets
Shaky warrior
Yeah, this that Oliver 40, Niko shit man, 15 Fort York shit ya know
Boi-1da, what's poppin'?

[Verse 1]
Yeah, yeah
Runnin' through the 6 with my woes
Countin' money you know how it goes
Pray the real live forever man
Pray the fakes get exposed
I want that ferrari then I swerve
I want that bugatti just to hurt
I ain't rockin' my jewelry that's on purpose
Niggas want my spot and don't deserve it
I don't like how serious they take themselves
I've always been me I guess I know myself
Shakiness man I don't have no time for that
My city too turnt up I'll take the fine for that
This been where you find me at
That's been where you find me at
I know a nigga named Johnny Bling
He put me on to the finer things
Had a job sellin' Girbraud jeans
I had a yellow TechnoMarine
Then Kanye dropped, it was polos and backpacks
That's when Ethan was pushin' a Subaru hatchback
Man I'm talkin' way before hashtags

[Hook]
I was runnin' through the 6 with my woes
Yeah! I was runnin' through the 6 with my woes
You know how that shit go
You know how that shit go
You know how that shit go
I was runnin' through the 6 with my woes
You know how that shit go
You know how that shit go
You know how that shit go

[Verse 2]
Don't fuck with them niggas they too irrational
This is that nasty flow
Top boy in this shit, I'm so international
Reps up in here got P Reign and Chubby and TJ and Winnie
Yeah, and you know how that shit go
I might declare it a holiday as soon as Baka get back on the road
Yeah but you know how that shit go
They so irrational, they don't wanna patch it up
They wanna mash it up, woah
My nigga [?] he whip it I ride in the passenger
I'm way up, I stay up, I'm two up, I'm three up
I had to get back to you, woah
I'm turnin' into a nigga that thinks about money and women
Like twenty four seven, that's where my life took me
That's just how shit happened to go

[Hook]
I was runnin' through the 6 with my woes
Yeah! I was runnin' through the 6 with my woes
You know how that shit go
You know how that shit go
You know how that shit go
I was runnin' through the 6 with my woes
You know how that shit go
You know how that shit go
You know how that shit go

[Outro]
She know it, it a no big
Always haffi look out an ya know if yuh head buk out
Dun know, a de unruly boss, dis man
No bomboclat, otha
And if a boy like
OVO crew my nigga can just suck ya motha
With no apology, I cannot [?]
Yeah girl I say we cute, if they dis we get execute
That's the truth, OVO unruly

(machine gun shots)

With my woes

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Drake/AUTHOR	NAME/Light Up/NAME	"CONTENT/I've been up for four days
Getting money both ways
Dirty and clean, I could use a glass of cold spades
Rolexes, chauffeurs and low fades
I keep thinking how young you can die from old age
They always tell me nobody's working as hard as you
And even though I laugh it off, man, it's probably true
Cause while all of my closest friends out partying
I'm just here making all the music that they party to
But party on, party on, all night nigga
I got these new rappers nervous prom night nigga
I've grown tired of these fucking grown man liars
Storytellers, they ain't even need a campfire
Uh, but I just wanna tell the truth
Before one of these haters load a couple shells and shoot
This shit feel like when Fredro Starr was at Sunset Park
Stuntin' hard in his yellow Goose
Yeah, but I'm a ma'fuckin' missed target
But a target nonetheless and I just started
Was that directed at moi? Can't be
They must be talking to themselves hoe, hands free
Yeah, and I'm just filling up this daily planner
Gettin' busy 'cause I'm a star, no spangled banner
Jealous dudes get to talkin' in they music
And I just say I wrote it for your girlfriends, Kelsey Grammar
Yeah, that's what life becomes when you're doing you
Welcome to Hollywood, don't let this town ruin you,
And if you pillow talking with the women that are screwin' you
Just know that she gon' tell another nigga when she through wit' you
Don't get impatient when it takes too long
Drink it all even when it tastes too strong
Yeah, I gotta feel alive, even if it kills me
Promise to always give you me, the real me

Who would have thought
I'd be caught in this life?
Let's celebrate with a toast
And get lost in tonight
And make it all light up
(Hey, Guru, tell home girl to go to open that Ace right there),
Wait until the sun goes down
We gon' make this bitch light up
Even when the sun goes down
I'm gon' make this go

Ow, hoes turn they heads like, owls
I'm the man of the hour
Triple entendre, don't even ask me how
Con Edison flow, I'm connected to a higher power
Bright life'd make your whole city light up
A trillion-watt light bulb, when I'm in the nightclub
I just landed in that G450
Caught the Mayweather fight, 'cause the satellite was crispy
(Uh) Y'all can miss me with that money talk
The smart money's on Hov, fuck what the dummies talk
I don't do too much blogging
I just run the town, I don't do too much joggin'
(Uh) I ain't got a scar yet
'Cause you fuckin' around with me and my dogs is far-fetched
Drake, here is how they gon' come at you
Will silly raps feuds tryin' to distract you
In disguise, in the form of a favor
The Barzini me, watch for the traitors
(Uh) I done seen it all, done it all
That's why none of these dumb-dumb could dun him off
The summer's ours, the winter too
Top down in the winter, that's what winners do
And to these niggas I'm like Windows 7
You let 'em tell it, they swear that they invented you
And since no good deed go unpunished
I'm not as cool with niggas as I once was
I once was, cool as The Fonz was
But these bright lights turned me to a monster
Sorry, mama, I promised it wouldn't change me
But I would've went insane had I remained the same me
Fuck niggas, bitches too
All I got is this money, this'll do

Who would have thought
I'd be caught in this life?
Let's celebrate with a toast
And get lost in tonight
And make it all light up
Wait until the sun goes down
We gon' make this bitch light up
Wait until the sun goes down
I'm gon' make this go

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Drake/AUTHOR	NAME/Make Me Proud/NAME	"CONTENT/I like a woman with a future and a past
A little attitude problem all good, it'll make the shit last
Don't make it too easy, girl, don't take it too fast
Yeah, that's it right there, that's it, do it just like that
Only you can do it just like that
And I love it when your hair still wet 'cause you just took a shower
Runnin' on a treadmill and only eating salad
Sound so smart like you graduated college
Like you went to Yale but you probably went to Howard
Knowin' you, weekend in Miami trying to study by the pool
Couple things due but you always get it done
Might have been a time when I loved her too
But you take that away and you'll always be the one
One, I wonder why the moon look nice, girl
Maybe it's just right for the night
You said niggas coming on too strong, girl
They want you in their life as a wife
That's why you want to have no sex, why you want to protest
Why you want to fight for your right
'Cause you don't love them boys
Pussy run everything, fuck that noise

[Chorus]
I know things get hard, but girl, you got it, girl, you got it, there you go
Can't you tell by how they looking at you everywhere you go?
Wondering what's on your mind, it must be hard to be that fine
When all these muthafuckas wanna waste your time
It's just amazing, girl, and all I can say is
I'm so I'm so I'm so I'm so I'm so proud of you
I'm so I'm so I'm so I'm so I'm so proud of you
I'm so I'm so I'm so I'm so I'm so proud of you
Everything's adding up, you've been through hell and back
That's why you're bad as fuck and you

B-b-b-b-bet I am
All of them bitches I'm badder than
Mansions in Malibu, Babylon
But I never mention everything I dabble in
And I always ride slow when I'm straddlin'
And my shit's so wet you gotta paddle in
Gotta r-r-row, gotta row ya boat
It's Pink Friday Records and OVO
Done did the pop tour, I'm the realest still
The best legal team so the deals is ill
It's MAC, OPI, and a fragrance too
Apparel, I'm dominating every avenue
Cobblestone, good view, little gravel too
Gotta pay for the entourage travel too
'Cause I'm fl-fl-fly I'm flying high
Ain't got time to talk, just hi and bye, bitch

But baby, if you ask me to take a break
I'll give it all away, don't care what the people say
I'll be a million, billion, trillion miles away

He asked my sign, I said a Sag'
I'm a star, sheriff badge
What's the point if I'm guarding?
Double D up, hoes, Dolly Parton

[Chorus]

I'm so I'm so I'm so I'm so I'm so proud of you
I'm so I'm so I'm so I'm so I'm so proud of you
I'm so I'm so I'm so I'm so I'm so proud of you
Everything's adding up, you've been through hell and back
That's why you're bad as fuck and you know you are

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Drake/AUTHOR	NAME/Messages From You/NAME	"CONTENT/I forgot about you last night
For the first time in a long time I Didddd
I was caught up in these drinks they keep on makin
In amazin conversation with this girl named lorraine
Who says she's from L. A.
Who keeps makin me laugh and even asks if she can pay
Ooohhhh
She could be good for me (yeahhh)
This what you text me
Tell me that you miss me
I forget about Lorraine
And in fact she's right here with me
And she's starin at my face
Something that could change
Thought that all these feelings went away (yeahh)

I hate gettin messages from youuuu (fromm youuu)
It's like you know the perfect shit to say
Thought that all these feelings went away

I forgot about you last night
For the first time in a long time I Didddd
I was caught up in these drinks they keep on makin
In amazin conversation with this girl named lorraine
Who says she's from L. A.
Who keeps makin me laugh and even asks if she can pay
Ooohhhh
She could be good for me (yeahhh)
This what you text me
Tell me that you miss me
I forget about Lorraine
And in fact she's right here with me
And she's starin at my face
Something that could change
Thought that all these feelings went away (yeahh)

I hate gettin messages from youuuu (fromm youuu)
It's like you know the perfect shit to say
Something that could change
Thought that all these feelings went away (yeahh)

I hate gettin messages from youuuu (fromm youuu)
Especially when you say you should've stayed
Something that could change
Thought that all these feelings went away (yeahh)

I hate the shit you do
I hate the shit you do
I hate the shit you do
I hate the shit you do
I hate the shit you do
But I still text you back

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Drake/AUTHOR	NAME/My Side/NAME	"CONTENT/[Intro]
Yeah, that's about it
This shit sound like what being rich feel like
Fo real
This life shit, is everywhere you can't control it
Too much going on
Too much, too much, too much, too much
Too much, too much
You, you, you
Make me wanna take ya down through there
Make me wanna take ya down through there
I'll take it down

[Hook 1]
Why you never come to where I stay?
Always hiding out in your New York condo
Why you never come to where I stay?
If anybody knows, girl you know, I know
Why are we wasting our relationship on a relationship?
Why are we rushing and forcing it? This isn't making sense
Why are we focused on things that don't even mean nothing, girl?
Why can we not find the time and sit down and discuss it, girl?
Let me at least tell you my side of things, man
Aw man, aw man
Aw, man

[Verse]
Me and you are playing house, start think that I'm losing touch
Got a tight grip on ya now, maybe I should loosen up
When I leave you and I go home, I start forgetting what it is
Start to think I got to get it how I live
We too busy for a wedding or a kid
If I'm working then I know you working
Keep in touch with other women, cause you make me nervous
I empower girls that don't deserve it
I don't mean to do that shit on purpose
It's just that when I go home, I start forgetting what it is
The dream is over, I get lost up in the 6

[Hook 2]
You don't ever come to where I stay
You just rather stay up in your New York condo
You don't ever come to where I stay
If anybody knows, girl you know, I know
Why are we wasting our relationship on a relationship?
You know how sticky these situation get
You go up higher than me some days
You know what I think we could be some day
Let me at least show you my side of things, man
Aw man, aw man
Aw man

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Drake/AUTHOR	NAME/No Tellin'/NAME	"CONTENT/[Hook]
Envelopes coming in the mail, let her open em'
Hopin' for a check again, ain't no tellin'
Yeah, she invite me to the telly
Keep the blade with me when I go to check a bitch, ain't no' tellin
Yeah, police comin' round' lookin' for some help on a case they gotta solve,
we never help em'
Yeah, I stay up late at night, thinkin' bout' my life
Wanna lie but I get it all, ain't no tellin'
Ain't no tellin', yeah, ain't no tellin'
Yeah, no tellin'
Ain't no tellin'

[Verse 1]
Suitcase, I been living outta' suitcase
Still drinkin' Henny, if it's done, I'll take the D'usse
Oops, aye, fuck it, all you niggas two-faced
Got the club going up on a Tuesday
True say, I been going hard but then again
They think I'm soft, think I'm innocent
I'm just lookin' in the mirror like I'm really him
Man, I'm really him, you just fillin' in, man
I gotta blunt, can I get a light?
Yeah, I took the summer off to get it right
Yeah, I gave these boys a shot and they fuckin' failed
Niggas like ""you took the summer off? we couldn't tell""
Dog, just bought a island gotta sail to it
You pick the casket, I'll put the nail through it
I ain't gotta do it, but fuck it someone gotta do it
Hate if someone else did it, fuck, I may as well do it

[Hook]
Envelopes coming in the mail, let her open em'
Hopin' for a check again, ain't no tellin'
Yeah, she invite me to the telly
Keep the blade with me when I go to check a bitch, ain't no' tellin
Yeah, police comin' round' lookin' for some help on a case they gotta solve,
we never help em'
Yeah, I stay up late at night, thinkin' bout' my life
Wanna lie but I get it all, ain't no tellin'
Ain't no tellin', yeah, ain't no tellin'
Yeah, no tellin'
Ain't no tellin'

[Verse 2]
I had to switch the flow up on you niggas
The shit was gettin' too predictable
The new shit on steroids, I would never pass a physical
I got it rollin' in all kinda ways, lump sum and residual, yeah
I mean we hear about the money you be gettin' but we just never see a visual
It's our year (aw yeah), Aw yeah
I mean besides Ricky Ross, Aubrey the biggest boss here (grunt)
What's the word these days?
Buncha' niggas chasing after all these woman they don't even know
Buncha' out of season woman fuckin' off-season niggas to get last season
wardrobe
All the rappers that you vouch for need to get out of the house more, they
washed up
And even if the team was religious with it, I can't really see another squad
tryna' cross us, nah

Ovo unruly
One shot to make it in a life
From the six to the fucking [?]

[Hook]
Envelopes coming in the mail, let her open em'
Hopin' for a check again, ain't no tellin'
Yeah, she invite me to the telly
Keep the blade with me when I go to check a bitch, ain't no' tellin
Yeah, police comin' round' lookin' for some help on a case they gotta solve,
we never help em'
Wanna lie but I get it all, ain't no tellin'
Ain't no tellin', yeah, ain't no tellin'
Yeah, no tellin'
Ain't no tellin'

[Outro]
I gotta' keep watchin' for Abba's cause' anything's possible, yeah
There's no code in ethics out here, anyone will take shots at you, yeah
Niggas think they can come take what I got, let's be logical, yeah
V-Live, I order that Alfredo pasta then eat in the kitchen like I'm in the
mafia
Houston, they get me though
European, my vehicle
How much it hit me fo'?
Ain't no tellin', yeah
What am I willin' to give her to get what I want tonight?
Ain't no tellin'
Please don't speak to me like I'm that Drake from four years ago
I'm at a higher place
Thinkin' they lions and tigers and bears, I go huntin'
Put heads on my fire place, oh my, take time
Ain't no tellin'
Oh my, take time, ain't no tellin'

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Drake/AUTHOR	NAME/Pop Style/NAME	"CONTENT/[Hook: Drake]
Dropped outta school now we dumb rich (dumb rich)
This sound like some forty-three-oh-one shit (one shit)
All my niggas wanna do is pop style (pop style)
Turn my birthday into a lifestyle (lifestyle)

[Verse 1: Drake]
Tell my mom I love her if I do not make it (do not make it)
Got so many chains they call me Chaining Tatum
(They do, they do)
And I like to finish what you think you started
Man you boys just got to Hollywood, you boys just started
You don't know what you just started
All I do is hang with the young and heartless
All this for my family, man, I try my hardest
It's all I ever did and look where it got him
Yeah, you've been on my mind lately
You've still got my number, girl you need to call me
I feel like they wanna see me learn the hard way
But you know I always handle that one my way
Girl let me rock, rock, rock, rock, rock your body
Justin Timberlake and then I hit the highway
I can't trust no fuckin' body
They still out to get me cause they never got me

[Verse 2: Drake]
They still out to get me, I don't get it
I can not be got, and that's a given
Give a real nigga the number one
Even though I got like twenty-one
Cannot be me I'm a one-of-one
Schooling your ass like 101
They been out here tryna slide on me
They been out here telling lies on me
Everybody looking out for themself
But they still got they eyes on me
See me putting in the hard work now, aye
Momma doesn't have to call work now, aye
I decide when I start work now, aye
Problems hit the gym, they all work out
MVP, MVP, oh-nine all the way to sixteen
Even next season looking like a breeze
Lot of y'all ain't built for the league, yeah
Trade you off the team while you in your sleep, yeah
Y'all showed me that nothing's guaranteed
And you don't know what you started
My friend's chain so big that he look like the artist
I can't trust no fuckin' body
They still out to get me cause they never got me

[Hook: Drake]
Dropped outta school now we dumb rich (dumb rich)
This sound like some forty-three-oh-one shit (one shit)
All my niggas wanna do is pop style (pop style)
Turn my birthday into a lifestyle (lifestyle)

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Drake/AUTHOR	NAME/Preach/NAME	"CONTENT/[Verse 1: PARTYNEXTDOOR]
I'm in Miami
I need to call up Miss Cassidy
My name is party not participation
Sorry for the miscommunication
I need a drink and some tequila with you
You know what I'm trying to do
Hey let's pop the E off at Liv I've got some time here to blow
I've got the money to blow
I've got the money and blow
Don't have to guess how I know
Oh it's a secret just for me I'll keep it
You old niggas boring as bones
Put the party tape on
You know what's going on
You know what's going on
She keep it wet like tsunami
She think she sunk the Titanic
I get her hot like Wasabi
She think it's wavy and gnarly
I think I'ma pop one for you
Drink one for you

[Hook: PARTYNEXTDOOR]
Young nigga preach
Preach, preach, preach, preach, preach, preach (X3)
Preach (x9)

[Verse 2: Drake]
Still in Miami
Most of these girls are too messy
I've got to do some reflecting
I've got to find me one out here that is good at taking direction
I'm convinced that my calls are being recorded
So hit my assistant to get me the message
And make the connection like brrrrr
I'm on my way tonight I hope you not the crazy type yeah
I'm in your state tonight I might just break the bank tonight
PND ain't with the ray tay tay
You know Jay Ray
Got girls her going way way way way way way
Sauga city trip the pay day
Load up off a gate way
Man you can't afford me
Doing is one thing, doing it right is a whole different story
Niggas is all in their feelings these days, all in their feelings these days
But hearing the scripture with that many sixes you should be afraid

[Hook: PARTYNEXTDOOR]

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Drake/AUTHOR	NAME/Replacement Girl/NAME	"CONTENT/(feat. Trey Songz)

[Echo-Trey Songz]
Ladies make some noise if you wanna be my replacement

[Verse 1-Drake]
Lat me show what it is
I was born up top but was raised at the bottom of the map
Where the girls all thick and the hottest niggas rap
If you lookin for the goods then we got in the trap like
[Trey]
Ooo wee
[Drake]
Took 'em from white snakes to
[Trey]
Ooo wee
[Drake]
This metaphore might sound a little confusing but
[Trey]
Yall don't really even know me yeah yeah
[Drake]
I done come all way from the Days Inn and all the hotels that stayed in
I took my lifestyle from mediocre to good and now I say it's sittin at
amazing'
Girls tryin sell a whole lobby of us
Hear em all screamin then it's probably is
But I can't blame females, females can't really ignore something this obvious
What you really expect when I strut through town
Two or three days I shut you down
Chilin wit the homie Trey Songz
You call him the prince he rep two up two down
Anyone I know get used to me
I'm far from the man that I used to be
I don't ever really kick game
I know you find it impressing whenever you introduced to me
'Cause I'm a good dude who take pride in that
Need good lovin' I'm providing that
Understand that I'm worldwide
You get who you want it wherever you be residing at
'Cause I do things from the M-town
To the uk
From Spain back out to Texas
This album's for my fans
But yo this hook is for my exes

[Chorus-Trey Songz]
This one is for you girl
You know who you are girl
You only show you're face
'Cause you know that I'm a star girl
What you trying to to make it
Don't ever mistake it
'Cause my time is limited and I ain't trying to waste it all on you
You had a chance now It's gone
Oooooh
You had a man now you don't
Back to the basics
I think I made it
Ladies make some noise if you wanna be my replacement girl

[Verse 2-Trey Songz]
Ain't ya never seen a yougin so fly
Lookin for someone your type
I done left behind the love of my life
Tryin to find another one tonight
And if it's you baby
Let yourself be seen
Don matter skirts
Dresses or jeans
I got that work
Know what I mean
And I'm flexing on my ex if you know what mean

[Chorus:]

[Verse 3-Drake]
Check this out
From the that she get picked for some take out
Until they slip up and break out
But it's another story over here at Drake's house
'Cause I'm dripped up and I'm drapped out
And I'm lean back
Scoping
Looking for a woman that I should wife
Who got just the right amount of loyalty
Yeah but is still anticipating us living the good life
We go la, va
Ny, to
Sunshine in that heat stroke
And them fur hoods in that deep snow
We have breakfast in the bedroom
Break bread downstairs in the basement
Since Jay and Kelz ain't doing the thing no more
Guess me and the boy Songz is the replacement

[Chorus:]

Ay, Ay, Ay, Ay, Ay, Ay, Ay, Ay, Ay, Ay
Ay, Ay, Ay
Let's Go

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Drake/AUTHOR	NAME/Right Hand/NAME	"CONTENT/[Hook]
You're my right hand, you're my go to
Told me everything about you
That's a bold move
I know that you're out here
And there's things you gotta go through
Just know that these streets just don't love you like I do
And they never will

[Verse 1]
But I swear you gotta chill
You wanna grip Benz wheel
And I know you can't wait
You dream big and sleep late
You got a lot on your plate
That's why you're always working out
Taking pictures of yourself
You don't see anybody else
You're like oh well
You're like fuck it oh well
My past behind me like a pony tail

[Hook]
But you're my right hand, you're my go to
Told me everything about you
That's a bold move
I know that you're out here
And there's things you gotta go through
Just know that these streets just don't love you like I do
And they never will

[Verse 2]
Ok I know you want the Audi
I know you want to go to Maui
You and all your girlfriends
The ones you never bring around me
Cause you don't trust me like your last man
Did he open doors for ya?
Buy the things he can't afford for ya
Cause he must have did a lot for ya
I just fell back with it
And now your past is behind you
Like the car with the strap in it
Thank god that's finished
Cause now it's back to business
Any more henny and you're past the limit
You told me about the picture
Now you have to send it
I would never put you on blast when I get it

[Hook]
You're my right hand, you're my go to
Told me everything about you
That's a bold move
I know that you're out here
And there's things you gotta go through
Just know that these streets just don't love you like I do
And they never will

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Drake/AUTHOR	NAME/Runaway Girl/NAME	"CONTENT/Hey there material girl
The neighbors told me that you're moving out
Leaving to witness the world
But are you sure that's what you're doing now

Are you running away for a purpose
Do you even know what your self worth is
The past what you carry in your purses
The gift in the curse when you going head first is
The atl, mia, lax, jfk
Luggage all packed and to them I say
Farewell to the pure, amen I pray

You wander the world
You seek what you've lost
You're waking up every day
The run away, run away girl
I turn and your gone
You're leaving to chase your fame
The run away, the run away girl

So long
Farewell
Good bye
Good day
Be on
Your way
Run away girl
(X2)

Watching it all through the window
And wishing you could make is shatter now
Now that you're here on the other side
Are you sure it even matters

Are you living the dream
Are you telling all your girls that it ain't what it seems
Do you strip do you model do you live in between
And look for the split second that you get on the screen like

You wander the world
You seek what you lost
You're waking up every day
To run away, run away girl
I turn and you're gone
You're leaving to chase your fame
You run away, run away girl

So long
Farewell
Good bye
Good day
Be on your way
Run away girl
(X2)

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Drake/AUTHOR	NAME/Say What's Real/NAME	"CONTENT/Why do I feel so alone?
Like everybody passing through the studio
Is in character as if we acting out a movie role
Talking bullshit as if it was for you to know
And I don't have the heart to give these
Bitch ass niggas the cue to go
So they stick around kicking out feedback
And I entertain it as if I need that
I had a talk with my uncle and he agreed that
My privacy about the only thing I need back but
It's hard to think of them polite flows
Mr. Fano Poloto suits are your night clothes
And Jordan sweat suits are your flight clothes
And you still make it even when they say your flight closed
Eyes hurting from the camera phone light shows
Life was so full
Now this shit just being lipo'd
Always said I'd say it all on the right track
But in this game you only lose when you fight back
Black diamond bracelets
Showing you the basics
I can't live and hold the camara
Someone gotta tape this
I make hits unlike a bitch
That's married I ain't miss
24 hours from greatness
I'm that close
Don't ever forget the moment
You began to doubt
Transitioning from fitting in to standing out
Los Angeles Cabanas or Atlanta South
Watchin' whole show
Embarrassed to pull my camera out
And my mother embarrassed
To pull my Phantom out
So I park about 5 houses down
She say I shouldn't have it until I have the crown
But I don't wanna feel the need to wear disguises around
So she wonder where my mind is accounts in the minus
But yet I'm rolling round the fuckin' city like your highness
Got niggas reactin' without a sinus
'Cause what I'm working with is timeless
And promoters try to get me out to they club
They say I have fun but I can't imagine how
'Cause I just seen my ex-girl
Standing with my next girl
Standing with the girl that I'm fuckin' right now
And shit could get weird unless they all down
And so I stay clear

We from a small town
Everybody talks and everybody listen
But somehow the truth just always comes up missing
I've always been something that these labels can't buy
Especially if they tryin' to take a peice of my soul
And Sylvia be tellin' Tez ""Damn Drake fly""
And he just be like ""Silly mother fucker I know""
That was your bad
How could you pass up on 'em?
He just take them records
And he gas up on 'em
Wayne will prolly put a million cash up on 'em
Surprised no one ever put your ass up on 'em
Oh they did Po
At least they tried to
And that's what happens
When you spitting what's inside you
But slip up and shoot the wrong fucking video
And they think they can market you
However they decide to nahh
But Forty told me to do me
And don't listen to anybody that knew me
'Cause to have known me would
Mean that there's a new me
And if you think I changed in the slightest
Could of fooled me
Boy in my city I'm da 2-3
Drug dealers live vicariously through me
I quit school and it's not because I'm lazy
I'm just not the social type
And campus life is crazy understand
I could get money with my eyes closed
Lost some of my hottest verses down in Cabo
So if you find a Blackberry with the side scroll
Sell that mothafucka to any rapper that I know
'Cause they need it much more than I ever will
I got new shit
I'm gettin' better still
Little niggas put my name in they verses
'Cause they girlfriend put my ass on a pedestal
Future said 'cause this 'Ye shit you better kill
And I think this got this ""Making of a Legend"" feel
Problem with these other niggas they
Ain't never real
Yea that's all I can say

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Drake/AUTHOR	NAME/Still Here/NAME	"CONTENT/[Intro]
Doin' well dog
Yeah, me and all my
Yeah, me
Yeah

[Hook]
Me and all my niggas doin' well, doin' well, dog
You not from the city, I could tell, I could tell, dog
Did it, did it, did it by myself, by myself, dog
Blew up and I'm in the city still, I'm still here, dog

[Verse 1]
How did I finesse all of this shit from Jane and Weston
Girls all in my bed and they don't trip off first impressions
Girls all in your bed and they just ask a hundred questions
I can't fuck with you no more cause you be actin' extra
Do your favorite rapper like my son, like my son, tho
Nothing mutual about my funds, bout my funds, tho
All you niggas fightin' over crumbs, where the bread at
How they feel about you, where you're from, where your bed at
I don't need no pill to speak my mind, I don't need that
I make people pay me for my time, yeah I need that
And I see your girl like all the time, all the time, tho
I can't tell you if she's yours or mine, but I do know

[Hook]
Me and all my niggas doin' well, doin' well, dog
You not from the city, I could tell, I could tell, dog
Did it, did it, did it by myself, by myself, dog
Blew up and I'm in the city still, I'm still here, dog

[Verse 2]
Oh, and I'm back, dog
Oh, you just went and turned your back, dog
I thought that we were family
You showed me that we can't be
I gotta talk to God even though he isn't near me
Based on what I got it's hard to think that he don't hear me
Hittin' like that 30 on my jersey man I'm gifted
Whole lot of sixes, but I'm still like
Hallelujah, Hallelujah, Hallelujah
6 point star, Lion of the Judah
All my niggas ain't off rockin' Gucci
One do it then we all gotta do it
Got the key, now the doors open and we all goin' through it
Whole city at your head for the boy
I ain't even gotta call no one for it

[Hook]
Me and all my niggas doin' well, doin' well, dog
You not from the city, I could tell, I could tell, dog
Did it, did it, did it by myself, by myself, dog
Blew up and I'm in the city still, I'm still -

[Outro]
Wow, all praise to the most high up

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Drake/AUTHOR	NAME/Stunt Hard/NAME	"CONTENT/[Chorus]
I did it all on my own,
Turned a chair to a throne,
I'm a king in this world,
(Stunt hard)
I put my whole city on,
To some things that they never would've known,
If I didn't,
(Stunt hard)
And every night is a premiere,
If I ever disappear,
Best believe I'm comin' back.
(Stunt hard)
Got rich, went broke, and got rich again,
On that same shit again,
All I ever do is,
(Stunt hard)

(Drake):
I tell her.
I'm getting motherfuckin' busy.
So many spins my records is motherfuckin' dizzy.
Haters wanna turn to their girl and be like, ""Who Is He"",
But I bet a million she tell you that's motherfuckin' Drizzy.
And I'm focused on my survival.
Keep an eye on the door, focus on my arrival.
Who do you look up to when you're better then your idols.
And how you 'posed to look when you do it with your eyes closed.
I'm everything you just haven't become.
I spend my time trying to outdo what hasn't been done.
Now hopefully let them see,
What they say that I'm gon' be,
And if not our whole future does in the memory of me.
Get your team in order, assembly is key.
And all my niggas shut up at the mention of a plea.
They rather be apprehended and keep quiet then to be,
On the stand jeopardizing every inch of their loyalty.
Pick a lane pick a lane. That's all I ever heard.
But I'm just trying to swerve.
Without hitting the curb.
That's why I spend thousands on bottles so I can pop them.
And take photos wit hater niggas and crop them.
I am not them. I Photoshop them, out.
'Cause they don't understand what I'm about.
Yeah.
The Chris Paul
Of this fall,
Sittin' this tall.
I float high,
Goodbye,
I will miss y'all.

[Chorus]

(Lil' Wayne):
If I don't do nothin', Imma stunt my ass off.
Money sittin' in the pocket, 'bout to get a passoff.
And I smoke that shit that smell like when you take your cast off.
And I got them beach bitches, like David Hasselhoff.
Baby I'm an acrobat. Sweetie, I'm a stunt devil.
You can't get on my level 'cause I am so unleveled.
I'm a young rebel.
And I got a baby face.
I need a young pebbles.
I need a stuntdouble.
Yeah!
Me, Drake and Kid and you know it's trouble.
We got 'em drownin' in the flow, you see 'em blowin' bubbles.
Yeah!
I stick my landin' in a freak drawers.
I'll have her bouncin' back like Dominique Dawes.
Yeah!
But I ain't stuntin' these hoes
I been pimpin' since Hulk Hogan was N.W.O.
Yeah!
I'm wild, Drizzy tough, and the Kid vicious.
The three horseman, we just need Sid Vicious.
Yeah!
I'm on the cup of that tilt.
And if you hatin' on me
I'll say fuck you like wilt.
Yeah!
I'm a wild-erbeast. You're just a wilderbeast.
My two fingers make a gun, shoot and kill ya peace.
Yeah!
Talkin' big big shit.
I am rude,
I take food,
From a kid picnic.
Nigga.
Yeah!
And we can bang like bumper cars.
You know I stunt shit 'cause I write all stunner bars.
Haha.

[Chorus]

(Nutt Da Kid):
I stunt hard. I stunt harder.
Boy they call me Jackie Chan in New Orleans.
I ball hard. So I'm a ball hogger.
And I go hard and I dunk like Vince Carter.
I hustle harder.
I live in the Carter.
I think forward,
All I see is tomorrow.
I need me.
I'll turn your shop into a horror.
So if you trying to see more
Better feed me.
I'm back on my grizzy like Izzy Efeger.
Don't he look like a black grizzly in that black fur.
And the feds will never get me,
Like a backwards,
Password,
Black spur,
Go some like Pacman, cats first.
Vanilla Ice got 'em hangin' over the banister
Ask her,
Am I their man,
Her answer,
Is yes sir.
Shit.
I'm tourin' states on stage,
I played the RTA
'Bout a quarter a day.
Now tell them bitches.

[Chorus]

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Drake/AUTHOR	NAME/Stunt On You/NAME	"CONTENT/It's ten o'clock on a wednesday and I know your home
Driving up and down your street hoping that you come outside
Cause I just got paid and I went and bought the car you wanted
And I just need you to see me alone
Childish as it seems it'll make it all better... Better
Selfish as it is this just ain't about you no...
Did me wrong eveytime we were together... Gether
And that's why...

I'm gonna stunt on you
I'm gonna stunt on you

You let me go...
Little did you know...
I could have made it all on my own...

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Drake/AUTHOR	NAME/Sweeterman (Remix)/NAME	"CONTENT/[Intro]
Girl I know you wanna, you know I wanna
Yeah, she keep giving me looks
Hotter than the 6 in the summer, that ass, girl I wanna

[Verse 1]
Girl I know you wanna
You know I wanna
Yeah, she keep giving me looks
Yeah, girl I know you wanna
She's a spice, ride pipe like bike, like Yokohama
She heard the ting bend like banana
So she wanna give me the adunana-ne

[Pre-Hook]
She say I'm a sweeterman
But she say that she don't need a man
I say why don't we make an agreement then
We can just fuck while we're being friends

[Hook]
Girl I know you wanna
You know I wanna
Girl I know you wanna
You know I wanna

[Verse 2]
Shawty too fly though, that's all I know
She don't sing songs, but if I go strong she gon' hit this high note
She know she working with the nana
And she wanna give me the adunana-ne

[Pre-Hook]
She say I'm a sweeterman
But she say that she don't need a man
What if we make an agreement then
We can just fuck while we're being friends

[Hook]
Girl I know you wanna
I know you wanna
Girl I know you wanna
I know you want to girl

[Verse 3]
Ride the pipe like a bike, oh
Do the things you know I like, oh
I'm the man in my ends, oh
You're the one, let's not pretend

[Bridge]
Cause the pussy too good, drink too strong
Yiy too change, I'm too sprung, I, I, I
The pussy too good, drink too strong
Yiy too change, I'm so gone, I, I, I

[Hook]
Girl I know you wanna
I know you wanna
Girl I know you wanna
I know you want to girl
Girl I know you wanna
I know you want to girl
Girl I know you wanna, I, I, I

[Verse 4]
She keep giving me looks (o,o,o)
She keep giving me looks (o,o,o)
I need you right here beside me
If you oblige me, I'll hang it up, and I'll never come out of retirement
You should just sleep on it, you shouldn't doubt me
It would be different without me
What is it without me
Don't go do nothing without me
This is a blessing, mashallah, wallahi
I swear my life story's better than stories they telling about me
They got it twisted
Ride the pipe like a bike, make sure you're going the distance
And if he wasn't with it, then why were you with him?
Maybe you just had to realize
That knowing the difference can make all the difference
She wanna ride me that adanunana
Yeah she keep giving me looks

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Drake/AUTHOR	NAME/Take Care/NAME	"CONTENT/Know you've been hurt by someone else
I can tell by the way you carry yourself
If you let me, here's what I'll do
I'll take care of you
I've loved and I've lost

I've asked about you and they've told me things
But my mind didn't change
I still the feel the same
What's a life with no fun, please don't be so ashamed
I've had mine, you've had yours we both know
We know, they don't get you like I will
My only wish is I die real
Cause that truth hurts, and those lies heal
And you can't sleep thinking that he lies still
So you cry still, tears all in the pillow case
Big girls all get a little taste
Pushing me away so I give her space
Dealing with a heart that I didn't break
I'll be there for you, I will care for you
I keep thanking you, just don't know
Trying to run from that, say you're done with that
On your face girl, it just don't show
When you're ready, just say you're ready
When all the baggage just ain't as heavy
And the parties over, just don't forget me
We'll change the pace and we'll just go slow
You won't ever have to worry,
You won't ever have to hide
And you seen all my mistakes
So look me in my eyes

Cause if you let me, here's what I'll do
I'll take care of you
I've loved and I've lost

It's my birthday, I get high if I want to
Can't deny that I want you, but I lie if have to
Cause you don't say you love me
To your friends when they ask you
Even though we both know that you do (you do)
One time, been in love one time
You and all your girls in the club one time
All so convinced that you're following your heart
Cause your mind don't control what it does sometimes
We all have our nights though, don't be so ashamed
I've had mine, you've had yours, we both know
We know,
You hate being alone, you ain't the only one
You hate the fact that you bought the dream
And they sold you one
You love your friends but somebody shoulda told you somin' to save you
Instead they say

Know you've been hurt by someone else
I can tell by the way you carry yourself
If you let me, here's what I'll do
I'll take care of you
I've loved and I've lost

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Drake/AUTHOR	NAME/The Language/NAME	"CONTENT/I don't know why they been lying but yo shit is not that inspiring
Bank account statements just look like I'm ready for early retirement
Fuck any nigga that's talkin' that shit just to get a reaction
Fuck going platinum, I looked at my wrist and it's already platinum
I am the kid with the motor mouth
I am the one that you should worry about
I don't know who you're referring to, who is this nigga you heard about?
Someone just talking that bullshit, someone just gave you the run-around
Niggas downplaying the money but that's what you do when the money down
I don't waste time putting money down
I just go straight to who got it and buy it in cash
Pussy so good that you gotta come see me on tour and you gotta fly in first
class
This has been years in the making, it's all for the city
You know I come right every summer, Cash Money Records forever
I'm always big timing, bitch, I came up right under Stunna, you know it

Jealousy in the air tonight, I could tell
I will never understand that but oh well
Been ready, it's real, I don't know about you
She just want to smoke and fuck, I said ""Girl, that's all that we do""
Okay, now you're talking my language, now you're talking my language
Now you're talking my language, now you're talking my language
Been ready, it's real, I don't know about you
She just want to smoke and fuck, I said ""Girl, that's all that we do""

I'm about to roll one and light it and fuck it man, no one's invited
I got to kill off the weak shit that's got all you niggas excited
I can't even listen, you whylin', I'd much rather sit here in silence
I send all my money to banks in the islands and eat with Italians, I do
People are funny you don't even know about the shit that I been through
I just want some head in a comfortable bed, it could all be so simple
Talking that shit with your back to me, just know it always get back to me
Come get your girl, she been here for three days and she way too attached to
me
Hate when they get too attached to me
I got to get on the bus and get back on the road
Get what I can out the country and then I just get on the jet and go back to
the cold
Can't even drive with the top off
Been workin' so hard on the album I missed the whole summer
I just might bring in some girls from Miami
To heat up the city and that's word to Stunna, you know it

Jealousy in the air tonight, I could tell
I will never understand that but oh well
Been ready, it's real, I don't know about you
She just want to smoke and fuck, I said ""Girl, that's all that we do""
Okay, now you're talking my language now you're talking my language
Now you're talking my language, now you're talking my language
Been ready, it's real, I don't know about you
She just want to smoke and fuck, I said ""Girl, that's all that we do""

Famous and gangstas
You understand me?
Showtime, headlines
Big time, sunshine, tote nines
Bust mines, flatline, hard grind
High life, stay fly it's jet time
Stunt nigga, every time you see a nigga
Stunt nigga, every time you see a nigga
Stunt nigga, swag on head to feet nigga
Stunt nigga,
I might just bring in some girls from Miami to heat up the city and that's
word to Stunna you know it

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Drake/AUTHOR	NAME/The Resistance/NAME	"CONTENT/Yesterday when we were getting high, you were invited.
You would've liked it. I-I know you all too well.
I said that we could kiss the past goodbye,
But you weren't excited, there's no way to fight it.
You can stay but shawty here I go

Uh, should I spend the weekend in Vegas?
I'm living inside a moment, not taking pictures to save it.
I mean, how could I forget? My memories never faded.
I can't relate to these haters, my enemies never made it.
I am, still here with who I started with.
The game needed life, I put my heart in it.
I blew myself up, I'm on some martyr shit.
Carried the weight for my city like a cargo ship.
Uh. I'm 23, with a money tree.
Growing more too, I just planted a hundred seeds.
It's ironic, 'cause my mother was a florist,
And that's how she met my pops and now my garden is enormous.
It's happening Penny Lane, just like you said.
I avoided the Coke game, and went with Sprite instead.
Uh huh, that's word to the millions that they putting up.
I'm trying to do better than good enough.

[Chorus]
What am I afraid of? This is suppose to be what dreams are made of.
But people I don't have the time to hang with,
Always look at me and say the same shit (they say)
You promised me you would never change.
You promised me you would never change.

Uh. Am I wrong for making light of my situation? Clap on.
When 40 got some shit for me to snap on.
Now that I'm on, I don't really want to worry about getting back on.
I'm just trying to stay on, get my fucking buffet on.
I heard they just moved my grandmother to a nursing home.
And I be acting like I don't know how to work a phone.
But hit redial you see that I just called, some chick I met at the mall,
That I barley know at all and,
Plus this woman that I messed with unprotected
Texting saying that she wish she would've kept it.
The one that I'm laying next to just looked over and read it.
Man I couldn't tell you where the fuck my head is,
I'm holding on by a thread it's,
Like I'm high right now, the guy right now,
And you can tell by looking in my eyes right now.
That nothing really comes as a surprise right now,
'cause we just having the time of our lives right now.

[Chorus]

Well all right. Uh. I live by some advices, girl Lisa told me.
The other day, Lisa told that she missed the old me.
Which made me question when I went missing.
And when I start treating my friends different.
Maybe it was the fast paced switch up.
Or the two guns in my face during the stick up.
Maybe cause the girl I thought I trusted was who set the whole shit up.
Or the fact I haven't seen em since they locked Big Rich up.
I know. At the same time I'm quick to forget.
I'm bout to roll me up a blunt with my list of regrets.
Burn it all, burn it all, I'm starting it fresh.
Cause half the time I got it right I probably guessed.
Did I just trade free time for camera time?
Will I blow all of this money baby, Hammer Time?
I just need some closure.
Ain't no turning back for me I'm in till it's over.

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Drake/AUTHOR	NAME/The Search/NAME	"CONTENT/(Feat. Saukrates)

[Intro: Saukrates]
(They say we killin' 'em all, all, all, all)

[Verse 1: Drake]
Hip-Hop's newest and youngest acquisition,
If this was you, I wonder what you'd do in that position.
Try to make a profit or try to make a difference,
Try to make 'em play your shit or try to make 'em listen.
I go from records with Dwele and LB and eLZhi,
The meetings where they tell me to
Start making records and t hey'll buy,
Now I'm at in A-Town,
A tellin' me trey sounds,
It's too mainstream if I plan on me stickin' a-round.
But the allure of this year's scream tour
Has been cuttin' all them jawns that be hurtin' the game.
I be dreamin' bout hoes and doin' them loud shows,
Shirtless, that's why I started to personal train.
Dog, personally maine,
I'm a person that came to bring purpose
To a seem unless they purpose is game.
It never feel like it's earned when you purchase the fame,
Now my thoughts getting' deeper and I'm searchin' the game,
I keep on, on, on, on, on

[Chorus:]
(Yeah) I'm killin' 'em all, all, all, all
(Yeah) I'm killin' 'em all, all
I'm killin' 'em all, all

[Verse 2: Saukrates]
Yeah.
Let me show you how to blast up,
Now tell me who is a masta.
A mind never wasted,
Who grows fasta.
The young and incredible while lightin' yo ass up,
You look a lil red, we getting that cash up.
See where we from,
The 50s are bloody and the 100-dollar bill
Is dirty brown they love me.
I mess up my livin' room, the studio with my money,
A g-note is purple, grape juice stains on the front piece of,
My lapel, is custom-made,
You off the rack shit,
I'm off the chain, come on.
The dogs are loose,
And yeah we get at themon like san frisco bay,
With 40 and mac dre.
Eat it or forever lose a piece of your meal to
Me or one of my folk,
Drake'll give you the deal.
If bein' broke at 30 is a nigga that kills,
I guess we somethin' like two ice bergs huntin' to kill.
Keep on, keep on (uh), keep on (uh), keep on (uh)

[Chorus:]
(Yeah) I'm killin' 'em all, all, all, all
(Yeah) I'm killin' 'em all, all
I'm killin' 'em all, all

[Verse 3: Drake]
Look, uh
I use to get 'em like murda murda,
Ol' time killin'.
I wasn't even rappin', spent my whole time chillin',
And now the girls like,
It's only drake got chased and so the artists
I respected try and take my place,
But pimpin' ain't easy man and neither is rappin',
They one in the same when you need it to happen.
My city full of players they just needed a captain,
In-need of him right now and needed him him back then.
But back then I was act-in',
Now-a-days I serve back-hands with back-spin.
Tryin' to prove rappers are intelligent black men,
Whoever chose to back out is back in,
They say there's two sides to every story
And three when the truth get told,
So grab a spoon 'fore your soup get cold.
When you drive it off the lot is when your coupe get old.
So please discover an answer 'fore proof gets sold.
And keep on, on, on, on, on

[Chorus:]
(Yeah) I'm killin' 'em all, all, all, all
I'm killin' 'em all, all
I'm killin' 'em all, all

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Drake/AUTHOR	NAME/Trust Issues/NAME	"CONTENT/All I care about is money and the city that I'm from
I'ma sip until I feel it
I'ma smoke until it's done
I don't really give a fuck
And my excuse is that I'm young
And I'm only getting older
Somebody shoula told ya
I'm on one
Fuck it I'm on one
I said I'm on one
Fuck it I'm on one
A strong on
2 white cups and I got that drink
It could be purple it could be pink
Depending on how you mix that shit
Money to be gotten I'ma get that shit
Cause I'm on one
Fuck it I'm on one
Ah yeah ah yeah

You know what I like
Oh yes oh yeah
Oh yes oh yeah
Oh yes oh yeah

You know what I'm sippin
I teach you how to mix it
But you're the only one
Cause I don't trust these bitches
I don't I don't trust these bitches
They might catch me slipping
So you're the only one
Cause I don't trust these bitches
They might they might catch me slipping
And put in something different
So you're the only one
Cause I don't trust these bitches
I don't I don't trust these bitches
They might catch me slipping
So you're the only one

Ho oh trust issues
Ho oh trust issues
Ho oh trust issues
Ho ohhh

Drizzy drake check me out
Coming live from the mu-fucking north side
Kid game run game run it real good
But never ever have my bitches sitting court side
Same nigga that you knew way back when
You acting like it's somebody you don't know
Tell me how the fuck we supposed to stay friends
When you got a bunch of feelings that you don't show
I can tell I can tell I can tell certain people don't like me no more
New shit don't excite me no more
Guess they didn't really make 'em like me no more
You can look me in my eyes and see I ain't myself
Cause if y'all what I created then I hate myself
But still let them girls in
And tell 'em all leave them cellphones on the table where we see 'em
I'm all day wit' it man am to the pm
Niggas hatin' I just wish that they would say it when we see 'em all

That's that shit that drives me crazy
And it's all that I've been getting lately
And it's pro'ly why I'm scared to put the time in
Women wanna fuck like that mean I'm them
Looking for somethings and I think that I can find them
In you in you

Ho oh trust issues
Ho oh trust issues
Ho oh trust issues
Ho ohhh

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Drake/AUTHOR	NAME/Try Harder/NAME	"CONTENT/Sometimes I feel like Lohan and Hilary Duff
Are the only ones with enough
To feel what I'm about to say in this song
When they want you to be like somebody else
And you just wanna be yourself
And you do it and get the feeling it's wrong
It is when all the press articles happening
And the cameras get to snappin
And they try to make you out as a lie
Symbolic cos you were just trying to please em'
By using logic and reason
It's a lose lose why even try
When your ideas so frequently get rejected and people just get neglected
And They never really know how to feel
Phone calls is something that you're expecting
For someone without ethics to try and make em a mill
You never noticed the fact you might be working what I'm receivin' at first
And niggas wanna say that you ain't around
I mean there's always some blame to put on yourself (yourselves)
Instead of claimin' that you couldn't help and maybe next time you were
(ain't) In town

Chorus:
You gonna try to try harder cos
Try harder cos

Try -Try-Try-Try

And the managers make you circum to pressure
And you spitin' the pressure than most of the rappers running the game
Concerned that people who copy what's in the past
And turn the profit to cash
There's time I would have done it the same
I mean I got me a range
Also got me a guilty conscience
That made you tell anybody I meet that I ran
Sometimes I wish that I woulda' just chilled on the sneakers
And watched the game from the bleachers
Cos I'm really telling me what I spent
In a house that I promised to get my mother
Don't compensate for the other time
I wasted late out at the club
Instead of sitting in once a week for some dinner
I working hard on the winner so this album is a labour of love
You say as long as I'm staying out of the streets
And just spending money on beats that
She can rest without a toss and a turn
Cos she know that my reputation perceives me
And people watch me on tv
That's exactly why I often get burned
But I'm gonna try to.

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Drake/AUTHOR	NAME/Unforgettable/NAME	"CONTENT/Let me know, let me know
Ooh, let me know, let me know let me know

Uh, yeah this is really one of my dumbest flows ever
I haven't slept in days
And me and my latest girl agreed to go our separate ways
So I'm single thinking about what we had and missing you
But I ain't Santa, I got something for these bad bitches too
I mean paparazzi on me trying not to get caught out
They always seem to catch me with the woman that I brought out
Baby don't hold on too long cause that's how them stories start out
And all the girls that played me eat your motherfucking heart out, its Drizzy
Always gone but never hard to find
And since you can't escape me do I ever cross your mind
Because all this shit is new to me, I'm learning to behave
And still spending every dollar they encourage me to save
But I'm good I know that niggas would kill for this lifestyle
I'm looking forward to the memories of right now
Never forgetting from where I came
And no matter where I'm headed
I promise to stay the same (yeah, look)

I'm just riding round the city with my hood on and my windows down
Ask your girl I'm the realest nigga she been around
I pull up in something new and park it by the haters
And when you get to talking 'bout the greatest

(I just really hope that) You'll think of me
(I just really hope that) You'll think of me
(I just really hope that) You'll think of me
(I'm doin' my thing) 'Cause I'm tryna be unforgettable

This just might be my realest flow ever
When I say fo' life, y'all say fo'ever (fo'ever)
It's hard but it's fair I told that girl life hurts
The closest your gone get to this is a Pac T-shirt
The names young, baby you know I live that thug life
The good die young so I'm gone need a thug wife
Yeah, I'm talking his and her firearms
Know our jewelry probably louder than a car alarm (yeah)
Yeah, I remember I used to have to sneak the car
Now my insides looking like a snickers bar
Yeah, I'm talking caramel leathers
Damn right, so fly I need feathers
Sayin' shit in the streets so whats the dilly
You done everything in the A but fuck Chilli (haha)
So welcome to my life no two days the same
Like for y'all to meet the love of my life, her names the game

I'm just riding round the city with my hood on and my windows down
Ask your girl I'm the realest nigga she been around
I pull up in something new and park it by the haters
And when you get to talking 'bout the greatest

(I just really hope that) You'll think of me
(I just really hope that) You'll think of me
(I just really hope that) You'll think of me
(I'm doin' my thing) 'Cause I'm tryna be unforgettable

Got my top dropped on this beautiful night
This beautiful night to live my beautiful life
Pain hurts like a cut from a beautiful knife
Just know she right here on my hip, my beautiful wife

Yeah, Drizzy we got 'em lil' bra
Unforgettable, ya never forget this
You understand me? Timeless homie, unforgettable (Let me know, let me know)

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Drake/AUTHOR	NAME/Up All Night/NAME	"CONTENT/Kush rolled, glass full, I prefer the better things
Niggas with no money act like money isn't everything
I'm having a good time haters tryna ruin it,
Shout out to the fact that I'm the youngest nigga doin' it
Cap on, brim bent, Denzel, Larry time
She ain't trying to pop that shit for pimp okay well never mind,
I I I tried to told you, drizzy still ain't nothin' nice
Bracelet saying you should quit, cars saying fuck ya life
Okay now we outta here
Toodles to you bitches
And if you dolled up
I got the voodoo for you bitches, yeah
I'm busy getting rich, I don't want trouble
I made enough for two niggas boy stunt double
Fame is like a drug that I've taken too much of
But I never ever trip
Just peace happiness and love
I got money in these jeans, so they fit me kinda snug
Plus the game is in my pocket, nigga this is what I does, ah!

[Chorus]
I'm about whatever man
Fuck what they be talkin' about,
They opinion doesn't count,
We the only thing that matters (ooh)
So we do it how we do it
All up in your face, man, I hate to put you through it
I be up all night,
Whole crews in here
Cause I don't really know who I'm a lose this year (ow)
Man I love my team.
Man I love my team
I would die for them niggas, ow

Yo, Drizzy sayin' get her I'm a get her
I get the kind of money that make a broke bitch bitter
I got that kinda' wait wait fixate!
Which bitch you know made a million off a mixtape?
That was just a keep sake
Bought the president the Louie presidential briefcase
Never been a cheapskate
We got the Hawks I ain't talkin' about the peach state
Man for Pete's sake scratch that, sweep stakes
(ha ha ha ha)
Fuck I look like hoe
I look like yes and you like no
I'm a bad bitch I ain't never been a mixed breed.
I'm on a diet but I'm doing donuts in a six speed
M M M6 from a M-2
I see a lot of rap bitches on a menu
But I collect 100 thou at the venue
And pop bottles with the team young money til the death of me

I'm about whatever man.
Fuck what they be talking about,
They opinion doesn't count,
We the only thing that matters (ow)
So we do it how we do it
All up in your face, man, I hate to put you through it
I be up all night,
Whole crews in here
Cause I don't really know who I'm a lose this year (ow)
Man I love my team
Man I love my team
I would die for them niggas, ow

I mean we can't even rock them shoes if it ain't gotta comma on the price tag
I mean, I mean but then again who who looks at the price tag

Oh yeah we in this bitch
Ow, ow, ow
Oh yeah we in this bitch
Ow, ow, ow

[Chorus: x2]

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Drake/AUTHOR	NAME/Wednesday Night Interlude/NAME	"CONTENT/[Verse 1]
Been a minute since we've slept together
Gotta get myself together
I've been thinkin' about everything
I don't know if it's because I'm lonely
Lonely on a Wednesday night
Girl I'm lonely
I'll admit it if you just keep quiet
Girl I'm lonely
That shit ain't my fault girl
Cause I'm lonely
Name another woman, ain't no other woman who should come for me
When I'm lonely
Mix the Remy, little bit of Henny
I'm running on empty, I'm lonely
When I'm lonely, when I'm lonely

[Verse 2]
Heard you spend your summers in Miami
At somebody's house
That you didn't buy
You're young so have fun girl
I hope it's worth it
Cause fuck it I'm not here to judge
Fuck it I'm not here to love
Everything you did to ball
Fuck it, I'm just glad that you called
Ring ring ring, what a thing
Ring ring ring, school bell ring
You and I got options there
Name another woman
Ain't no other woman that should come for me when I'm lonely
When I'm lonely
Mix the Remy with a little bit of Henny
I'm running on empty, I'm lonely
When I'm lonely, when I'm lonely
This shit ain't my fault

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Drake/AUTHOR	NAME/What If I Kissed You/NAME	"CONTENT/[Drake]
What if I kissed you right now
How would we explain it
Trying to imagine how it might sound
If I just yelled out
What if I kissed you right now
Would it bring us any closer
Take a weight off our shoulders
Take me I'm yours
And I don't really care who knows it
Can you afford to be open with all these emotions
If you were a secret how long could you keep it
Lyrics courtesy of www.killerhiphop.com
Keep it to yourself don't tell nobody else
Not a problem [?]
And you just be mine
And you just be mine
And you just be mine (just, just be mine)

What if I kissed you right now
Would it bring us any closer
Take a weight off of our shoulders
Tell on me
I don't mind cause if they ask me about it I won't lie
Admit that I'm yours
I doon't really care who knows it
Can we afford to be that open with all these emotions

If you were a secret how long could you keep it
Keep it to yourself don't tell nobody else
Not a problem [?]
And you just be mine
And you just be mine
And you just be mine (just, just be mine)

What if I kissed you right now
What if I kissed you right now

And you just be mine
And you just be mine (all mine)
And you just be mine (just, just be mine)

What if I kissed you right now
[End]a

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Drake/AUTHOR	NAME/Where Were You/NAME	"CONTENT/[Verse 1: drake]
I have to watch the road
I swear that every car that passes has you in it
I can't believe we're finished
My life is movin' fast
The time will often pass
And something will remind me
I can't put this behind me
I thought you would've called by now, by now
You could've had my all by now, by now
It's been too many years for you to disappear
And have me asking the question

[Hook]
I wonder whatever became of you
Although, it's not that I'm surprised, it's not I didn't try
It's not that I was frightened, of you
Although, I said all goodbyes
And, you had all your cries
I wonder whatever became of you
I wonder whatever became of you
I wonder whatever became of you

[Verse 2: dawn richard]
I swear I heard you call
But when I heard you'd gone
I hate that I looked desperate
You gone is like me naked
I'm staring at your (?)
Trying to make it last
Keep looking close behind me
My eyesight on a memory
I thought you would've called by now, by now
You could have all my love right now, by now
Gave into my fears
While you just disappeared
That's why I'm asking this question...

[Hook]
I wonder whatever became of you
Although, it's not that I'm surprised, it's not I didn't try
It's not that I was frightened, of you
Although, I said all goodbyes
And, you had all your cries
I wonder whatever became of you
I wonder whatever became of you
I wonder whatever became of you

[Verse 3: drake]
I can't go to bed
Thinking about my goals
And how we used to say a goal is just a dream with a deadline
Where did the other half of my heart go?
Why am I in bed alone?
How come when I drive by, it looks like you are never home?
Do you even live there?
Or did you take a u-haul?
Too far, move off and not even tell me that you're gone?
We were on fire
Somehow that fire cooled off, burnt out
I kept straight, but I wonder how you turned out

[Hook]
I wonder whatever became of you
Although, it's not that I'm surprised, it's not I didn't try
It's not that I was frightened, of you
Although, I said all goodbyes
And, you had all your cries
I wonder whatever became of you
I wonder whatever became of you
I wonder whatever became of you

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/John Legend/AUTHOR	NAME/Asylum/NAME	"CONTENT/Our love's an asylum
Where you and I go
Our love's an asylum
Where we go, go, go, go crazy

In a state of madness
Wrapped up in your magic
Ecstatic, an addict
Oh, we landed on another planet
And it feels like home here
Will never go back there

Cause we're crazy, I'll go crazy with you
You're so crazy, I'll go crazy with you

Our love's an asylum
Where you and I go
Our love's an asylum
Where we go, go, go, go, go

To the edge of reason
Grow, lose your mind when needed

Our love's an asylum
Where you and I go
Our love's an asylum
Where we go, go, go, go crazy

Can't nobody save me
I'll go down with you, baby
I'll take you, you'll take me

Crazy - I'll do crazy with you
Let's go crazy, I'll go crazy with you

Our love's an asylum
Where you and I go
Our loves an asylum
Where we go, go, go crazy

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/John Legend/AUTHOR	NAME/Chasing Your Love/NAME	"CONTENT/I'll chase it away, I'll chase it away, I'll chase it babe
I'll chase it away, I'll chase it away, I'll chase it babe

I was here before, when I been born
I was loved once... Now mine
Lessons learned
Now I'm so afraid to loose control
So my heart says yes I still say no
I'm chasing your love, I'm chasing your love, away
One taste of your love and I'm chasing your love away

They say nothing ventured is nothing gained
I don't know if falling in love is ever worth the pain
If I bathe in your river then I may drown

So the chance of a lifetime I'll turn it down
I'm chasing your love, I'm chasing your love, away
One taste of your love and I'm chasing your love away

Oh, maybe this could last forever, baby I don't know
But I don't wanna wait forever, baby you should go
I'm chasing your love, I'm chasing your love, away
One taste of your love and I'm chasing your love away
I'm chasing your love, I'm chasing your love, away
One taste of your love and I'm chasing your love away.

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/John Legend/AUTHOR	NAME/Cross The Line/NAME	"CONTENT/Only just a friend,
The love story begins,
Now here's a happy ending to believe in.
And always there for me,
Now you're with me in my dreams
It's got me wondering if you ever,
Dream of me.
I don't wanna risk losing everything.
But I'll take the chance and tell you what I'm thinking.

[Chorus]
Girl, you'll be my best friend,
Can we put this to bed then?
Tonight's the night
To cross the line
Baby won't you be mine?
Not just my home girl
Time that I take you home girl
Tonight's the night
To cross the line
Let me love you tonight.
I, I, I

Kiss, kiss, kiss me on my lips
We've been dancing 'round the moment
Now we're doing it.
Breathe, breathe.
And sigh your sweet relief
We've been holding it so long,
The wait was killing me.
Oh and we, are what we, have been waiting for.
So baby, open your mind, while I close the door.

[Chorus]

Don't let this moment just slip away.
Cause we'll never know, unless we try someday
If you're ready, I'm so ready
Tonight's the night
Tonight's the night.

[Chorus: x2]

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/John Legend/AUTHOR	NAME/Dare To Dream/NAME	"CONTENT/Take one look at these small hands
Bend down with power that can move mountains
There's much more in store than we could understand
I know we have to do anything

Close your eyes and visualize
Nothing is impossible for those who try
Just the dream to fly as eagles fly across the sky
I know we can

See the rainbow 'round us all
Hear the Angels when they call
Find a way to reach inside
Just dare to dream and walk with pride, yeah

Hold on when a hope is gone
Race may not begin to the swift or strong
It's given to the ones who can enjoy for long
I know we care

See the rainbow 'round us all
Hear the Angels when they call
Find a way to reach inside
Just dare to dream, oh, we will rise

Rise up together and we'll go higher
Find a step to make it through the fire
Just dare to dream, I know we care

See the rainbow 'round us all
Hear the Angels when they call
Find a way to reach inside
Dare to dream and walk with pride

We're together side by side
Let's find a way to reach inside
Walk with pride, oh

See the rainbow 'round us all
Hear the Angels when they call
Find a way to reach inside
Dare to dream and walk with pride

We're still together side by side
Let's find a way to reach inside

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/John Legend/AUTHOR	NAME/Don't Let Me Be Misunderstood/NAME	"CONTENT/Baby, you understand me now
Though sometimes you see that I am mad
No-one can always be an angel
When everything goes wrong, you'll see some bad

But I'm just a soul, who's intentions are good
Oh Lord, please don't let me be misunderstood

Sometimes I'm so care-free, with the joy that's hard to hide
Most of the time, I'm so full of worries
And then you're bound to see my other side

But I'm just a soul, who's intentions are good
Oh Lord please don't let me be misunderstood
Don't let me be misunderstood

If I seem edgy, I want you to know
I never mean to take it out on you, no
'Cos life has its problems
And I've got more than my share
That's one thing that I never wanna do
Cause I love you baby
I'm just human, I have faults like anyone
Sometimes I think I'll spend the rest of my life regretting
Some simple things that I have done

But I'm just a soul, who's intentions are good
Oh Lord please don't let me be misunderstood
Don't let me be misunderstood
Don't let me be
Don't let me be misunderstood
Don't let me be
Don't let me be misunderstood

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/John Legend/AUTHOR	NAME/Dreams/NAME	"CONTENT/Every time I close my eyes
Visions of you come to life
And I see
What we could be

I don't want to be awake
I don't want to see a day
Dawnin
Like this morning

Sun brings llight
Reality strikes
So bring back the night
Cause I'm longin

To dream dream dream dream
Dream dream dream dream
Like lovers do
And it might come true

If I dream dream dream dream
Dream dream dream dream
It just might be the only time that I'm with you

When I dream dream dream
Dream dream dream
Of you

Close to me
Still so far
Close enough
To feel your heart is falling
But he's calling

Baby it seems the time is never right
You're goin left and I'm goin right
It's crazy
But I'm still waiting

If I play my cards right
My lucks gonna strike
Until then there's a night
All I wanna do

Is dream dream dream dream
Dream dream dream dream
Like lovers do
And it might come true

If I dream dream dream dream
Dream dream dream dream
It just might be the only time that I'm with you

When I dream dream dream
Dream dream
Oh I dream
Yes I dream
Dream dream
Dream dream
They say that dreams they sometimes do come true

Your star shines so bright
You're the queen of my night
In the daytime not quite
But I'm so glad that I

Can dream dream dream
Dream dream dream
Like lovers do
And it might come true

If I dream dream dream
Dream dream dream
It just might be
The only time
That I'll be with you

But I'll dream dream dream
Dream dream dream
Of you

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/John Legend/AUTHOR	NAME/Floating Away/NAME	"CONTENT/(Oh Oh Oh)
She don't press me
Not like she used to
Everything that she don't do
That's what I want, what I need

Sinking rapidly
And that's when you sail through
Let me sail away with you
Everything that she won't do, you do for me

[Chorus:]
Say what you say (say)
Floating away (way)
Baby, I was drowning in my sorrow
Couldn't see tomorrow today
(Then you came)

Say what you say (say)
We're floating away (away way)
Now I see the solemn of horizons
Now I know that I'll be ok
Since you came yeah

12 am she leaves
She don't say where to
Won't see her again until 12 noon
And she don't smell like me

(Oh) suddenly I see
I see don't do what she used to
She's found someone who
Well, baby, needs you, so sorry

Say what you say (say)
Floating away (way)
Baby I was drowning in my sorrow
Couldn't see tomorrow today
(Then you came)

Say what you say
We're floating away
Now I see the solemn of horizons
Now I think that I'll be ok
(Since you came yeah)

[Bridge:]
Baby in all, we can just go
Can't stay, lets sail away
Open your eyes, say your goodbyes
We'll cruse into paradise

Say what you say (say)
Floating away (way)
Baby I was drowning in my sorrow
Couldn't see tomorrow today
(Then you came)

Say what you say
We're floating away (way) (way)
Now I see the solemn of horizons
Now I think that I'll be ok
(Since you came yeah)

Say what you say (say)
Floating away (way)
Baby I was drowning in my sorrow
Couldn't see tomorrow today
(Then you came)

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/John Legend/AUTHOR	NAME/Good Morning/NAME	"CONTENT/Good morning,
Good morning love,
It's my favorite love song,
I waited all night long,

Before you get into the shower,
Before you worry about your hair,
Baby give me one more hour,
I want you to stay right there,
I don't wanna lose a moment,
I don't wanna miss a kiss,
If I could plan the perfect day, love,
Then I would start it just like this

[Chorus]
Good morning,
Good morning love,
It's my favorite love song,
I waited all night long,
For morning,
Good morning love
Before we start the day dear,
I'm whispering in your ear,
Good morning.

Now baby how can I commence you,
I'll make it so you can't resist,
Whatever else you have to do now,
It can't be half as good as this,
I'll case you underneath the sheets, love,
And I won't let you get away,
The day won't be complete, love,
Unless we get a chance to say,

[Chorus]

Open your eyes,
See my sunrise,
I feel your skin
So warm inside,
Day breaks so sweet,
When you're next to me,
So stay each night,
So each morning will be

[Chorus]

Let's get lost together,
I will smile forever [Repeat: x2]
Was morning

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/John Legend/AUTHOR	NAME/Green Light/NAME	"CONTENT/Give me the green light, give me just one night
I'm ready to go right now, I'm ready to go right now

I'm ready to go right now, I'm ready to go right now

I see you move, I'm checking your smile
Working your back like it's going out of style
Shake just a little bit faster
Shake just a little now girl
Dying to meet you, so let's mess around
I've got an obsession of us getting down
Come just a little bit closer
I just need permission so just

Give me the green light, give me just one night
I'm ready to go right now, I'm ready to go right now
We can go all night, give me the green light
I'm ready to go right now, I'm ready to go right now

One two three green light, but if it's what it seems like
The you moving baby, lets me know it's gon' be right
I'm ready to go right now, I'm ready to go right now

One two three red light, I wanna see what you dance like
But if I can be your buddy, help you study and get your head right
I'm ready to go right now, I'm ready to go right now

Do I have a girlfriend, technically no.
If you'll be my girlfriend then I'll make it so
You'll be my only true lover
No competition, no others
Baby it's just the thrill of the chase
But I've got a feeling that I'm winning this race!
Baby I'm gettin' closer, I just need permission so

Give me the green light, give me just one night.
I'm ready to go right now! I'm ready to go right now
We can go all night, give me the green light
I'm ready to go right now, I'm ready to go right now

One two three green light, but if it's what it seems like
The you moving baby, lets me know it's gon' be right
I'm ready to go right now, I'm ready to go right now

One two three red light, I wanna see what your dance like
But if I can be your buddy, get your study and get your head right
I'm ready to go right now, I'm ready to go right now

So I went hard like Medusa staring at me
I told her let's go, let's blow this lame nigga factory
She said, What type of girl do you think I are
The kind that you meet in a bar
You think you can get whatever you want cause you some kinda star
No I'm a comet, I just want you woman
Hey, If I were you then It would be me that I go home with
Three, the one and only, one thing you ain't considered
I heard you when you told your girl ""ooh he can get it"" admit it,
You did it let's hop a cab and split it
I'm kiddin' we both going to where you livin'
Ha, I got you gigglin' like I'm piglet
Oh that's the ticket, I hope you are more like Anita Baker than Robin Givens
No, I don't know that lady so let me quit it
I'm just style freein', freestylin' with y'all seldom do
This is what I'm telling you
To the bed I'm nailing you
Like I've been in jail for two
Years and then they let me loose

Give me the green light, give me just one night
I'm ready to go right now, I'm ready to go right now
We can go all night, give me the green light
I'm ready to go right now, I'm ready to go right now

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/John Legend/AUTHOR	NAME/Heaven/NAME	"CONTENT/Heaven only knows[x5]

Last night was the worst night
Beginning of the end
Or maybe it began
Before it here we go again
Things got so dramatic
Things got out of hand
We said words we couldn't imagine
I don't understand

There you go with the same old thing
When things go wrong, you always seem to blame me
Now I would like to find what secrets hide in your mind
Where the end will go
Will I ever know?

[Chorus]
Heaven only knows
Heaven only knows
Heaven only knows
Heaven only knows

So let's make this night the best night
It's time for second chance
Turn the beat up on repeat, and we can start to dance

Sometimes when we talking words
Drowned on by the sound
Let's get back to touch, and we'll get back on solid ground

Let's hold hands
Like a young romance
Let's first kiss like the moment we first did
Can we make love
Like back way in the day?
We can lose control
Baby, don't say no

[Chorus]

So will you come back to me?
Heaven only knows
So will you come back to me?

Make this night the best night
It's time for second chance
Turn the beat up on repeat, and we can start to dance

[Chorus]

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/John Legend/AUTHOR	NAME/Hold On Longer/NAME	"CONTENT/Broken hearts rain on our angelic flies
But I won't run, I'm with you, that's enough
Kiss me now so you won't run

Out of breath underwater
Girl you can hold on longer
Girl you can hold on longer
Girl you can hold on longer
Long as you want

Oh, oh, oh, oh

Love is an ocean
Swimming and try not to drown
Right in the waves
Praying we don't go down
In the undertow I'll pull you out

Out of breath underwater
Girl you can hold on longer
I know the waves get stronger
Girl you can hold on longer
Long as you want
Oh, oh, oh, oh

Hold on

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/John Legend/AUTHOR	NAME/I Love, You Love/NAME	"CONTENT/Hush my baby, Don't you cry.
I'll dry your eyes. Fulfill your heart's desire.
Let's go in. Try again.
Careful this time. Broken promises linger in our mind.

I'll give in completely. Hearts break so easy.
I know. Believe me. Oh, I've tried.
But my arms can hold you. My kiss console you.
I'll come and love you tonight.

[Chorus]
And I
I love, I love, I love
Love hurts sometimes
But this feels right.
You
You love, you love, you love
Though you've been burned
You still return.

Come and share my house, my home, and all I own.
I'd love to give to you.
Aren't you tired of going along this lonely road?
It takes its toll on you.

Give me your emotion, your heart's devotion.
Give anything you like.
And I'll give understanding. Life's so demanding.
I'm all you need to get by.

[Chorus]

I love, I love, I love

Love hurts sometimes
But this feels right.

And You,
You love you love you love
Though you've been burned
You still return.

Still return
Still return to love (Oh)
Keep coming back to love (Ah oh)

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/John Legend/AUTHOR	NAME/Motherless Child/NAME	"CONTENT/Sometime I feel
Like a motherless child
Sometimes I feel
Like a motherless child
And sometimes I feel
Like a motherless child
A long...long way...from home

Whooaoo

And Sometimes I feel
Like I'm almost gone
Sometimes I feel whooaoo
Like I'm almost gone
Sometimes I feel yeahehe
Like I'm all alone
A long...a looong wayee from home

C'mon, c'mon
Who's got a shoulder when I need to cry
I feel restless and I don't know why
Cry for help, but still feel alone
Like A motherless child along way from home
Lord I'm lost I can't find my way
I'm dealin' with the struggles in my day to day
My soul is weak and I wanna be strong
I try to run away but I've been running to long

I've been running to long...
I've been running to long

Heeyy

Who's got a shoulder when I need to cry
I feel restless and I don't know why
Cry for help, but I still feel alone
Like a motherless child along way from home
Lord I'm lost I can't find my way
I'm dealin' with the struggles in my day to day
My soul is weak and I wanna be strong
I try to run away but I've been running to long

I've been running to long...
I've been running to long
Like a motherless child (X4)
So lost and so long
Like a motherless child

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/John Legend/AUTHOR	NAME/Must Be The Way/NAME	"CONTENT/It must be the way that you move inside my head
(Yeah, yeah)
Or it must be the songs that you sing to me in bed
(Yeah, yeah)
It must be the moon and the sun that sets so red
(Yeah, yeah)
Or it could be the stars when we're lying under them
(Yeah, yeah, yeah)
It must be the, it must be the
It must be the, it must be the way
It must be the, it must be the
It must be the, it must be the way
It must be the way that with you, I don't pretend
(No, no)
And it must be your skin that when I touch just drives me mad
(Yeah)
Or it must be the blues that with you, I never have
(Mo, no, no, no)
It's all those little things that you do, make me so glad
(Yeah, oh, yeah)
And I'm telling you that I wonder just what it is to me that you do
(Oh)
But I say that it doesn't matter
'Cause all I know is that there's something about you
(Oh)
It must be the, it must be the
It must be the, it must be the way
It must be the, it must be the
It must be the, it must be the way
And I don't know what it is, baby, that you do
But it must be the way that keeps me fallin' for you
It must be the, it must be the
It must be the, it must be the way
It must be the, it must be the
It must be the, it must be the way
It must be the, it must be the
It must be the, It must be the way
It must be the, It must be the
It must be the, it must be the way

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/John Legend/AUTHOR	NAME/My Imagination/NAME	"CONTENT/[Verse 1]
I've made them love, I've made them cry
But now the rain clouds are lonely inside
They don't know how it feels to know how I feel
I try to escape from everything that is real

[Chorus 1]
Hide in my imagination, safe inside my contemplation
Never out of time, somewhere in my mind
There's a place where I'll be landing, far away from where I'm standing
Day by day creating in my imagination

[Verse 2]
The well has run dry of all my ideas
Silence so loud, have to cover my ears
I'm closing the door, it's hurting too much
I'm runnIng away from everything I can touch

[Chorus 2]
To hide in my imagination, there is always magic waiting
Never counting time, always on my mind
There's a place that only I see, far away from all that I see
Inch by inch creating, in my imagination

[Verse 3]
I can stop it all from hurting
With this mind, I can stop the world from turning
Don't know how it feels to know how I feel
I try to escape from everything that is real

[Chorus 1]

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/John Legend/AUTHOR	NAME/No Other Love/NAME	"CONTENT/No other love
No other touch
Gimme gimme oh so much
Turn me on, turn me on

Won't you please get out of my head
Get back into my bed now, come kiss me, come with me
Cause I can't hardly sleep without you, can't stop thinking bout you girl
I want you, I need you

And I'm ready for love, I'm ready for us to lose control
Oh you know and I know that

[Chorus]
No other love
No other touch
Gimme gimme oh so much
Turn me on, turn me on
No other kiss
No one like this
Feeling that I can't resist
Turn me on, turn me on, turn me on

I had my share of lovers
But there is no other girl, your special, now let's go
Cause love I want you more than ever, want to do whatever now
To keep you, I need you

And I'm ready for love, I'm ready for us to lose control
Oh you know and I know that

[Chorus]

[Estelle]
I say your turning me on now, say your turning me oh, oh, oh, on
Say your turning me on with your smile, to your lips, to the words of this
song ah know
I used to say I was too young, now I'm grown up
But I put you where you need that strong, real goodie good loving
Stevie wonder said it's been so long
And I'ma a give it if you need it are you ready to receive it
Boy I, I, I, I, I (wanna give you some love), I wanna give you some love and
affection, you got my attention

See I'm ready for love, I'm ready for us to loose control
Oh you know, and I know that

[Chorus]

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/John Legend/AUTHOR	NAME/Number One/NAME	"CONTENT/Ooh I promise not to do it again
I promise not to do it

You can't say I don't love you
Just because I cheat on you
'Cause you can't see all I do
To keep you from knowing the things I do
Like erase my phone
And keep it out of town
I keep it strapped up when I sleep around
Well I should have known one say you'd find out
But you can't go and leave me now

You know that I love you
There's no one above you
I said it the last time
But this is the last time
Don't make me over
'Cause I can be faithful
Baby you're my number one
You're my number one

Now who is she?
What's her name?
You don't need to know about everything
We fight about this
We fight about that
You hang up the phone and call me right back
Well I'll never be something I'm not
Please don't throw away what we've got
'Cause we've been together for way too long
I was playing around but I'm coming home

You know that I love you (know that I love you)
There's no one above you (no one above you)
I said it the last time (hey, hey)
But this is the last time
Don't make me over (don't leave me baby)
'Cause I can be faithful (you know I try)
Baby you're my number one (baby)
You're my number one

I keep you laced up so you ain't gotta borrow nothing
From them broke ass friends who be bargain hunting
They say they shop on eBay - baby why is they frontin'?
They be on the internet but they never cop nothin'
I keep you in Girl what is those on your toes?
And your neck staying froze off that rose colored gold
I suppose you was told by them hoes I was cheatin'
Thinkin' my heart don't got nothing to do with my penis
He got a mind of his own and he just be seeing shit
And I don't want to cheat but I don't be saying shit
I try to jack off he ask me who is you playin' wit?
But I know he love you he told me you was his favorite

You know that I love you (know that I love you)
There's no one above you (above you)
I said it the last time (said it the last time)
But this is the last time (hey hey hey yeah)
Don't make me over (don't leave me baby)
'Cause I can be faithful (you know I try)
Baby you're my number one (oh baby)
You're my number one

You're making it hard for me
You're messing up everything
You tell me I gotta leave
Say we over
You saw that she came over
Came in the Range Rover
Left with a hangover
Say we over

I promise I won't cheat
I promise I won't lie
I promise I'll act right
Say we over
You can't tell me
I can't have you
I can't have that
We ain't over

Hey, it ain't over baby
We ain't over
Oh you don't need to go it's not over
We ain't over
Oh?
We ain't over
Oh it's gonna be alright now don't go now

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/John Legend/AUTHOR	NAME/Ordinary People/NAME	"CONTENT/Girl, I'm in love with you
This ain't the honeymoon
Passed the infatuation phase
Right in the thick of love
At times we get sick of love
Seems like we argue everyday

I know I misbehaved and you made your mistakes
And we both still got room left to grow
And though love sometimes hurts
I still put you first
And we'll make this thing work but I think maybe we should take it slow

We're just ordinary people
We don't know which way to go
Cause we're ordinary people
Maybe we should take it slow
Take it slow, ohh
This time we'll take it slow
Take it slow, ohh
This time we'll take it slow

This ain't a movie love
No fairytale conclusion y'all
It gets more confusing everyday
Sometimes it's heaven sent
Then we head back to hell again
We kiss then we make up on the way

I hang up, you call
We rise and we fall
And we feel like just walking away
As our love advances we take second chances
Though it's not a fantasy I still want you to stay

We're just ordinary people
We don't know which way to go
Cause we're ordinary people
Maybe we should take it slow
Take it slow, ohh
This time we'll take it slow
Take it slow, ohh
This time we'll take it slow

Take it slow
Maybe we'll live and learn
Maybe we'll crash and burn
Maybe you'll stay, maybe you'll leave
maybe you'll return
Maybe another fight
Maybe we won't survive
But maybe we'll grow
We never know Maybe you and I

We're just ordinary people
We don't know which way to go
Cause we're ordinary people
Maybe we should take it slow

We're just ordinary people
We don't know which way to go
Cause we're ordinary people
Maybe we should take it slow

Take it slow, ohh
This time we'll take it slow
Take it slow, ohh
This time we'll take it slow
Take it slow, slow
This time we'll take it slow
Take it slow, ohh
This time we'll take it slow

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/John Legend/AUTHOR	NAME/Out Of Sight/NAME	"CONTENT/It's a celebration baby, step out with me.
Draped in your finest clothes and accessories.
I notice you've been focused on the stress of the week.
But it's Friday tonight.
Spend the night out with me.

Let's hit the party tonight.
That will be out of sight.
No matter where we decide, it's gon' be on tonight.
You look you're ready and right.
You showed me out of sight.
We're coming home late tonight.

We gonna do it right right.
We'll do it right right.
Our hands are sky high.
From left to the right.
Don't look that the time.
Just let it fly by.
We live the good life.
And we'll do it right right.
We'll do it right right.

Ain't too fast or slow, it's just enough to get down.
Might be from the country but were going to town.
This weekend we can freak a leek all on the floor.
First get low, then come close.
Let the music control, oh.

Let's hit the party tonight.
That will be out of sight.
No matter where we decide, it's gon' be on tonight.
You look you're ready and right.
You showed me out of sight.
We're coming home late tonight.

We gonna do it right right.
We'll do it right right.
Our hands are sky high.
From left to the right.
Don't look that the time.
Just let it fly by.
We live the good life.
And we'll do it right right.
We'll do it right right.

This is the last call.
Fill up your glass y'all.
We'll dance until they play the last song.
It's the end of the night.
Now it's just you and I.
It's time for us to take this party back home.

Let's hit the party tonight.
That will be out of sight.
No matter where we decide, it's gon' be on tonight.
You look you're ready and right.
You showed me out of sight.
When we go home late tonight.

Girl we gon' do it right right.
Until the daylight.
We'll do it light right.
Yes, we'll do it all night.
Don't look at the time.
Just let it fly by.
Yes, we'll live the good life.
And we'll do it right right.
Then we say bye bye.

Then we say bye bye
(Bye bye)
Bye bye
(Bye bye)
Bye bye
(Bye bye)
Bye bye.

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/John Legend/AUTHOR	NAME/Penthouse Floor/NAME	"CONTENT/[Verse 1: John Legend]
All this trouble in this here town
All this shit going down
When will they focus, on this?
Streets ride up with the TV crews
Look ma, we on the news
But they didn't notice, before this
They float above the city lights
Forget the truth, inhale the lies
Just enjoy the show
They see us reaching for the sky
Just in order to survive

[Chorus: John Legend]
Maybe we should go
Go to the penthouse floor (let's go, let's go, let's go)
Go to the penthouse floor (let's go, let's go, let's go)
Let's ride the elevator, they can't keep us out no more
Go to the penthouse floor (let's go, let's go, let's go)
Penthouse floor

[Verse 2: John Legend]
All that bubbly, all that wine
Oh man, look at the times
Didn't they notice, notice?
Only future I can see, ain't what it used to be
And I didn't know this, I didn't know this
Once you're above the city lights
Won't want to spend another night, down there on your own
The holding on is made for us
The altitude is dangerous, but we ain't going home

[Chorus: John Legend]
Go to the penthouse floor (let's go, let's go, let's go)
Go to the penthouse floor (let's go, let's go, let's go)
Let's ride the elevator, it's what we've been waiting for
Can't keep us out no more (let's go, let's go, let's go)
Penthouse floor

[Verse 3: Chance The Rapper]
I heard this old joke once, it was like, uh
Knock knock, who there, it's us, us who?
Just us, who dis? Just playin'
Just me, new phone, new hair, new era
I'm in the penthouse, baby
Handpicked from bad apples and bad eggs
Held back, I had to grab crab legs
And then there were only but a few
Conversations held with patience, what a party, what a view
What a dress, what a song
What a beautiful time
My folks downstairs still waitin' in line
They never been in these rooms
Never stayed with these folks
Never laughed at the news, never hated these jokes
So as I fly in my suit, in a group, undercover
Forcin' a new smile, he tells me another
He said ""What happened to the boy that climbed up the trunk?""
Then he pushed me off the top and said ""Jump, nigga, jump!""

[Bridge: John Legend]
Oh, don't bring me down, I need a room in the clouds
I wanna get there babe, I wanna elevate
Oh my favorite mix, a little ignorance and bliss
In the penthouse babe, go to the penthouse

[Chorus: John Legend]
Go to the penthouse floor (let's go, let's go, let's go)
Go to the penthouse floor (let's go, let's go, let's go)
Let's ride the elevator, it's what we've been waiting for
We'll tear down those penthouse doors (let's go, let's go, let's go)
Those penthouse doors
We'll tear down the penthouse doors (let's go, let's go, let's go)
Baby, I'm in the penthouse floor
Baby, let's ride the elevator
Til we can rise some more
Go to the penthouse floor, penthouse floor (let's go, let's go, let's go)

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/John Legend/AUTHOR	NAME/Please Baby Don't/NAME	"CONTENT/(feat. Sergio Mendez)

Please baby don't (baby don't)
Don't fall in love with me
Please baby don't (baby don't)
You know my history
See honey I (honey I)
I'm just trying to warn you (let me warn you)
Please baby don't (baby don't)
Don't fall in love with me

I've been cruisin down this road for a while now,
I should tell the truth...
Girl you've been so good to me but I know
I'm no good for you
You should run while you can
Find yourself a better man
'Cause I'm known for brief romance
And breakin hearts across the land

Yes I've been known to have a few temptations
Out there on the road
And let's say hypothetically I've slipped and
Took a couple home
Girl I know that's not fair
You need someone who'll be there
So just get away before it's too late
And you're pain is too much to bear

Please baby don't (baby don't)
Don't fall in love with me
Please baby don't (baby don't)
You know my history
See honey I (honey I'm)
I'm just trying to warn you (let me warn you)
Please baby don't (baby don't)
Don't fall in love with me

(rhodes piano solo)

Please baby don't (baby don't)
Don't fall in love with me
Please baby don't (baby don't)
You know my history
See honey I'm (honey I'm)
I'm just trying to warn you (let me warn you)
Please baby don't (baby don't)
Don't fall in love with me

Now on second thought maybe we'll give
This love another try
'Cause I can't see you with no one else
I'm selfish I can't lie
So let's go, let's go slow
You know all you need to know
It could end one day but
Let's just say we'll see how far it goes

Please baby don't (baby don't)
Don't fall in love with me
Please baby don't (baby don't)
You know my history
See honey I'm (honey I'm)
I'm just trying to warn you (let me warn you)
Please baby don't (baby don't)
Don't fall in love with me

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/John Legend/AUTHOR	NAME/Refuge/NAME	"CONTENT/I pray for better days to come
I pray that I would see the sun
Cuz life is so burdensome
When everyday's a rainy one

But suddenly there's no more clouds
I believe without a doubt
That heaven sent an angel down
And then she turned my life around

You know and I know
Friends come and friends go
Storms rise and winds blow
But one thing I know for sure

When it's cold outside
There's no need to worry cuz
I'm so warm inside
You give me peace
When the storm's outside
Cuz we're in love I know
It'll be alright
Alright it's alright

Oooh...

Now peace is so hard to find
We're terrorized and victimized
But that's when I close my eyes
And think of you to ease my mind
You take me to another place
There's no more war (no more war)
Just love and grace
Baby you restore my faith
I know the struggle's not in vain
You know and I know
Through all the battles
Baghdad to Israel
There's one thing I know for sure

When it's cold outside
There's no need to worry cuz
I'm so warm inside
You give me peace
When the storm's outside
Cuz we're in love I know
It'll be alright
Alright it's alright

Alright it's alright
Alright it's alright
Alright it's alright

Oh...
When it's cold outside
There's no need to worry cuz
I'm so warm inside
You give me peace
When the storm's outside
Cuz we're in love I know
It'll be alright
Alright it's alright

Oh it's gonna be alright
Ooh...

Cuz you give me peace
In the middle of the storm
When it's cold you're keeping me warm
It's alright
It's alright
I'm never gonna leave
You give me what I need
It's alright, alright

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/John Legend/AUTHOR	NAME/Right By You (for Luna)/NAME	"CONTENT/[Verse 1]
Will you live like me, in a world run by desire?
Will you wake from worldly dream and not be tired?
Will you work like me to lift the conversation higher?
Will you be cool like water putting out the fire?
How can you be free from all this sorrow?
Will the ones you love today be gone tomorrow?

[Chorus 1]
And if angels don't have answers to your prayers
Oh, I will be there, oh I will be there

[Verse 2]
And if who you love don't want your love, well then...
Do you cut a deal with love and run again?
You see, love contains the meaning of despair
Will you think like me? Will you have your mother's fire?
Maybe the way we are will not be how you're wired
Will we do right by you? Will we you have what you require
To make your days on this Earth be not so dire?

[Chorus 2]
Can you choose to lead if no one follows?
And if we fell today, must you tomorrow?
Sanctify your answer not your prayer
Oh, I will be there, yeah, I will be there
Yeah, I will be there

[Outro]
And even when it all becomes too much
When you're growing old and feeling out of touch
Listen to this song and just take care
And know that I will be there, yeah, I will be there
No, I swear that I will, yeah, I promise I will
Little girl, I'm cryin'

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/John Legend/AUTHOR	NAME/Roll Jordan Roll/NAME	"CONTENT/Roll Jordan, roll
Roll Jordan, roll
I want to get to
Heaven when I die
To hear Roll Jordan roll
Roll Jordan, roll
Roll Jordan, roll
I want to get to
Heaven when I die
To hear Roll Jordan roll

My brother you ought
To been there
Yes, my Lord
A sitting in the kingdom
To see Roll Jordan roll

Roll Jordan, roll
Roll Jordan, roll
I want to get to
Heaven when I die
To hear Roll Jordan roll

My mother, you ought
To been there
Yes, my Lord
A sitting in the kingdom
To see Roll Jordan roll

Roll Jordan, roll
Roll Jordan, roll
I want to get to
Heaven when I die
To hear Roll Jordan roll
I want to get to
Heaven when I die
To see Roll Jordan roll

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/John Legend/AUTHOR	NAME/Same Old Story/NAME	"CONTENT/[Verse 1]
Nobody's buying
There ain't any truth to it
The fact is you're lying
But I'm getting used to it
Promising we'll stay together
Down in your heart, you know better
I know what I lost before it's gone

[Chorus]
Tell me slowly
Over and over again
Same old story
Over and over again
Tell me slowly
Over and over again
Over and over again

[Verse 2]
Oh, say I'm overreacting
As if you believe in that
But you answer questions
That nobody even asked
Although we may stay together
Down in your heart, you know better
You pictured all the ways that you'll move on

[Chorus]
But you just tell me slowly
Over and over again
Same old story
Over and over again
Tell me slowly
Over and over again
Over and over again

[Bridge]
I will try to pull the wool over my eyes
You thought it would keep me warm
You said it was cold outside

[Chorus]
Tell me slowly
Over and over again
Same old stories
Over and over again
Tell me slowly
Over and over again
Over and over again
Over and over again
Over and over again
Oh, over and over again

[Outro]
Oh, say it again, yeah
Keep on, yeah
Over and over

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/John Legend/AUTHOR	NAME/Save The Night/NAME	"CONTENT/A little trouble in the city
Trouble in my home
She told me love don't live here anymore
I wanna run to the light
It's too dark in this part of night
I need somebody who can make it right

And it's on tonight
How about we go and save the night
I can see you want it and so do I
How about we go and save the night
Let's save the night

I'm not a one man band
I want to sing a duet
You and me would sound much better
You look so good in my bed
And if your gonna go out
Your gonna go on with a bang
Let's save the night I'll be your superman

And it's on tonight
How about we go and save the night
I can see you want it and so do I
How about we go and save the night
Let's save the night

I see the night flashing before her eyes
Resuscitating bring it back to life

And it's on tonight
How about we go and save the night
I can see you want it and so do I
How about we go and save the night
Let's save the night

Oh, let's save the night
Let's save the night

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/John Legend/AUTHOR	NAME/Set Me Free/NAME	"CONTENT/[Verse:]
Late in the evening
City sleeping
All through the night
This feeling's creeping on me
So ready

Soul is waiting
Body's aching
Caught and imprisoned
My own making
I'm so, so ready
I'm so gone, come get me
Won't you come?

[Chorus:]
Set me free
Make me yours again
(Free)
In your arms again
(Free)
Won't you come and dance with me

[Verse 2:]
Throw out the lifeline
I've been sinking
Going out of my mind
I've been thinking
If I could hold her
Make this storm blow over

Give me a taste of satisfaction
Oh, I need to learn her
I need her faster
I'm so wide open
Won't you come right over?
Won't you come?

[Chorus:]
Set me free
Make me yours again
(Free)
In your arms again
(Free)
Won't you come and dance with me

(Bridge x2)
I've been looking for a light
Let it shine
Let it shine
You've been running through my mind
All this time
All this time

[Outro:]
Set me free
Free...
I feel like...
Oh, to be free...

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/John Legend/AUTHOR	NAME/She Don't Have To Know/NAME	"CONTENT/Oohhhhhhh stealing moments just to be with you
Though its wrong its hard to tell the truth
But she don't have to know
She don't have to know

When I meet cha
I got my shades on to cover up my eyes
I'm hoping that nobody sees me passing by
Through my disguise
I still know you recognize

But you
I know you got a lil secret of your own
Sneaking out with me while your mans at home
You know your wrong
But its so strong still carrying on

I go
To the other side of town so I
Will never risk the chance of catching her eye
'Cause she don't have to know
She don't have to know
Ooohhhh
Girl I know your doing the same thing too
But I won't tell your man the things we do oh no
'Cause he don't have to know
He don't have to know

Someone's watching
We got to be careful next time or we're through
( creeping creeping)
Damn it's so stressful doing the dirt we do
So sad but true
And I know one day
I'm going to pay

Then you ask me
To sneak out of town for just a day or three
(One, two, three)
Go to D.C. and hold hands publicly
All through the streets
Cause they don't know you and they don't know me

Ohhhhhh
Ill feel sorry for mistake we've made
But there's no reason that we should tell her today
Ohhhhh
Though you give a lot of love to me
Girl I know I'm not the only one you see
But he don't have to know
He don't have to know

Oh my its getting crazy
I don't want to hurt my baby
And I know its supposed to be the last time for you and I

But let's not end this way
Wait another day

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/John Legend/AUTHOR	NAME/Shine/NAME	"CONTENT/They wait to plead their case, unknown cast aside.
I love to see their face, can we spare the light?
Are we afraid to see the prisoners of history?
These beautiful minds, trapped inside.
Bring them back to life.

Let 'em shine.
Let 'em shine on.
Let 'em shine.
Let 'em shine on.

So dark, but I see sparks, if we don't snuff them out.
We gotta light them flame, let them speak their name.
Let them reach up to the clouds.
Can't eat if we don't feed them.
Can't read if we don't teach them.
There's no line if we just hide them.
Don't just let 'em die.

Let 'em shine.
Let 'em shine on.
Let 'em shine.
Let 'em shine on.
Let 'em shine.
Let 'em shine on.

Oh stars flicker in the distance, lonely out in space.
They sing out when we're not listening, because we don't see their face.
We can let them die, we can make them high.
Hold the little miracles that live inside.
Let 'em shine.

Let 'em shine.
Let 'em shine on.
Let 'em live.
Let 'em shine on.
Let 'em read on.
Let 'em shine on.
Let 'em grow.
Let 'em shine on.
Come on, let them love.
Come on, let them love.
Come on, let them love.
Yeah.
Yeah (let them love)

Hold them close, let them know they'll get through the night
Ordinary people could be a hero, don't blow out the light.
Let 'em shine.
Let 'em shine on.
Let 'em shine.
Let 'em shine on.
Yeah, yeah, yeah.
Let them shine on.

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/John Legend/AUTHOR	NAME/Show Me/NAME	"CONTENT/Oh... oh...
I realize as I lay down to sleep, we haven't spoke in weeks
So many things that I'd like to know...
Come have a talk with me
I need a sign, something I can see
Why all the mystery?
I try not to fall for make-believe, but what is reality?

Where do we go, what do we know?
Life has to have a meaning
Show me the light, show me the way
Show that you're listening
Show me, that you love me
Show me that you walk with me
Hopefully, just above me, heaven's watchin over me

Guess it's funny how I say thanks to you for all you've given me
Sometimes the price of what you gave to me,
I can't stop questioning
Oh God of love, peace, and mercy, why so much suffering?
I pray for the world, it gets worse to me
Wonder if you're listening...

When people go, why do they go?
Why don't you choose me?
But someday I'll know that I'm gonna go
I hope you're waiting for me

Show me that you love me
Show nme that you walk with me
Hopefully, just above me, heaven's watching over me
Oh...

Show me... Oh... Oh... Show me...

Maybe we'll talk some other night
Right now I'll take it easy
Won't spend my time waiting to die
Enjoy the life I'm living

Show me that you love me
Show me that you walk with me
Hopefully, just above me, heaven's watching over me
Oh...

Show me that you love me
Show me that you walk with me
Hopefully, just above me, heaven's watching over me
Oh...

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/John Legend/AUTHOR	NAME/Sin City/NAME	"CONTENT/10 a.m. it's west side bitch
She see the glasses, so obvious
Run from home, after tonight we up out of here
Don't go home 'cause they just ran me up out of there
All of those drunken nights then fuckin' every night
She run her mouth, but can't eat right
Don't read between the line and figure out how to be white
She smelled the line, baby you know you don't need white
Now look what we did now, the cops behind us
Ran that red light, did you have to be mindless? SMH,
We all know that cocaine killed Abel
From the scholar letters devour this
She stepped into hell, 'cause winter got cold
Don't look in her eyes, you might see straight to her soul
Don't say yes to that good, cause you'll never know
'Cause we lost in the city where sin is no biggy

I'm here with open arms and I got her
Here is where her heart belongs, her heart belongs with me
Here is where her heart
I'm here and I won't go without her
This is where her heart belongs it should be here with me
Here is where her heart

I beg for mercy today
They won't take me away
Take me away from you
Don't know what I would do
Don't let us die in vain
Don't let them see our pain
Wash these demons away
Wash these demons away

You are all unwelcome to Sin City
Yet the population still increases its density
And that increases its intensity
Which increases the propensity
To complicate your simplicity
No matter your ethnicity
All for the sake of publicity, in this city

Huh, bad bitches with ass shots
Use a house as a stash spot
Lexus coupe with the rag-top
I'm in the loop, warm tie like a ascot
I used to run with the have-nots
Kept the ave' hot just so we could have knots
A lot of niggas see they dreams in a glass pot
Until the judge throw you in that box and watch your ass rot
We broke all the commandments
Authentic, I'm hand-stitched
Come spend a day in my Hamlet
My city lost, some say it's Atlantis
I went to Cannes with a tan bitch, Francis
She rode the broom on the beach, that's a sand witch
So I ate her like it, haters hate to like it
Sex, drugs, and playin' dices, those are our favorite vices
But this life'll take a toll on ya
Well I guess you gotta pay the prices
I know who Christ is
And he never hung with the Saints it makes no sense to save the righteous
By the age ten, we were caged in
Now they raise men in the state pen
Fake friends, forgive 'em for they sins
God bless the city, amen

I'm here with open arms and I got her
Here is where her heart belongs her heart belongs with me
Here is where her heart
I'm here and I won't go without her
This is where her heart belongs it should be here with me

And now I'm one of the residents
They walk with none of the repercuss', but all of the decadence
And all the fuckin' debauchery
Adult film star, somebody's fuckin' watchin' me
I always feel like, I'm almost Phil like
'Cause I could feel it in the air tonight
I did some wrongs I wouldn't dare to right
And wrote some songs I wouldn't dare recite
But I am willing to share tonight
In the city that is as unfair as life

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/John Legend/AUTHOR	NAME/Slow Dance/NAME	"CONTENT/Yea, sing it with me y'all, oh yea yea

Can we wait just a minute
Slow it down for a minute now baby
Your talkin' loud
Your wilding out
Don't seem like my old lady
Lets go and play the song we used to play
Can we reignite the flame
Cause things just ain't the same

We can talk about the baby
We can talk until we're crazy
We can focus on it now
Or we can focus on it later
We can start another fight
We can argue and fuss all night
But I propose that we go to floor and we slow dance

Tonight I wanna dance
Can you do that with you man yea
Tonight I wanna groove
And let the music make you move
Move yea

Can we wait just a minute
Turn that TV off for a minute
Now politics and talkin' shit ain't really none of my business
Lets go and play the songs we used to play
On that old school radio
Let the music soothe your soul

Forget about the world
I'm groovin' with my girl
Forget about the news
Lets put on our dancin' shoes
Lets not talk about the war
Do we know what they fightin' for
I propose that we go to the floor and we slow dance

Tonight I wanna dance
Can you do that with you man yea
Tonight I wanna groove
And let the music make you move
Move yea yea
Move yea yea

I love it
I love it
I love it we're slow dancin' together
I love it
I love it
I love it we're slow dancin' together
I love it
I love it
I love it we're slow dancin' together
I love it
I love it I propose that we go to floor and we slow dance

Tonight I wanna dance
Can you do that with your man yea
Tonight I wanna groove
Let the music make you move

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/John Legend/AUTHOR	NAME/So Gone/NAME	"CONTENT/I'm a do my thing
I'm a do, I'm a do, I'm a do my thing

I was born at the end of december
Not afraid that the cold of the winter
Would keep me inside, hey
Ever since mama left me at home
I had to search for a class of my own
And go there in my mind

I had a dream like dr. King
I had a song I had to sing
And I knew it wasn't make believe
When the teacher said to me
Baby, who do you wanna be
Said I don't know but I know that I'm a gonna leave

I'm so gone (just you)
All I do is walk alone (just me)
I'm so gone (just you)
I can make it on my own (just me)
Alright

Everybody wanna follow the crowd
But I belong in the front singing loud
And I'll go solo, hey
But the fame is a hell of a temptress
Not my wife but I guess she's a mistress, oh
Can I let her go

She can play tricks on your mind
Have you leave your soul behind
She's turned some niggas out
But she can't keep her spell on me
She can't keep back mailing me
I'm free to leave, to be just me

I'm so gone (just you)
All I do is walk alone (just me)
I'm so gone (just you)
I can make it on my own (just me)

So many (so many people tryna be somebody else)
Tryna be somebody else (or whatever sells)
I've got my own lane (I've got my own lane, I'm driving by myself)
Hope you wish my well

I'm so gone (just you)
All I do is walk alone (just me)
I'm so gone (just you)
I can make it on my own (just me)

I'm so gone (just you)
All I do is walk alone (just me)
I'm so gone (just you)
I can make it on my own (just me)

If I fall then let me fall, yea yea yea
Oh cause I only got myself to blame
Oh it's just me
All I do is walk alone

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/John Legend/AUTHOR	NAME/So High/NAME	"CONTENT/Baby since the day you came into my life
You made me realize that we were born to fly
You showed me everyday new possibilities
You proved my fantasies of love could really be

Let's go to a place only lovers go
To a spot that we've never known
To the top of the clouds we're floating away yeah
Ooh this feels so crazy
Oh this love is blazing
Baby we're so high
Walking on cloud nine

(You've got me up so high) So high
(My shoes are scraping the sky) So high
(You've got me up so high) Oh
(My shoes are scraping the sky)

Maybe later we can go up to the moon
Or sail among the stars before the night is through
And when morning comes we'll see the sun is not so far
And we can't get much closer to God than where we are

We'll go to a place only lovers go
To a spot that we've never known
To the top of the clouds we're floating away yeah
Ooh this feels so crazy
Oh this love is blazing
Baby we're so high
Walking on cloud nine

(You've got me up so high) So high
(My shoes are scraping the sky) So high
(You've got me up so high) Oh
(My shoes are scraping the sky)

Ooh yeah
Ooh oh hey

Ooh this feels so crazy
Oh this love is blazin'
Baby we're so high
Walking on cloud nine
You got me up so high
You got me up so high
You got me up so high
My shoes are scraping the sky

You got me up so high
You got me up so high
You got me up so high
My shoes are scraping the sky ooh ooh
Yeah?

This is how love's supposed to be
This is how, this is how love's supposed to be, yeah
Let's go to the moon baby, ooh
Let's go to the moon baby, yeah
Let's go, go, let's go to the moon baby
So high?

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/John Legend/AUTHOR	NAME/Someday/NAME	"CONTENT/As days go by and fade to nights
I still question why you left
I wonder how it didn't work out
But now you're gone
And memories all I have for now

But no, it's not over
We'll get older, we'll get over
We'll live to see the day that I hope for
Come back to me

I still believe that we'll get it right again
We'll come back to life again
We won't say another goodbye again
You'll live forever with me

Someday, someday
We'll be together
Someday, someday
We'll be together

I heard someday might be today
Mysteries of destinies
They are somehow and are someway

For all we know they come tomorrow
For today my eyes are open
My arms are raised for your embrace
My hands are here to mend what is broken

To feel again the warmth of your face
I believe there is more to life
Oh, I love you much more than life itself
I believe I can change your mind
Revive what is dying inside

And someday, someday
We'll be together
Someday, someday
We'll be together

Someday, someday
We'll be together
We'll be together
We'll be together someday

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/John Legend/AUTHOR	NAME/Soul Joint/NAME	"CONTENT/Yall know Soul Joint? I got soul. Yall know that song
We about to do that

It all began rockin with the church band when I was 5 years old
Now I could see that the music was in me and that I had plenty of soul
So I stayed up every night workin on my flow
Waitin for the chance to show
The ruckess that I bring when I get to do my thing
Now I'm here to let yall know

That I got soul
(soul)
Yes I got Soul
(soul)
I know I got Soul
(soul)
You know I got Soul
(soul)

Everybody here trying to find out what the deal
And wonderin if I turn it out
Well I'm here to show you that I'm donin this for real
And I'm making sure there is no doubt
And so I hitcha with a high
And I hitcha with a low
Have you comin back for more
I love the Funkiness I bring everytime I do my thing
And now I'm here to let yall know

That I got soul
(soul)
I guess I got soul
(soul)
I know I got Soul
(soul)
And yes I got Soul
(soul)
And I came to rock the show
(show)
I came to get my dough
(dough)
As soon as I hit the door
(door)
You know I got soul
(soul)

Hay
And if you thinkin you should leave
And it's gettin toward the end of the night
(hold tight)
(yea)
And if you got some where to be
But you hear a lil' somethin you like
Stay right here I'm gonna rock you till the mornin light
(all night)
And forget about your troubles 'cause I'm gonna make you feel alright

And yea I got soul
(soul)
You kno I got soul
(soul)
Oh I got soul
(soul)
Yes I got soul
(soul)
And I came to rock the show
(show)
As soon as I hit the door
(Door)
I came to let yall kno that I got soul

Hay
And if you thinkin you should leave
And it's gettin toward the end of the night
(hold tight)
(yea)
And if you got some where to be
But you hear a lil' somethin you like
(hold tight)
Stay right here I'm gonna rock you till the mornin light
(all night)
And forget about your troubles 'cause I'm gonna make you feel alright

And I got soul
(soul)
Yes I got soul
(soul)
You kno I got soul
(soul)
Yes I got soul
(soul)
And I was rockin shows back in 84'
(84')
And I'm here to let yall know
(know)
That I got.............
Soul

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/John Legend/AUTHOR	NAME/Stay With You/NAME	"CONTENT/We've been together for a while now
We're growing stronger everyday now
It feels so good and there's no doubt
I will stay with you as each morning brings sunrise
And the flowers bloom in springtime
On my love you can rely
And I'll stay with you

Oh I'll stay with you through the ups and the downs
Oh I'll stay with you when no one else is around
And when the dark clouds arise
I will stay by your side
I know we'll be alright
I will stay with you

Though relationships can get old
They had a tendency to grow cold
We have something like miracle
Yeah, I'll stay with you

Oh I'll stay with you through the ups and the downs
Oh I'll stay with you when no one else is around
And when the dark clouds arise
I will stay by your side
I know we'll be alright
I will stay with you

And there will be heartaches and pains, yes it will
But through it all, we will remain
In this life, we all know
Friends may come, they may go
Through the years I know
I will stay
And in the end I know that we'll find
Love so beautiful and divine
We'll be lovers for a lifetime, yeah
And I'll stay with you
I will stay with you

Oh I'll stay with you through the ups and the downs
Oh I'll stay with you when no one else is around
And when the dark clouds arise
I will stay by your side
I know we'll be alright
I will stay with you
Everything will be fine
And I will stay with you
Through the end of time
I will stay with you

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/John Legend/AUTHOR	NAME/Stereo/NAME	"CONTENT/She's a fast love professional
Crafty, bold and beautiful
Stage right, locked eyes, I swear it's magical
Her name is Melanie, says she digs my melody
Likes how I move, thinks I'm cool, that's what she says to me
Big stage, bright light, short love, long night
Frequent flies through the skies to some stars
I come back to town, she's hangin' around
But still feels so real but it can't go too far

Her favorite colors be platinum and gold!
She only loves in stereo! she only loves in stereo!
I should know 'cause I've seen it before
I think I gotta let her go, she only loves in stereo!
Ohhh ohhhhhh, ohhhh ohhh...
Ohhh ohhhhhh, ohhhh ohhh...

Turn on the video, oh my goodness there she goes
Now I'm hot, seems I'm not, the only one she knows
Name dropping everyday, I still want her anyway...
I like how she moves, think she's cool.. my favorite get away

Big stage, bright light, short love, long night
Deja vu yeh we'll do it again, off the next town
She's onto the next round
Let it go, we both know that its all gonna end oh

Her favorite colors be platinum and gold!
She only loves in stereo! she only loves in stereo!
I should know cause I've seen it before
I think I gotta let her go, she only loves in stereo!
Ohhh ohhhhhh, ohhhh ohhh...
Ohhh ohhhhhh, ohhhh ohhh...

Ohhh ohhhhhh, ohhhh ohhh...
Ohhh ohhhhhh, ohhhh ohhh...

She fell in love with the radio
Wasn't really me, so I had to let her go
Just ask any DJ back in her hotel
She likes to get around
As much as she gets down

Her favorite colors be platinum and gold!
She only loves in stereo! she only loves in stereo!
I should know cause I've seen it before
I think I gotta let her go, she only loves in stereo!
Ohhh ohhhhhh, ohhhh ohhh...
She loves in stereo
Think I gotta let her
Ohhh ohhhhhh, ohhhh ohhh...
She loves in stereo
Think I gotta let her
Ohhh ohhhhhh, ohhhh ohhh...
She loves in stereo
Ohhh ohhhhhh, ohhhh ohhh...
She loves in stereo
Oh, oh oh, oh oh!

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/John Legend/AUTHOR	NAME/Sun Comes Up/NAME	"CONTENT/Yeah Yeah Yeah
Yeah Yeah Yeah
WoooYeah

I know you think I'm like the the other man, you let him in and he breaks your
heart again
But this things more than physical I'll free your mind and I'll bless your
soul
Tonight we're gonna loose track of time body and spirit will intertwine and
you'll stay here the rest of the night and

Chorus:
Baby when the sun comes up, I'm gonna be holding you
It's just a need that your next to me, I'm in love with you
Oh and baby when I wake up, I'm gonna be there with you, a new day rise I want
to look in your eyes when he sun comes up

Verse 2:
Wait a minute baby I'm not through I intend to spend more than one night with
you
A love affair that never ends like the old song saids ""lets do it again""
Come with me I know you'll stay you'll wake up in the morning to a brand new
day
You'll begin the rest of you'll life and baby

Chorus:
Baby when the sun comes up, I'm gonna be holding you
It's just a need that your next to me, I'm in love with you
Oh and baby when I wake up, I'm gonna be there with you, a new day rise I want
to look in your eyes when he sun comes up

Verse 3:
When the morning breaks I'll awake and then I won't want you to go
And when your gone I'll hold on to the memory all day
And baby when the sun comes up yeah yeah yeah
So listen here now I know you've been hurt by the one before I know your pain
And I know you never thought you could love again but I know the way yeah yeah
And I know about your circumstance but love is here at a 2nd chance so take my
hand and follow me you'll never want to leave

Adlibbing:
You'll still be here oh yeah when the sun comes up
You'll still be here in the morning when the sun comes up
Yeah yeah oh yeah when the sun comes up
Yeah eh eh eh oh yeah when the sun comes up
In the morning when I rise I want to look into your eyes yeah when the sun
Oh oh oh oh when the sun comes up
Yeah .... when the sun comes up
Yeah yeah when the sun comes up
Yeah yeah eh o o when the sun comes up
Ooo when the sun comes up
Baby when the sun comes up

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/John Legend/AUTHOR	NAME/Surefire/NAME	"CONTENT/[Verse 1]
Can you just stay through the night?
Turn down the bed and the blinds
Before your turn around
Can you just stay through the night?
Let me breathe you in 'til gravity bends
And we fall through the hole in the light
Make this our kingdom
Somewhere where good love conquers and not divide

[Chorus]
Cause I may not know a lot of things but
I feel it in my chest
Know I won't let the blue flame die
We can't lose hope just yet
'Cause it's once, just once in a lifetime
And we're scared to love but it's alright
I may not know a lot of things but
I know that we're surefire, yeah
Know that we're surefire, yeah

[Verse 2]
Can't keep this bed warm on the left side
When something is cold as a goodbye
Why don't you turn around?
Ignore all that shit from the outside
The world is a nightmare
Wake up and stay here
Let me be on your side
We'll make this our kingdom
Somewhere where good love conquers and not divide

[Pre-Chorus]
And oh my, oh my, oh my, oh my God
I'm so, I'm so, I'm so tired of fighting
Let go, give in, let go and give up, oh

[Chorus]
I may not know a lot of things but
I feel it in my chest
Know I won't let the blue flame die
We can't lose hope just yet
'Cause it's once, just once in a lifetime
And we're scared to love but it's alright
I may not know a lot of things but
I know that we're surefire
Know that we're surefire

[Pre-Chorus]
And oh my, oh my, oh my, oh my God
I'm so, I'm so, I'm so tired of fighting
Let go, give in, let go and give up, oh

[Chorus]
I may not know a lot of things but
I feel it in my chest
If we just let the blue flame die
The devil wins this bet
Oh it's once, just once in a lifetime
And you're scared to love but it's alright
I may not know a lot of things but
I know that we're surefire
Know that we're surefire

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/John Legend/AUTHOR	NAME/Take Me Away/NAME	"CONTENT/Yeah, yeah

We danced and sing, somewhere in between heaven and hell
Gabrielle, that was her name
Everyone was smiling, even through their tears, under her spell
But in Gabrielle's eyes, nothing
I asked, ""Do you not like the music?""
She said, ""It's alright""
But she dances to her own side
So she says,

[Chorus]
Take me away from here
Take me somewhere, where love is like breathing
I don't care where we go as long as I'm there with you, baby

Long as I'm there with you

I could tell, she's been through pain I could only dream
Nightmares live where you live
Tears were in her eyes, but she wouldn't let them fall
I get the world to know a her smile is
I asked, ""Do you dance with me now?""
Let me try to figure out
The fastest round out of town
And she says,

[Chorus]

Oh oh yeah yeah yeah
I got a full tank of gas
Anywhere you wanna go, girl
All you have to do is ask girl
Oh, she said,

[Chorus: x2]

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/John Legend/AUTHOR	NAME/Temporarily Painless/NAME	"CONTENT/[Verse 1]
We don't have to explain it
The beat is way too loud
Even though the lights faded
I still saw you in the crowd
When I put you in my arm
Feel it all through me
When you promise me nothing
You give me everything I need

[Pre-Chorus]
She comes over
We're both not sober
It's like we're losing our minds
We kiss like lovers
And Cupid hovers
Like he's just learning to fly
And even though it's dangerous
It's temporarily painless
I'm falling for a stranger, stranger

[Chorus]
No need to justify
Little by little we love tonight
I need somebody
You need somebody too
No need to justify
All I wanna be is your friend tonight
I need somebody
You need somebody too
I need somebody
You need somebody too
I need somebody

[Verse 2]
Don't even know what your name is
When I taste your skin
I don't wanna sound shameless
I just wanna bring your body
Wanna push you in my place
Either hear you scream
You don't even have to stay
Oh but I don't think you wanna leave

[Pre-Chorus]
She comes over
We're both not sober
It's like we're losing our minds
We kiss like lovers
And Cupid hovers
Like he's just learning to fly
And even though it's dangerous
It's temporarily painless
I'm falling for a stranger, stranger

[Chorus]
No need to justify
Little by little we love tonight
I need somebody
You need somebody too
No need to justify
All I wanna be is your friend tonight
I need somebody
You need somebody too
I need somebody

[Bridge]
And even though it's dangerous
It's temporarily painless
I'm falling for a stranger, stranger
Even though it's dangerous
It's temporarily painless
I'm falling for a stranger, stranger

[Chorus]
No need to justify
Little by little we love tonight
I need somebody
You need somebody too
No need to justify
All I wanna be is your friend tonight
I need somebody
You need somebody too
I need somebody
You need somebody too
I need somebody
You need somebody too

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/John Legend/AUTHOR	NAME/Under The Stars/NAME	"CONTENT/[Intro]

[Chorus]
Here we are, under the stars
Here we are, under the stars
Heaven is not so far
Heaven is not so far
Heaven is not so far
Under the stars

[Verse 1]
We'll find a love to hold our hand through the cold
We'll find an angel lying out in the snow
We'll see a light to lead us all the way home and
Wherever we go, we will know

[Chorus]
Here we are, under the stars
Here we are, under the stars
Heaven is not so far
Heaven is not so far
Heaven is not so far
Under the stars

[Verse 2]
Let's raise a toast for all the good days to come
Let's celebrate the season, come everyone
Let's save a kiss for us when the night is done
Oh my love, I'll keep you warm

[Chorus]
Here we are, under the stars
Here we are, under the stars
Heaven is not so far
Heaven is not so far
Heaven is not so far
Under the stars

[Bridge]
All the lost and lonely
All the lovers holding on
All of us, no matter what we've done
We are not alone although we're far apart
We are one, under the stars

[Chorus]
Here we are, under the stars
Here we are, under the stars
Heaven is not so far
Heaven is not so far
Heaven is not so far
Under the stars

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/John Legend/AUTHOR	NAME/What You Do To Me/NAME	"CONTENT/[Verse 1]
Go from zero to a hundred and up it crazy
Don't believe it when you say that you fuckin' hate me, no
Use your tongue to crucify me, you motivate me, oh I
Throwing down when it ends up with your legs around me
Your legs around me, oh
I rise, you fall, we wreck it all
My pride is at your beck and call

[Chorus]
That's what you do to me
That's what you do to me
That's what you do to me
That's what you do to me
That's what you do, you always do me right
Screaming through the night
Make me love and hate you at the same time
That's what you do to me
That's what you do to me, yeah
That's what you do, you watch me lose my mind
Make me feel like I...
I would die if you were out of my life
That's what you do to me

[Verse 2]
I could stop, I could leave, but no, I don't wanna
It's a mess I'm obsessed with your kind of torture
It's my kind of torture
Oh, I rise, you fall, we wreck it all
You kill me with every kiss and don't you know...

[Chorus]
That's what you do to me
That's what you do to me
That's what you do to me
That's what you do to me
That's what you do, you always do me right
Screaming through the night
Make me love and hate you at the same time
That's what you do to me
That's what you do to me, yeah
That's what you do, you watch me lose my mind
Make me feel like I...
I would die if you were out of my life
That's what you do to me

[Bridge]
I don't know how you take control of me baby
I don't know how you got a hold

[Chorus]
That's what you do to me
That's what you do to me
That's what you do, you always do me right
Screaming through the night
Make me love and hate you at the same time
That's what you do to me
That's what you do, you always do me right
Screaming through the night
(Yeah, that's what you do to me)
Make me love and hate you at....
That's what you do to me, yeah
That's what you do, you watch me lose my mind
Make me feel like I...
I would die if you were out of my life
That's what you do to me
What you do to me
That's what you do to me
What you do to me
Oh, that's what you do, you always do me right
Screaming through the night
Make me love and hate you at the same time, at the same time, at the same time
That's what you do to me
What you do to me
That's what you do to me
That's what you do to me
That's what you do, you watch me lose my mind
Make me feel like I...
I would die if you were out of my life
That's what you do to me

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/John Legend/AUTHOR	NAME/Who Do We Think We Are/NAME	"CONTENT/Who do we think we are?
Baby, tell me, who do we think we are?

We can't run out of magic
It's the only way we know
Let's trip the night fantastic
Light it up 'til we both explode
We love, we love, we love the stars
We could fall so hard
The drinks, the minks, the jewels, the house, the cars
Why'd we ball so hard?
Yeah, and I, I'm not afraid to fly
Here we are, in the air, barely breathing
And we're not afraid to die

Who do we think we are?
Baby, tell me, who do we think we are?
Who do we think we are?
Baby, tell me, who do we think we are?

We've got a lot of nerve, girl
We walk around here like we own this place

See my jewels dripping on my Timberlands
Stepping like a criminal, success is so imminent
Pink champagne, black Rolls Royce
Eggplant double-breasted suit from Tom Ford
Bon voyage, left haters in the fog
Look up in the sky, bet you recognize a boss
Look into my eyes as I fantasize for us
Still actin' shy like this is summer class crush
Money comin' fast, I'm never in a rush, no
Plus another twenty in a tuck
Semi in a truck, another forty on the wrist
Quarter-mill on my mind got me livin' like I pitch
Dodging Robin Givens, boiling like I'm Roger Clemens
Still in the game, uniform all linen
She get Chanel, ski trips to Vail
Only the highest grade, like trees that I inhale

And I, I'm not afraid to fly
Here we are, in the air, barely breathing
And we're not afraid to die
Who do we think we are?
Baby, tell me, who do we think we are?
Who do we think we are?
Oh baby, tell me, who do we think we are?

Who do we think we are?
I don't know about y'all, but I feel good tonight
There's something in the air tonight
You know, everyone needs someone to look up to
Why shouldn't it be us?
Who do we think we are?
Tell me, who do we think we are?
Who do we think we are?
Tell me, who do we think we are?

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Fall Out Boy/AUTHOR	NAME/7 Minutes In Heaven/NAME	"CONTENT/I'm sleeping my way out of this one
With anyone who will lie down
I'll be stuck fixated on one star
When the world is crashing down

I keep telling myself
I keep telling myself
I'm not the desperate type
But you've got me looking in through blinds
I keep telling myself
I keep telling myself
I'm not the desperate type

Sitting out dances on the wall
Trying to forget everything that isn't you
I'm not going home alone
Cause I don't do too well
Sitting out dances on the wall
Trying to forget everything that isn't you
I'm not going home alone
Cause I don't do too well on my own

The only thing worse that not knowing
Is you think that I don't know
I'm having another episode
I just need a stronger dose

I keep telling myself
I keep telling myself
I'm not the desperate type
But you've got me looking in through blinds
I keep telling myself
I keep telling myself
I'm not the desperate type

Sitting out dances on the wall
Trying to forget everything that isn't you
I'm not going home alone
Cause I don't do too well
Sitting out dances on the wall
Trying to forget everything that isn't you
I'm not going home alone
Cause I don't do too well on my own

Da da da da da da
Dadadada
Da da da da da da
Dadadada
Da da da da da da
Dadadadada
Do do do do do do

Da da da da da da
Dadadada
Da da da da da da
Dadadada
Da da da da da da
Dadadadada
Do do do do do do

I keep telling myself
I keep telling myself
I'm not the desperate type
But you got me looking in through blinds

I keep telling myself
I keep telling myself
I'm not the desperate type

Sitting out dances on the wall
I'm trying to forget everything that isn't you
I'm not going home alone
Cause I don't do to well on my own

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Fall Out Boy/AUTHOR	NAME/Alphadog/NAME	"CONTENT/Clap until your hands hurt,
Standing ovations or boo-boo-boos
Wa-wa-watch us until we blur,
Walk off into the sunset
Tell Rock'n'Roll I'm alone again
I wanna put the midwest home again
Your time has passed
They say never means never
So the fast dance won't last,
But never means forever
Never means forever

ALPHAdog and oh, oh OMEGAlomaniac
Eh, eh, eh-eh, eh, eh
ALPHAdog and oh oh OMEGA-MEGA-lo
Welcome to the new deja vu
I can almost see the wizard through the curtains
ALPHAdog and oh, oh OMEGAlomaniac

We must have the best coach
Tell the best jokes
We must make it hard to
Look so easy doing something so hard
Like you must see my way
They scream when they look at me
I'm a, I'm a star
I'm a, I'm a star
I'm a star, Ohh, I'm a star

ALPHAdog and oh, OMEGAlomaniac
Eh, eh, eh-eh, eh, eh
ALPHAdog and oh OMEGA-MEGA-lo
Welcome to the new deja vu
I can almost see the wizard through the curtains
ALPHAdog and oh, OMEGAlomaniac

You're not the first
Or the last but you're possibly the prettiest
Whoa

He's a fighter past his prime
He's in the gutter waving his hand
I'm just fine

You're not the first
Or the last but you're possibly the prettiest
Whoa

He's a fighter past his prime
He's in the gutter waving his hand

ALPHAdog and oh, oh OMEGAlomaniac
Eh, eh, eh-eh, eh, eh
ALPHAdog and oh, oh OMEGA-MEGA-lo
Welcome to the new deja vu
I can almost see the wizard through the curtains
ALPHAdog and oh, oh OMEGAlomaniac

(whoaa, ohh, whoaa)
Abracadabra
(whoaa, ohh, whoaa)

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Fall Out Boy/AUTHOR	NAME/Golden/NAME	"CONTENT/How cruel is the golden rule
When the lives we lived are only golden plated?
And I knew that the lights of the city were too heavy for me
And though I carry karats for everyone to see

And I saw God cry in the reflection of my enemies
And all the lovers with no time for me
And all of the mothers raise their babies
To stay away from me

Tongues on the sockets of electric dreams
Where the sewage of youth drowned the spark of my teens
And I knew that the lights of the city were too heavy for me
And though I carry karats for everyone to see

And I saw God cry in the reflection of my enemies
And all the lovers with no time for me
And all of the mothers raise their babies
To stay away from me
And pray they don't grow up to be

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Fall Out Boy/AUTHOR	NAME/Grenade Jumper/NAME	"CONTENT/My heart ticks in beat with
These kids that I grew up with
Living like life's going out of style
And you came to watch us play
Like a big shot talent
But at the end of the day you know
Where we came from and where we call home

Hey Chris, you were our only friend
And I know this is belated, we love you back

They'll say it's not worth
So we'll leave this town in ruins
Living like life's going out of style
And you came to watch us play
Like a big shot talent
But at the end of the day you know
These busted lips we take back home

Hey Chris, you were our only friend
And I know this is belated, we love you back

I know you would be there either way
I'm so glad it seems like these time will never fade

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Fall Out Boy/AUTHOR	NAME/Homesick At Space Camp/NAME	"CONTENT/Landing on a runway in Chicago and I'm grounding all my dreams of ever really
seeing California, because I know what's in between is something sensual in
such non-conventional ways.

Tonight the headphones will deliver you the words that I can't say.
Tonight I'm writing you a million miles away.
Tonight is all about ""We miss you.""

And I can't forget your style or your cynicism,
Somehow it was like you were the first to listen to everything we said.
My smile's an open wound without you...and my hands are tied to pages inked to
bring you back.

These friends are, new friends are golden.

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Fall Out Boy/AUTHOR	NAME/Hum Hallelujah/NAME	"CONTENT/It's all a game of this or that
Now verses then
Better off against
Worse for wear
And you're someone
Who knows someone who knows someone I once knew
And I just want to be a part of this

The road outside my house
Is paved with good intentions
Hired a construction crew
'Cause it's hell on the engine
And you are the dreamer
And we are the dream
I could write it better than you ever felt it

[Chorus:]
So hum hallelujah
Just off the key of reason
I thought I loved you
But it's just how you looked in the light
A teenage vow in a parking lot
Till tonight do us part
I sing the blues and swallow them too

My words are my faith
To hell with our good name
A remix up your guts
Your insides x-rayed
And one day we'll get nostalgic for disaster
We're a bull
Your ears are just a china shop

I love you in the same way
There's a chapel in a hospital
One foot in your bedroom
And one foot out the door
Sometimes we take chances
Sometimes we take pills
I could write it better than you ever felt it

[Chorus]

Hallelujah, hallelujah, hallelujah, hallelu... (hum hallelujah)
Hallelujah, hallelujah, hallelujah, hallelu... (hum hallelujah)

A teenage vow in a parking lot
Till tonight do us part
I sing the blues
And swallow them too

So, hum hallelujah
Just off the key of reason
I thought I loved you
It's just how you looked in the light
A teenage vow in a parking lot
Till tonight do us part
A teenage love in a parking lot
Till tonight do us part
A teenage vow in a parking lot
Till tonight do us part
I sing the blues and swallow them too

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Fall Out Boy/AUTHOR	NAME/Our Lawyer Made Us Change The Name Of This Song So We Wouldn't Get Sued/NAME	"CONTENT/Brothers and sisters put this record down
Take my advice ('cause we are bad news)
We will leave you high and dry
It's not worth the hearing you'll lose

It's just past 8 and I'm feeling young and reckless
The ribbon on my wrist says, ""Do not open before Christmas.""

We're only liars, but we're the best (we're the best)
We're only good for the latest trends
We're only good cause you can have almost famous friends
Besides, we've got such good fashion sense

Brothers and sisters, yeah, put these words down
Into your notebook (spit lines like these)
We're friends when you're on your knees
Make them dance like we were shooting their feet

It's just past 8 and I'm feeling young and reckless
The ribbon on my wrist says, ""Do not open before Christmas.""

We're only liars, but we're the best (we're the best)
We're only good for the latest trends
We're only good cause you can have almost famous friends
Besides, we've got such good fashion sense

We're only liars, but we're the best
We're only good for the latest trends

We're only liars, but we're the best
We're only good for the latest trends
We're only good cause you can have almost famous friends
Besides, we've got such good fashion sense

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Fall Out Boy/AUTHOR	NAME/Pretty In Punk/NAME	"CONTENT/Walking off that stage tonight
I know what you're thinking
And he stands alone, because he's high on himself
But if you only knew
I was terrified and would you mind if I sat next to you
And watched you smile
So many kids but I only see you
And I don't think you notice me
Well I've seen your boyfriend and I don't think he treats you right,
But that's none of my business is it?
I'm not the way you think I am
The only girl who ever gave me the time
Was the one who only wanted five minutes of mine
Knocking boots in the back, how degrading is that?
I decline.

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Fall Out Boy/AUTHOR	NAME/Sending Postcards From A Plane Crash/NAME	"CONTENT/I am such a sucker
And I'm always the last to know
My insides are copper
And I'd kill to make them gold

Conversation got me here: another night alone in the city
So make my bed the grave and shovel dirt onto my sheets

Every friend we ever had in common
I will sever the tie with you
You can thank your lucky stars
That everything I wish for will never come true

When you go, I will forget everything about you

I've seen sinking ships go down with more grace than you
Turn this up I'll tune you out
Another night alone in the city
Thinking that you matter
That's a lie we can both keep

Every friend we ever had in common
I will sever the tie with you
You can thank your lucky stars
That everything I wish for will never come true

When you go, I will forget everything about you

Every friend we ever had in common
I will sever the tie with you
You can thank your lucky stars
That everything I wish for will never come true

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Fall Out Boy/AUTHOR	NAME/Untitled/NAME	"CONTENT/I speak fast and I'm not gonna repeat myself
So listen carefully to every word I say:
""I'm the only one who's gonna get away with making excuses today,

You're appealing to emotions that I simply do not have""
Blackmailed myself
Cause I ain't got anyone else
""This is a stick up
Give us all your inspiration""
I've got the red carpet blues baby

""Put your hands in the air and don't make a sound
But don't get the wrong idea
We're gonna shoot you
We're gonna shoot you
And there's nothing in your head or pocket, throat or wallet
That could change just how this goes
No
We're gonna shoot you
We're gonna shoot you""

When I said that I'd return to you I meant more like a relapse
Now again I think ""His and her's"" ""For better or worse""
But the only ring I want buried with me are the ones around my eyes

""You're appealing to emotions that I simply do not have""
I've got the red carpet blues baby

""Put your hands in the air and don't make a sound
But don't get the wrong idea
We're gonna shoot you
We're gonna shoot you
And there's nothing in your head or pocket, throat or wallet
That could change just how this goes""
And everyone shakes to the beat with a barrel down their throat

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Fall Out Boy/AUTHOR	NAME/Young Volcanoes/NAME	"CONTENT/When Rome's in ruins,
We are the lions free of the coliseums
In poison places, we are empty venom
We're the beginning of the end

Tonight, the foxes hunt the hounds
It's all over now
Before it has begun
We've already won

We are wild
We are like young volcanoes
We are wild
Americana, exotica
Do you wanna feel a little beautiful, baby?

Come on, make it easy, say I never mattered
Run it up the flag pole,
We will teach you how to make boys next door out of assholes

Tonight, the foxes hunt the hounds
And it's all over now
Before it has begun
We've already won

We are wild
We are like young volcanoes
We are wild
Americana, exotica
Do you wanna feel a little beautiful, baby?

We are wild
We are like young volcanoes
We are wild
Americana, exotica
Do you wanna feel a little beautiful, baby?

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Fall Out Boy/AUTHOR	NAME/You're Crashing, But You're No Wave/NAME	"CONTENT/The D.A. is dressed to the nines
In the mirror he practices all his lines
To his closing argument twelve hearts beat in favor
I'm guessing that he read the morning paper
The headline reads: ""The man hangs, but the jury doesn't.""

And everybody's looking for relief
The United States versus disbelief
Mothers cast tears on both sides of the aisle
From face to floor the body falls like bachelors or bad luck girls
Only breathing with the aid of the knife

Case open, case shut
But you could pay to close it like a casket
Baby boy can't lift his headache head
Isn't it tragic?

He glances at his pew seating seven to twelve stacked
On one to six the gallery is hushed
Boys in three pieces dream of girls' daring and bravado
The city streets in a cell not withstanding what we don't know
Hang on the rope of bated breath
Whichever you prefer

And everyone's looking for relief
A bidding war for an old friend's grief
The calls for chick, the calls for charm
Another girl that's not aware but that can make you comprehend
Too well dressed for the witness stand
The best place for whichever headlines run

Case open, case shut
But you could pay to close it like a casket
Baby boy can lift his headache head
Isn't it tragic?

First class suit and tie
I'm desperate
Sing and die
Can talk my way out of anything
The foreman reads the verdict and the above-entitled actions
We find the defendant (guilty)

Case open, case shut
But you could pay to close it like a casket
Baby boy can left his headache head
Isn't it tragic?
Case open, case shut
That you could be the cause of that casket
Baby boy can left his head and he cares
Isn't it tragic?

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Fall Out Boy/AUTHOR	NAME/Yule Shoot Your Eye Out/NAME	"CONTENT/These are your good years
Don't take my advice
You never wanted the nice boys anyway
And I'm of good cheer
Cause I've been checking my list
The gifts you're receiving from me
Will be

One awkward silence
And two hopes you cry yourself to sleep
Staying up, waiting by the phone
And all I want this year is for you to dedicate your last breath to me
Before you bury yourself alive

Don't come home for Christmas
You're the last thing I want to see
Underneath the tree
Merry Christmas, I could care less

Happy new years baby
You owe me the best gift I will ever ask for
Don't call me up, when the snow comes down
It's the only thing I want this year

One awkward silence
And two hopes you cry yourself to sleep
Staying up, waiting by the phone
All I want this year is for you to dedicate your last breathe to me
Before you bury yourself alive

Don't come home for Christmas
You're the last thing I want to see
Underneath the tree
Merry Christmas, I could care less

Don't come home for Christmas
You're the last thing I want to see
Underneath the tree (don't come home for Christmas)
Merry Christmas, I could care less

Don't come home for Christmas
You're the last thing I want to see
Underneath the tree (don't come home for Christmas)
Merry Christmas, I could care less

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Selena Gomez/AUTHOR	NAME/Bang A Drum/NAME	"CONTENT/You caught my eye and I'm tryin' to holler at 'cha
You walk on by and I trip on the furniture
I'm on a ride that won't stop movin'
And I don't know exactly what I'm doin'
I see you shake, shake and I'm spinnin'
It's like I won the race that I'm winning
I'm all dizzy when your here with me
So lets bring the heat

There ain't nothing to it
Just got to do it
You got to own it own it
To the beat of your own drum
And you got it like that
Burn it up like that
To the beat of your own drum
If you got it like that
Yeah it's hot like that
Eh eh eh
Yeah it will make you say eh eh eh
So bang a drum, bang a drum

You got me floatin' ten feet off the ground
It's like wow, I'm not backin' down
My hearts pumpin' and it's workin' over time
I got the crazy butterflies
Were doin' it right when were together
With you by my side it only gets better
Your on my team we got it figure out
It's you and me no doubt

There ain't nothing to it
Just got to do it
You got to own it own it
To the beat of your own drum
If it's hot like that
Burn it up like that
To the beat yeah dip it down low
If you got it like that
Yeah it's hot like that
Eh eh eh
Yeah it will make you say eh eh eh
So bang a drum, bang a drum, bang a drum
Lets turn it up, bang a drum
Yeah bang a drum, turn it up, bang a drum

You caught my eye and I'm tryin' to holler at 'cha
You walk on by and I trip on the furniture
I'm on a ride that won't stop movin'
And I don't know exactly what I'm doin'
I see you shake, shake and I'm spinnin'
It's like I won the race that I'm winning
I'm all dizzy when your here with me
So lets bring the heat

There ain't nothing to it
Bang a drum
Just got to do it
Bang a drum
You got to own it own it
To the beat dip, it down low
If you got it like that
Burn it up like that
To the beat of your own drum
If you got it like that
Yeah it's hot like that
Eh eh eh
Yeah it will make you say eh eh eh
So bang a drum, bang a drum
Yeah bang a drum, turn it up, bang a drum
Bang a drum, turn it up, bang a drum
Yeah bang a drum, turn it up, bang a drum

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Selena Gomez/AUTHOR	NAME/Falling Down/NAME	"CONTENT/Uh, oh oh, oh
Uh, oh oh, oh
Uh, oh oh, oh
Uh, oh oh, oh
Uh, oh oh, oh

You walk and talk
Like you're some new sensation
You move in circles
You don't need an invitation
You spend your money
You can't get no satisfaction
You play it right so you can get the right reaction

It won't be long my darling
Pick up the phone, nobody's on it
Where are your friends now baby
Aren't they the ones supposed to be there for

You (you)
You're falling down
The world's not spinning 'round
You (you)
When you're falling down
No, it's not all about
You (you)
When you're falling down
You know I'll be around
When you're falling down, falling down

Falling down, down, down, you're falling down.

What's out of place when you look into the mirror?
The truth is blurry but the lies are getting clearer
Your eyes are fixed, your smile is so elastic
You gave me roses but they're all just made of plastic

It won't be long my darling
Pick up the phone, nobody's on it
Where are your friends now baby
How's anyone supposed to be there for

You (you)
When you're falling down
The world's not spinning 'round
You (you)
When you're falling down
No, it's not all about
You (you)
When you're falling down
You know I'll be around
When you're falling down, falling down

Smile for the camera, everybody's looking at ya
Smile for the camera, 'cause they're all about to trash ya
Smile for the camera, camera, camera, smile for the camera
Who's gonna catch ya?

You, you

You (you)
When you're falling down
The world's not spinning 'round
You (you)
When you're falling down
No, it's not all about
You (you)
When you're falling down
You know I'll be around
When you're falling down, falling down

Smile for the camera,
Everybody's looking at ya.
Smile for the camera
'Cause they're all about to trash ya.

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Selena Gomez/AUTHOR	NAME/Feel Me/NAME	"CONTENT/[Verse 1]
No one love you like I love you
I never cheated, never lied
I never put no one above you
I gave you space and time
And now you're telling me you miss me
And I'm still on your mind
We were one in a million
Our love is hard to find

[Pre-Chorus]
Do you stay up late just so you don't dream?

[Chorus]
Every time your lips touch another
I want you to feel me, I want you to feel me
Every time you dance with somebody
I want you to feel me, I want you to feel me
Do your days get a little bit lonely?
Nights get a little bit colder?
Heartbeat a little bit louder?
Days get a little bit longer?
Nights get a little bit colder?
Heartbeat a little bit louder?

[Verse 2]
When you're running, who you run to?
Where do you go to hide?
When she ain't giving you enough to get you through the night
I won't be caught up in the middle
Through your highs and your lows
Baby, 'long as you're not with me, you'll always be alone

[Pre-Chorus]
Do you stay up late, just so you don't dream?

[Chorus]
Every time your lips touch another
I want you to feel me, I want you to feel me
Every time you dance with somebody
I want you to feel me, I want you to feel me
Do your days get a little bit lonely?
Nights get a little bit colder?
Heartbeat a little bit louder?
Days get a little bit longer?
Nights get a little bit colder?
Heartbeat a little bit louder?

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Selena Gomez/AUTHOR	NAME/Fly To Your Heart/NAME	"CONTENT/Watch all the flowers
Dance with the wind
Listen to snowflakes
Whisper your name

Feel all the wonder
Lifting your dreams
You can fly

Fly to who you are
Climb upon your star
When you believe
You'll find your wings
Fly to your heart

Touch every rainbow
Painting the sky
Look at the magic
Glide through your life

A sprinkle of pixie dust
Circles the night
You can fly

Fly to who you are
Climb upon your star
When you believe
You'll find your wings
Fly

Everywhere you go
Your soul will find a home
You'll be free
To spread your wings
Fly, you can fly to your heart

Rise to the heights
Of all you can be
Soar on the hope
Of marvelous things

Fly to who you are
Climb upon your star
When you believe
You'll find your wings
Fly

Everywhere you go
Your soul will find a home
You'll be free
To spread your wings
Fly, you can fly to your heart

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Selena Gomez/AUTHOR	NAME/Hands To Myself/NAME	"CONTENT/[Verse 1]
Can't keep my hands to myself
No matter how hard I'm trying to
I want you all to myself
You're metaphorical gin and juice
So come on, give me a taste
Of what it's like to be next to you
Won't let one drop go to waste
You're metaphorical gin and juice

[Pre-Chorus]
Cause all of the doubts and the outbursts
Keep making love to each other
And I'm trying, trying, I'm trying, trying
All of the doubts and the outbursts
Keep making love to each other
And I'm trying, trying, I'm trying, but I

[Chorus]
Can't keep my hands to myself
My hands to myself
Can't keep my hands to myself
My hands to myself

[Verse 2]
My doctor say you're no good
But people say what they wanna say
And you should know if I could
I'd breathe you in every single day

[Pre-Chorus]
All of the doubts and the outbursts
Keep making love to each other
And I'm trying, trying, I'm trying, trying
All of the doubts and the outbursts
Keep making love to each other
And I'm trying, trying, I'm trying, but I

[Chorus]
Can't keep my hands to myself
My hands to myself
Can't keep my hands to myself
My hands to myself

[Bridge]
Can't keep my hands to myself
I want it all, no, nothing else
Can't keep my hands to myself
Give me your all and nothing else
Oh, I, I want it all
I want it all, I want it all
Can't keep my hands to myself
I mean I could, but why would I want to?

[Chorus]
My hands to myself
Can't keep my hands to myself
My hands to myself
Can't keep my hands to myself
I want it all, no, nothing else
Can't keep my hands to myself
Give me your all and nothing else
Can't keep my hands to myself

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Selena Gomez/AUTHOR	NAME/I Won't Apologize/NAME	"CONTENT/You had me to get her.
And here, I thought it was me.
I was changin', arrangin' my life to fit your lies.
It's all said and all done.
I gave it all for the long run.
Can she say the same thing?
I guess this is good bye and good luck.
(I can't be what you want me to be)

[Chorus]
I'm sorry for changing.
I'm sorry it had to be this way.
Believe me, it's easier just to pretend.
But, I won't apologize for who I am.

No, no.

Remember the time when you said
You were out with your best friend.
But it wasn't the best friend
That you know I thought you meant and
I used to accept it,
I didn't know I could be free.
But I am, and I won't go back
'cause you so don't deserve me.
(I don't even want to be her)

[Chorus]

I thank you for this hopeless war
Cause through the pain now I'm stronger now than before.
Now I'm more.
I don't need you anymore.
I'm sorry.
(Listen close I won't say this again)

[Chorus]

I'm sorry for changing.
I'm sorry it isn't like it was.
Believe me, it's easier just to pretend.
But, I won't apologize,
Why should I apologize,
No, I won't apologize for who I am

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Selena Gomez/AUTHOR	NAME/Survivors/NAME	"CONTENT/[Intro]
Wild, wild, wild, wild, wild
Wild, wild, wild, wild, wild
Mmm

[Verse 1]
You built me from a broken heart
With bricks you made from broken parts
You've fixed the paint, so we could start
So now what's mine is ours
I still have proof in form of scars
The first time always falls so far
Those healing wounds heal twice as hard
But now what's mine is ours
But now what's mine is ours

[Chorus]
We are survivors
We are survivors of the wild
We are survivors
We are survivors of the wild

[Verse 2]
My sweet devoted counterpart
We kept each other's shooting stars
However close, however far
Whatever's mine is ours
Whatever's mine is ours

[Chorus]
We are survivors
We are survivors of the wild
We are survivors
We are survivors of the wild
We are survivors
We are survivors of the wild
We are survivors (we are survivors)
We are survivors of the wild

[Bridge]
Woahoooo (we are, we are)
Woahoooo (we are, we are)
Woahoooo(we are, we are)
We are survivors of the wild
Woahoooo (we are, we are)
Woahoooo (we are, we are)
Woahoooo(we are, we are)
We are survivors of the wild

[Outro]
We are survivors of the wild
We are survivors (woah)
We are survivors of the wild
We are survivors (we are survivors)
We are survivors of the wild

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Selena Gomez/AUTHOR	NAME/Tell Me Something I Don't Know/NAME	"CONTENT/Everybody tells me,
That it's so hard to make it,
Yet so hard to break it,
And there's no way to fake it,
Everybody tells me that it's wrong what I'm feeling,
I shouldn't believe in,
The dreams that I'm dreaming,

I hear it everyday,
I hear it all the time,
I'm never gonna amount to much,
But they're never gonna change my mind.
Oh!

[Chorus: x2]
Tell me, tell me, tell me,
Something I don't know,
Something I don't know,
Something I don't know,

How many inches in a mile,
What it takes to make you smile.
Getcha not to treat me like a child, baby.

[Chorus]

Tell me, tell me something I don't know,
Tell me, tell me something I don't know.

Everybody tells me I don't know what I'm doing,
This life I'm pursuing,
The odds of me loosing.

Everybody tells me that it's one in a million,
More like one in a billion,
Or one in a zillion.

I hear it everyday,
I hear it all the time,
I'm never gonna amount to much,
But they're never gonna change my mind.
Oh!

[Chorus: x2]

How many inches in a mile,
What it takes to make you smile,
Getcha not to treat me like a child, baby.

[Chorus]

Are you ready for it?
Yeah I'm ready for it.
Really ready for it?
Yeah I'm ready for it.
Let's get ready for this.

I'm on my way,
I know I'm gonna get there someday,
It doesn't help when you say,
It won't be easy.

[Chorus: x2]

How many inches in a mile,
What it takes to make you smile,
Getcha not to treat me like a child, baby.

[Chorus: x3]

How many inches in a mile,
What it takes to make you smile,
Getcha not to treat me like a child, baby.

[Chorus]

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Selena Gomez/AUTHOR	NAME/That's More Like It/NAME	"CONTENT/When I wanted you, you would not reciprocate
When I needed you, you would always show up late
But things have changed, and I've got the upper hand
You can run and I've got you eating out of my hand

That's more like it, yeah
That's more like it
Make my dinner, bring it to me
That's more like it
That's more like it
Yeah, that's more like it
Yeah, that's more like it
I see where and when it happens
That's more like it
That's more like it
That's more like it
That's more like it

When my birthday came, you would not remember it
When I talked to you, you were never listening
But tables turn, and it's great to be on top
Got you good to appreciate the good that you've got

That's more like it, yeah
That's more like it
Make my dinner, bring it to me
That's more like it
That's more like it
Yeah, that's more like it
Yeah, that's more like it
I see where and when it happens
That's more like it
That's more like it
That's more like it
That's more like it

I like chocolate, and I like daisies
Maybe you better write this down
I love cashmere, and I want diamonds
I'm ready for my massage right now, oh right now

That's more like it, yeah
That's more like it
Make my dinner, bring it to me
That's more like it
That's more like it
Yeah, that's more like it
Yeah, that's more like it
I see where and when it happens
That's more like it
That's more like it
That's more like it
That's more like it

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Selena Gomez/AUTHOR	NAME/The Way I Loved You/NAME	"CONTENT/Everything's cool, yeah
It's all gonna be okay, yeah
And I know,
Maybe I'll even
Laugh about it someday

But not today, no
Cause I don't feel so good
I'm tangled up inside
My heart is on my sleeve
Tomorrow is a mystery to me

[Chorus]
And it might be wonderful
It might be magical
It might be everything I've waited for,
A miracle
Oh, and even if I fall in love again
With someone new
It could never be the way I loved you

Letting you go is
Making me feel so cold, yeah
And I've been trying to make
Believe it doesn't hurt

But that makes it worse, yeah
See, I'm a wreck inside
My tongue is tied and my
Whole body feels so weak
The future may be all I really need

[Chorus]

Like a first love,
The one and only true love
Wasn't it written all over my face, yeah
I loved you like you loved me (oh)
Like something pure and holy
Like something that can never be replaced

And it was be wonderful,
It was magical,
It was everything I've waited for,
A miracle
And if I should ever fall in love again
With someone new
Oh, It could never be the way
No, It will never be the way
I loved you

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Selena Gomez/AUTHOR	NAME/When The Sun Goes Down/NAME	"CONTENT/Been a long day, waiting for the night to come
I check my Iphone,
Let me see what's going on, going on, going on
Help me DJ, and play my favorite song,
Make the speakers shake, speakers shake
Now everybody wants to sing along, sing along,
When the night is here
The only thing on my mind is
Having a good time when the moon appears
You can always hear us say

[Chorus]
The party doesn't start til the sun goes down
That's when everything starts moving,
Everybody up when the sun goes down
Ahh, ahh, ahh
The music isn't on till it's way too loud,
That's when everybody starts dancing
Everybody shout when the sun goes down
When the sun goes down
When the sun goes down
When the sun goes down
Oh oh oh oh yeah

Pushing my hands up,
I'm feeling good now
On the dance floor,
We can turn it inside out, inside out
When the night is here
The only thing on my mind is
Having good time with my friends
That's real, you can always hear us say

[Chorus]

Down,down,down
The sun is going down, down,down
When the moon appears, you can always hear us say
When the stars come out, you can always here us say

[Chorus]

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Selena Gomez/AUTHOR	NAME/Whiplash/NAME	"CONTENT/Oh baby, moonlights
Hits the spotlight
I'm on my flight
To take you away
I'm feeling so free
You're makin' me crazy

That's what you do
That's what you do
Let's go now!

Lickety split
A girl and a bear
She crawls in a pit
Say hello darling
Twisted insanity
Fallen humanity
All I want is some tranquility
Do you hear me?
Do you hear me?
Well come on, boy

Well come on
And take me to the other side
I'm gon' away
When I look into your eyes
I'm so in love
I think I'm gonna crash
And get whiplash whiplash whiplash
It's up to you
And I don't wanna give you clues
We're movin' fast
I think we got enough to lose
So don't look back or else we're gonna crash
And get whiplash whiplash whiplash

Like a first kiss
With a sweet list
Of some love songs, oh yeah
And with this melody
Falling over me
It makes me weak
So damn weak
So let's go now

Lickety split
A girl and a bear
She crawls in a pit
Say hello darling
Twisted insanity
Fallen humanity
All I want is some tranquility
Do you hear me?
Do you hear me?
Well come on, boy

Well come on
And take me to the other side
I'm gon' away
When I look into your eyes
I'm so in love
I think I'm gonna crash
And get whiplash whiplash whiplash
It's up to you
And I don't wanna give you clues
We're movin fast
I think we got enough to lose
So don't look back or else we're gonna crash
And get whiplash whiplash whiplash

La la la la la la la
La la la la la la la
La la la oh yea
La la la la la la la
La la la la la la la
So let's go now

Well come on
And take me to the other side
I'm gon' away
When I look into your eyes
I'm so in love
I think I'm gonna crash
And get whiplash whiplash whiplash
It's up to you
And I don't wanna give you clues
We're movin' fast
I think we got enough to lose
So don't look back or else we're gonna crash
And get whiplash whiplash whiplash

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Selena Gomez/AUTHOR	NAME/Winter Wonderland/NAME	"CONTENT/Sleigh bells ring
Are you listening?
In the lane
Snow is glistening
A beautiful sight
We're happy tonight
Walking
In a winter wonderland

Gone away
Is the bluebird
Here to stay
Is a new bird
He sings a love song
As we go along
Walking
In a winter wonderland

In the meadow
We can build a snowman
And pretend
That he is Parson Brown
He'll say are you married?
We'll say No man
But you can do the job
When you're in town
Later on, we'll conspire
As we dream, by the fire
To face unafraid
The plans that we've made
Walking
In a winter wonderland

In the meadow
We can build a snowman
And pretend
That he's a circus clown
We'll have lots of fun
With Mr. Snowman
Until the other kids
Come knock him down

When it's cold
Ain't it thrilling
When your nose
Gets to chilling
We'll frolic and play
The eskimo way
Walking
In a winter wonderland

Walking
In a winter wonderland

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Taylor Swift/AUTHOR	NAME/Cold As You/NAME	"CONTENT/You have a way of coming easily to me
And when you take, you take the very best of me
So I start a fight 'cause I need to feel somethin'
And you do what you want 'cause I'm not what you wanted

[Chorus]
Oh, what a shame
What a rainy ending given to a perfect day
Just walk away
Ain't no use defending words that you will never say
And now that I'm sittin' here thinkin' it through
I've never been anywhere cold as you

You put up the walls and paint them all a shade of gray
And I stood there loving you, and wished them all away
And you come away with a great little story
Of a mess of a dreamer with the nerve to adore you

[Chorus]

You never did give a damn thing, honey
But I cried, cried for you
And I know you wouldn't have told nobody if I died, died for you
Died for you

Oh, what a shame
What a rainy ending given to a perfect day
Oh, every smile you fake is so condescending
Countin' all the scars you've made
Now that I'm sittin' here thinkin' it through
I've never been anywhere cold as you

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Taylor Swift/AUTHOR	NAME/Crazier/NAME	"CONTENT/I've never gone with the wind, just let it flow
Let it take me where it wants
Til you opened the door, there's so much more
I've never seen it before
I was trying to fly but I couldn't find wings
But you came along and you changed everything

You lift my feet off the ground
You spin me around
You make me crazier crazier
Feels like I'm falling in love and I'm lost in your eyes
You make me crazier crazier crazier

I watched from a distance as you made life your own
Every sky was your own kind of blue
And I wanted to know how that would feel
And you made it so real
You showed me something that I couldn't see
You opened my eyes and you made me believe.

You lift my feet off the ground
You spin me around
You make me crazier crazier
Feels like I'm falling in love and I'm lost in your eyes
You make me crazier crazier crazier oh

Baby you showed me what livin' is for
I don't wanna hide anymore

You lift my feet off the ground
You spin me around
You make me crazier crazier
Feels like I'm falling and I'm, I'm lost in your eyes
You make me crazier crazier crazier crazier crazier

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Taylor Swift/AUTHOR	NAME/Everything Has Changed/NAME	"CONTENT/All I knew this morning when I woke
Is I know something now, know something now I didn't before
And all I've seen since 18 hours ago is green eyes and freckles
And your smile in the back of my mind making me feel like
I just want to know you better, know you better, know you better now
I just want to know you better, know you better, know you better now
I just want to know you better, know you better, know you better now
I just want to know, you know you know you

'Cause all I know is we said hello
And your eyes look like coming home
All I know is a simple name, everything has changed
All I know is you held the door
You'll be mine and I'll be yours
All I know since yesterday is everything has changed

And all my walls stood tall painted blue
But I'll take them down, take them down and open up the door for you

And all I feel in my stomach is butterflies the beautiful kind
Making up for lost time, taking flight, making me feel like

I just want to know you better, know you better, know you better now
I just want to know you better, know you better, know you better now
I just want to know you better, know you better, know you better now
I just want to know you, know you know you

'Cause all I know is we said hello
And your eyes look like coming home
All I know is a simple name, everything has changed
All I know is you held the door
You'll be mine and I'll be yours
All I know since yesterday is everything has changed

Come back and tell me why
I'm feeling like I've missed you all this time
And meet me there tonight
And let me know that it's not all in my mind

I just want to know you better, know you better, know you better now
I just want to know you, know you, know you

'Cause all I know is we said hello
And your eyes look like coming home
All I know is a simple name, everything has changed
All I know is he held the door
You'll be mine and I'll be yours
All I know since yesterday is everything has changed

All I know is we said hello
So dust off your highest hopes
All I know is pouring rain
And everything has changed
All I know is a new found grace
All my days, I'll know your face
All I know since yesterday is everything has changed

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Taylor Swift/AUTHOR	NAME/Fifteen/NAME	"CONTENT/You take a deep breath
And you walk through the doors
It's the morning of your very first day
You say hi to your friends you ain't seen in awhile
Try and stay out of everybody's way

It's your freshman year
And you're gonna be here for the next four years
In this town
Hoping one of those senior boys
Will wink at you and say, ""you know I haven't seen you around, before""

'Cause when you're fifteen,
Somebody tells you they love you
You're gonna believe them
And when you're fifteen

Feeling like there's nothing to figure out

Count to ten
Take it in
This is life before you know who you're gonna be
At fifteen

You sit in class next to a red-head named Abigail
And soon enough you're best friends
Laughing at the other girls
Who they think they're so cool
We'll be out of here as soon as we can

And then you're on your very first date
And he's got a car
And you're feeling like flying
And you're mama's waiting up
And you're thinking he's the one
And you're dancing around the room when the night ends
When the night ends

'Cause when you're fifteen,
Somebody tells you they love you
You're gonna believe them
And when you're fifteen

And your first kiss makes your head spin around

But in your life you'll do things
Greater than dating the boy on the football team
But I didn't know it at fifteen

When all you wanted
Was to be wanted
Wish you could go back
And tell yourself what you know now

Back then I swore I was gonna marry him someday
But I realized some bigger dreams of mine
And Abigail gave everything she had
To a boy who changed his mind
And we both cried

'Cause when you're fifteen,
Somebody tells you they love you
You're gonna believe them
And when you're fifteen

Don't forget to look before you fall

I've found time can heal most anything
And you just might find who you're supposed to be
I didn't know who I was supposed to be
At fifteen

La la la la la
Your very first day
Take a deep breath girl
And take a deep breath as you walk through the doors

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Taylor Swift/AUTHOR	NAME/Hey Stephen/NAME	"CONTENT/Hey Stephen, I know looks can be deceiving
But I know I saw a light in you
And as we walked we would talk
And I didn't say half the things I wanted to
Of all the girls tossing rocks at your window
I'll be the one waiting there even when it's cold
Hey Stephen, boy you might have me believing
I don't always have to be alone

[Chorus]
'Cause I can't help it if you look like an angel
Can't help it if I wanna kiss you in the rain, so
Come feel this magic I've been feeling since I met you
Can't help it if there's no one else
Mmm I can't help myself

Hey Stephen, I've been holding back this feeling
So I've got some things to say to you
I've seen it all, so I thought
But I've never seen nobody shine the way you do
The way you walk, way you talk, way you say my name
It's beautiful, wonderful, don't you ever change
Hey Stephen, why are people always leaving
I think you and I should stay the same

[Chorus]
Cause I can't help it if you look like an angel
Can't help it if I wanna kiss you in the rain, so
Come feel this magic I've been feeling since I met you
Can't help it if there's no one else
Mmm I can't help myself

They're dimming the street lights, you're perfect for me
Why aren't you here tonight?
I'm waiting alone now so come on and come out
And pull me near and shine, shine, shine

Hey Stephen, I could give you fifty reasons
Why I should be the one you choose
All those other girls, well they're beautiful
But would they write a song for you?

[Chorus]
Cause I can't help it if you look like an angel
Can't help it if I wanna kiss you in the rain, so
Come feel this magic I've been feeling since I met you
Can't help it if there's no one else

I can't help myself if you look like an angel
Can't help it if I wanna kiss you in the rain, so
Come feel this magic I've been feeling since I met you
Can't help it if there's no one else
Mmm I can't help myself
Myself
Mm
I can't help myself
I can't help myself
Oh, Oh,
Mm
Mm

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Taylor Swift/AUTHOR	NAME/I Knew You Were Trouble/NAME	"CONTENT/Once upon time
A few mistakes ago
I was in your sights
You got me alone
You found me
You found me
You found me

I guess you didn't care
And I guess I liked that
And when I fell hard
You took a step back
Without me, without me, without me

And he's long gone
When he's next to me
And I realize the blame is on me

'Cause I knew you were trouble when you walked in
So shame on me now
Flew me to places I'd never been
So you put me down oh
I knew you were trouble when you walked in
So shame on me now
Flew me to places I'd never been
Now I'm lying on the cold hard ground
Oh, oh, trouble, trouble, trouble
Oh, oh, trouble, trouble, trouble

No apologies
He'll never see you cry
Pretend he doesn't know
That he's the reason why
You're drowning, you're drowning, you're drowning

And I heard you moved on
From whispers on the street
A new notch in your belt
Is all I'll ever be
And now I see, now I see, now I see
He was long gone
When he met me
And I realize the joke is on me

I knew you were trouble when you walked in
So shame on me now
Flew me to places I'd never been
So you put me down oh
I knew you were trouble when you walked in
So shame on me now
Flew me to places I'd never been
Now I'm lying on the cold hard ground
Oh, oh, trouble, trouble, trouble
Oh, oh, trouble, trouble, trouble

When your saddest fear comes creeping in
That you never loved me or her or anyone or anything
Yeah

I knew you were trouble when you walked in
So shame on me now
Flew me to places I'd never been
So you put me down oh
I knew you were trouble when you walked in
So shame on me now
Flew me to places I'd never been
Now I'm lying on the cold hard ground
Oh, oh, trouble, trouble, trouble
Oh, oh, trouble, trouble, trouble

I knew you were trouble when you walked in
Trouble, trouble, trouble
I knew you were trouble when you walked in
Trouble, trouble, trouble

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Taylor Swift/AUTHOR	NAME/Jump Then Fall/NAME	"CONTENT/I like the way you sound in the morning,
We're on the phone and without a warning
I realize your laugh is the best sound I have ever heard

I like the way I can't keep my focus,
I watch you talk you didn't notice
I hear the words but all I can think is we should be together

Every time you smile, I smile
And every time you shine, I'll shine for you

Whoa oh I'm feeling you baby
Don't be afraid to jump then fall, jump then fall into me

Baby, I'm never gonna leave you,
Say that you wanna be with me too
Cuz I'ma stay through it all so jump then fall

Well I like the way your hair falls in your face
You got the keys to me I love each freckle on your face, oh,
I've never been so wrapped up,
Honey, I like the way you're everything I've ever wanted

I had time to think it all over and all I can say is come closer,
Take a deep breath and jump then fall into me

Every time you smile, I smile
And every time you shine, I'll shine for you

Whoa oh I'm feeling you baby
Don't be afraid to jump then fall, jump then fall into me

Baby, I'm never gonna leave you,
Say that you wanna be with me too
I'ma stay through it all so jump then fall

The bottoms gonna drop out from under our feet
I'll catch you, I'll catch you
When people say things that bring you to your knees,
I'll catch you
The time is gonna come when you're so mad you could cry
But I'll hold you through the night until you smile

Whoa oh I need you baby
Don't be afraid please
Jump then fall, jump then fall into me

Baby, I'm never gonna leave you,
Say that you wanna be with me too
I'ma stay through it all so jump then fall

Jump then fall baby
Jump then fall into me, into me

Every time you smile, I smile
And every time you shine, I'll shine
And every time you're here baby, I'll show you, I'll show you
You can jump then fall, jump then fall, jump then fall into me, into me

Yeah

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Taylor Swift/AUTHOR	NAME/Last Kiss/NAME	"CONTENT/I still remember the look on your face
Lit through the darkness at 1:58
The words that you whispered
For just us to know
You told me you loved me
So why did you go
Away
Away

I do recall now
The smell of the rain
Fresh on the pavement
I ran off the plane
That July ninth
The beat of your heart
It jumps through your shirt
I can still feel your arms

But now I'll go sit on the floor
Wearing your clothes
All that I know is
I don't know how to be something you missed
Never thought we'd have a last kiss
Never imagined we'd end like this
Your name, forever the name on my lips

I do remember
The swing in your step
The life of the party, you're showing off again
And I roll my eyes and then
You pull me in
I'm not much for dancing
But for you I did

Because I love your handshake
Meetin' my father
I love how you walk with your hands in your pockets
How you kissed me when I was in the middle of saying something
There's not a day I don't miss those rude interruptions

And I'll go sit on the floor
Wearing your clothes
All that I know is that
I don't know how to be something you miss
Never thought we'd have a last kiss
Never imagined we'd end like this
Your name, forever the name on my lips

So I'll watch your life in pictures like I used to watch you sleep
And I feel you forget me like I used to feel you breathe
And I'll keep up with our old friends just to ask them how you are
Hope it's nice where you are

And I hope the sun shines
And it's a beautiful day
And something reminds you
You wish you had stayed
You can plan for a change in weather and time
But I never planned on you changing your mind

So I'll go sit on the floor
Wearing your clothes
All that I know is that
I don't know how to be something you miss
Never thought we'd have a last kiss
Never imagined we'd end like this
Your name, forever the name on my lips

Just like our last kiss
Forever the name on my lips
Forever the name on my lips
Just like our last

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Taylor Swift/AUTHOR	NAME/Live For The Little Things/NAME	"CONTENT/One day break, one heart ache, every once upon a time
That black dress, happiness, bubble baths and quarter lines
They mean so much to everyone,
But you count them up one by one

Clear midnights, and this firelight, once thinking that your dad was ten feet
tall
A blue bonnet with rain on it, quiet winters and leaves that always fall
Your black boots, my red flower ring
Live for the little things

Oil paintings and making every detail turn out right
One last dance, new romance, living for that love at first sight
It means so much to everyone
But you count them up one by one

Clear midnights, and this firelight, once thinking that your dad was ten feet
tall
A blue bonnet with rain on it, quiet winters and leaves that always fall
Your black boots, my red flower ring
Live for the little things

No fighting, black writing, wish upon a star and give the moon a smile
Pretending, defending, take a risk and go along for the ride
Strawberries and fairies with wings
Live for the little things,
Na na na, na na na, na na na na, uh yeah
Na na na, na na na, na na na na, oh yeah.

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Taylor Swift/AUTHOR	NAME/Long Live/NAME	"CONTENT/I said remember this moment
In the back of my mind
The time we stood with our shaking hands
The crowds in stands went wild
We were the kings and the queens
And they read off our names
The night you danced like you knew our lives
Would never be the same
You held your head like a hero
On a history book page
It was the end of a decade
But the start of an age

Long live the walls we crashed through
All the kingdom lights shined just for me and you
I was screaming, ""long live all the magic we made""
And bring on all the pretenders
One day we will be remembered

I said remember this feeling
I passed the pictures around
Of all the years that we stood there on the sidelines
Wishing for right now
We are the kings and the queens
You traded your baseball cap for a crown
When they gave us our trophies
And we held them up for our town
And the cynics were outraged
Screaming, ""this is absurd""
'Cause for a moment a band of thieves in ripped up jeans got to rule the world

Long live the walls we crashed through
All the kingdom lights shined just for me and you
I was screaming, ""long live all the magic we made""
And bring on all the pretenders
I'm not afraid

Long live all the mountains we moved
I had the time of my life
Fighting dragons with you
I was screaming, ""long live the look on your face""
And bring on all the pretenders
One day we will be remembered

Hold on to spinning around
Confetti falls to the ground
May these memories break our fall

Can you take a moment
Promise me this:
That you'll stand by me forever
But if God forbid fate should step in
And force us into a goodbye
If you have children someday
When they point to the pictures
Please tell them my name
Tell them how the crowds went wild
Tell them how I hope they shine

Long live the walls we crashed through
I had the time of my life with you

Long, long live the walls we crashed through
All the kingdom lights shined just for me and you
And I was screaming, ""long live all the magic we made""
And bring on all the pretenders
I'm not afraid

Singing long live all the mountains we moved
I had the time of my life
Fighting dragons with you
And long, long live the look on your face
And bring on all the pretenders
One day, we will be remembered

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Taylor Swift/AUTHOR	NAME/Love Story/NAME	"CONTENT/We were both young when I first saw you
I close my eyes and the flashback starts
I'm standing there on a balcony in summer air

See the lights, see the party, the ball gowns
See you make your way through the crowd
And say hello

Little did I know
That you were Romeo, you were throwing pebbles
And my daddy said, ""Stay away from Juliet""
And I was crying on the staircase
Begging you, please, don't go

And I said,
""Romeo, take me somewhere we can be alone
I'll be waiting, all that's left to do is run
You'll be the prince and I'll be the princess
It's a love story, baby just say yes

So I sneak out to the garden to see you
We keep quiet 'cause we're dead if they knew
So close your eyes, escape this town for a little while
'Cause you were Romeo, I was a scarlet letter
And my daddy said ""Stay away from Juliet""
But you were everything to me, I was begging you, please, don't go

And I said Romeo take me somewhere we can be alone
I'll be waiting, all there's left to do is run
You'll be the prince and I'll be the princess
It's a love story baby just say yes

Romeo save me, they're trying to tell me how to feel
This love is difficult, but it's real
Don't be afraid, we'll make it out of this mess
It's a love story, baby just say ""Yes""

Oh, oh

I got tired of waiting
Wondering if you were ever coming around
My faith in you was fading
When I met you on the outskirts of town

And I said
""Romeo save me, I've been feeling so alone
I keep waiting for you but you never come
Is this in my head? I don't know what to think""

He knelt to the ground and pulled out a ring and said
""Marry me, Juliet, you'll never have to be alone
I love you and that's all I really know
I talked to your dad, go pick out a white dress
It's a love story, baby just say yes""

Oh, oh,
Oh, oh

'Cause we were both young when I first saw you.

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Taylor Swift/AUTHOR	NAME/Mean/NAME	"CONTENT/You, with your words like knives
And swords and weapons that you use against me
You, have knocked me off my feet again,
Got me feeling like a nothing
You, with your voice like nails
On a chalk board, calling me out when I'm wounded
You, picking on the weaker man

You can take me down
With just one single blow
But you don't know what you don't know

Someday I'll be living in a big old city
And all you're ever gonna be is mean
Someday I'll be big enough so you can't hit me
And all you're ever gonna be is mean
Why you gotta be so mean?

You, with your switching sides
And your wildfire lies and your humiliation
You have pointed out my flaws again
As if I don't already see them
I walk with my head down,
Try to block you out 'cause I never impress you
I just want to feel okay again

I bet you got pushed around
Somebody made you cold but the cycle ends right now
'Cause you can't lead me down that road
And you don't know what you don't know

Someday I'll be living in a big old city
And all you're ever gonna be is mean
Someday I'll be big enough so you can't hit me
And all you're ever gonna be is mean
Why you gotta be so mean?

And I can see you years from now in a bar
Talking over a football game
With that same big loud opinion
But nobody's listening, washed up and ranting
About the same old bitter things
Drunk and rumbling on about how I can't sing
But all you are is mean
All you are is mean and a liar and pathetic
And alone in life and mean, and mean, and mean, and mean

But someday I'll be living in a big old city
And all you're ever gonna be is mean
Yeah someday I'll be big enough
So you can't hit me
And all you're ever gonna be is mean
Why you gotta be so (mean)
Someday I'll be living in a big old city
(Why you gotta be so mean)

And all you're ever gonna be is mean
(Why you gotta be so mean)
Someday I'll be big enough so you can't hit me
(Why you gotta be so mean)
And all you're ever gonna be is mean
Why you gotta be so mean?

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Taylor Swift/AUTHOR	NAME/Ours/NAME	"CONTENT/Elevator buttons and morning air,
Strangers silence makes me want to take the stairs,
If you were here we'd laugh about their vacant stares,
But right now,
My time is theirs.

Seems like there's always
Someone who disapproves,
They'll judge it like they know about me and you,
And the verdict comes from those with nothing else to do,
The jury's out,
And my choice is you.

So don't you worry your pretty little mind,
People throw rocks at things that shine,
And life makes love look hard,
The stakes are high,
The waters rough,
But this love is ours,

You never know what people have up their sleeves,
Ghosts from your past gonna jump out at me,
Lurking in the shadows with their lip gloss smiles,
But I don't care,
'Cause right now you're mine,
And you say,

So don't you worry your pretty little mind,
People throw rocks at things that shine,
And life makes love look hard,
The stakes are high,
The water's rough,
But this love is ours

And it's not theirs to speculate,
If it's wrong and,
Your hands are tough but they are where,
My belong in,
I'll fight their doubt and give you faith with this song for you.

'Cause I love the gap between your teeth,
And I love the riddles that you speak,
And any snide remarks from my father about your tattoos will be ignored,
'Cause my heart is yours.

So don't you worry your pretty little mind,
People throw rocks at things that shine,
And life makes love look hard,

And don't you worry your pretty little mind,
People throw rocks at things that shine,
But they can't take what's ours,
They can't take what's ours,
The stakes are high,
The water's rough,
But this love is ours.

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Taylor Swift/AUTHOR	NAME/Sad Beautiful Tragic/NAME	"CONTENT/Long handwritten note, deep in your pocket
Words, how little they mean, when you're a little too late
I stood right by the tracks, your face in a locket
Good girls, hopeful they'll be, and lonely we'll wait

We had a beautiful magic love affair
What a sad beautiful tragic love affair

In dreams, I meet you in long conversation
We both wake in lonely beds, and different cities
And time is ticking a sweet summer race in you
And you've got your demons and darling they all look like me

'Cause we had a beautiful magic love affair
What a sad beautiful tragic love affair

Distance, timing, break down, fighting
Silence, this train runs off its tracks
Kiss me, try to fix it, would you just try to listen
Hang up, give up, for the life of us we can't get it back

A beautiful magic love affair
What a sad beautiful tragic, beautiful tragic, beautiful
What we had, a beautiful magic love affair
What a sad beautiful tragic love affair
We had a beautiful magic love affair
What a sad beautiful tragic love affair

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Taylor Swift/AUTHOR	NAME/Santa Baby/NAME	"CONTENT/Santa baby, slip a sable under the tree, for me
I've been an awful good girl, Santa baby
So hurry down the chimney tonight

Santa baby, a '54 convertible, too, light blue
Well I'll wait up for you, dear, Santa baby
So hurry down the chimney tonight, yeah

Think of all the fun I've missed
Think of all the boys I haven't kissed
Next year I could be just as good
If you check off my Christmas list

Santa baby, I want a yacht and really that's not a lot
I've been an angel all year, Santa baby
So hurry down the chimney tonight

Santa, honey, there's one more thing I really do need, the deed
To a platinum mine, Santa honey
So hurry down the chimney tonight

Come and trim my Christmas tree
With some decorations bought at Tiffany's
I really do believe in you
Let's see if you believe in me

Santa baby, forgot to mention one little thing
A ring
And I don't mean on the phone, Santa baby
So hurry down the chimney tonight

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Taylor Swift/AUTHOR	NAME/Stay Stay Stay/NAME	"CONTENT/I'm pretty sure we almost broke up last night
I threw my phone across the room at you
I was expecting some dramatic turn away
But you stayed
This morning I said we should talk about it
'Cause I read you should never leave a fight unresolved
That's when you came in wearing a football helmet
And said okay, let's talk
And I said

Stay, stay, stay
I've been loving you for quite some time, time, time
You think that it's funny when I'm mad, mad, mad
But I think that it's best if we both stay

Before you, I'd only dated self indulgent takers who took all of their problem
out on me
But you carry my groceries and now I'm always laughing
I love you, because you have given me no choice but to

Stay, stay, stay
I've been loving you for quite some time, time, time
You think that it's funny when I'm mad, mad, mad
But I think that it's best if we both stay
Stay, stay, stay

You took the time to memorize me, my fears, my hopes and dreams,
I just like hanging out with you
All the time
All those times that you didn't leave, it's been occurring to me
I'd like to hang out with you for my whole life

Stay and I'll be loving you for quite some time
No one else is gonna love me when I get mad, mad, mad
So I think that it's best if we both stay, stay, stay
Stay, stay, stay

Stay, stay, stay
I've been loving you for quite some time, time, time
You think that it's funny when I'm mad, mad, mad
But I think that it's best if we both stay
Stay, stay, stay, stay, stay

Stay, stay, stay
I've been loving you for quite some time, time, time
You think that it's funny when I'm mad, mad, mad
But I think that it's best if we both stay

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Taylor Swift/AUTHOR	NAME/Superman/NAME	"CONTENT/Tall dark and Superman
He puts papers in his briefcase and drives away
To save the world or go to work
It's the same thing to me
Hes got his mothers eyes, his fathers ambition
I wonder if he knows how much that I miss him
And I know every word that you say, yay
You smile and say, ""How are you?""
And I'll say, ""Just fine""
I always forget to tell you,
I love you, I love you, forever

I watch superman fly away
You've got a busy day today
Go save the world I'll be around
I watch superman fly away
Come back I'll be with you someday
I'll be right here on the ground
When you come back down

Talk dark and beautiful
He's complicated, he's so irrational
But I hope someday you take me away and save the day, yeah
Something in his deep browns eyes has me singin'
He's not as bad like this reputation
I can't hear one single word they said, no
You really got places to be and I'll be old then
I always forget to tell you I love you,
I loved you from the very first day

I watch superman fly away
You've got a busy day today
Go save the world I'll be around
I watch superman fly away
Come back I'll be with you someday
I'll be right here on the ground
When you come back down

And I watch you fly around the world
And I hope you don't take some other girl
I hope you don't forget about me
I'm far away but I'll never let you go
I'm lovestruck and looking out the window
Don't forget, don't forget where I'll be
Right here wishing the flowers were from you
Wishing the card was from you
Wishing the call was from you

'Cause I loved you from the very first day

I watch superman fly away
You've got a busy day today to save the world
I'll be around forever and ever here
I watch superman fly away
I swear I'll be with you someday
I'll be right here on the ground
When you come back down

La, la, la

When you come back down

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Taylor Swift/AUTHOR	NAME/Superstar/NAME	"CONTENT/This is wrong but
I can't help but feel like
There ain't nothing more right babe
Misty morning comes again and I can't
Help but wish I could see your face

And I knew from the first note played
I'd be breaking all my rules to see you
You smile that beautiful smile
And all the girls in the front row scream your name

So dim that spotlight, tell me things like
I can't take my eyes off of you
I'm no one special, just another wide-eyed girl
Who's desperately in love with you
Give me a photograph to hang on my wall
Superstar

Good morning loneliness
Comes around when I'm not dreaming about you
When my world wakes up today you'll be in another town
And I knew when I saw your face I'd be
Counting down the ways to see you
And you smile that beautiful smile
And all the girls in the front row scream your name

So dim that spotlight, tell me things like
I can't take my eyes off of you
I'm no one special, just another wide-eyed girl
Who's desperately in love with you
Give me a photograph to hang on my wall
Superstar

You played in bars, you play guitar
And I'm invisible and everyone knows who you are
And you'll never see, you sing me to sleep
Every night from the radio

So dim that spotlight, tell me things like
I can't take my eyes off of you
I'm no one special, just another wide-eyed girl
Who's desperately in love with you
Give me a photograph to hang on my wall
Superstar
Sweet, sweet superstar
Superstar

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Taylor Swift/AUTHOR	NAME/Sweeter Than Fiction/NAME	"CONTENT/Hit the ground, hit the ground, hit the ground, oh oh
Only sound, only sound that you hear is ""no""
You never saw it coming
Slipped when you started running
And now you've come undone and I, I, I, I

Seen you fall, seen you crawl on your knees, eh eh
Seen you lost in a crowd, seen your colors fade
Wish I could make it better
Someday you won't remember
This pain you thought would last forever and ever

And there you'll stand, ten feet tall
I will say, I knew it all along
Your eyes' wider than distance
This life's sweeter than fiction

Just a shot, just a shot in the dark, oh oh
All you got, all you got are your shattered hopes
They never saw it coming
You hit the ground running
And now you're onto something, I, I, I say

What a sight, what a sight when the light came on
Proved me right, proved me right when you proved them wrong
And in this perfect weather
It's like we don't remember
The rain we thought would last forever and ever

And there you'll stand, ten feet tall
I will say, I knew it all along
Your eyes' wider than distance
This life's sweeter than fiction

There you'll stand, next to me
All at once, the rest is history
Your eyes' wider than distance
This life's sweeter than fiction, fiction

I'll be one of the many saying,
Look at you now, look at you now, now
I'll be one of the many saying,
You made us proud, you made us proud, proud
I'll be one of the many saying,
Look at you now, look at you now, now
I'll be one of the many saying,
You made us proud, you made us proud, proud

And when they call your name
And they put your picture in a frame
You know that I'll be there time and again
'Cause I loved you when, when you

Hit the ground, hit the ground, hit the ground, oh oh
Only sound, only sound that you heard was ""no""
Now in this perfect weather
It's like we don't remember
The rain we thought would last forever and ever (forever)

There you'll stand, ten feet tall
I will say, I knew it all along
Your eyes' wider than distance
This life's sweeter than fiction

There you'll stand next to me
All at once, the rest is history
Your eyes' wider than distance
This life's sweeter than fiction, fiction

It's sweeter than fiction
It's sweeter, yeah
It's sweeter than, sweeter
Sweeter than fiction

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Taylor Swift/AUTHOR	NAME/Teardrops On My Guitar/NAME	"CONTENT/Drew looks at me, I fake a smile so he won't see
That I want and I'm needing everything that we should be
I'll bet she's beautiful, that girl he talks about
And she's got everything that I have to live without

Drew talks to me, I laugh 'cause it is so damn funny
That I can't even see anyone when he's with me
He says he's so in love, he's finally got it right,
I wonder if he knows he's all I think about at night

He's the reason for the teardrops on my guitar
The only thing that keeps me wishing on a wishing star
He's the song in the car I keep singing, don't know why I do

Drew walks by me, can he tell that I can't breathe?
And there he goes, so perfectly,
The kind of flawless I wish I could be
She'd better hold him tight, give him all her love
Look in those beautiful eyes and know she's lucky cause

He's the reason for the teardrops on my guitar
The only thing that keeps me wishing on a wishing star
He's the song in the car I keep singing, don't know why I do

So I drive home alone, as I turn out the light
I'll put his picture down and maybe
Get some sleep tonight

Because he's the reason for the teardrops on my guitar
The only one who's got enough of me to break my heart
He's the song in the car I keep singing, don't know why I do
He's the time taken up, but there's never enough
And he's all that I need to fall into

Drew looks at me, I fake a smile so he won't see

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Taylor Swift/AUTHOR	NAME/Tell Me Why/NAME	"CONTENT/I took a chance, I took a shot
And you might think I'm bulletproof, but I'm not
You took a swing, I took it hard
And down here from the ground I see who you are

I'm sick and tired of your attitude
I'm feeling like I don't know you
You tell me that you love me then you cut me down

[Chorus]
And I need you like a heartbeat
But you know you got a mean streak
Makes me run for cover when you're around
And here's to you and your temper
Yes, I remember what you said last night
And I know that you see what you're doing to me
Tell me why

You could write a book on how to ruin someone's perfect day
Well I get so confused and frustrated
Forget what I'm trying to say, oh

I'm sick and tired of your reasons
I got no one to believe in
You tell me that you want me, then push me around

[Chorus]

Why, do you have to make me feel small
So you can feel whole inside
Why, do you have to put down my dreams
So you're the only thing on my mind

Well I'm sick and tired of your attitude
I'm feeling like I don't know you
You tell me that you want me then cut me down
I'm sick and tired of your reasons
I've got no one to believe in

You ask me for my love then you push me around
Here's to you and your temper
Yes, I remember what you said last night
And I know that you see what you're doing to me
Tell me why
Why, tell me why

I take a step back, let you go
I told you I'm not bulletproof
Now you know

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Taylor Swift/AUTHOR	NAME/The Best Day/NAME	"CONTENT/I'm five years old
It's getting cold
I've got my big coat on

I hear your laugh
And look up smiling at you
I run and run
Past the pumpkin patch
And the tractor rides
Look now, the sky is gold
I hug your legs
And fall asleep on the way home

I don't know why all the trees change in the fall
But I know you're not scared of anything at all
Don't know if Snow White's house is near or far away
But I know I had the best day with you today

I'm thirteen now
And don't know how
My friends could be so mean
I come home crying
And you hold me tight
And grab the keys

And we drive and drive
Until we found a town far enough away
And we talk and window shop
'Till I forgotten all their names

I don't know who I'm gonna talk to now at school
But I know I'm laughing
On the car ride home with you
Don't know how long it's gonna take to feel okay
But I know I had the best day with you today

I have an excellent father
His strength is making me stronger
God smiles on my little brother
Inside and out he's better than I am
I grew up in a pretty house
And I've got space to run and hide
And I had the best days with you

There is a video I found
From back when I was three
You set up a paint set in the kitchen
And you're talking to me
It's the age of princesses and pirate ships
And the seven dwarfs
And Daddy's smart
And you're the prettiest lady in the whole wide world

And now I know why the all the trees change in the fall
I know you were on my side
Even when I was wrong
And I love you for giving me your eyes
Staying back and watching me shine

And, I didn't know if you knew
So I'm taking this chance to say
That I had the best day with you today.

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Taylor Swift/AUTHOR	NAME/The Last Time/NAME	"CONTENT/I found myself at your door, just like all those times before
But I'm not sure how I got there
All roads, they lead me here
I imagine you are home, in your room, all alone
And you open your eyes into mine and everything feels better

Right before your eyes I'm breaking
No past, no reasons why
Just you and me

This is the last time I'm asking you this
Put my name at the top of your list
This is the last time I'm asking you why
You break my heart in the blink of an eye, eye, eye

You find yourself at my door, just like all those times before
You wear your best apology
But I was there to watch you leave
And all the time to let you in, just for you to go again
Disappear when you come back
Everything is better

And right before your eyes I'm aching
Run fast, nowhere to hide
Just you and me

This is the last time I'm asking you this
Put my name at the top of your list
This is the last time I'm asking you why
You break my heart in the blink of an eye, eye, eye

This is the last time you tell me I've got it wrong
This is the last time I say it's been you all along
This is the last time I let you in my door
This is the last time, I won't hurt you anymore, ohh

This is the last time I'm asking you this
Put my name at the top of your list
This is the last time I'm asking you why
You break my heart in the blink of an eye

This is the last time I'm asking you this (This is the last time I'm asking
you this)
Put my name at the top of your list (Put my name at the top of your list)
This is the last time I'm asking you why (This is the last time I'm asking you
why)
You break my heart in the blink of an eye (You break my heart)

This is the last time I'm asking you, last time I'm asking you, last time I'm
asking you this
This is the last time I'm asking you, last time I'm asking you, last time I'm
asking you this
This is the last time I'm asking you, last time I'm asking you, last time I'm
asking you this
This is the last time I'm asking you, last time I'm asking you, last time I'm
asking you this

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Taylor Swift/AUTHOR	NAME/Treacherous/NAME	"CONTENT/Put your lips close to mine
As long as they don't touch
Out of focus, eye to eye
Till the gravity is too much
And I'll do anything you say
If you say it with your hands
And I'll be smart to walk away
But you're quick sand

This slope is treacherous
This path is reckless
This slope is treacherous
And I, I, I like it

I can't decide if it's a choice
Getting swept away
I hear the sound of my own voice
Asking you to stay
And all we are is skin and bone trained to get along
Forever going with the flow but you're friction

This slope is treacherous
This path is reckless
This slope is treacherous
I, I, I like it

Two headlights shine through the sleepless night
And I will get you get you alone
Your name has echoed through my mind
And I just think you should think you should know
That nothing safe is worth the driving
And I will follow you follow you home
I follow you follow you home

This hope is treacherous
This day dream is dangerous
This hope is treacherous
I, I, I, I, I, I, I, I, I

Two headlights shine through the sleepless night
And I will get you get you alone
Your name has echoed through my mind
And I just think you should think you should know
That nothing safe is worth the drive
And I will follow you follow you home
I'll follow you, follow you home
I'll follow you, follow you home
I'll follow you, follow you home

This slope is treacherous
I, I, I like it

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Taylor Swift/AUTHOR	NAME/Umbrella/NAME	"CONTENT/You had my heart, we'll never be worlds apart
Maybe in magazines but you'll still be my star
Baby 'cause in the dark, you can't see shiny cars
That's when you need me there, with you I'll always share

Because when the sun shines we'll shine together
Told you I'll be here forever
Said I'll always be your friend
Took an oath, I'ma stick it out to the end

Now that it's raining more than ever
Know that we'll still have each other
You can stand under my umbrella
You can stand under my umbrella-ella-ella-ay-ay-ay
Under my umbrella-ella-ella-ay-ay-ay-ay-ay-ay

Just trying to get your attention

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Taylor Swift/AUTHOR	NAME/Untouchable/NAME	"CONTENT/Untouchable like
A distant diamond sky

I'm reaching out
And I just
Can't tell you why

I'm caught up in you
I'm caught up in you

Untouchable burning
Brighter than the sun
And when you're close
I feel like coming undone

In the middle of the night
When I'm in this dream
It's like
A million little stars
Spelling out your name
You gotta come on, come on
Say that we'll be together
Come on, come on
Little taste of heaven

It's half full
And I won't wait here
All day
I know you're saying
That you'd be here
Anyway

But you're
Untouchable burning
Brighter than the sun
Now that you're close
I feel like coming undone

In the middle of the night
When I'm in this dream
It's like
A million little stars
Spelling out your name
You gotta, come on, come on
Say that we'll be together
Come on, come on

In the middle of the night
Wakin' from this dream
I wanna feel you
By my side
Standing next to me
You gotta, come on, come on
Say that we'll be together
Come on, come on
Little taste of heaven

Oh, oh
Oh, oh
I'm caught
Up in you
Oh, oh
Oh, oh
Oh, oh

It's your
Untouchable burning
Brighter than the sun
Now that you're close
I feel like coming undone

In the middle of the night
When I'm in this dream
It's like
A million little stars
Spelling out your name
You gotta come on, come on
Say that we'll be together
Come on, come on
Oh, oh

In the middle of the night
When I'm in this dream
It's like
A million little stars
Spelling out your name
You gotta, come on, come on
Say that we'll be together
Come on, come on
Come on

In the middle of the night
We can form this dream
I wanna feel you by my side
Standing next to me
You gotta, come on, come on
Say that we'll be together
Come on, come on
Little taste of heaven

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Taylor Swift/AUTHOR	NAME/We Are Never Ever Getting Back Together/NAME	"CONTENT/I remember when we broke up, the first time
Saying, this is it, I've had enough
'Cause like we hadn't seen each other in a month
When you, said you, needed space (what?)
Then you come around again and say
Baby, I miss you and I swear I'm gonna change, trust me
Remember how that lasted for a day?
I say, I hate you, we break up, you call me, I love you

Oh we called it off again last night
But oh, this time I'm telling you, I'm telling you

We are never ever, ever getting back together
We are never ever, ever getting back together
You go talk to your friends, talk to my friends, talk to me
But we are never ever, ever, ever getting back together

Like, ever

I'm really gonna miss you picking fights
And me, falling for it screaming that I'm right
And you, would hide away and find your peace of mind
With some indie record that's much cooler than mine

Oh, you called me up again tonight
But oh, this time I'm telling you, I'm telling you

We are never ever, ever getting back together
We! Are never ever, ever getting back together
You go talk to your friends, talk to my friends, talk to me (talk to me)
But, we are never ever, ever, ever getting back together

Oh yeah, oh yeah, oh yeah
Oh oh oh

I used to think that we were forever ever, ever
And I used to say, never say never
Huh, so he calls me up and he's like, I still love you
And I'm like I just I mean this is exhausting, you know, like
We are never getting back together like, ever

(No!) We are never ever, ever getting back together
We! Are never ever, ever getting back together
You go talk to your friends, talk to my friends, talk to me
But we! Are never ever ever ever getting back together

We, are not getting back together,
We oh, not getting back together

You go talk to your friends, talk to my friends, talk to me (talk to me)
But we are never ever, ever, ever getting back together

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Taylor Swift/AUTHOR	NAME/You Belong With Me/NAME	"CONTENT/You're on the phone with your girlfriend
She's upset
She's going off about something that you said
'Cause she doesn't get your humor like I do
I'm in my room
It's a typical Tuesday night
I'm listening to the kind of music she doesn't like
And she'll never know your story like I do'

But she wears short skirts
I wear T-shirts
She's cheer captain
And I'm on the bleachers
Dreaming about the day when you wake up
And find that what you're looking for has been here the whole time

If you can see I'm the one who understands you
Been here all along so why can't you see
You belong with me
You belong with me

Walkin' the streets with you and your worn-out jeans
I can't help thinking this is how it ought to be
Laughing on a park bench, thinking to myself
Hey isn't this easy

And you've got a smile that could light up this whole town
I haven't seen it in a while since she brought you down
You say your fine
I know you better then that
Hey what you doing with a girl like that

She wears high heels
I wear sneakers
She's cheer captain and I'm on the bleachers
Dreaming about the day when you wake up
And find that what what you're looking for has been here the whole time

If you can see that I'm the one who understands you
Been here all along so why can't you see
You belong with me

Standing by and waiting at your back door
All this time how could you not know
Baby, you belong with me
You belong with me

Oh, I remember you drivin' to my house in the middle of the night
I'm the one who makes you laugh
When you know you're about to cry
And I know your favorite songs
And you tell me about your dreams
I think I know where you belong
I think I know it's with me

Can't you see that I'm the one who understands you
Been here all along so why can't you see
You belong with me

Standing by and waiting at your back door
All this time
How could you not know
Baby you belong with me
You belong with me

You belong with me
Have you ever thought just maybe
You belong with me
You belong with me

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Sam Smith/AUTHOR	NAME/How Will I Know/NAME	"CONTENT/Oh it's you I know, you're the one I dream of
Looks into my eyes, takes me to the clouds above,
Oh I lose control, can't seem to get enough,
When I wake from dream, tell me is it really love,

How will I know if you really love me
I say a prayer with every heart beat
I fall in love whenever we meet
I'm asking you what you know about these things

How will I know if you're thinking of me
I try to call but I'm too shy (can't speak)
Falling in love is so bitter sweet
This love is strong why do I feel weak

Oh wake me, I'm shaking, wish I had you near me now,
Said there's no mistaking, what I feel is really love,

How will I know
How will I know
How will I know
How will I know

How will I know if you really love me
I say a prayer with every heart beat
I fall in love whenever we meet
I'm asking you what you know about these things

How will I know if you're thinking of me
I try to fall but I'm too shy (can't speak)
Falling in love is so bitter sweet
This love is strong why do I feel weak.

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Sam Smith/AUTHOR	NAME/La La La/NAME	"CONTENT/La la, la la la la la na na na na na,
La la na na, la la la la la na na na na na

La la, la la la la la na na na na na,
La la na na, la la la la la na na na na na

Hush, don't speak
When you spit your venom, keep it shut I hate it
When you hiss and preach
About your new messiah 'cause your theories catch fire

I can't find your silver lining
I don't mean to judge
But when you read your speech, it's tiring
Enough is enough

I'm covering my ears like a kid
When your words mean nothing, I go la la la
I'm turning up the volume when you speak
'Cause if my heart can't stop it,
I find a way to block it, I go
La la, la la la la la na na na na na
La la na na, la la la la la na na na na na,
I find a way to block it, I go
La la na na, la la la la la na na na na na [2x]

If our love is running out of time
I won't count the hours, rather be a coward
When our worlds collide
I'm gonna drown you out before I lose my mind

I can't find your silver lining
I don't mean to judge
But when you read your speech, it's tiring
Enough is enough

I'm covering my ears like a kid
When your words mean nothing, I go la la la
I'm turning up the volume when you speak
'Cause if my heart can't stop it,
I find a way to block it, I go
La la, la la la la la na na na na na
La la na na, la la la la la na na na na na,
I find a way to block it, I go
La la, la la la la la na na na na na
La la na na, la la la la la na na na na na,
I find a way to block it, oh
La la, la la la la la na na na na na
La la na na, la la la la la na na na na na,
I find a way to block it, I go
La la na na, la la la la la na na na na na,
La la na na, la la la la la na na na na na,

I'm covering my ears like a kid
When your words mean nothing, I go la la la
I'm turning up the volume when you speak
'Cause if my heart can't stop it,
I find a way to block it, I go

I'm covering my ears like a kid
When your words mean nothing, I go la la la
I'm turning up the volume when you speak
'Cause if my heart can't stop it,
I find a way to block it, I go
La la, la la la la la na na na na na
La la na na, la la la la la na na na na na
La la na na, la la la la la na na na na na
La la na na, la la la la la na na na na na

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Sam Smith/AUTHOR	NAME/Life Support/NAME	"CONTENT/I've been sleeping with the lights on
Cause the darkness is surrounding you
This is my world, this is my choice
And you're the drug that gets me through

I've been waiting for an answer
Because I build this bed for two
I'm just waiting on your answer
I built this bed for me and you

Cause you'll see that I am yours
So will you be my life support
You're my life support
You're my life support

Sick of waiting up in darkness
When the sky is always painted blue
There's a method to my madness
It's clear that you don't have a clue

I've been waiting for an answer
Because I build this bed for two
I'm just waiting on your answer
I built this bed for me and you

Cause you'll see that I am yours
So will you be my life support
You're my life support
You're my life support

Can't you see that I am yours?
So will you be my life support?
I've been sleeping with the lights on
Cause the darkness is surrounding you

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Sam Smith/AUTHOR	NAME/Restart/NAME	"CONTENT/It was a Monday night when you told me it was over, babe
And by the Friday night, I knew that I would be okay
Don't say it was a good thing
Don't say it was the right thing to do
Don't say it was the best thing for the both of us
When I'm the one playing the fool

What do you want from me when I just wanna restart
You keep coming back for me when you're the one who tore us apart
The truth is I'm better on my own
And I don't wanna live in the past
So let me restart
So let me restart
So let me restart

You've been lightin' up my phone
Worried that I'll be alone tonight
Wanna to make sure that I'm fine
But, baby, you're not on my mind, no more
I know it was the best thing for the both of us
Cause you're the one who looks like a fool

What do you want from me when I just wanna restart
You keep coming back for me when you're the one who tore us apart
The truth is I'm better on my own
And I don't wanna live in the past
So let me restart
So let me restart
So let me restart

So let me restart

What do you want from me when I just wanna restart
You keep coming back for me when you're the one who tore us apart
And the truth is I'm better on my own
And I don't wanna live in the past
So let me restart
So let me restart
So let me restart
So let me restart
So let me restart

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Sam Smith/AUTHOR	NAME/Together/NAME	"CONTENT/Kiss my lips and taste the Sauvignon
I wrap the vines around your thighs
I can see the kind of tip you're on
There's no confusion in your eyes

Let's unwind together
Together
Ease our minds together
Together

Taking sips to push the moment on
But it's just the bottle that's run dry
Lose the watch 'cause we got nothing on
And I'm not keeping track of time!

Let's unwind together
Together
Ease our minds together
Together

Together
Together
Together

Ease our minds together
Together
Together
Together
Together
Together
Together
Together
Together

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Sam Smith/AUTHOR	NAME/Writing's On The Wall/NAME	"CONTENT/[Verse 1]
I've been here before
But always hit the floor
I've spent a lifetime running
And I always get away
But with you I'm feeling something
That makes me want to stay

I'm prepared for this
I never shoot to miss
But I feel like a storm is coming
If I'm gonna make it through the day
Then there's no more use in running
This is something I gotta face

[Pre-Chorus]
If I risk it all
Could you break my fall?

[Chorus]
How do I live? How do I breathe?
When you're not here I'm suffocating
I want to feel love, run through my blood
Tell me is this where I give it all up?
For you I have to risk it all
Cause the writing's on the wall

[Verse 2]
A million shards of glass
That haunt me from my past
As the stars begin to gather
And the light begins to fade
When all hope begins to shatter
Know that I won't be afraid

[Pre-Chorus]
If I risk it all
Could you break my fall?

[Chorus]
How do I live? How do I breathe?
When you're not here I'm suffocating
I want to feel love, run through my blood
Tell me is this where I give it all up?
For you I have to risk it all
Cause the writing's on the wall

[Bridge: Instrumental]
The writing's on the wall

[Chorus]
How do I live? How do I breathe?
When you're not here I'm suffocating
I want to feel love, run through my blood
Tell me is this where I give it all up?
How do I live? How do I breathe?
When you're not here I'm suffocating
I want to feel love, run through my blood
Tell me is this where I give it all up?
For you I have to risk it all
Cause the writing's on the wall

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Journey/AUTHOR	NAME/A Better Life/NAME	"CONTENT/Morning sunlight on her face
As he wakes her with a kiss
She's been everything he wanted

They were married as high school sweethearts
Never dreamed it'd be like this
Finding nothing for them comes easy

Trying hard just to make a living
Seems life won't give them a break
Well as long as they've got each other
Ooh, they'll find a way

There's a better life
Waiting out there somewhere
They gotta learn to fly
Need to spread their wings to soar
There's a better life
They'll find it together (keep holding on)
She shows him rainbows every time he sees her smile

They've been more than lovers
There's no mountain they can't climb
Can't stop dreaming dreams together

Gotta rise above the crossroads
Beyond the streets they were born
To a place where prayers are answered
And battles are won

There's a better life
Waiting out there somewhere
They gotta learn to fly
Need to spread their wings to soar
There's a better life
They'll find it together
They keep holding on
It only makes them strong
They wanna learn to fly

Gotta arise above the crossroads
Beyond the streets they were born
To a place where prayers are answered
And battles are won

There's a better life
Waiting out there somewhere
They gotta learn to fly
Need to spread their wings to soar
There's a better life
They'll find it together (keep holding on)
She shows him rainbows every time he sees her smile

There's a better life
(Waiting somewhere)
They gotta learn to fly

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Journey/AUTHOR	NAME/All That Really Matters/NAME	"CONTENT/See the headlines
Have you heard the news
They're tryin' to turn the world upside down
We sit and watch it on TV
Programmed prophets trying to bring us down

Give us a break now
We know it can't all be bad news
Let's get away now
Cause when I'm holding on to you

We're all, we're all that really matters
The time is now
For taking our own chances
We're all, all that really matters

More brain power
Just to keep alive
Some computer trying to shut you down
The world powers watchin' the way you live
On a mission pushing us around

Give us a break now
No way we're gonna lose
We'll find a way now
Cause when I'm making love to you

We're all, we're all that really matters
The time is now
For taking our own chances
We're all, all that really matters

I want to love you
I'm gonna try to make it right
Nothing can touch you
We'll make a dream come true tonight

We're all, we're all that really matters
The time is now
For taking our own chances
We're all, all that really matters

We're all, we're all that really matters
We're all, all that really matters

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Journey/AUTHOR	NAME/All The Way/NAME	"CONTENT/I kiss you and I feel you pull away
It hurts me when I feel you hesitate
Mistakes I've made wish I could take them back
Say it's not too late to hear you

[Chorus]
Speak your heart and I will listen
Don't hold back we'll find what's missing
I'll take you all the way
Close your eyes and think forever
If you believe we go together
I'll take you all the way

Sifting through the memories we have known
Looking back at places we have gone
Let's not leave behind what so few have found
Love ain't always easy so

[Chorus]

I'll take you all the way
I'll take you all the way

From the miles that come between us
To have faith in love and where it leads us

I'll take you all the way
I'll take you all the way

From the miles that come between us
To have faith in love and where it leads us

I'll take you all the way
I'll take you all the way

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Journey/AUTHOR	NAME/Any Way You Want It/NAME	"CONTENT/Any way you want it
That's the way you need it
Any way you want it

She loves to laugh
She loves to sing
She does everything
She loves to move
She loves to groove
She loves the lovin' things

Ooh, all night, all night
Oh, every night
So hold tight, hold tight
Ooh baby, hold tight

Oh,she said,
""Any way you want it
That's the way you need it
Any way you want it""
She said, ""Any way you want it
That's the way you need it
Any way you want it""

I was alone
I never knew
What good love could do
Ooh, then we touched
Then we sang
About the lovin' things

Ooh, all night, all night
Oh, every night
So hold tight, hold tight
Ooh baby, hold tight

Oh, she said,
""Any way you want it
That's the way you need it
Any way you want it""
She said, ""Any way you want it
That's the way you need it
Any way you want it""

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Journey/AUTHOR	NAME/Anytime/NAME	"CONTENT/Ooh, ooh anytime that you want me
Ooh, ooh anytime that you need me
Ooh, ooh anytime that you want me to
Ooh, ooh anytime that you need me

I'm standing here with my arms a mile wide
Hoping and praying for you
Listen to me and enlighten me
I hope that you need me too, 'cause,

Ooh, ooh anytime that you want me
Ooh, ooh anytime that you want me
Ooh, ooh anytime that you want me to
Ooh, ooh anytime that you need me

Give me all of your sunshine
A spark is all I need
To take away, all of the shadows
Well what more can I say.

Anytime at all
Anytime at all
Anytime at all

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Journey/AUTHOR	NAME/Ask The Lonely/NAME	"CONTENT/You've been picked and it's over
What's the chip on your shoulder?
Out side were solid rainbows
Inside is where the heart grows
Picking up the pieces
Something more to believe in

As you search the embers
Think what you've had, remember
Hang on, don't you let go now
You know, with every heartbeat, we love
Nothing comes easy
Hang on, ask the lonely

You've got some fascination
With your high expectations
This love is your obsession
Your heart, your past possession
Let down your defenses
Won't be up to the one who cares

As you search the embers
Think what you've had, remember
Hang on, don't you let go now
You know, with every heartbeat, we love
Nothing comes easy

Hang on, ask the lonely
When you're feeling love's unfair
You just ask the lonely
When you're lost in deep despair
You just ask the lonely

Ask the lonely
When you're down in deep despair
When you're down in deep despair
Ask the lonely
Lonely

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Journey/AUTHOR	NAME/Believe/NAME	"CONTENT/Hold on, hold on
To opportunities you thought long gone
Hold on, hold on
To the could-have-beens and should-have-dones

You can lose yourself along the way
Find there's something new in yesterday

Hold onto your faith and your dreams
Look into yourself and believe
In you

Oh, go on, go on
The stars will guide your journey home, yeah
Oh, it won't be long
'Til you see your diamonds in the stone, yeah

'Cause there's still some magic here tonight
If you just step out into the light

Hold onto your faith and your dreams
Look into yourself and believe

I believe in you, believe in me
I believe in you, believe in me
I believe the truth will set you free, yeah
I believe in you, believe in me

I believe in you, believe in me

(Hold on) Hold on, hold on
To your innocence and your beliefs
Mmm, hold on, hold on
Onto who you are and where you've been

I believe in you, believe in me, yeah
I believe in you, believe in me
Oh, I believe the truth will set you free, yeah, yeah
I believe in you, believe in me

Oh I believe in you, believe in me
Oh I believe in you, believe in me
Yeah I believe the truth will set you free
Oh, I believe in you, believe in me
Oh, whoa, oh yeah, oh yeah

I believe in you (I believe in you)
Darlin', believe in me (Darlin', believe in me)
I believe in you (I believe in you)
Darlin', believe in me (Darlin', believe in me)

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Journey/AUTHOR	NAME/Beyond The Clouds/NAME	"CONTENT/So long ago, has it been that long
Since we felt the sun
Where has it gone to
Has it hid from the world
Have we lost our way

I can remember it filling the sky
And it'd warm my face
The summers were endless
But they're over now
That was yesterday

I know we'll find love again
If we all pray a little
The heart will break free

Beyond the clouds
That's where my soul waits
She's waiting now
Beyond the clouds

Sorrow seems endless
Now there's only so much
That a man can bear
Hold on so tender
To a glimmer of faith
Gets me half way there
I know it will shine again
With some prayer and some patience
We'll find our way home

Beyond the clouds
That's where my soul waits
She's waiting now
Just beyond

Beyond anything you've ever known
Oh, so beautiful
Like a summer sky
Oh, you know it won't be long
If we find the strength I know
There beyond the clouds
We'll find the sun

Beyond the clouds
That's where my soul waits, oh yeah
She's waiting now
Beyond

Beyond the clouds
That's where my love waits
She's waiting now
Beyond the clouds

Yeah, that's it now, oh
Oh, that's it now, baby, oh
Beyond everything you've ever known
Oh, if I could find the strength, I know
We'll find the sun

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Journey/AUTHOR	NAME/Butterfly (She Flies Alone)/NAME	"CONTENT/She never knew the meaning of the word
Or ever heard or felt of freedom
All she knew was looking out from windows
Streaked with her own tears and her own shadows
Within a cage, tried to escape
The silent rage
Cause no one ever listened
Behind her back, she's both wings tied
She will break free
She will not be denied

And so she
She flies alone
High into the great unknown
And no one there to tell her where to go
So she flies
Sweet butterfly

Counting every second, minutes turn to hours
Seems like years
The wait's eternal
Finally passed the point of all lost hope
She will break free
She will not be denied, oh no

And so she
She flies alone
High into the great unknown
And no one there to tell her where to go
So she flies
Like a butterfly, oh
Yeah

Within a cage
Tried to escape the silent rage
But no one ever listened
Behind her back
She's both wings tied
She will break free
She will not be denied

So she
She flies alone
High into the great unknown
She don't need me to tell her where to go
Sweet little butterfly

So she
She flies alone
Up into the great unknown
She don't need me to tell her where she goes
So she flies

Within a cage
Tried to escape the silent rage
Where no one ever listened
Behind her back
She's both wings tied
She will break free
She will break free
Sweet butterfly

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Journey/AUTHOR	NAME/Can Do/NAME	"CONTENT/Did you ever stop to listen
To what you're missin', in the things you say
If you open up your eyes
Than you'll realize, what I say

You can do what you want to
You can do if you try
You can do what you want to
You can do if you try

You take that golden rule
That you learned in school
And just throw it away
If you're well directed
Then you're protected, from the evil ways

You can do what you want to
You can do if you try
You can do what you want to
You can do if you try

You can do what you want to
You can do if you try

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Journey/AUTHOR	NAME/Can't Tame The Lion/NAME	"CONTENT/In the midst of a dream I swear I saw you standing there
In a sea of emotion with faithful devotion you were there
In heat of the night under the street lights once again
At the edge of the fire for the love of the jungle again and again, oh yeah

They can't tame the lion
Can't tame the lion
They can't tame the lion

One night in Detroit, yes I swear I saw you standing there
In a summer of dreams down by the river you were there
I remember it's all so clear
In the midst of a dream, yes I swear I say you standing there

They can't tame the lion
Can't tame the lion
They can't tame the lion

In the midst of a dream I swear I saw you standing there
In a sea of emotion with faithful devotion you were there
I remember it's all so clear
In the embers of reckless years

In the midst of a dream I swear I saw you standing there
They can't tame the lion
Can't tame the lion
They can't tame the lion
At the edge of the fire, for the love of the jungle
They can't tame the lion
Can't tame the lion
They can't tame the lion

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Journey/AUTHOR	NAME/Daydream/NAME	"CONTENT/Shining in the silver moon,
Crystal ships are sailing to the sea.
Dreams the joys of pearls and gold,
And our angel's wings in flight unfold.
Fly, fly by my window,
Flyin' so free, yeah.

Yes, they fly, fly by my window.
Yes, those bright diamonds a-once were stone,
Rollin' down a silver stream.
Yes, those bright diamonds a-once were stone.

Sail on a silver wings of fire,
Sailing dreams beyond the silver moon.
In silver clouds that fly so high,
Live the dreams you search,
But can't find.

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Journey/AUTHOR	NAME/Don't Stop Believin'/NAME	"CONTENT/Just a small town girl
Livin' in a lonely world
She took the midnight train goin' anywhere
Just a city boy
Born and raised in south Detroit
He took the midnight train goin' anywhere

A singer in a smokey room
A smell of wine and cheap perfume
For a smile they can share the night
It goes on and on, and on, and on

[Chorus]
Strangers waiting
Up and down the boulevard
Their shadows searching in the night
Streetlight people
Living just to find emotion
Hiding somewhere in the night

Working hard to get my fill
Everybody wants a thrill
Payin' anything to roll the dice
Just one more time
Some will win, some will lose
Some were born to sing the blues
Oh, the movie never ends
It goes on and on, and on, and on

[Chorus]

Don't stop believin'
Hold on to the feelin'
Streetlights, people

Don't stop believin'
Hold on
Streetlight people

Don't stop believin'
Hold on to the feelin'
Streetlight people

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Journey/AUTHOR	NAME/Feeling That Way/NAME	"CONTENT/Opened my eyes to a new kind of way
All the good times that you saved
Are you feeling,
You feeling that way too
Or am I just,
Am I just a fool

When the summer's gone
She'll be there standing by the light
Once she's bee to where she's gone to
She should know wrong from right

A new road's waiting, you touched my life
Soft and warm on a summer's night
You're the only one, the only one I love
The lovely one, I'm thinking of

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Journey/AUTHOR	NAME/Forever In Blue/NAME	"CONTENT/When she walked into the room
I felt her move me
I saw her eyes
They went right through me
Just one look I was forever in blue

In a spell of her embrace
Just for a moment
I was the one, caught in the moment
I knew, yes, right then I knew

Two hearts, reach for each other
Once chance, she's like no other
I'm lost, lost in the dream of you
'Cause it's true oh
I'm forever, forever in blue

In a fantasy of my anticipation
I knew there was no consolation
I knew, oh I knew

And on the night she told me that
She had another
I was broken by the truth
I discovered, I knew oh I knew

Two hearts, reach for each other
Once chance, she's like no other
I'm lost, lost in the dream of you
'Cause it's true oh
I'm forever, forever in blue... in blue

Believe me girl, I tried not to call
But here I am once again, yes once again
Beside you, with my hands on the wall

Two hearts, reach for each other
Once chance, she's like no other
I'm lost, lost in the dream of you
Those two hearts, reach for each other
Once chance, she's like no other
I'm lost, lost in the dream of you
'Cause it's true oh
I'm forever, forever in blue

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Journey/AUTHOR	NAME/Frontiers/NAME	"CONTENT/Oh yeah
Progress flies, into our lives
Got to find time, find time
Talk digit talk
You're doin' find
Machines never mind
They never mind

[Chorus]
Out on the border
Of a changing skyline
We put hope in front of fear
And all the Heroes
Have gone east of Eden
We all need new frontiers

Oh It's a 3D rise
All technical jive
Talk a video dive
War is for fools
Crisis is cool
Barbarians play

[Chorus]

New, new, frontiers

[Chorus x3]

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Journey/AUTHOR	NAME/Girl Can't Help It/NAME	"CONTENT/If he could hold her, so close in his arms...again
If she could show him
The letter her heart forgot to send...why
They're livin' dreams on their own
Ooh they'll never stop running

The girl can't help it, she needs more
He hasn't found what he's lookin' for
They're still standing in the rain
He can't help it, and she's just that way

And when he calls her
She tells him that she still cares
Under the moonlight,
He wonders why she can't be there...why
Why do they go on alone
When they're missin' each other

The girl can't help it, she needs more
He hasn't found what he's lookin' for
They're still standing in the rain
He can't help it, and she's just that way

The girl can't help it, she needs more
He hasn't found what he's lookin' for
They're still standing in the rain
He can't help it, and she's just that way

There's a fire
Ooh there's a fire in his eyes for you
Don't you know she still cries
Ooh do you know she still cries for you
Fire
Ooh there's a fire in his eyes for you
For you she cries
Ooh do you know she still cries for you
Fire
Ooh there's a fire in his eyes for you
Ooh nothing stands between love and you

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Journey/AUTHOR	NAME/Gone Crazy/NAME	"CONTENT/She fell out of bed and said, I'm leavin' this place
In a hot blooded, red-headed rage
She grabbed her things and slammed out that door
Jumped in the car, said, don't need you no more

She turned on the radio I said, hey, hey babe
Why do you have to treat me this way
She's wrapped up and wound herself way too tight
I think she's finally come loose this time

She's not the same, I can't explain
She's gone away, I don't mean maybe
She's not the same, my burnin' flame
She's gone
She's gone crazy

She's drivin' me crazy

Well I rode down the highway, so she pulled off
Way past the point of gettin' lost
She calls me up on my mobile phone
I said, hey, hey babe
You're in the twilight zone

Call it blind luck but she found a way
Back to the scene where it all took place
And when she walked through that door it's all I could say
Hey, hey babe it's me that's changed

She's not the same, I can't explain
She's gone away, I don't mean maybe
She's not the same, my burnin' flame
She's gone
She's gone crazy

Come on, get out of here
You're drivin' me crazy

I'm not the same, I can't explain
I'm goin' away, I don't mean maybe
I'm not the same
It's me that's changed
She's gone
She's gone crazy

She's gone away, no time to play
She's in the wings
No time to please
Come on, get out of here
She's drivin' me crazy

Go on, get out
Good-bye
Good-bye
Good-bye
Good-bye
Good-bye

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Journey/AUTHOR	NAME/Good Morning Girl/NAME	"CONTENT/Good morning girl, how you been?
Good morning girl, is love within?

I see your face every where.
I see your smile your golden hair.
I see your eyes shinin' through.
Those gentle eyes silver blue.

Good morning girl, how you been?
Good morning girl, is love within?
Good morning girl, it's been long.
Good morning girl, to you this song.

I sing it girl from the heart.
I'll sing it girl from the start.
Good morning girl, how you been?
Good morning girl is love within?

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Journey/AUTHOR	NAME/Happy To Give/NAME	"CONTENT/I was born a believer, played the fool
Lonely dreamer, left to choose
I don't know where the love is, there's a promise undone
Someone's cryin, in a room all alone
Shadows fall, after the hurt is gone
Through it all, we love and we lose

Where is the one, someone who's happy (happy to give)
Happy to be with you, it's here you belong, with someone
Who's happy (happy to give) happy to give you love

A song for the singer, one book of dreams
Take this heartache, away from me
A page in a story, romance untold
Sharing secrets, we call, our own
Shadows fall, after the hurt is gone
Through it all, we love and we lose

Where is the one, someone who's happy (happy to give)
Happy to be with you, it's where you belong, with someone
Who's happy (happy to give) happy to give you love

Happy, happy, oh happy
(Happy to give), ooo happy to give
Oh somebody's happy to give you love,
Your love, your love oh yeah

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Journey/AUTHOR	NAME/I Would Find You/NAME	"CONTENT/Many days have faded away and the time has passed,
Those were memories that have been by so fast,
I can't see you
I can't hear you
But I feel you

I would find you,
I would find you,
Well, I would find you,
I would find you
I would find you

Now that we know that we've been there and the time is running out,
That message was from the Lord without a doubt,
I can't see you
I can't hear you
But I feel you

Could it be that I feel so all alone
It's you that's driving me mad
You won't leave me alone

You have touched my soul
You have touched my soul
Now hear me

Could it be that you feel so all alone?
If it's me that's driving you mad,
Oh, I would leave you alone
Oh yes I would.

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Journey/AUTHOR	NAME/If He Should Break Your Heart/NAME	"CONTENT/Please be wrong
Please don't tell me it's really you
Tell me eyes,tell my heart what I'm goin' through
I believed, I believed I was over you

If he should break your heart
I'll always know where you are
If you should fall apart
I'll be there, I'll be around
If he should break your heart
I'll be there

Is this right
I don't care I'm alone with you
Here we are, once again you've got someone new
Lonely hands, please don't do what you want to do

If he should break your heart
I'll always know where you are
If you should fall apart
I'll be there, I'll be around

If he should break your heart
From my soul I say good-bye yesterday
One more night alone, without the touch of you
Then I start to break is it my mistake
Tell me am I wrong for holdin' on to you

If he should break your heart
I'll always know where you are
If you should fall apart
I'll be there, I'll be around

If he should break you heart, I'll be there
If he should break your, if he should break your
If he should break your heart
I'll be there, I'll be around

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Journey/AUTHOR	NAME/I'll Be Alright Without You/NAME	"CONTENT/I've been thinking 'bout the times
You walked out on me
There were moments I'd believe, you were there
Do I miss you, or am I lying to my self again
I do these things...
(It's all because of you)
I keep holding on, but I'll try
(try not to think of you)
Love don't leave me lonely

I'll be alright without you
There'll be someone else...I keep tellin' myself
I'll be alright without you
Oh...love's an empty face, I can't replace
(you don't need it)
People wonderin' why we broke apart
The great pretender here I go again
These things I do
(It's all because of you)
I'll keep holdin' but I'll try
(try not to think of you)
All I wanted was to hold you

I'll be alright without you
There'll be someone else, I keep tellin' myself
I'll be alright without you
Love's an empty face...Oh I've got to replace

I'll be alright without you
There'll be someone else, I keep tellin' myself
I'll be alright without you
Oh...love's an empty place, I can still see your face
I'll be alright

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Journey/AUTHOR	NAME/In Self-defense/NAME	"CONTENT/The situation's got me rattled
I twist and turn late at night
This whole world's up in shambles
Who's the one to make it right

Missing persons lost in action (action)
Forgotten victims of the night (victims of the night)
They're making crime the main attraction (attraction)
They're making everyone uptight
They're all looking for a fight

In this confusion from day to day
Sometimes fear just makes no sense
In this crossfire I see one way
In self defense

You'll take your chances, Mr. Policeman (policeman)
You're like a cat with thirteen lives (cat with thirteen lives)
Your law and order is our lifeline (lifeline)
Through the danger, you'll survive
I do what I need to stay alive

In this confusion from day to day
Sometimes fear just makes no sense
In this crossfire I see one way
In self defense

In self (self) defense
In self (self) defense

In this confusion from day to day
Sometimes fear just makes no sense
In this crossfire I see one way
In self defense

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Journey/AUTHOR	NAME/In The Morning Day/NAME	"CONTENT/Everybody's got the blues
In the morning day, yeah
If you find the answer
And you wonder
Let's find a way
I want to give you happiness
Just like the sun gives to the day
I'd like to make you mine yeah
I'm gonna make you mine
Just like a blinding dream
Yeah, you're gonna be with me

Strolling through a summer's breeze,
And you find it's not the rain,
Leaving wrong behind you,
All your fantasies so very plain.

I want to give you happiness
Just like the sun gives to the day
I'd like to make you mine, yeah
I'm gonna make you mine
Just like a blinding dream
Yeah, you're gonna be with me.

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Journey/AUTHOR	NAME/Just The Same Way/NAME	"CONTENT/Yesterday was a good day,
It's after midnight and I've got you on my mind.
Come with me never go away,
Every day we will fly, yeah.

[Chorus:]
That's the same way you love me. (That's the same way she loves you).
Ooo, just the same way you do. (Just the same way you do).
Just the same way you love me. (Just the same way she...)
Loves.

Take a chance now the timing's right.
You're free to leave the key to my life.
Stay with me.
Won't you stay the night,
In the mornin' feelin' fine, yeah.

[Chorus]

Oh, no, you should be holdin' on to him girl.
Oh, yeah just like, just like you want to do.
Oh, no, just love and squeeze him girl.
Oh, yeah just love and squeeze him yeah.

[Chorus]

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Journey/AUTHOR	NAME/Lay It Down/NAME	"CONTENT/Lookin' 'round for a feelin'
I love the rhythm and blues
The place was rockin' and reelin'
I thought I'd shake me loose
The band was pumpin' Motown
Lord how they could play
The girls a-started singing
Rock the night away

[Chorus:]
By the midnight hour
They could've raised the dead
They were takin' it higher
Higher, higher, higher, ringin' in my head
Lay it down, lay it down
Lay it down, lay it down

Whiskey, wine and women
They get me though the night
I ain't lookin' for trouble
I ain't lookin' to fight
A little vertical persuasion
Would do me right
What I'm really needin'
Ah, double shot tonight.

By the midnight hour
We were on our way
She was takin' it higher
Higher, higher, higher, then I heard say

[Chorus]

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Journey/AUTHOR	NAME/Like A Sunshower/NAME	"CONTENT/Girl, tell me what's wrong
Are those tears in your eyes
What's going on between us
I'm ready to listen
I don't care if it takes all night
We both said something we didn't mean
We lost our heads
Now I can't sleep
'Til you talk to me
We find the sun through the rain
Caught in a sunshower
We'll be all right, no one's to blame
After the storm, we'll shine
So rare you and me disagree
Love's like a sunshower
When you meet me, babe
Somewhere halfway, yeah
It's been way too long
Since we shared what's in our hearts
Let's say this charade is over
Ooh, we can't take for granted
How far we've come
Let's not lose each other
I know you care, 'cause you stand your ground
When we talked enough
I wanna make up
Wanna make love
We find the sun through the rain
Caught in a sunshower
We'll be alright
No one's to blame
After the storm, we'll shine
So rare you and me disagree
Love's like a sunshower
Baby, babe
Somewhere we'll find
We won't regret
We won't forget
Rainbows wait for you and me
Girl, we're caught in a sunshower
When we've talked enough
Can we make up
Can we make love, ooh
Yeah

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Journey/AUTHOR	NAME/Little Girl/NAME	"CONTENT/It was just the month of May,
Words got in my way, girl I'm so sorry
So I'm reaching out to you,
With the hope to see you through
Just another day

Do you see
the words I'm trying to say,
But words get in my way, girl I really mean it,
Yes I warned you from the start
That I could break your heart
So girl don't stay

Ooh, ooh little girl
Ooh, ooh little girl
ooh, ooh little girl

I'm the fool that plays the part, the one
That broke your heart,
Girl I'm so sorry, so what more can a poor boy do,
I'm reaching out to you,
So now don't you stay

[Chorus]

Shades turn red from green to blue,
What more can I do, I told you this before,
So please walk out hat door
I told you from the start
That love could break your heart,
Girl I'm so sorry, ooh ooh little girl

[Chorus]

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Journey/AUTHOR	NAME/Livin' To Do/NAME	"CONTENT/A message comes down... It's a warning
It's not your time, oh no it ain't but it's coming
Now what makes us think, we're here forever
When life is gone, life is gone, before you know it's over

A church in the rain...a sad congregation
An old friend I knew
When I look at the end...I understand now
I got livin' to do...there's still livin' to do

With every breath, comes deeper meaning
I don't want to waste, I don't want to waste, one single minute
Tears fall from the sky, angles are cryin'
They cry for those...who don't know that they're dyin'

I wait for the sun...a chance at a new day
There's no time to lose
When I look at the end...I understand now
I got lovin' to do...there's still lovin' to do
When I look at the end...I understand now
I got lovin' to do...
Whoa...
There's still livin' to do

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Journey/AUTHOR	NAME/Next/NAME	"CONTENT/Sitting in the corner of a room, thinkin' of you.
Wonderin' what you're doing now we're apart.
No use cryin', tears can't reach you now.
Memories, fulfilling dreams.

You used to be, so good to me,
I can't live without you.
I'd like to be, in your fantasy baby,
Part of you is me, wo-

Walking across the clouds, hope I see you there.
Be it day or nighttime, I don't really care.
Hope you see me too, before I meet my end.
Someone stole my life away, I can't pretend.

(chorus)

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Journey/AUTHOR	NAME/Of A Lifetime/NAME	"CONTENT/The mist is slowly lifting
The sound of life misplaced your mind
You're sitting, spellbound through out time
I hope that you remember what you find
Singin' more of a lifetime

You put it down-all that I'm thinking
but take a long and distant search, when all is right
you take for granted
You can't look down but you're no worse.
Singin' more of a lifetime

The countless visions that are drifting
The silver dreams you hate to lose.
There's no harm. We've all been waiting.
well keep your faith. Do what you choose.
Singin' more of a lifetime

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Journey/AUTHOR	NAME/Oh Sherry/NAME	"CONTENT/Steve Perry

You should've been gone
Knowing how I made you feel
And I should've been gone
After all your words of steel
Oh I must've been a dreamer
And I must've been someone else
And we should've been over

Oh Sherry, our love
Holds on, holds on
Oh Sherry, our love
Holds on, holds on

But I want to let go
You'll go on hurtin' me
You'd be better off alone
If I'm not who you thought I'd be

But you know that there's a fever
Oh that you'll never find nowhere else
Can't you feel it burnin' on and on

[Chorus:]

But I should've been gone
Long ago, far away
And you should've been gone
Now I know just why you stay

[Chorus:]

Oh Sherry, our love
Holds on, holds on

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Journey/AUTHOR	NAME/Pride Of The Family/NAME	"CONTENT/Young blood has got it shakin'
Growin' up, she's changin'
She's so tough to try tame her
These days she just wants to run wild

Short skirt, loves her make up
Plays the flirt, it's daddy's wake up
He's on the edge of teen age shake up
It's so bad he's losing sleep at night

Cause he was young once restless and free
An apple doesn't fall far from a tree

She's the pride of the family
Stands above the crowd, makes them all believe
She's the pride of the family
When it's her time to fly
She's got love on her side

Photographs of her childhood
The years have passed
Where did they run to
Love still lasts the tears they've been through
Time's a thief as precious moments fly by

Dreamy eyes like her mama
Her temper flies like her papa
Her brother's cool and he's never been a bother
But he's someone to turn to
When life ain't feelin' right

Hold on loosely but never let go
The rest she'll have to find out on her own

She's the pride of the family
Stands above the crowd, makes them all believe
She's the pride of the family
When it's her time to fly
She's got love on her side

Hold on loosely but never let go
The rest she'll have to find out on her own

She's the pride of the family
Stands above the crowd, makes them all believe
She's the pride of the family
When it's her time to fly
She's got love on her side

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Journey/AUTHOR	NAME/Raised On Radio/NAME	"CONTENT/Stagger Lee, can you Do The Locomotion
Lucille I hear you knocking but you can't come in
Rockin' Robin, C.C Rider,
A Rama Lama Ding Dong
Let the Good Times Roll
My Sweet Sixteen
I'm Maybelline

The Great Pretender
Returned To Sender
I wonder Why Fools Fall in Love
Yeah, Louie, Louie, loves drive-in movies.
Johnny Angel Rocks Around the Clock

Mister D.J. make a dedication
Cause I'm All Shook Up over Peggy Sue
I'm Mister Blue,
The hits keep rockin' station to station
In the Midnight Hour in the Sea of Love
My Turtle Dove.
When I Found my Thrill, On Blue Berry Hill,
We wrote Love Letters in the Sand.
Be Bop a Lu La,
She Loved Me Tender.
Jungle Lion Sleeps Tonight

Radio, radio
We're all raised on radio, radio
I love my radio
Radio, Radio,
Radio, Radio

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Journey/AUTHOR	NAME/Suzanne/NAME	"CONTENT/I see your face at the movies
I hear your voice on the radio
You're makin' love on the silver screen
I want you more, I know
Temptation...Infatuation...
Suzanne, don't walk away
On no Suzanne, oh girl I'm callin' you
Suzanne, so far away
Remember Suzanne, those summer nights with me

I wonder if you're really happy
And if you saw me, would you know my name
I'm the one you used to hold on to
You're the one who used to wear my ring
Remember...our last September...

Oh Suzanne, don't walk away
On no Suzanne, oh girl I'm callin' you
Suzanne, so far away
Remember Suzanne, those summer nights with me

Remember...our last September...
Suzanne, so far away
Remember Suzanne, those summer nights with me

Suzanne, don't walk away, I love you Suzanne
I'm still callin' you
Suzanne...no no no no no remember
Those summer nights with me, those summer nights

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Journey/AUTHOR	NAME/Trial By Fire/NAME	"CONTENT/Treasures in the jars of clay
Let the light shine out of darkness
Fallen down but not destroyed
It's just another trial by fire

In my song I'll send a prayer
Do you know me, do you hear me
Where the will to face this shame
It's just another trial by fire

Hello Mr. Moon
Can I have some time with you
Trouble keep me runnin'
You can see it comin'
I know who shines down on you

Hello Mr. Moon
I've come back to talk to you
All my life I'm runnin'
From the love that's comin'
Saving grace please pull me through

In my doubt I can't believe
Like a wave tossed where the wind blows
Tears of faith temper my soul
Just another trial by fire
Just another trial by fire

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Journey/AUTHOR	NAME/World Gone Wild/NAME	"CONTENT/See the signs, madness all around us
Somewhere I hear sirens wailing through the night
Read The Times, starts to make me wonder is there
More to life than black and white

I'd never thought I'd question (thought I'd question)
The doubt I'm seeing everywhere (doubt I'm seeing everywhere)
Standing here beside me you're the answer (you're the answer)
When I lose my faith you're there

[Chorus]
Face the fire, in a world gone wild
You're the fortress in my life
Seeing the world through a child's eyes
They can't fool me now
I don't believe it's all a world gone wild

It's a lie, the more you get the more you want, it leads to nowhere
Should have learned by now
What is life without someone to share
The mountains that you climb to reach the sky
With everyone uncertain (everyone uncertain)
The future's never really clear (never really clear)
Standing here beside me you're the reason
I found my faith again with you here

[Chorus]

They can't bring me down
I don't believe it's all a world gone wild

Now you can count on me to keep you safe
I'll be your shelter from the storm
Come lay down with me, and let our spirits melt us into one

[Chorus]

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Journey/AUTHOR	NAME/You're On Your Own/NAME	"CONTENT/Well, try to make up your mind
Well, try to make up your mind, yeah
Now you're on your own, yeah, yeah, baby
Now you're on your own, yeah
There's a new moon rising on the other side
The other side of you
Talk to yourself and someone else
What you tryin' to do
You maybe will, you maybe won't
It's all for you to say
You say you do, and then you don't
It's only you in the way, yeah, yeah, yeah
Baby, now you're on your own
Yeah, yeah, yeah, baby
Hey, now you're on your own, yeah
When the light is gone that left your eyes
I haven't spoke too soon
And now we know your pretty words
Is just another tune
You spoke your mind, you've been quite kind
It's all according to you
Well go inside, keep your pride
I can't get through to you, no no
Now you're on your own
Now you're on your own
Well, try and make up your mind
Well, try and make up your mind

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Leonard Cohen/AUTHOR	NAME/A Singer Must Die/NAME	"CONTENT/Now the courtroom is quiet, but who will confess
Is it true you betrayed us? The answer is ""yes""
Then read me the list of the crimes that are mine
I will ask for the mercy that you love to decline
And all the ladies go moist, and the judge has no choice
A singer must die for the lie in his voice
And I thank you, I thank you for doing your duty
You keepers of truth, you guardians of beauty
Your vision is right, my vision is wrong
I'm sorry for smudging the air with my song

Oh, the night it is thick, my defences are hid
In the clothes of a woman I would like to forgive
In the rings of her silk, in the hinge of her thighs
Where I have to go begging in beauty's disguise
Oh goodnight, goodnight, my night after night

I am so afraid that I listen to you
Your sun glassed protectors they do that to you
It's their ways to detain, their ways to disgrace
Their knee in your balls and their fist in your face
Yes and long live the state by whoever it's made
Sir, I didn't see nothing, I was just getting home late

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Leonard Cohen/AUTHOR	NAME/Alexandra Leaving/NAME	"CONTENT/Suddenly the night has grown colder.
The god of love preparing to depart.
Alexandra hoisted on his shoulder,
They slip between the sentries of the heart.

Upheld by the simplicities of pleasure,
They gain the light, they formlessly entwine
And radiant beyond your widest measure
They fall among the voices and the wine.

It's not a trick, your senses all deceiving,
A fitful dream, the morning will exhaust
Say goodbye to Alexandra leaving.
Then say goodbye to Alexandra lost.

Even though she sleeps upon your satin
Even though she wakes you with a kiss.
Do not say the moment was imagined
Do not stoop to strategies like this.

As someone long prepared for this to happen,
Go firmly to the window. Drink it in.
Exquisite music. Alexandra laughing.
Your firm commitments tangible again.

And you who had the honor of her evening,
And by the honor had your own restored
Say goodbye to Alexandra leaving
Alexandra leaving with her lord.

Even though she sleeps upon your satin
Even though she wakes you with a kiss.
Do not say the moment was imagined
Do not stoop to strategies like this.

As someone long prepared for the occasion
In full command of every plan you wrecked
Do not choose a coward's explanation
that hides behind the cause and the effect.

And you who were bewildered by a meaning
Whose code was broken, crucifix uncrossed
Say goodbye to Alexandra leaving.
Then say goodbye to Alexandra lost.

Say goodbye to Alexandra leaving.
Then say goodbye to Alexandra lost.

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Leonard Cohen/AUTHOR	NAME/Ballad Of The Absent Mare/NAME	"CONTENT/Say a prayer for the cowboy
His mare's run away
And he'll walk til he finds her
His darling, his stray
But the river's in flood
And the roads are awash
And the bridges break up
In the panic of loss.

And there's nothing to follow
There's nowhere to go
She's gone like the summer
Gone like the snow
And the crickets are breaking
His heart with their song
As the day caves in
And the night is all wrong

Did he dream, was it she
Who went galloping past
And bent down the fern
Broke open the grass
And printed the mud with
The iron and the gold
That he nailed to her feet
When he was the lord

And although she goes grazing
A minute away
He tracks her all night
He tracks her all day
Oh blind to her presence
Except to compare
His injury here
With her punishment there

Then at home on a branch
In the highest tree
A songbird sings out
So suddenly
Ah the sun is warm
And the soft winds ride
On the willow trees
By the river side

Oh the world is sweet
The world is wide
And she's there where
The light and the darkness divide
And the steam's coming off her
She's huge and she's shy
And she steps on the moon
When she paws at the sky

And she comes to his hand
But she's not really tame
She longs to be lost
He longs for the same
And she'll bolt and she'll plunge
Through the first open pass
To roll and to feed
In the sweet mountain grass

Or she'll make a break
For the high plateau
Where there's nothing above
And there's nothing below
And it's time for the burden
It's time for the whip
Will she walk through the flame
Can he shoot from the hip

So he binds himself
To the galloping mare
And she binds herself
To the rider there
And there is no space
But there's left and right
And there is no time
But there's day and night

And he leans on her neck
And he whispers low
""Whither thou goest
I will go""
And they turn as one
And they head for the plain
No need for the whip
Ah, no need for the rein

Now the clasp of this union
Who fastens it tight?
Who snaps it asunder
The very next night
Some say the rider
Some say the mare
Or that love's like the smoke
Beyond all repair

But my darling says
""Leonard, just let it go by
That old silhouette
On the great western sky""
So I pick out a tune
And they move right along
And they're gone like the smoke
And they're gone like this song

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Leonard Cohen/AUTHOR	NAME/Be For Real/NAME	"CONTENT/Are you back in my life to stay
Or is it just for today
Oh that you're gonna need me?
If it's a thrill you're looking for
Honey, I'm flexible. Oh, yeah.
Just be for real won't you, Baby
Be for real oh, Baby
You see I, I don't want to be hurt by love again

So you see I'm not naive.
I just would like to believe
Ah what you tell me.
So don't give me the world today
And tomorrow take it away.
Don't do that to me, darling.

Just be for real won't you, Baby
Be for real won't you, Baby

Been hurt so many times
You see I, I don't want to be hurt by love again.

(I don't give a damn about the truth, Baby
Except for the naked truth. Oh yeah)

Just be for real won't you, Baby
Be for real won't you, Baby

No, no, no, no
It's just that I, I don't want to be hurt by love again.

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Leonard Cohen/AUTHOR	NAME/Blessed Is The Memory/NAME	"CONTENT/I remember the promise
That you made in the barn
When the kittens were born
And you could not keep warm
So you moved away the mountain
That the sun rose behind
And you said yourself a prayer
And laid down with the blind
But you lost them in your freedom
And you need him now, you're wild
Blessed is the memory
Of everybody's child
And the vow of compassion
That you swore through your teeth
When the war began to end
And the photographs weep
Well, nobody blames you
As the train pulls away
With its cargo of snow
For these German paper-weights
But you lost them in your freedom
And you need him now, you're wild
Blessed is the memory
Of everybody's child
Well, its five in the morning
There's no one home
Except for your wife
And your child on the phone
Somebody's got to listen
To a promise or two
Oh, this room is far too small
For a pilgrim like you
But you lost them in your freedom
And you need him now, you're wild
Blessed is the memory
Of everybody's child
So, now that you've decided
To follow the sun
Like a shadow of birds
Or a King on the run
Oh, your chains are too dark
For the seas you must swim
You're smiling at the seaweed
But your smile is too grim
But you lost them in your freedom
And you need him now, you're wild
Blessed is the memory
Of everybody's child
Blessed is the memory
Of everybody's child
Blessed is the memory
Of everybody's child

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Leonard Cohen/AUTHOR	NAME/Came So Far For Beauty/NAME	"CONTENT/I came so far for beauty
I left so much behind
My patience and my family
My masterpiece unsigned

I thought I'd be rewarded
For such a lonely choice
And surely she would answer
To such a very hopeless voice

I practiced all my sainthood
I gave to one and all
But the rumors of my virtue
They moved her not at all

I changed my style to silver
I changed my clothed to black
And where I would surrender
Now I would attack

I stormed the old casino
For the money and the flesh
And I myself decided
What was rotten and what was fresh

And men to do my bidding
And broken bones to teach
The value of my pardon
The shadow of my reach

But no, I could not touch her
With such a heavy hand
Her star beyond my order
Her nakedness unmanned

I came so far for beauty
I left so much behind
My patience and my family
My masterpiece unsigned

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Leonard Cohen/AUTHOR	NAME/Come Healing/NAME	"CONTENT/O gather up the brokenness
And bring it to me now
The fragrance of those promises
You never dared to vow

The splinters that you carry
The cross you left behind
Come healing of the body
Come healing of the mind

And let the heavens hear it
The penitential hymn
Come healing of the spirit
Come healing of the limb

Behold the gates of mercy
In arbitrary space
And none of us deserving
The cruelty or the grace

O solitude of longing
Where love has been confined
Come healing of the body
Come healing of the mind

O see the darkness yielding
That tore the light apart
Come healing of the reason
Come healing of the heart

O troubled dust concealing
An undivided love
The heart beneath is teaching
To the broken heart above

Let the heavens falter
Let the earth proclaim
Come healing of the altar
Come healing of the name

O longing of the branches
To lift the little bud
O longing of the arteries
To purify the blood

And let the heavens hear it
The penitential hymn
Come healing of the spirit
Come healing of the limb

O let the heavens hear it
The penitential hymn
Come healing of the spirit
Come healing of the limb

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Leonard Cohen/AUTHOR	NAME/Coming Back To You/NAME	"CONTENT/Maybe I'm still hurting
I can't turn the other cheek
But you know that I still love you
It's just that I can't speak
I looked for you in everyone
And they called me on that too
I lived alone but I was only
Coming back to you

Ah they're shutting down the factory now
Just when all the bills are due
And the fields they're under lock and key
Tho' the rain and the sun come through
And springtime starts but then it stops
In the name of something new
And all the senses rise against this
Coming back to you

And they're handing down my sentence now
And I know what I must do
Another mile of silence while I'm
Coming back to you

There are many in your life
And many still to be
Since you are a shining light
There's many that you'll see
But I have to deal with envy
When you choose the precious few
Who've left their pride on the other side of
Coming back to you

Even in your arms I know
I'll never get it right
Even when you bend to give me
Comfort in the night
I've got to have your word on this
Or none of it is true
And all I've said was just instead of
Coming back to you

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Leonard Cohen/AUTHOR	NAME/Dance Me To The End Of Love/NAME	"CONTENT/Dance me to your beauty with a burning violin
Dance me through the panic 'til I'm gathered safely in
Lift me like an olive branch and be my homeward dove
Dance me to the end of love
Dance me to the end of love

Oh let me see your beauty when the witnesses are gone
Let me feel you moving like they do in Babylon
Show me slowly what I only know the limits of
Dance me to the end of love
Dance me to the end of love
Dance me to the wedding now, dance me on and on
Dance me very tenderly and dance me very long
We're both of us beneath our love, we're both of us above
Dance me to the end of love
Dance me to the end of love

Dance me to the children who are asking to be born
Dance me through the curtains that our kisses have outworn
Raise a tent of shelter now, though every thread is torn
Dance me to the end of love

Dance me to your beauty with a burning violin
Dance me through the panic till I'm gathered safely in
Touch me with your naked hand or touch me with your glove
Dance me to the end of love
Dance me to the end of love
Dance me to the end of love

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Leonard Cohen/AUTHOR	NAME/Death Of A Ladies' Man/NAME	"CONTENT/Ah the man she wanted all her life was hanging by a thread
""I never even knew how much I wanted you,"" she said.
His muscles they were numbered and his style was obsolete.
""O baby, I have come too late."" She knelt beside his feet.
""I'll never see a face like yours in years of men to come
I'll never see such arms again in wrestling or in love.""
And all his virtues burning in the smoky Holocaust
She took unto herself most everything her lover lost
Now the master of this landscape he was standing at the view
With a sparrow of St. Francis that he was preaching to
She beckoned to the sentry of his high religious mood
She said, ""I'll make a place between my legs,
I'll show you solitude.""

He offered her an orgy in a many mirrored room
He promised her protection for the issue of her womb
She moved her body hard against a sharpened metal spoon
She stopped the bloody rituals of passage to the moon

She took his much admired oriental frame of mind
And the heart-of-darkness alibi his money hides behind
She took his blonde Madonna and his monastery wine
""This mental space is occupied and everything is mine.""

He tried to make a final stand beside the railway track
She said, ""The art of longing's over and it's never coming back.""
She took his tavern parliament, his cap, his cocky dance,
She mocked his female fashions and his working-class mustache.

The last time that I saw him he was trying hard to get
A woman's education but he's not a woman yet
And the last time that I saw her she was living with some boy
Who gives her soul an empty room and gives her body joy.

So the great affair is over but whoever would have guessed
It would leave us all so vacant and so deeply unimpressed
It's like our visit to the moon or to that other star
I guess you go for nothing if you really want to go that far.

It's like our visit to the moon or to that other star
I guess you go for nothing if you really want to go that far.

It's like our visit to the moon or to that other star
I guess you go for nothing if you really want to go that far.

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Leonard Cohen/AUTHOR	NAME/Democracy/NAME	"CONTENT/It's coming through a hole in the air,
From those nights in Tiananmen Square.
It's coming from the feel
That this ain't exactly real,
Or it's real, but it ain't exactly there.
From the wars against disorder,
From the sirens night and day,
From the fires of the homeless,
From the ashes of the gay:
Democracy is coming to the U.S.A.

It's coming through a crack in the wall
On a visionary flood of alcohol
From the staggering account
Of the Sermon on the Mount
Which I don't pretend to understand at all.
It's coming from the silence
On the dock of the bay,
From the brave, the bold, the battered
Heart of Chevrolet
Democracy is coming to the U.S.A.

It's coming from the sorrow in the street,
The holy places where the races meet
From the homicidal bitchin'
That goes down in every kitchen
To determine who will serve and who will eat.
From the wells of disappointment
Where the women kneel to pray
For the grace of God in the desert here
And the desert far away:
Democracy is coming to the U.S.A.

Sail on, sail on
O mighty Ship of State!
To the Shores of Need
Past the Reefs of Greed
Through the Squalls of Hate
Sail on, sail on, sail on, sail on.

It's coming to America first,
The cradle of the best and of the worst.
It's here they got the range
And the machinery for change
And it's here they got the spiritual thirst.
It's here the family's broken
And it's here the lonely say
That the heart has got to open
In a fundamental way:
Democracy is coming to the U.S.A.

It's coming from the women and the men.
O baby, we'll be making love again.
We'll be going down so deep
The river's going to weep,
And the mountain's going to shout Amen!
It's coming like the tidal flood
Beneath the lunar sway,
Imperial, mysterious,
In amorous array
Democracy is coming to the U.S.A.

Sail on, sail on

I'm sentimental, if you know what I mean
I love the country but I can't stand the scene.
And I'm neither left or right
I'm just staying home tonight,
Getting lost in that hopeless little screen.
But I'm stubborn as those garbage bags
That Time cannot decay,
I'm junk but I'm still holding up
This little wild bouquet
Democracy is coming to the U.S.A.

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Leonard Cohen/AUTHOR	NAME/Do I Have To Dance All Night/NAME	"CONTENT/I'm Forty-One, the moon is full,
You make love very well.
You touch me like I touch myself,
I like you Mademoiselle.
You're so fresh and you're so new,
I do enjoy you, Miss.
There's nothing I would rather do
Than move around just like this
But do I have to dance all night?
But do I have to dance all night?
Ooh tell me, Bird of Paradise,
Do I have to dance all night?
You never really have to tell me what
You really think of me - alright.
Let's say I'm doing fine,
But do I have to dance all night?
Do I have to dance all night? ...
I learned this step a while ago.
I had to practice it while everybody slept.
I waited half my life for you, you know,
I didn't even think that you'd accept.
And here you are before me in the flesh
Saying ""Yes, yes, yes!""
But do I have to dance all night? ...
I learned this step a while ago ...
But do I have to dance all night? ...

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Leonard Cohen/AUTHOR	NAME/Don't Go Home With Your Hard-On/NAME	"CONTENT/I was born in a beauty salon
My father was a dresser of hair
My mother was a girl you could call on
When you called she was always there [Repeat: x5]

Ah but don't go home with your hard-on
It will only drive you insane
You can't shake it (or break it) with your Motown
You can't melt it down in the rain

You can't melt it down in the rain
You can't melt it down in the rain
You can't melt it down in the rain

I've looked behind all of the faces
That smile you down to you knees
And the lips that say, Come on, taste us
And when you try to they make you say Please

When you try to they make you say Please
When you try to they make you say Please
When you try to they make you say Please
When you try to they make you say Please

Ah but don't go home with your hard-on

Here come's your bride with her veil on
Approach her, you wretch, if you dare
Approach her, you ape with your tail on
Once you have her she'll always be there

Once you have her she'll always be there [Repeat: x4]

Ah but don't go home with your hard-on

So I work in that same beauty salon
I'm chained to the old masquerade
The lipstick, the shadow, the silicone
I follow my father's trade

I follow my father's trade
Yes I follow my father's trade
Yes I follow my father's trade
Yes I follow my father's trade

Ah but don't go home with your hard-on
It will only drive you insane
You can't shake it (or break it) with your Motown
You can't melt it down in the rain [Repeats]

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Leonard Cohen/AUTHOR	NAME/Famous Blue Raincoat/NAME	"CONTENT/It's four in the morning, the end of December
I'm writing you now just to see if you're better
New York is cold, but I like where I'm living
There's music on Clinton Street all through the evening.

I hear that you're building your little house deep in the desert
You're living for nothing now, I hope you're keeping some kind of record.

Yes, and Jane came by with a lock of your hair
She said that you gave it to her
That night that you planned to go clear
Did you ever go clear?

Ah, the last time we saw you you looked so much older
Your famous blue raincoat was torn at the shoulder
You'd been to the station to meet every train
And you came home without Lili Marlene

And you treated my woman to a flake of your life
And when she came back she was nobody's wife.

Well I see you there with the rose in your teeth
One more thin gypsy thief
Well I see Jane's awake

She sends her regards.
And what can I tell you my brother, my killer
What can I possibly say?
I guess that I miss you, I guess I forgive you
I'm glad you stood in my way.

If you ever come by here, for Jane or for me
Well your enemy is sleeping, and his woman is free.

Yes, and thanks, for the trouble you took from her eyes
I thought it was there for good so I never tried.

And Jane came by with a lock of your hair
She said that you gave it to her
That night that you planned to go clear

Sincerely L Cohen

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Leonard Cohen/AUTHOR	NAME/Field Commander Cohen/NAME	"CONTENT/Field Commander Cohen, he was our most important spy.
Wounded in the line of duty,
Parachuting acid into diplomatic cocktail parties,
Urging Fidel Castro to abandon fields and castles.
Leave it all and like a man,
Come back to nothing special,
Such as waiting rooms and ticket lines,
Silver bullet suicides,
And messianic ocean tides,
And racial roller-coaster rides
And other forms of boredom advertised as poetry.
I know you need your sleep now,
I know your life's been hard.
But many men are falling,
Where you promised to stand guard.

I never asked but I heard you cast your lot along with the poor.
But then I overheard your prayer,
That you be this and nothing more
Than just some grateful faithful woman's favorite singing millionaire,
The patron Saint of envy and the grocer of despair,
Working for the Yankee Dollar.

I know you need your sleep now

Ah, lover come and lie with me, if my lover is who you are,
And be your sweetest self awhile until I ask for more, my child.
Then let the other selves be wrong, yeah, let them manifest and come
Till every taste is on the tongue,
Till love is pierced and love is hung,
And every kind of freedom done, then oh,
Oh my love, oh my love, oh my love,
Oh my love, oh my love, oh my love.

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Leonard Cohen/AUTHOR	NAME/Fingerprints/NAME	"CONTENT/I touched you once too often
Now I don't know who I am
My fingerprints were missing
When I wiped away the jam
Yes I called my fingerprints all night
But they don't seem to care
The last time that I saw them
They were leafing through your hair

Fingerprints, fingerprints
Where are you now my fingerprints?

Yeah I thought I'd leave this morning
So I emptied out your drawer
A hundred thousand fingerprints
They floated to the floor

You know you hardly stopped to pick them up
You don't care what you lose
Ah you don't even seem to know
Whose fingerprints are whose

Fingerprints, fingerprints
Where are you now my fingerprints?

And now you want to marry me
You want to take me down the aisle
You want to throw confetti fingerprints
You know that's not my style

O sure I'd like to marry you
But I can't face the dawn
With any girl who knew me
When my fingerprints were on

Fingerprints, fingerprints
Where are you now my fingerprints?

Fingerprints, oh fingerprints
Where are you now my fingerprints?

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Leonard Cohen/AUTHOR	NAME/First We Take Manhattan/NAME	"CONTENT/They sentenced me to twenty years of boredom
For trying to change the system from within
I'm coming now, I'm coming to reward them
First we take Manhattan, then we take Berlin

I'm guided by a signal in the heavens
I'm guided by this birthmark on my skin
I'm guided by the beauty of our weapons
First we take Manhattan, then we take Berlin

I'd really like to live beside you, baby
I love your body and your spirit and your clothes
But you see that line there moving through the station?
I told you, I told you, told you, I was one of those

Ah you loved me as a loser, but now you're worried that I just might win
You know the way to stop me, but you don't have the discipline
How many nights I prayed for this, to let my work begin
First we take Manhattan, then we take Berlin

I don't like your fashion business mister
And I don't like these drugs that keep you thin
I don't like what happened to my sister
First we take Manhattan, then we take Berlin

I'd really like to live beside you, baby

And I thank you for those items that you sent me
The monkey and the plywood violin
I practiced every night, now I'm ready
First we take Manhattan, then we take Berlin

I am guided

Ah remember me, I used to live for music
Remember me, I brought your groceries in
Well it's Father's Day and everybody's wounded
First we take Manhattan, then we take Berlin

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Leonard Cohen/AUTHOR	NAME/Go No More A-Roving/NAME	"CONTENT/[Dedicated to Irving Layton]

So we'll go no more a-roving
So late into the night,
Though the heart be still as loving,
And the moon be still as bright.
For the sword outwears its sheath,
And the soul outwears the breast,
And the heart must pause to breathe,
And love itself have rest.
Though the night was made for loving,
And the day returns too soon,
Yet we'll go no more a-roving
By the light of the moon.

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Leonard Cohen/AUTHOR	NAME/God Is Alive, Magic Is Afoot/NAME	"CONTENT/(Lyrics: Cohen, Recorded By Buffy Sainte-Marie)

God is alive, magic is afoot
God is alive, magic is afoot
God is alive, magic is afoot
God is afoot, magic is alive
Alive is afoot, magic never died
God never sickened
Many poor men lied
Many sick men lied
Magic never weakened
Magic never hid
Magic always ruled
God is afoot, God never died
God was ruler
Though his funeral lengthened
Though his mourners thickened
Magic never fled
Though his shrouds were hoisted
The naked God did live
Though his words were twisted
The naked magic thrived
Though his death was published
Round and round the world
The heart did not believe

Many hurt men wondered
Many struck men bled
Magic never faltered
Magic always lead
Many stones were rolled
But God would not lie down
Many wild men lied
Many fat men listened
Though they offered stones
Magic still was fed
Though they locked their coffers
God was always served
Magic is afoot, God is alive
Alive is afoot

Alive is in command
Many weak men hungered
Many strong men thrived
Though they boast of solitude
God was at their side
Nor the dreamer in his cell
Nor the captain on the hill
Magic is alive
Though his death was pardoned
Round and round the world
The heart would not believe

Though laws were carved in marble
They could not shelter men
Though altars built in parliaments
They could not order men
Police arrested magic and magic went with them
Mmmmm.... For magic loves the hungry
But magic would not tarry
It moves from arm to arm
It would not stay with them
Magic is afoot
It cannot come to harm
It rests in an empty palm
It spawns in an empty mind
But magic is no instrument
Magic is the end
Many men drove magic
But magic stayed behind
Many strong men lied
They only passed through magic
And out the other side
Many weak men lied
They came to God in secret
And though they left Him nourished
They would not tell who healed
Though mountains danced before them
They said that God was dead
Though his shrouds were hoisted
The naked God did live
This I mean to whisper to my mind
This I mean to laugh within my mind
This I mean my mind to serve
Til' service is but magic
Moving through the world
And mind itself is magic
Coursing through the flesh
And flesh itself is magic
Dancing on a clock
And time itself
The magic length of God

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Leonard Cohen/AUTHOR	NAME/Hallelujah/NAME	"CONTENT/Now I've heard there was a secret chord
That David played, and it pleased the Lord
But you don't really care for music, do you?
It goes like this
The fourth, the fifth
The minor fall, the major lift
The baffled king composing Hallelujah

Hallelujah
Hallelujah
Hallelujah
Hallelujah

Your faith was strong but you needed proof
You saw her bathing on the roof
Her beauty and the moonlight overthrew her
She tied you
To a kitchen chair
She broke your throne, and she cut your hair
And from your lips she drew the Hallelujah

Hallelujah, Hallelujah
Hallelujah, Hallelujah
You say I took the name in vain
I don't even know the name
But if I did, well really, what's it to you?
There's a blaze of light
In every word
It doesn't matter which you heard
The holy or the broken Hallelujah

Hallelujah, Hallelujah
Hallelujah, Hallelujah

I did my best, it wasn't much
I couldn't feel, so I tried to touch
I've told the truth, I didn't come to fool you
And even though
It all went wrong
I'll stand before the Lord of Song
With nothing on my tongue but Hallelujah

Hallelujah, Hallelujah
Hallelujah, Hallelujah
Hallelujah, Hallelujah
Hallelujah, Hallelujah
Hallelujah, Hallelujah
Hallelujah, Hallelujah
Hallelujah, Hallelujah
Hallelujah, Hallelujah
Hallelujah

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Leonard Cohen/AUTHOR	NAME/Here It Is/NAME	"CONTENT/Here is your crown
And your seal and rings
And here is your love
For all things.

Here is your cart,
And your cardboard and piss
And here is your love
For all of this.

May everyone live,
And may everyone die.
Hello, my love,
And my love, Goodbye.

Here is your wine,
And your drunken fall
And here is your love.
Your love for it all.

Here is your sickness.
Your bed and your pan
And here is your love
For the woman, the man.

May everyone live,
And may everyone die.
Hello, my love,
And, my love, Goodbye.

And here is the night,
The night has begun
And here is your death
In the heart of your son.

And here is the dawn,
(Until death do us part)
And here is your death,
In your daughter's heart.

May everyone live,
And may everyone die.
Hello, my love,
And, my love, Goodbye.

And here you are hurried,
And here you are gone
And here is the love,
That it's all built upon.

Here is your cross,
Your nails and your hill
And here is your love,
That lists where it will

May everyone live,
And may everyone die.
Hello, my love,
And my love, Goodbye.

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Leonard Cohen/AUTHOR	NAME/Hey, That's No Way To Say Goodbye/NAME	"CONTENT/Leonard Cohen - Hey, That's No Way To Say Goodbye

I loved you in the morning, our kisses deep and warm,
Your hair upon the pillow like a sleepy golden storm,
Yes, many loved before us, I know that we are not new,
In city and in forest they smiled like me and you,
But now it's come to distances and both of us must try,
Your eyes are soft with sorrow,
Hey, that's no way to say goodbye.

I'm not looking for another as I wander in my time,
Walk me to the corner, our steps will always rhyme
You know my love goes with you as your love stays with me,
It's just the way it changes, like the shoreline and the sea,
But let's not talk of love or chains and things we can't untie,
Your eyes are soft with sorrow,
Hey, that's no way to say goodbye.

I loved you in the morning, our kisses deep and warm,
Your hair upon the pillow like a sleepy golden storm,
Yes many loved before us, I know that we are not new,
In city and in forest they smiled like me and you,
But let's not talk of love or chains and things we can't untie,
Your eyes are soft with sorrow,
Hey, that's no way to say goodbye.

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Leonard Cohen/AUTHOR	NAME/Humbled In Love/NAME	"CONTENT/Do you remember all of those pledges
That we pledged in the passionate night
Ah they're soiled now, they're torn at the edges
Like moths on a still yellow light
No penance serves to renew them
No massive transfusions of trust
Why not even revenge can undo them
So twisted these vows and so crushed

And you say you've been humbled in love
Cut down in your love
Forced to kneel in the mud next to me
Ah but why so bitterly turn from the one
Who kneels there as deeply as thee

Children have takes these pledges
They have ferried them out of the past
Oh beyond all the graves and the hedges
Where love must go hiding at last
And here where there is no description
Oh here in the moment at hand
No sinner need rise up forgiven
No victim need limp to the stand

And you say you've been humbled in love
And look dear heart, look at the virgin
Look how she welcomes him into her gown
Yes, and mark how the stranger's cold armour
Dissolves like a star falling down
Why trade this vision for desire
When you may have them both
You will never see a man this naked
I will never hold a woman this close

And you say you've been humbled in love

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Leonard Cohen/AUTHOR	NAME/I'm Your Man/NAME	"CONTENT/If you want a lover,
I'll do anything you ask me to
And if you want another kind of love,
I'll wear a mask for you
If you want a partner, take my hand
Or if you want to strike me down in anger,
Here I stand
I'm your man

If you want a boxer,
I will step into the ring for you
And if you want a doctor,
I'll examine every inch of you
If you want a driver, climb inside
Or if you want to take me for a ride,
You know you can
I'm your man

Ah, the moon's too bright
The chain's too tight
The beast won't go to sleep
I've been running through these promises to you
That I made and I could not keep
But a man never got a woman back,
Not by begging on his knees
Or I'd crawl to you baby
And I'd fall at your feet
And I'd howl at your beauty
Like a dog in heat
And I'd claw at your heart
And I'd tear at your sheet
I'd say please, please
I'm your man

And if you've got to sleep
A moment on the road,
I will steer for you
And if you want to work the street alone,
I'll disappear for you
If you want a father for your child,
Or only want to walk with me a while
Across the sand
I'm your man

(If you want a lover)

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Leonard Cohen/AUTHOR	NAME/Jazz Police/NAME	"CONTENT/Can you tell me why the bells are ringing?
Nothing's happened in a million years
I've been sitting here since Wednesday morning
Wednesday morning can't believe my ears
Jazz police are looking through my folders
Jazz police are talking to my niece
Jazz police have got their final orders
Jazzer, drop your axe, it's Jazz police!

Jesus taken serious by the many
Jesus taken joyous by a few
Jazz police are paid by J. Paul Getty
Jazzers paid by J. Paul Getty II

Jazz police I hear you calling
Jazz police I feel so blue
Jazz police I think I'm falling,
I'm falling for you

Wild as any freedom loving racist
I applaud the actions of the chief
Tell me now oh beautiful and spacious
Am I in trouble with the Jazz police?

Jazz police are looking through my folders

They will never understand our culture
They'll never understand the Jazz police
Jazz police are working for my mother
Blood is thicker margarine than grease

Let me be somebody I admire
Let me be that muscle down the street
Stick another turtle on the fire
Guys like me are mad for turtle meat

Jazz police I hear you calling
Jazz police I feel so blue
Jazz police I think I'm falling,
I'm falling for you

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Leonard Cohen/AUTHOR	NAME/Love Calls You By Your Name/NAME	"CONTENT/You thought that it could never happen
To all the people that you became,
Your body lost in legend, the beast so very tame.
But here, right here,
Between the birthmark and the stain,
Between the ocean and your open vein,
Between the snowman and the rain,
Once again, once again,
Love calls you by your name.

The women in your scrapbook
Whom you still praise and blame,
You say they chained you to your fingernails
And you climb the halls of fame.
Oh but here, right here,
Between the peanuts and the cage,
Between the darkness and the stage,
Between the hour and the age,
Once again, once again,
Love calls you by your name.

Shouldering your loneliness
Like a gun that you will not learn to aim,
You stumble into this movie house,
Then you climb, you climb into the frame.
Yes, and here, right here
Between the moonlight and the lane,
Between the tunnel and the train,
Between the victim and his stain,
Once again, once again,
Love calls you by your name.

I leave the lady meditating
On the very love which I, I do not wish to claim,
I journey down the hundred steps,
But the street is still the very same.
And here, right here,
Between the dancer and his cane,
Between the sailboat and the drain,
Between the newsreel and your tiny pain,
Once again, once again,
Love calls you by your name.

Where are you, Judy, where are you, Anne?
Where are the paths your heroes came?
Wondering out loud as the bandage pulls away,
Was I, was I only limping, was I really lame?
Oh here, come over here,
Between the windmill and the grain,
Between the sundial and the chain,
Between the traitor and her pain,
Once again, once again,
Love calls you by your name.

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Leonard Cohen/AUTHOR	NAME/Misty Blue (outtake From Recent Songs)/NAME	"CONTENT/Oh but it's been such a long, long time.
Thought I'd got you off my mind.
Looks like I can't, just the thought of you
Turns my whole world a misty blue.
Just the mention of your name
Fans the flicker to a flame.
I can't forget the things we used to do.
My whole world turns misty blue.
You know I should forget you
I really should,
And heaven knows that I tried.
But when I told you,
When I said that we were through
Deep in my heart I lied
Baby, oh what a long, long time.
Thought I'd get you off my mind.
Oh but I can't, just the thought of you
Turns my world misty blue
And the very mention of your name
Fans the flicker to a flame.
I think of things we used to do,
My whole world turns misty blue.

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Leonard Cohen/AUTHOR	NAME/Never Any Good/NAME	"CONTENT/I was never any good at loving you
I was never any good at coming
Through for you
You're going to feel much better
When you cut me loose forever
I was never any good
Never any good
I was never any good at loving you

I was dying when we met
I bet my life on you
But you called me and I folded
Like you knew I'd do
You called my ace, my king, my bluff
Okay, you win, enough's enough
I was never any good
Never any good
I was never any good at loving you

I was pretty good at taking out
The garbage
Pretty good at holding up the wall
Dealing with the fire and the earthquake
But that don't count
That don't count
That don't count for nothing much at all

I was never any good at loving you
I was just a tourist in your bed looking
At the view
But I can't forget where my lips
Have been
Those holy hills, that deep ravine
I was never any good
Never any good
I was never any good at loving you

I was pretty good at taking out the garbage
Pretty good at holding up the wall
I'm sorry for my crimes against
The moonlight
I didn't think
I didn't think
I didn't think the moon would mind at all

I was never any good at loving you
At doing what a woman really wants
A man to do
You're going to feel much better
When you cut me loose forever
I was never any good
Never any good
I was never any good at loving you

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Leonard Cohen/AUTHOR	NAME/Priests/NAME	"CONTENT/And who will write love songs for you
When I am lord at last
And your body is some little highway shrine
That all my priests have passed,
That all my priests have passed?

My priests they will put flowers there,
They will stand before the glass,
But they'll wear away your little window, love,
They will trample on the grass,
They will trample on the grass.

And who will aim the arrow
That men will follow through your grace
When I am lord of memory
And all your armour has turned to lace,
And all your armour has turned to lace?

The simple life of heroes,
And the twisted life of saints,
They just confuse the sunny calendar
With their red and golden paints,
With their red and golden paints.

And all of you have seen the dance,
That God has kept from me,
But he has seen me watching you
When all your minds were free
When all your minds were free.

And who will write love songs for you ...

My priests they will put flowers there ...

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Leonard Cohen/AUTHOR	NAME/Queen Victoria/NAME	"CONTENT/Queen Victoria,
My father and all his tobacco loved you,
I love you too in all your forms,
The slim and lovely virgin floating among German beer,
The mean governess of the huge pink maps,
The solitary mourner of a prince.

Queen Victoria,
I am cold and rainy,
I am dirty as a glass roof in a train station,
I feel like an empty cast iron exhibition,
I want ornaments on everything,
Because my love, she gone with other boys.

Queen Victoria,
Do you have a punishment under the white lace,
Will you be short with her, will you make her read those little Bibles,
Will you spank her with a mechanical corset.
I want her pure as power, I want her skin slightly musty with petticoats
Will you wash the easy bidet out of her head?

Queen Victoria,
I'm not much nourished by modern love,
Will you come into my life
With your sorrow and your black carriages,
And your perfect
Memories.

Queen Victoria,
The Twentieth Century belongs to you and me.
Let us be two severe giants not less lonely for our partnership,
Who discolor test tubes in the halls of Science,
Who turn up unwelcome at every World's Fair,
Heavy with proverbs and corrections,
Confusing the star-dazed tourists
With our incomparable sense of loss.

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Leonard Cohen/AUTHOR	NAME/Show Me The Place/NAME	"CONTENT/Show me the place, where you want your slave to go
Show me the place, I've forgotten I don't know
Show me the place where my head is bend and low
Show me the place, where you want your slave to go

Show me the place, help me roll away the stone
Show me the place, I can't move this thing alone
Show me the place where the word became a man
Show me the place where the suffering began

The troubles came, I saved what I could save
A shred of light, a particle away
But there were chains so I hastened to the hay
There were chains, so I loved you
Like a spade

Show me the place, where you want your slave to go
Show me the place, I've forgotten I don't know
Show me the place, where you want your slave to go

The troubles came, I saved what I could save
A shred of light, a particle away
But there were chains so I hastened to the hay
There were chains so I loved you like a slave

Show me the place
Show me the place
Show me the place

Show me the place, help me roll away the stone
Show me the place, I can't move this thing alone
Show me the place, where the word became a man
Show me the place, where the suffering began

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Leonard Cohen/AUTHOR	NAME/Since You've Asked (Dialogue)/NAME	"CONTENT/What I'll give you since you asked is all my time together
Take the rugged sunny days, the warm and rocky weather
Take the roads that I have walked along
Looking for tomorrow's time, peace of mind

As my life spills into yours changing with the hours
Filling up the world with time, turning time to flowers
I can show you all the songs
That I never sang to one man before

We have seen a million stones lying by the water
You have climbed the hills with me to the mountain shelter
Taken off the days one by one
Setting them to breathe in the sun

Take the lilies and the lace from the days of childhood
All the willow winding paths leading up and outward
This is what I give
This is what I ask you for nothing more

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Leonard Cohen/AUTHOR	NAME/Storeroom/NAME	"CONTENT/I love you, without caring whom you love.
My hands below the belt, or my hands above
In the arms of other men,
Or in my bed again.
It's just a man,
Taking what he needs,
From the store room,
Store room, store room.
I love to see you sitting there upon your throne,
Your preachers all around you
Being bored, and your prophet straight and tall.
And yet they'll undermine it all.
Just a man, just a man,
Taking what he needs,
From the store room,
Store room, store room.
Yeah, Shakespeare said it all, then he said no more
And he left me feeling just like a two bit whore.
Well the silence broke my heart, but yes
I spread my legs apart.
It's just a man...
?????
?????
The hermit in the Wild,
The parent in the child.
Just a man...
Oh my love, let us unpin you,
???? You done, bringing more:
The mother and the father, the daughter and the son.
But should one refuse to come, it does not subtract the sum
It's just a man...
It's not a (due?) of burning pounds that ruins your mind
Like a spoon that you turn and you turn and you don't unwind,
Though these wars that you did not stop,
They don't tear your sleep apart.
It's just a man...
???? That keeps you up,
What a (moon?) coming like a headlight through the window
Not the thumbnail of a screen, [?]
No best way to dream [?]
It's just a man...
Now the woman by your side is she awake?
But there's nothing you want to give her,
And there's nothing that you really want to take.
You don't even try to prove that the noisy neighbor's making love. [?]
It's just a man...
I love you without caring whom you love...

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Leonard Cohen/AUTHOR	NAME/Stories Of The Street/NAME	"CONTENT/The stories of the street are mine, the Spanish voices laugh.
The Cadillacs go creeping now through the night and the poison gas,
And I lean from my window sill in this old hotel I chose,
Yes one hand on my suicide, one hand on the rose.

I know you've heard it's over now and war must surely come,
The cities they are broke in half and the middle men are gone.
But let me ask you one more time, O children of the dusk,
All these hunters who are shrieking now oh do they speak for us?
And where do all these highways go, now that we are free?
Why are the armies marching still that were coming home to me?

O lady with your legs so fine O stranger at your wheel,
You are locked into your suffering and your pleasures are the seal.
The age of lust is giving birth, and both the parents ask
The nurse to tell them fairy tales on both sides of the glass.
And now the infant with his cord is hauled in like a kite,
And one eye filled with blueprints, one eye filled with night.

O come with me my little one, we will find that farm
And grow us grass and apples there and keep all the animals warm.
And if by chance I wake at night and I ask you who I am,
O take me to the slaughterhouse, I will wait there with the lamb.
With one hand on the hexagram and one hand on the girl
I balance on a wishing well that all men call the world.

We are so small between the stars, so large against the sky,
And lost among the subway crowds I try to catch your eye.

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Leonard Cohen/AUTHOR	NAME/Teachers/NAME	"CONTENT/I met a woman long ago
Her hair the black that black can go,
Are you a teacher of the heart?
Soft she answered, no.

I met a girl across the sea,
Her hair the gold that gold can be,
Are you a teacher of the heart?
Yes, but not for thee.

I met a man who lost his mind
In some lost place I had to find,
Follow me, the wise man said,
But he walked behind.

I walked into a hospital
Where none was sick and none was well,
When at night the nurses left
I could not walk at all.

Morning came and then came noon,
Dinner time a scalpel blade
Lay beside my silver spoon.

Some girls wander by mistake
Into the mess that scalpels make.
Are you the teachers of my heart?
We teach old hearts to break.

One morning I woke up alone,
The hospital and the nurses gone.
Have I carved enough my Lord?
Child, you are a bone.

I ate and ate and ate,
No, I did not miss a plate, well
How much do these suppers cost?
Well take it out in hate.

I spent my hatred everyplace,
On every work, on every face,
Someone gave me wishes
And I wished for an embrace.

Several girls embraced me, then
I was embraced by men,
Is my passion perfect?
No, do it once again.

I was handsome, I was strong,
I knew the words of every song.
Did my singing please you?
No, the words you sang were wrong.

Who is it whom I address,
Who takes down what I confess?
Are you the teachers of my heart?
We teach old hearts to rest.

Oh teachers are my lessons done?
I cannot do another one.
They laughed and laughed and said
Well child,
Are your lessons done?
Are your lessons done?
Are your lessons done?

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Leonard Cohen/AUTHOR	NAME/The Butcher/NAME	"CONTENT/I came upon a butcher,
He was slaughtering a lamb,
I accused him there
With his tortured lamb.

He said, Listen to me, child,
I am what I am and you, you are my only son.
Well, I found a silver needle,
I put it into my arm.

It did some good,
Did some harm.
But the nights were cold
And it almost kept me warm,
How come the night is long?
I saw some flowers growing up
Where that lamb fell down

Was I supposed to praise my Lord,
Make some kind of joyful sound?
He said, Listen, listen to me now,
I go round and round
And you, you are my only child.

Do not leave me now,
Do not leave me now,
I'm broken down
From a recent fall.

Blood upon my body
And ice upon my soul,
Lead on, my son, it is your world.

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Leonard Cohen/AUTHOR	NAME/The Land Of Plenty/NAME	"CONTENT/Don't really know who sent me
To raise my voice and say
May the lights in The Land of Plenty
Shine on the truth some day.

I don't know why I come here,
Knowing as I do,
What you really think of me,
What I really think of you.

For the millions in a prison,
That wealth has set apart
For the Christ who has not risen,
From the caverns of the heart

For the innermost decision,
That we cannot but obey
For what's left of our religion,
I lift my voice and pray
May the lights in The Land of Plenty
Shine on the truth some day.

I know I said I'd meet you,
I'd meet you at the store,
But I can't buy it, baby.
I can't buy it anymore.

And I don't really know who sent me,
To raise my voice and say
May the lights in The Land of Plenty
Shine on the truth some day.

I don't know why I come here,
Knowing as I do,
What you really think of me,
What I really think of you.

For the innermost decision
That we cannot but obey
For what's left of our religion
I lift my voice and pray
May the lights in The Land of Plenty
Shine on the truth some day.

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Leonard Cohen/AUTHOR	NAME/The Law/NAME	"CONTENT/How many times did you call me
And I knew it was late
I left everybody
But I never went straight
I don't claim to be guilty
But I do understand
There's a Law, there's an Arm, there's a Hand

Now my heart's like a blister
From doing what I do
If the moon has a sister
It's got to be you
I'm going to miss you forever
Tho' it's not what I planned
There's a Law, there's an Arm, there's a Hand

Now the deal has been dirty
Since dirty began
I'm not asking for mercy
Not from the man
You just don't ask for mercy
While you're still on the stand
There s a Law, there's an Arm, there's a Hand

I don't claim to be guilty
Guilty's too grand
There s a Law, there's an Arm, there's a Hand

That's all I can say, baby
That's all I can say
It wasn't for nothing
They put me away
I fell with my angel
Down the chain of command
There s a Law, there's an Arm, there's a Hand

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Leonard Cohen/AUTHOR	NAME/The Lost Canadian/NAME	"CONTENT/Un Canadien Errant (A wandering Canadian,)
Banni de ses foyers, (banned from his hearths,)
Parcourait en pleurant (travelled while crying)
Des pays etrangers. (in foreign lands.)
Parcourait en pleurant (travelled while crying)
Des pays etrangers. (in foreign lands.)
Un jour, triste et pensif, (One day, sad and pensive,)
Assis au bord des flots, (sitting by the flowing waters,)
Au courant fugitif (to the fleeing current)
Il adressa ces mots: (he addressed these words:)
Au courant fugitif (to the fleeing current)
Il adressa ces mots: (he addressed these words:)

""Si tu vois mon pays, (If you see my country,)
Mon pays malheureux, (my unhappy country,)
Va dire a mes amis (go tell my friends)
Que je me souviens d'eux. (that I remember them.)
Va dire a mes amis (go tell my friends)
Que je me souviens d'eux. (that I remember them.)

O jours si pleins d'appas, (O days so full of charms,)
Vous etes disparus... (you have vanished...)
Et ma patrie, helas! (And my native land, alas!)
Je ne la verrai plus. (I will see it no more.)
Et ma patrie, helas! (And my native land, alas!)
Je ne la verrai plus. (I will see it no more.)

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Leonard Cohen/AUTHOR	NAME/The Marriage March/NAME	"CONTENT/(Written By Cohen, Performed In ""Night Magic"")

(Everyone) The whole work holds it's breath again
The marriage ring it shines
The billionth trillionth walk begins
As another world sighs

Sights and best of wishes and
A silence you can hear
The vow that breaks the world are spoke
And the whole world sheds a tear

(Beggar) Out of the joy of your marriage feast
O brother be good to me
The way is long and the shrine is far
Where my weary feet would be
And feasting is always somewhat sad
To those outside the door
Still love is only a dream
And life itself is hardly more

(Everyone) The human company draws close
And lends an ear
The vows that break the world are spoke
As the whole world sheds a tear

The vows that break the world
And the whole world sheds a tear

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Leonard Cohen/AUTHOR	NAME/The Smokey Life/NAME	"CONTENT/I've never seen your eyes so wide
I've never seen your appetite quite this occupied
Elsewhere is your feast of love
I know where long ago we agreed to keep it light
So lets be married one more night
It's light, light enough
To let it go
It's light enough to let it go

Remember when the scenery started fading
I held you til you learned to walk on air
So don't look down the ground is gone,
there's no one waiting anyway
The Smoky Life is practiced
Everywhere

So set your restless heart at ease
Take a lesson from these Autumn leaves
They waste no time waiting for the snow
Don't argue now you'll be late
There is nothing to investigate

It's light enough, light enough
To let it go
Light enough to let it go

Remember when the scenery started fading
I held you til you learned to walk on air
So don't look down the ground is gone,
there's no one waiting anyway
The Smoky Life is practiced everywhere

Come on back if the moment lends
You can look up all my very closest friends

Light, light enough
To let it go
It's light enough to let it go

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Leonard Cohen/AUTHOR	NAME/The Stranger Song/NAME	"CONTENT/It's true that all the men you knew were dealers
Who said they were through with dealing
Every time you gave them shelter
I know that kind of man
It's hard to hold the hand of anyone
Who is reaching for the sky just to surrender
Who is reaching for the sky just to surrender.

And then sweeping up the jokers that he left behind
You find he did not leave you very much not even laughter
Like any dealer he was watching for the card
That is so high and wild
He'll never need to deal another
He was just some Joseph looking for a manger
He was just some Joseph looking for a manger.

And then leaning on your window sill
He'll say one day you caused his will
To weaken with your love and warmth and shelter
And then taking from his wallet
An old schedule of trains, he'll say
I told you when I came I was a stranger
I told you when I came I was a stranger.

But now another stranger seems
To want you to ignore his dreams
As though they were the burden of some other
O you've seen that man before
His golden arm dispatching cards
But now it's rusted from the elbows to the finger
And he wants to trade the game he plays for shelter
Yes he wants to trade the game he knows for shelter.

Ah you hate to see another tired man
Lay down his hand
Like he was giving up the holy game of poker
And while he talks his dreams to sleep
You notice there's a highway
That is curling up like smoke above his shoulder
It is curling just like smoke above his shoulder.

You tell him to come in sit down
But something makes you turn around
The door is open you can't close your shelter
You try the handle of the road
It opens do not be afraid
It's you my love, you who are the stranger
It's you my love, you who are the stranger.

Well, I've been waiting, I was sure
We'd meet between the trains we're waiting for
I think it's time to board another
Please understand, I never had a secret chart
To get me to the heart of this
Or any other matter
When he talks like this
You don't know what he's after
When he speaks like this,
You don't know what he's after.

Let's meet tomorrow if you choose
Upon the shore, beneath the bridge
That they are building on some endless river
Then he leaves the platform
For the sleeping car that's warm
You realize, he's only advertising one more shelter
And it comes to you, he never was a stranger
And you say ok the bridge or someplace later.

And then sweeping up the jokers that he left behind ...

And leaning on your window sill ...

I told you when I came I was a stranger.

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Leonard Cohen/AUTHOR	NAME/The Third Invention/NAME	"CONTENT/(Written By Cohen, Performed In ""Night Magic"")

(Angels) Blindly he worked
At his third invention
Taking the chances
Of one who is lost

Feeling his way
To a cleaner expression
Of whatever it was
He stumbled across

All for the sake
Of a possible woman
He goaded himself
With a technical hope

For the sake of his longing
We came to the window
He put on his cloths
And he walked through the smoke

All for the sake
Of an interested woman
Riding to him
On a flicker of hope

Some tourist of beauty
In full disappointment
Ready to fall
In love with a ghost

And here was his ghost
With his third invention
The usual claim
To the highest reward

And now it was ready
His third invention
Ready to fall
In love with the world

And he falls back
And she comes forward
The eye of his labour
Measures them both

And she lies in the arms
Of his third invention
And back in his room
He commences the fourth

This is the work
Of the highest pretension
An automatic
Ode to the world

O deep in comfort
O full employment
He's lost to the fourth
He's lost to the third.

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Leonard Cohen/AUTHOR	NAME/The Throne Of Desire/NAME	"CONTENT/(Written By Cohen, Performed In ""Night Magic"")

(Michael) Their bodies Triumphant
Their power unfurled
I know I am nothing
And women the world!

A slave to their favours
Their no and their yes
I'm crushed in the crease
Of a cotton dress

And I'm dead except
In their company
And I'm only at rest
When they motion to me

And night after night
I turn to myself
And I raise them
Out of my panic
And they come to me
Willing at last
Inflamed and fast
Mutual and graphic.

And suddenly they drill my heart
With cavities of absence
And they cover their thighs
With cellophane
And they cover their breasts
With a shadow
And they nail my good right hand
To a wall in the attic

O take me away
From the thorns and the fire
And let me recline
On the Throne of Desire

From the Throne of Desire
I make this solemn decree
Every woman I want
Will want, will want, will want
Will more than want me!

O o o

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Leonard Cohen/AUTHOR	NAME/The Traitor/NAME	"CONTENT/Now the Swan it floated on the English river
Ah the Rose of High Romance it opened wide
A sun tanned woman yearned me through the summer
And the judges watched us from the other side

I told my mother ""Mother I must leave you
Preserve my room but do not shed a tear
Should rumour of a shabby ending reach you
It was half my fault and half the atmosphere""

But the Rose I sickened with a scarlet fever
And the Swan I tempted with a sense of shame
She said at last I was her finest lover
And if she withered I would be to blame

The judges said you missed it by a fraction
Rise up and brace your troops for the attack
Ah the dreamers ride against the men of action
Oh see the men of action falling back

But I lingered on her thighs a fatal moment
I kissed her lips as though I thirsted still
My falsity had stung me like a hornet
The poison sank and it paralyzed my will

I could not move to warn all the younger soldiers
That they had been deserted from above
So on battlefields from here to Barcelona
I'm listed with the enemies of love

And long ago she said ""I must be leaving,
Ah but keep my body here to lie upon
You can move it up and down and when I'm sleeping
Run some wire through that Rose and wind the Swan""

So daily I renew my idle duty
I touch her here and there, I know my place
I kiss her open mouth and I praise her beauty
And people call me traitor to my face

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Leonard Cohen/AUTHOR	NAME/The Window/NAME	"CONTENT/Why do you stand by the window
Abandoned to beauty and pride
The thorn of the night in your bosom
The spear of the age in your side
Lost in the rages of fragrance
Lost in the rags of remorse
Lost in the waves of a sickness
That loosens the high silver nerves

Oh chosen love, Oh frozen love
Oh tangle of matter and ghost
Oh darling of angels, demons and saints
And the whole broken-hearted host
Gentle this soul

And come forth from the cloud of unknowing
And kiss the cheek of the moon
The New Jerusalem glowing
Why tarry all night in the ruin
And leave no word of discomfort
And leave no observer to mourn
But climb on your tears and be silent
Like a rose on its ladder of thorns

Oh chosen love, Oh frozen love

Then lay your rose on the fire
The fire give up to the sun
The sun give over to splendour
In the arms of the high holy one
For the holy one dreams of a letter
Dreams of a letter's death
Oh bless thee continuous stutter
Of the word being made into flesh

Oh chosen love, Oh frozen love

Gentle this soul

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Leonard Cohen/AUTHOR	NAME/There For You/NAME	"CONTENT/When it all went down
And the pain came through
I get it now
I was there for you
Don't ask me how
I know it's true
I get it now
I was there for you
I make my plans
Like I always do
But when I look back
I was there for you
I walk the streets
Like I used to do
And I freeze with fear
But I'm there for you
I see my life
In full review
It was never me
It was always you
You sent me here
You sent me there
Breaking things
I can't repair
Making objects
Out of thoughts
Making more
By thinking not
Eating food
And drinking wine
A body that
I thought was mine
Dressed as Arab
Dressed as Jew
O mask of iron
I was there for you
Moods of glory
Moods so foul
The world comes through
A bloody towel
And death is old
But it's always new
I freeze with fear
And I'm there for you
I see it clear
I always knew
It was never me
I was there for you
I was there for you
My darling one
And by your law
It all was done

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Leonard Cohen/AUTHOR	NAME/There Is A War/NAME	"CONTENT/There is a war between the rich and poor,
A war between the man and the woman.
There is a war between the ones who say there is a war
And the ones who say there isn't.
Why don't you come on back to the war, that's right, get in it,
Why don't you come on back to the war, it's just beginning.

Well I live here with a woman and a child,
The situation makes me kind of nervous.
Yes, I rise up from her arms, she says ""I guess you call this love""
I call it service.

Why don't you come on back to the war, don't be a tourist,
Why don't you come on back to the war, before it hurts us,
Why don't you come on back to the war, let's all get nervous.

You cannot stand what I've become,
You much prefer the gentleman I was before.
I was so easy to defeat, I was so easy to control,
I didn't even know there was a war.

Why don't you come on back to the war, don't be embarrassed,
Why don't you come on back to the war, you can still get married.

There is a war between the rich and poor,
A war between the man and the woman.
There is a war between the left and right,
A war between the black and white,
A war between the odd and the even.

Why don't you come on back to the war, pick up your tiny burden,
Why don't you come on back to the war, let's all get even,
Why don't you come on back to the war, can't you hear me speaking?

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Leonard Cohen/AUTHOR	NAME/Throne Of Desire Variations/NAME	"CONTENT/(Written By Cohen, Performed In ""Night Magic"")

Let me start with you Miss Shy
Bundled up in your mother's lie
Tip toe, tip toe
Hiding your silky pleasure

Miss Shy come to me
Along the snowy paths of modesty
Tip toe, tip toe
Hiding your silky treasure

Come to me with downcast eyes
Come to me and claim the prize
Of your outrageous pleasure

How I like you Miss Shy
Bundled up in your mother's lie
Tip toe --
Claim your outrageous pleasure!

O o o

And you I want strong
With your hatred intact
With your father's pipe
And your brother's bat
And your quaint belief
In holy authority

With your discipline
And your Darwin claws
And your legal eye
On the peacock's flaws
I see what fallen man
Was meant to be

With your absolute
No man can refute
Your absolutely unique
Contempt for the weak
Down on our paws
There are no laws
Kiss me where I can not speak

You I want strong
With your hatred intact
With your father's pipe
And your brother's bat
Now kiss me
Where I cannot speak!

O o o

You I want for my friend
To gossip with me and drink tea
To walk down by the river's bend
You I want for my friend

To watch the water going by
The swallows climbing above
To tell me that I lie
When I tell you I cannot love,
Cannot love

To know my heart better than me
To be my friend in charity
To speak of lovers old and new
To say to me, what they've done to you

You I want for my friend
To make some sense of our difference
To eat and drink together
To comfort one another,
And may our conversation never end!

O o o

And you
I want your
Beauty hidden
From all
Sight but my
Own
So none may know
Your womanhood
Or hear you moan
Your pleasures
To an infant thumb

You will be
True to me
There will be no
Infidelity
For I will weave
A cloak so tight
About your loveliness
No man will ever guess
The wild commands you whisper
From your childhood to the night

And what
Drops the moon
About a man
And draws
Him tidal to
Your lips
And lets your nipples
Harden I can
Hear you moan
Your pleasures
To an infant thumb

And you I want
To wink at me
And you I want
To think of me
You I want above
I want you below
You I want veiled
And you to know
I want you clumbsy
I want you skilled
You be ferocious
You be mild...

You be foolish
You be wise
You stay here
You stay outside
You comb out your hair
You keep it curled
I want, I want, I want
I want to know the world
You comb out your hair
You keep yours curled
I want, I want to know the world!

O o o

And you
Who did not come tonight
I will wait for you
And you
Who are not born
I will write for you
And you
Who must appear
In veils of chance
And mystery
I will kneel
I will kneel
Like a child
Who's watching Mary
As she stands
Upon the air
In gentle splendour
In the black
Mouth of a cave
Open-armed and radiant
To save mankind
And all the broken
World to mother

And I swear
By the obscure
Truth
Of this
Enfolded heart
I swear
By
The unrequited greed
Of this
Human heart
And all
Its
Disappointed pleasures
I swear
By
The deep light
Of my soul
Stained
And covered over
With
Intrigues of pride
Whose mercy is
To let me sing
I swear
That I will be
For the one
Who will not come
To me
I swear that
I will be
Her lover
Her eternal
And imperfect
Spirit lover.

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Leonard Cohen/AUTHOR	NAME/To A Teacher/NAME	"CONTENT/[Dedicated to A. M. Klein (1909-1972)]
Hurt once and for all into silence.
A long pain ending without a song to prove it.
Who could stand beside you so close to Eden,
When you glinted in every eye the held-high
Razor, shivering every ram and son?
And now the silent loony bin, where
The shadows live in the rafters like
Day-weary bats,
Until the turning mind, a radar signal,
Lures them to exaggerate
Mountain-size on the white stone wall
Your tiny limp.
How can I leave you in such a house?
Are there no more saints and wizards
To praise their ways with pupils,
No more evil to stun with the slap
Of a wet red tongue?
Did you confuse the Messiah in a mirror
And rest because he had finally come?
Let me cry Help beside you, Teacher.
I have entered under this dark roof
As fearlessly as an honoured son
Enters his father's house.

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Leonard Cohen/AUTHOR	NAME/To Love Somebody/NAME	"CONTENT/(originally sung by the Beegees)

There's a light, a very special light,
Never ever shone on me.
I would like my whole life to be,
With someone like you...
With someone... With someone like...

You don't know what it's like,
You don't know what it's like,
To love somebody,
To love somebody,
The way I love you.

There's a way, a very special way,
To look at each and every single thing.
Ah, but what good would that bring,
If I ain't got you...
If I ain't... If I ain't got you.

You don't know what it's like,
I don't think you really, really know what it's like,
To love somebody,
To love somebody,
The way I love you,
The way I love you.

There's a light, a special kind of light,
Never ever shone on me.
I would like my whole life to be,
With someone like you...
With someone... With someone like...

Baby, you don't know what it's like,
You, you just don't know what it's like,
To love somebody,
To love somebody,
The way I love you.

You don't know what it's like,
I don't think you really, really know what it's like,
To love somebody,
To love
The way I love you.

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Leonard Cohen/AUTHOR	NAME/Tower Of Song/NAME	"CONTENT/Well my friends are gone and my hair is grey
I ache in the places where I used to play
And I'm crazy for love but I'm not coming on
I'm just paying my rent every day
Oh in the Tower of Song
I said to Hank Williams: how lonely does it get?
Hank Williams hasn't answered yet
But I hear him coughing all night long
A hundred floors above me
In the Tower of Song

I was born like this, I had no choice
I was born with the gift of a golden voice
And twenty-seven angels from the Great Beyond
They tied me to this table right here
In the Tower of Song

So you can stick your little pins in that voodoo doll
I'm very sorry, baby, doesn't look like me at all
I'm standing by the window where the light is strong
Ah they don't let a woman kill you
Not in the Tower of Song

Now you can say that I've grown bitter but of this you may be sure
The rich have got their channels in the bedrooms of the poor
And there's a mighty judgment coming, but I may be wrong
You see, you hear these funny voices
In the Tower of Song

I see you standing on the other side
I don't know how the river got so wide
I loved you baby, way back when
And all the bridges are burning that we might have crossed
But I feel so close to everything that we lost
We'll never have to lose it again

Now I bid you farewell, I don't know when I'll be back
There moving us tomorrow to that tower down the track
But you'll be hearing from me baby, long after I'm gone
I'll be speaking to you sweetly
From a window in the Tower of Song

Yeah my friends are gone and my hair is gray
I ache in the places where I used to play
And I'm crazy for love but I'm not coming on
I'm just paying my rent every day
Oh in the Tower of Song

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Leonard Cohen/AUTHOR	NAME/Traveling Light/NAME	"CONTENT/I'm traveling light
It's au revoir
My once so bright, my fallen star
I'm running late, they'll close the bar
I used to play one mean guitar
I guess I'm just somebody who
Has given up on the me and you
I'm not alone, I've met a few
Traveling light like we used to do

Good night, good night, my fallen star
I guess you're right, you always are
I know you're right about the blues
You live some life you'd never choose
I'm just a fool, a dreamer who forgot to dream of the me and you
I'm not alone, I've met a few
Traveling light like we used to do
Traveling light
It's au revoir
My once so bright, my fallen star
I'm running late, they'll close the bar
I used to play one mean guitar
I guess I'm just somebody who
Has given up on the me and you
I'm not alone, I've met a few
Traveling light like we used to do

But if the road leads back to you
Must I forget the things I knew
When I was friends with one or two
Traveling light like we used to do
I'm traveling light

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Leonard Cohen/AUTHOR	NAME/True Love Leaves No Traces/NAME	"CONTENT/As the mist leaves no scar
On the dark green hill
So my body leaves no scar
On you and never will
Through windows in the dark
The children come, the children go
Like arrows with no targets
Like shackles made of snow

True love leaves no traces
If you and I are one
It's lost in our embraces
Like stars against the sun

As a falling leaf may rest
A moment on the air
So your head upon my breast
So my hand upon your hair

And many nights endure
Without a moon or star
So we will endure
When one is gone and far

True love leaves no traces
If you and I are one
It's lost in our embraces
Like stars against the sun

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Leonard Cohen/AUTHOR	NAME/Un Canadien Errant (The Lost Canadian)/NAME	"CONTENT/Un Canadien Errant (A wandering Canadian,)
Banni de ses foyers, (banned from his hearths,)
Parcourait en pleurant (travelled while crying)
Des pays etrangers. (in foreign lands.)
Parcourait en pleurant (travelled while crying)
Des pays etrangers. (in foreign lands.)
Un jour, triste et pensif, (One day, sad and pensive,)
Assis au bord des flots, (sitting by the flowing waters,)
Au courant fugitif (to the fleeing current)
Il adressa ces mots: (he addressed these words:)
Au courant fugitif (to the fleeing current)
Il adressa ces mots: (he addressed these words:)

""Si tu vois mon pays, (If you see my country,)
Mon pays malheureux, (my unhappy country,)
Va dire a mes amis (go tell my friends)
Que je me souviens d'eux. (that I remember them.)
Va dire a mes amis (go tell my friends)
Que je me souviens d'eux. (that I remember them.)

O jours si pleins d'appas, (O days so full of charms,)
Vous etes disparus... (you have vanished...)
Et ma patrie, helas! (And my native land, alas!)
Je ne la verrai plus. (I will see it no more.)
Et ma patrie, helas! (And my native land, alas!)
Je ne la verrai plus. (I will see it no more.)

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Leonard Cohen/AUTHOR	NAME/Villanelle For Our Time/NAME	"CONTENT/From bitter searching of the heart,
Quickened with passion and with pain
We rise to play a greater part.
This is the faith from which we start:
Men shall know commonwealth again
From bitter searching of the heart.
We loved the easy and the smart,
But now, with keener hand and brain,
We rise to play a greater part.
The lesser loyalties depart,
And neither race nor creed remain
From bitter searching of the heart.
Not steering by the venal chart
That tricked the mass for private gain,
We rise to play a greater part.
Reshaping narrow law and art
Whose symbols are the millions slain,
From bitter searching of the heart
We rise to play a greater part.

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Leonard Cohen/AUTHOR	NAME/Winter Lady/NAME	"CONTENT/Trav'ling lady, stay awhile
Until the night is over.
I'm just a station on your way,
I know I'm not your lover.
Well I lived with a child of snow
When I was a soldier,
And I fought every man for her
Until the nights grew colder.

She used to wear her hair like you
Except when she was sleeping,
And then she'd weave it on a loom
Of smoke and gold and breathing.

And why are you so quiet now
Standing there in the doorway?
You chose your journey long before
You came upon this highway.

Traveling lady stay awhile
Until the night is over.
I'm just a station on your way,
I know I'm not your lover.

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Leonard Cohen/AUTHOR	NAME/You Have Loved Enough/NAME	"CONTENT/I said I'd be your lover.
You laughed at what I said.
I lost my job forever.
I was counted with the dead.

I swept the marble chambers,
But you sent me down below.
You kept me from believing
Until you let me know:

That I am not the one who loves
It's love that seizes me.
When hatred with his package comes,
You forbid delivery.

And when the hunger for your touch
Rises from the hunger,
You whisper, ""You have loved enough,
Now let me be the Lover.""

I swept the marble chambers,
But you sent me down below.
You kept me from believing
Until you let me know:

That I am not the one who loves
It's love that chooses me.
When hatred with his package comes,
You forbid delivery.

And when the hunger for your touch
Rises from the hunger

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Leonard Cohen/AUTHOR	NAME/You Know Who I Am/NAME	"CONTENT/I cannot follow you, my love,
You cannot follow me.
I am the distance you put between
All of the moments that we will be.

You know who I am,
You've stared at the sun,
Well I am the one who loves
Changing from nothing to one.

Sometimes I need you naked,
Sometimes I need you wild,
I need you to carry my children in
And I need you to kill a child.
You know who I am

If you should ever track me down
I will surrender there
And I will leave with you one broken man
Whom I will teach you to repair.
You know who I am

I cannot follow you, my love,
You cannot follow me.
I am the distance you put between
All of the moments that we will be.
You know who I am

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Leonard Cohen/AUTHOR	NAME/You Want It Darker/NAME	"CONTENT/[Leonard Cohen]
If you are the dealer, I'm out of the game
If you are the healer, it means I'm broken and lame
If thine is the glory then mine must be the shame
You want it darker
We kill the flame

Magnified, sanctified, be thy holy name
Vilified, crucified, in the human frame
A million candles burning for the help that never came
You want it darker
Hineni, hineni
I'm ready, my Lord

There's a lover in the story
But the story's still the same
There's a lullaby for suffering
And a paradox to blame
But it's written in the scriptures
And it's not some idle claim
You want it darker
We kill the flame

They're lining up the prisoners
And the guards are taking aim
I struggled with some demons
They were middle-class and tame
I didn't know I had permission to murder and to maim
You want it darker

Hineni, hineni
I'm ready, my Lord

Magnified, sanctified, be thy holy name
Vilified, crucified, in the human frame
A million candles burning for the love that never came
You want it darker
We kill the flame

If you are the dealer, let me out of the game
If you are the healer, I'm broken and lame
If thine is the glory, mine must be the shame
You want it darker

Hineni, hineni
Hineni, hineni
I'm ready, my Lord

[Outro: Cantor Gideon Zelermyer]
Hineni
Hineni, hineni
Hineni

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Lorde/AUTHOR	NAME/400 Lux/NAME	"CONTENT/We're never done with killing time
Can I kill it with you?
'Til the veins run red and blue
We come around here all the time
Got a lot to not do, let me kill it with you

You pick me up and take me home again
Head out the window again
We're hollow like the bottles that we drain
You drape your wrists over the steering wheel
Pulses can drive from here
We might be hollow, but we're brave

(And I like you)
I love these roads where the houses don't change (and I like you)
Where we can talk like there's something to say (and I like you)
I'm glad that we stopped kissing the tar on the highway (and I like you)
We move in the tree streets
I'd like it if you stayed

Now we're wearing long sleeves
And the heating comes on
(You buy me orange juice)
We're getting good at this
Dreams of clean teeth
I can tell that you're tired
But you keep the car on
While you're waiting out front

You pick me up and take me home again
Head out the window again
We're hollow like the bottles that we drain
You drape your wrists over the steering wheel
Pulses can drive from here
We might be hollow, but we're brave

(And I like you)
I love these roads where the houses don't change (and I like you)
Where we can talk like there's something to say (and I like you)
I'm glad that we stopped kissing the tar on the highway (and I like you)
We move in the tree streets
I'd like it if you stayed

We're never done with killing time
Can I kill it with you?
'Til the veins run red and blue
We come around here all the time
Got a lot to not do, let me kill it with you

(And I like you)
I love these roads where the houses don't change (and I like you)
Where we can talk like there's something to say (and I like you)
I'm glad that we stopped kissing the tar on the highway (and I like you)
We move in the tree streets
I'd like it if you stayed

And I like you
And I like you
And I like you

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Lorde/AUTHOR	NAME/A World Alone/NAME	"CONTENT/That slow burn wait while it gets dark,
Bruising the sun, I feel grown up with you in your car
I know it's dumb

We've both got a million bad habits to kick
Not sleeping is one
We're biting our nails, you're biting my lip
I'm biting my tongue

When people are talking, people are talking
When People are talking, people are talking

Raise a glass, 'cause I'm not done saying it
They all wanna get rough, get away with it
Let 'em talk 'cause we're dancing in this world alone
We're all alone
We're alone

All my fake friends and all of their noise
Complain about work
They're studying business, I study the floor
And you haven't stopped smoking all night
Maybe the Internet raised us
Or maybe people are jerks

When people are talking, people are talking (But not you)
When people are talking, people are talking

Raise a glass, 'cause I'm not done saying it
They all wanna get rough, get away with it
Let 'em talk 'cause we're dancing in this world alone
We're all alone
We're alone

All the double-edged people and schemes
They make a mess then go home and get clean
You're my best friend, and we're dancing in a world alone,
We're all alone
We're all alone

I know we're not everlasting
We're a train wreck waiting to happen
One day the blood won't flow so gladly
One day we're all get still
When people are talking, people are talking
Get still

When people are talking, people are talking
When people are talking, people are talking

Raise a glass, 'cause I'm not done saying it
They all wanna get rough, get away with it
Let 'em talk 'cause we're dancing in this world alone
We're all alone
We're alone

All the double-edged people and schemes
They make a mess then go home and get clean
You're my best friend, so we're dancing in a world alone
We're all alone
We're all alone

When people are talking, people are talking
When people are talking, people are talking
When people are talking, people are talking
When people are talking, people are talking

Let 'em talk

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Lorde/AUTHOR	NAME/Biting Down/NAME	"CONTENT/It feels better biting down
It feels better biting down
It feels better biting down
It feels better biting down
It feels better biting down
It feels better biting down

Skip a hit, don't make a sound
It feels better biting down

Breathed so deep I thought I'd drown
It feels better biting down

Listen to the beats resound
It feels better biting down
It feels better biting down

It feels better biting down
It feels better biting down
It feels better biting down

Skip a hit, don't make a sound
It feels better biting down

Breathed so deep I thought I'd drown
It feels better biting down

Listen to the beats resound
It feels better biting down
It feels better biting down

The electronics of your heart
See how fast they fall apart
It feels better biting down

The electronics of your heart
See how fast they fall apart
It feels better biting down
It feels better biting down

Skip a hit, don't make a sound
It feels better biting down

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Lorde/AUTHOR	NAME/Buzzcut Season/NAME	"CONTENT/I remember when your head caught flame
It kissed your scalp and caressed your brain
Well you laughed, baby it's okay
It's buzz cut season anyway
(Well you laughed, baby it's okay)

Explosions on TV, and all the girls with heads inside a dream
So now we live beside the pool, where everything is good

We ride the bus with the knees pulled in
People should see how we're living
(We ride the bus with the knees pulled in)
Shut my eyes to the song that plays
Sometimes this has a hot, sweet taste
(Shut my eyes to the song that plays)

The men up on the news, they try to tell us all that we will lose
But it's so easy in this blue, where everything is good

And I'll never go home again (place the call, feel it start)
Favorite friend (and nothing's wrong when nothing's true)
I live in a hologram with you
We're all the things that we do for fun (and I'll breathe, and it goes)
Play along (make-believe it's hyper real)
But I live in a hologram with you

Cola with the burnt-out taste
I'm the one you tell your fears to
There'll never be enough of us

Explosions on TV, and all the girls with heads inside a dream
So now we live beside the pool, where everything is good

And I'll never go home again (place the call, feel it start)
Favorite friend (and nothing's wrong when nothing's true)
I live in a hologram with you
We're all the things that we do for fun (and I'll breathe, and it goes)
Play along (make-believe it's hyper real)
But I live in a hologram with you

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Lorde/AUTHOR	NAME/Easy/NAME	"CONTENT/Easy, easy
Pull out your heart
To make the being alone
Easy, easy
Pull out your heart
To make the being alone
Easy, easy

Easy, easy
You break the bridle to make
Losing control
Easy, easy
Crushed what you're holding
So you can say letting go is
Easy, easy

Oh, easy, easy
Burn all your things
To make the fight to forget
Easy, oh, easy
Burn all your things
To make the fight to forget
Easy

Easy, easy
Pull out your heart
To make the being alone
Easy, easy
Pull out your heart
To make the being alone
Easy

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Lorde/AUTHOR	NAME/Everybody Wants To Rule The World/NAME	"CONTENT/Welcome to your life
There's no turning back
Even while we sleep
We will find you

Acting on your best behaviour
Turn your back on mother nature
Everybody wants to rule the world

It's my own design
It's my own remorse
Help me to decide
Help me make the most

Of freedom and of pleasure
Nothing ever lasts forever
Everybody wants to rule the world

There's a room where the light won't find you
Holding hands while the walls come tumbling down
When they do I'll be right behind you

So glad we've almost made it
So sad they had to fade it
Everybody wants to rule the world
Everybody wants to rule the world
Everybody wants to rule the world

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Lorde/AUTHOR	NAME/Glory And Gore/NAME	"CONTENT/There's a humming in the restless summer air
And we're slipping off the course that we prepared
But in all chaos, there is calculation
Dropping glasses just to hear them break
You've been drinking like the world was gonna end (it didn't)
Took a shiner from the fist of your best friend (go figure)
It's clear that someone's gotta go
We mean it, but I promise we're not mean

And the cry goes out (ha)
They lose their minds for us, and how it plays out (ha)
Now we're in the ring and we're coming for blood

(Oh! Oh!)
You could try and take us (oh-oh)
But we're the gladiators (Oh! Oh!)
Everyone a rager (oh-oh)
But secretly they're saviors
Glory and gore go hand in hand
That's why we're making headlines (Oh! Oh!)
You could try and take us (oh-oh)
But victory's contagious

Delicate in every way but one (the swordplay)
God knows we like archaic kinds of fun (the old way)
Chance is the only game I play with, baby
We let our battles choose us

And the cry goes out (ha oh)
They lose their minds for us and how it plays out (ha oh)
Now we're in the ring and we're coming for blood

(Oh! Oh!)
You could try and take us (oh-oh)
But we're the gladiators (Oh! Oh!)
Everyone a rager (oh-oh)
But secretly they're saviors
Glory and gore go hand in hand
That's why we're making headlines (Oh! Oh!)
You could try and take us (oh-oh)
But victory's contagious

No-one 'round here's good at keeping their eyes closed
The sun's starting to light up when we're walking home
Tired little laughs, gold lie promises,
We'll always win at this, I don't ever think about death
It's alright if you do, it's fine
We gladiate but I guess we're really fighting ourselves
Roughing up our minds so we're ready when the kill time comes
Wide awake in bed, words in my brain,
""Secretly you love this, do you even wanna go free?""
Let me in the ring, I'll show you what that big word means

(Oh! Oh!)
You could try and take us (oh-oh)
But we're the gladiators (Oh! Oh!)
Everyone a rager (oh-oh)
But secretly they're saviors
Glory and gore go hand in hand
That's why we're making headlines (Oh! Oh!)
You could try and take us (oh-oh)
But victory's contagious

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Lorde/AUTHOR	NAME/Lost Boys/NAME	"CONTENT/It's time to let the lost boys take you in
It's getting cold out
You wear yourself down
So please don't go out
You're looking dead behind these eyes
We'll stay at your house
Watch all those late shows on TV
I like it best when you're in here with me
And all the lost boys
We'd make a picture perfect team
Bruising sidewalks
With all the drumming of our feet
And boy I promise
We'll never ever let you leave
Never let you leave

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Lorde/AUTHOR	NAME/Million Dollar Bills/NAME	"CONTENT/There's nothing I want but money and time
Million dollar bills and a tick tick tick tick
There's nothing more cruel
Than only nine lives
A limit in spite
Will do the trick trick trick trick

We can leave the house lead the party let the people know
Go drown the colors of our minds and watch the cards go

There's nothing as fun as coming untied
And running with the kids in the park park park park
There's nothing that hurts like letting you go
Tiger burn eyes in the dark dark dark dark

We can leave the house lead the party let the people know
Go drown the colors of our minds and watch the cards go
It's not about just being out with all our people
'Cause we can get in trouble just by going free throw
And now I'm letting you know and now I'm letting you know
And now I'm letting you know and now I'm letting you know

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Lorde/AUTHOR	NAME/Ribs/NAME	"CONTENT/The drink you spilt all over me
'Lover's Spit' left on repeat
My mom and dad let me stay home
It drives you crazy, getting old

We can talk it so good
We can make it so divine
We can talk it good
How you wish it would be all the time

The drink you spilt all over me
'Lover's Spit' left on repeat
My mom and dad let me stay home
It drives you crazy, getting old

The drink you spilt all over me
'Lover's Spit' left on repeat
My mom and dad let me stay home
It drives you crazy, getting old

This dream isn't feeling sweet
We're reeling through the midnight streets
And I've never felt more alone
It feels so scary, getting old

We can talk it so good
We can make it so divine
We can talk it good
How you wish it would be all the time

This dream isn't feeling sweet
We're reeling through the midnight streets
And I've never felt more alone
It feels so scary, getting old

This dream isn't feeling sweet
We're reeling through the midnight streets
And I've never felt more alone
It feels so scary, getting old

I want 'em back (I want 'em back)
The minds we had (the minds we had)
How all the thoughts (how all the thoughts)
Moved 'round our heads (moved 'round our heads)
I want 'em back (I want 'em back)
The minds we had (the minds we had)
It's not enough to feel the lack
I want 'em back, I want 'em back, I want 'em

You're the only friend I need
Sharing beds like little kids
Laughing 'til our ribs get tough
But that will never be enough

You're the only friend I need
Sharing beds like little kids
Laughing 'til our ribs get tough
But that will never be enough

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Lorde/AUTHOR	NAME/Royals/NAME	"CONTENT/I've never seen a diamond in the flesh
I cut my teeth on wedding rings in the movies
And I'm not proud of my address, in the torn up town
No post code envy

But every song's like gold teeth, Grey Goose, trippin' in the bathroom
Blood stains, ball gowns, trashin' the hotel room
We don't care, we're driving Cadillacs in our dreams
But everybody's like Cristal, Maybach, diamonds on your timepiece.
Jet planes, islands, tigers on a gold leash
We don't care, we ain't caught up in your love affair

And we'll never be royals (royals)
It don't run in our blood
That kind of luxe just ain't for us
We crave a different kind of buzz
Let me be your ruler (ruler), you can call me Queen Bee
And baby I'll rule (I'll rule I'll rule I'll rule)
Let me live that fantasy

My friends and I we've cracked the code
We count our dollars on the train to the party
And everyone who knows us knows that we're fine with this
We didn't come from money

But every song's like gold teeth, Grey Goose, trippin' in the bathroom
Blood stains, ball gowns, trashin' the hotel room
We don't care, we're driving Cadillacs in our dreams
But everybody's like Cristal, Maybach, diamonds on your timepiece.
Jet planes, islands, tigers on a gold leash
We don't care, we aren't caught up in your love affair

And we'll never be royals (royals)
It don't run in our blood
That kind of luxe just ain't for us
We crave a different kind of buzz
Let me be your ruler (ruler), you can call me Queen Bee
And baby I'll rule (I'll rule I'll rule I'll rule)
Let me live that fantasy

(Ooh ooh oh)
We're bigger than we ever dreamed, and I'm in love with being queen
(Ooh ooh oh)
Love is great without a care
We aren't caught up in your love affair

And we'll never be royals (royals)
It don't run in our blood
That kind of luxe just ain't for us
We crave a different kind of buzz
Let me be your ruler (ruler), you can call me Queen Bee
And baby I'll rule (I'll rule I'll rule I'll rule)
Let me live that fantasy

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Lorde/AUTHOR	NAME/Team/NAME	"CONTENT/Wait 'til you're announced
We've not yet lost all our graces
The hounds will stay in chains
Look upon your greatness that you'll send the call out
Send the call out

Call all the ladies out, they're in their finery
A hundred jewels on throats
A hundred jewels between teeth
Now bring my boys in, their skin in craters like the moon
The moon we love like a brother, while he glows through the room
Dancin' around the lies we tell
Dancin' around big eyes as well
Even the comatose, they don't dance and tell

We live in cities you'll never see onscreen
Not very pretty, but we sure know how to run things
Livin' in ruins of a palace within my dreams
And you know we're on each other's team

I'm kind of over gettin' told to throw my hands up in the air
So there

So all the cups got broke
Shards beneath our feet
But it wasn't my fault
And everyone's competing for a love they won't receive
Cause what this palace wants is release

We live in cities you'll never see onscreen
Not very pretty, but we sure know how to run things
Livin' in ruins of a palace within my dreams
And you know we're on each other's team

I'm kind of over gettin' told to throw my hands up in the air
So there
I'm kind of older than I was when I reveled without a care
So there

We live in cities you'll never see onscreen
Not very pretty, but we sure know how to run things
Livin' in ruins of a palace within my dreams
And you know we're on each other's team

We're on each other's team
And you know we're on each other's team
We're on each other's team
And you know and you know and you know

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Lorde/AUTHOR	NAME/The Love Club/NAME	"CONTENT/I'm in a clique but I want out
It's not the same as when I was punched
In the old days there was enough
The card games and ease with the bitter salt of blood
I was in but I want out
My mother's love is choking me
I'm sick of words that hang above my head
What about the kid? It's time the kid got free

Be a part of the love club
Everything will glow for you
You'll get punched for the love club
For the love club

I joined the club and it's all on
There are fights for being my best friend
And the girls get their claws out
There's something about hanging out with the wicked kids
Take the pill make it too ill
The other day I forgot my old address
I'm sitting pretty on the throne
There's nothing more I want
Except to be alone

Be a part of the love club
Everything will glow for you
You'll get punched for the love club
For the love club

Your clothes are soaked and you don't know where to go
So drop your chin and take yourself back home
And roll out your maps and papers
Find out your hiding places again
The only problem that I got with the club
Is how you're severed from the people who watched you grow up
When you're a member go on your great adventure again
They will be waiting at the end

Be a part of the love club
Everything will glow for you
You'll get punched for the love club
For the love club

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Lorde/AUTHOR	NAME/White Teeth Teens/NAME	"CONTENT/We wouldn't be seen dead here in the day yeah
I guess you're lucky that it's dark now
And if I like it then we'll stay
Impress the empress, take a shot now

We got the glow in our mouths
White teeth teens are out
White teeth teens are

Up for it
I know you love it when the hairpins started to drop
I like your reckoning
But we got our methods and there's nothing here to stop
To stop this

If you want we'll help tonight to split his schemes
Give the bruises out like gifts
You'll get the picture of your dreams
I won't be smiling but the notes from my admirers
Fill my dashboard just the same

We got the glow in our mouths
White teeth teens are out
White teeth teens are

Up for it
I know you love it when the hairpins start to drop
I like your reckoning,
But we got our methods and there's nothing here to stop
To stop this when we're

Up for it
I know you love it when the hairpins start to drop
I like your reckoning,
But we got our methods and there's nothing here to stop
To stop this

(And everything works out so good)
(I wear the robe like no one could)

I'll let you in on something big
I am not a white teeth teen
I tried to join but never did
The way they are, the way they seem is something else, it's in the blood
Their molars blinking like the lights, in the underpass where we all sit
And do nothing and love it

And everything works out so good
I wear the robe like no one could

And everything works out so good
I wear the robe like no one could

And everything works out so good
I wear the robe like no one could

(White teeth teens are out)
And everything works out so good
(I wear the robe like no one could)
White teeth teens are out

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Lorde/AUTHOR	NAME/Yellow Flicker Beat/NAME	"CONTENT/[Verse 1]
I'm a princess cut from marble, smoother than a storm
And the scars that mark my body, they're silver and gold
My blood is a flood of rubies, precious stones
It keeps my veins hot, the fires find a home in me
I move through town, I'm quiet like a fire
And my necklace is of rope, i tie it and untie it

[Pre-Chorus]
And now people talk to me, but nothing ever hits home
So people talk to me, and all the voices just burn holes
I'm done with it (ooh)

[Chorus]
This is the start of how it all ends
They used to shout my name, now they whisper it
I'm speeding up and this is the
Red, orange, yellow flicker beat sparking up my heart
We're at the start, the colors disappear
I never watch the stars there's so much down here
So I just try to keep up with them
Red, orange, yellow flicker beat sparking up my heart

[Verse 2]
I dream all year, but they're not the same kinds
And the shivers move down my shoulder blades in double time

[Pre-Chorus]
And now people talk to me I'm slipping out of reach now
People talk to me, and all their faces blur
But I got my fingers laced together and I made a little prison
And I'm locking up everyone who ever laid a finger on me
I'm done with it (ooh)

[Chorus]
This is the start of how it all ends
They used to shout my name, now they whisper it
I'm speeding up and this is the
Red, orange, yellow flicker beat sparking up my heart
We're at the start, the colors disappear
I never watch the stars there's so much down here
So I just try to keep up with them
Red, orange, yellow flicker beat sparking up my heart

[Outro]
And this is the red, orange, yellow flicker beat
Sparking up my heart
And this is the red, orange, yellow flicker beat-beat-beat-beat

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Passenger/AUTHOR	NAME/Bullets/NAME	"CONTENT/Well he's been collecting since the age of nine
Every shiny bullet that he could find
Built himself a house with the wooden floors
Put the shiny bullets in a chest of drawers

Well his wife's long gone and the kids have grown
And trees they fall down on their own
Memories fade like an old slideshow
But the bullets still shine like coins in the snow

Well one day took himself into town
The men with a truck well they came around
Took the television and the gun from the war
And almost every bullet from the chest of drawers

Well he came back home and found the house in a mess
Run into the bedroom and the old brown chest
Didn't care much for the vcr
But he cried for the space where the bullets were

The men drove the truck down into town
And sold all the silver they had found
But they couldn't sell the bullets cause they weren't live rounds
So they dug a big hole put the bullets in the ground

Now he doesn't leave the house much anymore
Cause the men are gonna come like they did before
And he'll hold onto the three or four
Bullets that they left in the chest of drawers
Oh yeah the bullets that they left in the chest of drawers

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Passenger/AUTHOR	NAME/Darkest Days/NAME	"CONTENT/See the lights of your town slowly sink and drown
Like a ship in a storm
See the birds against the sun
Feel the weight of things to come
And everything that's been before

See the woods with no pathways
See your grandfather's last days
See the darkest days my dear

Whisper words soft and low
To the songs that you know

And take them on your way
See the fallen snow
Beneath the street light glow
By the side of the motorway

See the walls with no doorways
With a heavy heart always
See the darkest days my dear

See the woods with no pathways
See your grandfather's last days
See the darkest days my dear

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Passenger/AUTHOR	NAME/Divers And Submarines/NAME	"CONTENT/Well I clung to you,
Like cat hair clings to a woolen shirt
You needed me, like a wedding dress needs dirt
The more that I wanted, the harder I squeezed
The harder I squeezed, the less you could breathe
And we sunk down to the bottom
Yeah, we sunk down to the bottom of the sea
Yeah, we sunk down to the bottom of the sea

And I cried for you,
Like a widow cries at her lover's grave
You haunted me through my stinging nights,
And aching days
The more that you struggled, the tighter the knots,
The tighter the knots, the lower we got

And we sunk down to the bottom
Yeah, we sunk down to the bottom of the sea
Yeah, we sunk down to the bottom of the sea
Yeah, we sunk down to the bottom of the sea
Oh no,
'Cause I saw divers and submarines
And I saw divers and submarines
Oh, I saw divers and submarines

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Passenger/AUTHOR	NAME/Golden Leaves/NAME	"CONTENT/Do you remember how this first begun?
Teeth were white and our skin was young
Eyes as bright as the Spanish Sun
We had nothing we could hide

Now my dear we are two golden leaves
Clinging desperately to winter trees
Got up here like a pair of thieves
While the sirens blare outside

What's left to say when every word's been spoken?
What's left to see when our eyes won't open?
What's left to do when we've lost all hope and
What's left to break when our hearts are broken?

But sometimes...

Do you remember how this started out?
So full of hope and now we're filled with doubt
A dirty joke we used to laugh about
But it's not funny anymore

I fear I choke unless I spit it out
Still smell of smoke, although the fire's gone out
Can't live with you, but I die without

What's left to say when every word's been spoken?
What's left to see when our eyes won't open?
What's left to do when we've lost all hope and
What's left to break when our hearts are broken?

But sometimes...

What's left to say when every word's been spoken?
What's left to see when our eyes won't open?
What's left to do when we've lost all hope and
What's left to break when our hearts are broken?

But sometimes...

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Passenger/AUTHOR	NAME/House On A Hill/NAME	"CONTENT/In an old house on a hillside
Next to the sea
Far from the madness, that folds around me
Peaceful and gentle, like sails on the breeze

In an old house on a hillside
Next to the sea
There's a warm light on a cold night
And clean cotton sheets
Soap smelling skin and tingling feet
With stars lining the skyline
And shine through the trees

In an old house on a hillside
Next to the sea
And when the autumn comes down
We'll get what we need from the town
And all of our friends will be round

In an old house on a hillside
Next to the sea
Moon white as paper and night like asleep
With old things behind us and new things to be

In an old house on a hillside
Next to the sea
And when the sunshine comes down,
My hair will turn golden
And my skin will turn brown
And all of our friends will be round

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Passenger/AUTHOR	NAME/In My Head/NAME	"CONTENT/I'm so brilliant
I'm a joke
My tongue is golden
I'm about to choke
And I'm holy
I'm a wreck
My voice is velvet
I have a rope around my neck

I'm so tired of this world in my head
I am the man that lost
So tired, so tired of myself
Am I the man that lost?

I'm a king
I'm a kick to the curb
I see things clear
My world is disturbed
And I'm a mountain
Yeah I'm a pile
I long for tomorrow
Haven't seen it in a while

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Passenger/AUTHOR	NAME/Let Her Go/NAME	"CONTENT/Well you only need the light when it's burning low
Only miss the sun when it starts to snow
Only know you love her when you let her go
Only know you've been high when you're feeling low
Only hate the road when you're missing home
Only know you love her when you let her go
And you let her go

Staring at the bottom of your glass
Hoping one day you'll make a dream last
But dreams come slow and they go so fast
You see her when you close your eyes
Maybe one day you'll understand why
Everything you touch, surely dies

But you only need the light when it's burning low
Only miss the sun when it starts to snow
Only know you love her when you let her go
Only know you've been high when you're feeling low
Only hate the road when you're missing home
Only know you love her when you let her go

Staring at the ceiling in the dark
Same old empty feeling in your heart
'Cause love comes slow and it goes so fast
Well you see her when you fall asleep
But never to touch and never to keep
'Cause you loved her too much and you dive too deep

Well you only need the light when it's burning low
Only miss the sun when it starts to snow
Only know you love her when you let her go
Only know you've been high when you're feeling low
Only hate the road when you're missing home
Only know you love her when you let her go
And you let her go
Oh oh oh no
And you let her go
Oh oh oh no
Well you let her go

'Cause you only need the light when it's burning low
Only miss the sun when it starts to snow
Only know you love her when you let her go
Only know you've been high when you're feeling low
Only hate the road when you're missing home
Only know you love her when you let her go

'Cause you only need the light when it's burning low
Only miss the sun when it starts to snow
Only know you love her when you let her go
Only know you've been high when you're feeling low
Only hate the road when you're missing home
Only know you love her when you let her go
And you let her go

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Passenger/AUTHOR	NAME/Needle In The Dark/NAME	"CONTENT/With progress comes problems
With wisdom comes age
With lessons come learning
And pleasure comes with pain

You can only have the sunshine after the rain

I took a walk
It got me thinking
Left foot, right foot
Smiling, blinking
Breathe out, breathe in
Somehow linking

My soul to my mind and my heart to my mouth
Lost and the found and the north to the south
And the corners to the circle in my mind

We may find that the gate has been locked
When we come back down to what we really are
Retrace the footprints off the path that is lost
It's like trying to find a needle in the dark

My hands they are empty
But they are clean
I'm poor but I'm healthy
I'm halfway between
The gutter and the skyline

So I took a walk to the land's end
Thinking about an ex-girlfriend that I had
And the pages that I've turned
And it seems to me
That we all love the chase
But once we're caught we feel encased
Behind bars of love and trust
Uprooted by drunken lust
By people, people just like us
People, people just like us

You may find that the gate has been locked
When we come back down to what we really are
Retrace the footprints off the path that's been lost
It's like trying to find a needle in the dark

So I took a walk to the station
Lost in my imagination
Having private conversations with myself
And I'm just stumbling around
And I wait for the sound
Of this crumbling town to come tumbling down
People say I'm just bummin' around
But I've had both my ears to the ground

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Passenger/AUTHOR	NAME/The Wrong Direction/NAME	"CONTENT/When I was a kid the things I did were hidden under the grid
Young and naive I never believed that love could be so well hid
dWith regret I'm willing to bet and say the older you get
It gets harder to forgive and harder to forget
It gets under your shirt like a dagger at work
The first cut is the deepest but the rest still flipping hurt
You build your heart of plastic
Get cynical and sarcastic
And end up in the corner on your own

'Cause I'd love to feel love but I can't stand the rejection
I hide behind my jokes as a form of protection
I thought I was close but under further inspection
It seems I've been running in the wrong direction oh no

So what's the point in getting your hopes up
When all you're ever getting is choked up
When you're coked up
And can't remember the reason why you broke up
You call her in the morning
When you're coming down and falling like an old man on the side of the road
'Cause when you're apart you don't want to mingle
When you're together you want to be single
Ever the chase to taste the kiss of bliss
That made your heart tingle
How much greener the grass is
With those rose tinted glasses
But the butterflies they flutter by and leave us on our arses

'Cause I'd love to feel love but I can't stand the rejection
I hide behind my jokes as a form of protection
I thought I was close but under further inspection
It seems I've been running in the wrong direction
There's fish in the sea for me to make a selection
I'd jump in if it wasn't for my ear infection
Cause all I want to do is try to make a connection
It seems I've been running in the wrong direction oh oh

Oh I'd love to feel love but I can't stand the rejection
I hide behind my jokes as a form of protection
I thought I was close but under further inspection
It seems I've been running in the wrong direction
I'd love to feel love but I can't stand the rejection
I hide behind my jokes as a form of protection
I thought I was close but under further inspection
It seems I've been running in the wrong direction oh
It seems like I'm running in the wrong direction oh
Seems like I'm running in the wrong direction oh
Well it seems I've been running in the wrong direction oh no
Seems I've been running in the wrong direction

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Passenger/AUTHOR	NAME/Used/NAME	"CONTENT/Your world always seemed so far away
My words are bouncing against your shield
They say time will heal all wounds
But I can't bleed forever

I want to live
I want to breathe
I want to live forever

Please spare us your self-pity
It's tedious enough
The stack of empathy
Has long ago run out

I hold no regrets of what has been done
I don't need the memories of a haunted man
It sickens me to feel this way
But I can't bleed forever
I want to live
I want to breathe
I want to live forever

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/The Beatles/AUTHOR	NAME/A Day In The Life/NAME	"CONTENT/I read the news today, oh boy
About a lucky man who made the grade
And though the news was rather sad
Well I just had to laugh
I saw the photograph.

He blew his mind out in a car
He didn't notice that the red lights had changed
A crowd of people stood and stared
They'd seen his face before
Nobody was really sure
If he was from the House of Lords.

I saw a film today, oh boy
The English army had just won the war
A crowd of people turned away
But I just had to look
Having read the book
I'd love to turn you on.

Woke up, fell out of bed,
Dragged a comb across my head
Found my way downstairs and drank a cup,
And looking up I noticed I was late.

Found my coat and grabbed my hat
Made the bus in seconds flat
Found my way upstairs and had a smoke,
Somebody spoke and I went into a dream.

I read the news today oh boy
Four thousand holes in Blackburn, Lancashire
And though the holes were rather small
They had to count them all
Now they know how many holes it takes to fill the Albert Hall.
I'd love to turn you on.

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/The Beatles/AUTHOR	NAME/A Hard Day's Night/NAME	"CONTENT/It's been a hard day's night, and I've been working like a dog
It's been a hard day's night, I should be sleeping like a log
But when I get home to you I find the things that you do
Will make me feel alright

You know I work all day to get you money to buy you things
And it's worth it just to hear you say you're going to give me everything
So why on earth should I moan, 'cause when I get you alone
You know I feel OK

When I'm home everything seems to be right
When I'm home feeling you holding me tight, tight

It's been a hard day's night, and I been working like a dog
It's been a hard day's night, I should be sleeping like a log
But when I get home to you I find the things that you do
Will make me feel alright, oww

So why on earth should I moan, 'cause when I get you alone
You know I feel OK

When I'm home everything seems to be right
When I'm home feeling you holding me tight, tight

It's been a hard day's night, and I been working like a dog
It's been a hard day's night, I should be sleeping like a log
But when I get home to you I find the things that you do
Will make me feel alright
You know I feel alright
You know I feel alright

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/The Beatles/AUTHOR	NAME/A Little Rhyme/NAME	"CONTENT/[Speech]

Rodney Burke: Now, for the final number, John's got a card in his hand with a
little rhyme on it. What is it?
John: It's from the form up a third at Hemel Hempstead.
Rodney: Oh!
John: It says, ""Dear George, John, Ringo, Paul, here's hoping that you'll
please us all. A beauty song and swinging voice, we leave it up to you, the
choice. We think you're fab and really cool, so brighten up our lads at
school."" Dig this, for here's Paul, whistling ""Clarabella

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/The Beatles/AUTHOR	NAME/A Taste Of Honey/NAME	"CONTENT/A taste of honey,
Tasting much sweeter than wine

Do do do
Do do do

I dream of your first kiss, and then,
I feel upon my lips again,
A taste of honey, a taste of honey
Tasting much sweeter than wine

I will return, yes I will return,
I'll come back for the honey and you

Do do do
Do do do

Yours was the kiss that awoke my heart,
There lingers still, 'though we're far apart,
That taste of honey, a taste of honey
Tasting much sweeter than wine

I will return, yes I will return,
I'll come back (he'll come back)
For the honey (for the honey)
And you

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/The Beatles/AUTHOR	NAME/Act Naturally/NAME	"CONTENT/They're gonna put me in the movies
They're gonna make a big star out of me
We'll make a film about a man that's sad and lonely
And all I gotta do is act naturally

Well, I'll bet you I'm gonna be a big star
Might win an Oscar you can never tell
The movies gonna make me a big star
'Cause I can play the part so well

Well I hope you come and see me in the movies
Then I know that you will plainly see
The biggest fool that ever hit the big time
And all I gotta do is act naturally

We'll make the scene about a man that's sad and lonely
And beggin' down upon his bended knee
I'll play the part but I won't need rehearsal
All I gotta do is act naturally

Well, I'll bet you I'm gonna be a big star
Might win an Oscar you can never tell
The movies gonna make me a big star
'Cause I can play the part so well

Well I hope you come and see me in the movies
Then I know that you will plainly see
The biggest fool that ever hit the big time
And all I gotta do is act naturally

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/The Beatles/AUTHOR	NAME/Ain't She Sweet/NAME	"CONTENT/Oh ain't she sweet,
Well see her walking down that street.
Yes I ask you very confidentially,
Ain't she sweet?

Oh ain't she nice,
Well look her over once or twice.
Yes I ask you very confidentially,
Ain't she nice?

Just cast an eye
In her direction.
Oh me oh my,
Ain't that perfection?

Oh I repeat
Well don't you think that's kind of neat?
Yes I ask you very confidentially,
Ain't she sweet?

Oh ain't she sweet,
Well see her walking down that street.
Well I ask you very confidentially,
Ain't she sweet?

Oh ain't that nice,
Well look it over once or twice.
Yes I ask you very confidentially,
Ain't she nice?

Just cast an eye
In her direction.
Oh me oh my,
Ain't that perfection?

Oh I repeat
Well don't you think that's kind of neat?
Yes I ask you very confidentially,
Ain't she sweet?

Oh ain't she sweet,
Well see her walking down that street.
Well I ask you very confidentially,
Ain't she sweet?
Well I ask you very confidentially,
Ain't she sweet?

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/The Beatles/AUTHOR	NAME/All My Loving/NAME	"CONTENT/Close your eyes and I'll kiss you
Tomorrow I'll miss you
Remember I'll always be true
And then while I'm away
I'll write home every day
And I'll send all my loving to you

I'll pretend that I'm kissing
The lips I am missing
And hope that my dreams will come true
And then while I'm away
I'll write home every day
And I'll send all my loving to you

All my loving, I will send to you
All my loving, darling I'll be true

Close your eyes and I'll kiss you
Tomorrow I'll miss you
Remember I'll always be true
And then while I'm away
I'll write home every day
And I'll send all my loving to you

All my loving, I will send to you
All my loving, darling I'll be true
All my loving, all my loving
Woo, all my loving, I will send to you

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/The Beatles/AUTHOR	NAME/All Things Must Pass/NAME	"CONTENT/Sunrise doesn't last all morning
A cloudburst doesn't last all day
Seems my love is up
And has left you with no warning
But it's not always going to be this grey

All things must pass
All things must pass away

Sunset doesn't last all evening
A mind can blow those clouds away
After all this my love is up
And must be leaving
It has not always been this grey

All things must pass
All things must pass away

All things must pass
None of life's strings can last
So I must be on my way
And face another day

Now the darkness only stays at nighttime
In the morning it will fade away
Daylight is good
At arriving at the right time
It's not always going to be this grey

All things must pass
All things must pass away
All things must pass
All things must pass away

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/The Beatles/AUTHOR	NAME/All Together Now/NAME	"CONTENT/One two three four
Can I have a little more
Five six seven eight nine ten
I love you

A B C D
Can I bring my friend to tea
E F G H I J
I love you

Bom bom bom bompa bom
Sail the ship Bompa bom
Chop the tree bompa bom
Skip the rope bompa bom
Look at me

All together now
All together now
All together now
All together now
All together now
All together now
All together now
All together now

Black white green red
Can I take my friend to bed
Pink brown yellow orange and blue
I love you

All together now
All together now
All together now
All together now
All together now
All together now
All together now
All together now
All together now
All together now
All together now
All together now
All together now
All together now
All together now
All together now
Bom bom bom bompa bom
Sail the ship Bompa bom
Chop the tree bompa bom
Skip the rope bompa bom
Look at me

All together now
All together now
All together now
All together now
All together now
All together now
All together now
All together now
All together now
All together now
All together now
All together now
All together now
All together now
All together now
All together now

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/The Beatles/AUTHOR	NAME/All You Need Is Love/NAME	"CONTENT/Love, love, love, love, love, love, love, love, love.

There's nothing you can do that can't be done.
Nothing you can sing that can't be sung.
Nothing you can say, but you can learn
How to play the game
It's easy.
Nothing you can make that can't be made.
No one you can save that can't be saved.
Nothing you can do, but you can learn
How to be you in time
It's easy.

All you need is love, all you need is love,
All you need is love, love. Love is all you need.
Love, love, love, love, love, love, love, love, love.
All you need is love, all you need is love,
All you need is love, love. Love is all you need.

There's nothing you can know that isn't known.
Nothing you can see that isn't shown.
There's nowhere you can be that isn't where
You're meant to be
It's easy.

All you need is love, all you need is love,
All you need is love, love. Love is all you need.
All you need is love. (All together now).
All you need is love. (Everybody).
All you need is love, love. Love is all you need.
Love is all you need.
Love is all you need

(Yesterday)
(Oh yeah)
(She love you, yeah, yeah, yeah)
(She love you, yeah, yeah, yeah)
(Oh, yesterday)

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/The Beatles/AUTHOR	NAME/Anna, Go To Him/NAME	"CONTENT/Anna,
You come and ask me, girl,
To set you free, girl,
You say he loves you more than me,
So I will set you free,
Go with him.
Go with him.

[Chorus]
Anna,
Girl, before you go now,
I want you to know, now,
That I still love you so,
But if he loves you mo',
Go with him.

All of my life,
I've been searchin' for a girl
To love me like I love you.
Oh, now, but every girl I've ever had,
Breaks my heart and leaves me sad.
What am I, what am I supposed to do.

Anna,
Just one more thing, girl.
You give back your ring to me, and I will set you free,
Go with him.

[Chorus]

All of my life,
I've been searchin' for a girl
To love me like I love you.
Oh, now, but every girl I've ever had,
Breaks my heart and leaves me sad.
What am I, what am I supposed to do.

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/The Beatles/AUTHOR	NAME/Baby, It's You/NAME	"CONTENT/It's not the way you smile that touched my heart
It's not the way you kiss that tears my apart

But how many many many nights go by
I sit alone at home and cry over you
What can I do, can't help myself
'Cause baby it's you, baby it's you

You should hear what they say about you (cheat, cheat)
They say, they say you never never ever been true (cheat, cheat)

Wo ho, it doesn't matter what they say
I know I'm gonna love you any old way
What can I do, then it's true
Don't want nobody, nobody
'Cause baby it's you, baby it's you

Wo ho, it doesn't matter what they say
I know I'm gonna love you any old way
What can I do, then it's true
Don't want nobody, nobody
'Cause baby it's you
Baby it's you, don't leave me all alone

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/The Beatles/AUTHOR	NAME/Baby's In Black/NAME	"CONTENT/Oh dear, what can I do?
Baby's in black
And I'm feeling blue
Tell me, oh what can I do?
She thinks of him
And so she dresses in black
And though he'll never come back
She's dressed in black

Oh dear, what can I do?
Baby's in black
And I'm feeling blue
Tell me, oh what can I do?
I think of her
But she thinks only of him
And though it's only a whim
She thinks of him

Oh how long will it take
Till she sees the mistake
She has made?
Dear what can I do?
Baby's in black
And I'm feeling blue
Tell me, oh what can I do?

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/The Beatles/AUTHOR	NAME/Back In The USSR/NAME	"CONTENT/Flew in from Miami Beach BOAC
Didn't get to bed last night
On the way the paper bag was on my knee
Man, I had a dreadful flight
I'm back in the USSR
You don't know how lucky you are, boy
Back in the USSR, yeah

Been away so long I early knew the place
Gee, it's good to be back home
Leave it till tomorrow to unpack my case
Honey disconnect the phone
I'm back in the USSR
You don't know how lucky you are, boy
Back in the US
Back in the US
Back in the USSR

Well the Ukraine girls really knock me out
They leave the west behind
And Moscow girls make me sing and shout
That Georgia's always on my my my my my my my my my mind
Oh, come on
Hu hey hu, hey, ah, yeah
Yeah, yeah, yeah
I'm back in the USSR
You don't know how lucky you are, boys
Back in the USSR

Well the Ukraine girls really knock me out
They leave the west behind
And Moscow girls make me sing and shout
That Georgia's always on my my my my my my my my my mind

Oh, show me round your snow peaked
Mountain way down south
Take me to your daddy's farm
Let me hear your balalaika's ringing out
Come and keep your comrade warm
I'm back in the USSR
Hey, you don't know how lucky you are, boy
Back in the USSR
Oh, let me tell you honey

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/The Beatles/AUTHOR	NAME/Bad Boy/NAME	"CONTENT/A bad little kid moved into my neighborhood
He won't do nothing right just sitting down and looks so good
He don't want to go to school and learn to read and write
Just sits around the house and plays the rock and roll music all night
Well, he put some tacks on teachers chair
Puts some gum in little girl's hair
Hey, junior, behave yourself

Buys every rock and roll book on the magazine stand
Every dime that he get is lost to the jukebox man
Well he worries his teacher till at night she's ready to poop
From rocking and a-rolling spinning in a hula hoop
Well this rock and roll has got to stop
Junior's head is hard as rock
Now, junior, behave yourself

Going tell your mama you better do what she said
Get to the barber shop and get that hair cut off your head
Threw the canary and you fed it to the neighbors cat
You gave the cocker spaniel a bath in mother's laundromat
Well, mama's head has got to stop
Junior's head is hard as rock
Now, junior, behave yourself

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/The Beatles/AUTHOR	NAME/Bad To Me/NAME	"CONTENT/If you ever leave me, I'll be sadand blue
Don't you ever leave me, I'm so in love with you
The birds in the sky would be sad and lonely,
If they knew that I lost my one and only,
They'd be sad if you're bad to me
The leaves on the trees would be softly sighin
If they heard from the breeze that you left me crying,
They'd be sad, don't be bad to me
But I know you won't leave me cause you told me so,
And I've no intention of letting you go,
Just as long as you let me know, you won't be bad to me
So the birds in the sky won't be sad and lonely,
Cause they know I got my one and only
They'd be glad that you're not bad to me
But I know you won't leave me cause you told me so,
And I've no intention of letting you go,
Just as long as you let me know, you won't be bad to me
So the birds in the sky won't be sad and lonely,
"" Cos they know I got my one and only
They'd be glad that you're not bad to me,
They'd be glas that you're not bad to me, to me, to me

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/The Beatles/AUTHOR	NAME/Being For The Benefit Of Mr. Kite/NAME	"CONTENT/For the benefit of Mr. Kite
There will be a show tonight on trampoline
The Hendersons will all be there
Late of Pablo Fanques' Fair-what a scene
Over men and horses hoops and garters
Lastly through a hogshead of real fire!
In this way Mr. K. will challenge the world!

The celebrated Mr. K.
Performs his feat on Saturday at Bishops Gate
The Hendersons will dance and sing
As Mr. Kite flies through the ring, don't be late
Messrs. K and H. assure the public
Their production will be second to none
And of course Henry The Horse dances the waltz!

The band begins at ten to six
When Mr. K. performs his tricks without a sound
And Mr. H. will demonstrate
Ten somersaults he'll undertake on solid ground
Having been some days in preparation
A splendid time is guaranteed for all
And tonight Mr. Kite is topping the bill

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/The Beatles/AUTHOR	NAME/Besame Mucho/NAME	"CONTENT/Esame besame mucho,
Each time I bring you a kiss
I hear music divine.
So besame besame mucho,
I love you for ever,
Say that you'll always be mine.

Dearest one, if you should leave me
Then each little dream will take wings
And my life would be through.
Oh besame besame mucho,
I love you for ever,
You make all my dreams come true.

Oh this joy is something new,
My arms they're holding you,
I never knew this thrill before.
Who ever thought I'd be
Holding you close to me
Whispering: it's you I adore.

Yes so dearest one, if you should leave me
Then each little dream will take wings,
And my life would be through.

Oh so besame besame mucho,
I love you for ever,
Make all my dreams come true.
Oh this joy is something new,
My arms are holding you,
I never knew this thrill before.
Who ever thought I'd be
Holding you close to me
Whispering it's you I adore.

Oh so dearest one, if you should leave me,
Then each little dream will take wings
And my life would be through.

Oh so besame besame mucho,
I love you for ever,
Make all my dreams come true.
I love you for ever,
Make all my dreams come true.
I love you for ever,
Make all my dreams come true.

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/The Beatles/AUTHOR	NAME/Carry That Weight/NAME	"CONTENT/Boy, you gotta carry that weight
Carry that weight a long time
Boy, you gonna carry that weight
Carry that weight a long time

I never give you my pillow
I only send you my invitation
And in the middle of the celebrations
I break down

Boy, you gotta carry that weight
Carry that weight a long time
Boy, you gotta carry that weight
You're gonna carry that weight along time

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/The Beatles/AUTHOR	NAME/Chains/NAME	"CONTENT/Chains, my baby's got me locked up in chains,
And they ain't the kind, that you can see
Whoa, these chains of love,
Got a hold on me, yeah

Chains, well I can't break away from these chains,
Can't run around 'cause I'm not free
Whoa, these chains of love won't let me be, yeah

I want to tell you pretty baby,
I think you're fine
I'd like to love you, but,
Darling, I'm imprisoned by these

Chains, my baby's got me locked up in chains,
And they ain't the kind, that you can see
Whoa, it's chains of love got a hold on me, yeah

Please believe me when I tell you, your lips are sweet
I'd like to kiss them but I can't break away from all these

Chains, my baby's got me locked up in chains,
And they ain't the kind that you can see
Whoa, these chains of love got a hold on me, yeah

Chains, chains of love
Chains of love
Chains of love

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/The Beatles/AUTHOR	NAME/Child Of Nature/NAME	"CONTENT/I was dreaming of the past
And my heart was beating fast
I began to lose control
I began to lose control
I didn't mean to hurt you
I'm sorry that I made you cry
Oh well I didn't want to hurt you
I'm just a jealous guy
I was feeling insecure
You might not love me any more
I was shivering inside
I was shivering inside
I didn't mean to hurt you
I'm sorry that I made you cry
Oh well I didn't want to hurt you
I'm just a jealous guy
I was tryin' to catch your eyes
Thought that you was tryin' to hide
I was swallowing my pain
I was swallowing my pain
I didn't mean to hurt you
I'm sorry that I made you cry
Oh well I didn't want to hurt you
I'm just a jealous guy
Watch out
I'm just a jealous guy
Look out baby
I'm just a jealous guy

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/The Beatles/AUTHOR	NAME/Christmas Time/NAME	"CONTENT/Christmas time is here again
Christmas time is here again
Christmas time is here again
Christmas time is here again

Ain't been round since you know when
Christmas time is here again
O-you-t spells "" out""

Christmas time is here again
Christmas time is here again
Christmas time is here again
Christmas time is here again

Ain't been round since you know when
Christmas time is here again
O-you-t spells "" out""

Christmas time is here again
Christmas time is here again
Christmas time is here again
Christmas time is here again

Ain't been round since you know when
Christmas time...[music continues and fades to background]

[spoken]

This is paul mccartney here, I'd just like to wish you everything you wish
yourself for christmas.

This is john lennon saying on behalf of the beatles, have a very happy
christmas and a good new year.

George harrison speaking. I'd like to take this opportunity to wish you a very
merry christmas, listeners everywhere.

This is ringo starr and I'd just like to say merry christmas and a really
happy new year to all listeners

[a john lennon pastiche at this point, very hard to understand]

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/The Beatles/AUTHOR	NAME/Clarabella/NAME	"CONTENT/Well, I got a baby crazy for me
Yeah, I got a baby won't let me alone
Baby baby, Clarabella
Baby baby, Clarabella
Baby baby, wo wo, yeah uh

Well, she needs no coaching on making love
All she needs is the stars up above
Who, baby baby, Clarabella
Baby baby, Clarabella
Baby baby, wo wo, yeah uh
Ahh! Woo hoo

Well now, Clarabella
You're my honey, Clarabella
Ooh yeah now, Clarabella
I said you're my baby
Clarabella
Yeah, Clarabella, baby
Wo wo, yeah yeh

Well, she's got no time for a dungeries
Already knows her ABC's
Who, baby baby, Clarabella
Baby baby, Clarabella
Baby baby, wo wo, yeah yeh
Ahh ow! Woo

Well now, Clarabella
Yeah, you're my honey, Clarabella
Woo ooh, you're my baby, Clarabella
You're my honey, Clarabella
Yeah, Clarabella, baby
Wo wo, yeah heh yeah, oh yeah

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/The Beatles/AUTHOR	NAME/Cold Turkey/NAME	"CONTENT/Temperature's rising
Fever is high
Can't see not future
Can't see no sky
My feet are so heavy
So is my head
I wish I was a baby
I wish I was dead
Cold turkey has got me on the run
Body is aching
Goose-pimple bone
Can't see no body
Leave me alone
My eyes are wide open
Can't get to sleep
One thing I'm sure of
I'm at the deep freeze
Cold turkey has got me on the run
Cold turkey has got me on the run
Thirty-six hours
Rolling in pain
Praying for someone
Free me again
Oh I'll be a good boy
Please make me well
I promise you anything
Get me out of this hell
Cold turkey has got me on the run

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/The Beatles/AUTHOR	NAME/Come And Get It/NAME	"CONTENT/If you want it
Here it is,
Come and get it.
Make your mind up fast.

If you want it
Anytime I can give it
But you better hurry
Cause it may not last.

Did I hear you say
That there must be a catch
Will you walk away
From a fool and his money

If you want it,
Here it is,
Come and get it,
But you better hurry
Cause it's going fast.

If you want it
Here it is,
Come and get it,
Make your mind up fast.

If you want it
Anytime I can give it,
But you'd better hurry
Cause it may not last.

Did I hear you say
That there must be a catch
Will you walk away
From a fool and his money

Sonny, if you want it,
Here it is,
Come and get it
But you'd better hurry
Cause it's going fast.
You'd better hurry
Cause it's going fast.

Fool and his money.

Sonny, if you want it,
Here it is,
Come and get it,
But you'd better hurry
Cause it's going fast,
You'd better hurry
Cause it's going fast,
You'd better hurry
Cause it's going fast.

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/The Beatles/AUTHOR	NAME/Come Together/NAME	"CONTENT/Here come old flat top
He come groovin' up slowly
He got joo joo eyeballs
He one holy rollers
He got hair down to his knee
Got to be a joker
He just do what he please

He wear no shoeshine
He got toe jam football
He got monkey finger
He shoot Coca Cola
He say I know you, you know me
One thing I can tell you is
You got to be free
Come together, right now
Over me

He Bag production
He got walrus gumboat
He got Ono sideboard
He one spinal cracker
He got feet down below his knees
Hold you in his arms, yeah,
You can feel his disease
Come together, right now
Over me

He roller coaster
He got early warning
He got muddy water
He one Mojo filter
He say one and one and one is three
Got to be good looking
Cause he's so hard to see
Come together right now
Over me

Come together, yeah
Come together, yeah
Come together, yeah
Come together, yeah
Come together, yeah
Come together, yeah
Come together, yeah
Come together, yeah
Come together, yeah

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/The Beatles/AUTHOR	NAME/Commonwealth/NAME	"CONTENT/Immigrants. Wilson Health said to the immgrants you better get back to the
Commonwealth homes. Yeah, yeah, yeah I said Get back home. Now Enoch Powell
was
Said to the folks color of his skin. He said don't care. So he said you better
Get up. He said he said to Enoch Powell. You better go home. So Wilson said
to.
We got to swing. We have to go the hill. So Wilson Health said to Enoch Powell
We got to the commonwealth. Commonwealth yeah commonwealth yeah commonwealth
Yeah commonwealth yeah.
Commonwealth yeah. If you don't want trouble you got to go home. To Indania.
I've have enough of that. I'm coming back yeah to England. Dirty Enoch Powell.
Commonwealth. Commonwealth yeah. Don't you hear me commonwealth yeah. Well I
Check Austria England India. Enoch powell. Oh commonwealth yeag. Oh
Commonwealth yeah. Yeah commonwealth yeah. Commonwealth yeah. It's to common
to
Me. I came down the street to New Zealand. Commonwealth. Commonwealth yeah.
Commonwealth yeah. Enoch Powell commonwealth yeah. Immigrants commonwealth
Yeah. Market.

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/The Beatles/AUTHOR	NAME/Crinsk Dee Night/NAME	"CONTENT/[Speech]

Brian Matthew: The next few minutes, we're in the lap of the gods and the
hands of the Beatles. In my young days, when I was a lad, they used to have
actors in films and now that they--
Paul: Yes?
John: Hey! Listen!
Paul: It's all changed, now, Brian. They're not doing that, no actors.
John: It's all changed, now.
Brian: But this is what I wonder. In those days, the actors used to say their
best bits were left on the cutting room floor. Did you find that?
John: No, no, no, those were the good bits in the film. You should have seen
the rest.
Brian: Yes?
John: Rubbish!
Brian: Was it, really?
John: Even worse, yes.
Brian: Who was worst?
John: Oh, Paul.
Brian: I see.
Paul: I think John was about the worst.
John: No, it was you.
Paul: Oh, Ringo was very good. He was. He's a good lad.
Brian: He was. They're saying he's a new Charlie Chaplin. Do you think that's
right?
John: He was miming.
Paul: You, too, with Jason.
John: Oh, yes, he's an old one. Okay, Ring?
Brian: Beginning to look like that. Now, then--
Ringo: All right, John. Can you hear me?
Paul: Can you hear him? Hello!
Brian: Not really. I hope not. I hope not!
John: We brought you the flowers, Ring.
Brian: He's not allowed to talk.
Ringo: Eh?
John: We brought you the flowers.
Ringo: Oh, good.
John: And the grapes.
Ringo: Oh, I like grapes.
Paul: He likes grapes.
George: We've been to Portugal.
Brian: Guess who's, guess who's top of the pops in Portugal, then.
All: Who?
Brian: Los Beatles.
John: Los Beatles? Great, great laugh.
Brian: I don't suppose you know the title of your film in Portuguese?
John: No. Crinsk dee Night?
Brian: Could be. Let's hear the number, shall we?
John: Right

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/The Beatles/AUTHOR	NAME/Cry Baby Cry/NAME	"CONTENT/Cry baby cry
Make your mother sigh
She's old enough to know better.

The King of Marigold was in the kitchen
Cooking breakfast for the Queen
The Queen was in the parlor
Playing piano for the children of the King.

Cry baby cry
Make your mother sigh
She's old enough to know better.
So cry baby cry.

The King was in the garden
Picking flowers for a friend who came to play
The Queen was in the playroom
Painting pictures for the children's holiday.

Cry baby cry
Make your mother sigh
She's old enough to know better.
So cry baby cry.

The Dutchess of Kircaldy always smiling
And arriving late for tea
The Duke was having problems
With a message at the local Bird and Bee.

Cry baby cry
Make your mother sigh
She's old enough to know better.
So cry baby cry.

At twelve o'clock a meeting round the table
For a seance in the dark
With voices out of nowhere
Put on specially by the children for a lark.

Cry baby cry
Make your mother sigh
She's old enough to know better.
So cry baby cry cry cry cry baby
Make your mother sigh.

She's old enough to know better
Cry baby cry
Cry cry cry
Make your mother sigh
She's old enough to know better.
So cry baby cry.

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/The Beatles/AUTHOR	NAME/Crying, Waiting, Hoping/NAME	"CONTENT/Crying, waiting, hoping you'll come back
I just can't seem to get you off my mind
Crying, waiting, hoping you'll come back
You're the one I love, I think about you all the time

Crying, do do do do, tear keep a falling all night long
Waiting, do do do do, it seems so useless I know it's wrong
Keep a crying, waiting, hoping you'll come back
Maybe someday soon it'll change and you'll be mine

Crying, do do do do, tears keep a falling all night long
Waiting, do do do do, it seems so useless I know it's wrong
Keep a crying, waiting, hoping you'll come back
Maybe someday soon it'll change and you'll be mine
Crying, waiting, hoping

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/The Beatles/AUTHOR	NAME/Day Tripper/NAME	"CONTENT/Got a good reason
For taking the easy way out
Got a good reason
For taking the easy way out now
She was a day tripper
One way ticket, yeah
It took me so long to find out
And I found out

She's a big teaser
She took me half the way there
She's a big teaser
She took me half the way there, now
She was a day tripper
One way ticket, yeah
It took me so long to find out
And I found out
Ah, ah, ah, ah, ah, ah

Tried to please her
She only played one night stand
Tried to please her
She only played one night stand, now
She was a day tripper
Sunday driver, yeah
It took me so long to find out
And I found out

Day tripper, day tripper, yeah
Day tripper, day tripper, yeah
Day tripper, day tripper, yeah

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/The Beatles/AUTHOR	NAME/Dear Prudence/NAME	"CONTENT/Dear Prudence, won't you come out to play
Dear Prudence, greet the brand new day
The sun is up, the sky is blue
It's beautiful and so are you
Dear Prudence won't you come out to play

Dear Prudence open up your eyes
Dear Prudence see the sunny skies
The wind is low the birds will sing
That you are part of everything
Dear Prudence won't you open up your eyes?

Look around round
Look around round round
Look around

Dear Prudence let me see you smile
Dear Prudence like a little child
The clouds will be a daisy chain
So let me see you smile again
Dear Prudence won't you let me see you smile?

Dear Prudence, won't you come out to play
Dear Prudence, greet the brand new day
The sun is up, the sky is blue
It's beautiful and so are you
Dear Prudence won't you come out to play

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/The Beatles/AUTHOR	NAME/Devil In Her Heart/NAME	"CONTENT/She's got the devil in her heart
But her eyes they tantalize
She's gonna tear your heart apart
Oh her lips they really thrill me

I'll take my chances
For romance is
So important to me
She'll never hurt me
She won't desert me
She's an angel sent to me

She's got the devil in her heart
No, no, this I can't believe
She's gonna tear your heart apart
No, no nay will she deceive

I can't believe that she'll ever ever go
Not when she hugs and says she loves me so
She'll never hurt me
She won't desert me
Listen can't you see

She's got the devil in her heart
Oh, no, no, no, this I can't believe
She's gonna tear your heart apart
No no nay will she deceive

Don't take chances if your romance is
So important to you
She'll never hurt me
She won't desert me
She's an angel sent to me

She's got the devil in her heart
Oh, no, no, no, no this I can't believe
She's gonna tear your heart apart
No, no nay will she deceive

She's got the devil in her heart
No she's an angel sent to me
She's got the devil in her heart
No she's an angel sent to me

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/The Beatles/AUTHOR	NAME/Do You Want To Know A Secret/NAME	"CONTENT/You'll never know how much I really love you
You'll never know how much I really care
Listen do you want to know a secret
Do you promise not to tell woh woh woh closer
Let me whisper in your ear
Say the words you long to hear
I'm in love with you oo
I've known the secret for a week or two
Nobody knows just we two
Listen do you want to know a secret
Do you promise not to tell woh woh woh closer
Let me whisper in your ear
Say the words you long to hear
I'm in love with you oo

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/The Beatles/AUTHOR	NAME/Don't Bother Me/NAME	"CONTENT/Since she's been gone I want no one to talk to me.
It's not the same but I'm to blame, it's plain to see.

So go away, leave me alone, don't bother me.
I can't believe that she would leave me on my own.
It's just not right when every night I'm all alone.

I've got no time for you right now, don't bother me.
I know I'll never be the same if I don't get her back again.
Because I know she'll always be the only girl for me.

But 'till she's here please don't come near, just stay away.
I'll let you know when she's come home.
Until that day

Don't come around, leave me alone, don't bother me.
I've got no time for you right now, don't bother me.
I know I'll never be the same if I don't get her back again.
Because I know she'll always be the only girl for me.

But 'till she's here please don't come near, just stay away.
I'll let you know when she's come home.
Until that day

Don't come around, leave me alone, don't bother me.
Don't bother me.
Don't bother me.
Don't bother me.
Don't bother me.

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/The Beatles/AUTHOR	NAME/Don't Ever Change/NAME	"CONTENT/[Speech]
Rodney Burke: That was a, a Little Richard number that the boys rather like
and hope you liked it, ""Ooh! My Soul."" And, ooh, my arms! We've, we've just
flown in to Manchester here from London to record this show. Ha, ha. Well,
it's, ha, ha, it's good to see you again, fellers, in these, er, foreign
parts. How are you?
John: Oh, great!
George: Very well, thank you.
Ringo: Oh, great, yeah, it's just fine.
Paul: Yeah.
Rodney: Well, what are you doing at the moment, by the way?
George: Ah, we're playing in Liverpool at the moment and we've never been
there months, you see, so it's--
Ringo: It's good to be back.
Paul Yeah, it's great!
Rodney: Anybody over there like a request that you can do right now?
George: Well, we'll do a request for everybody.
Paul: Yeah.
Rodney: Good, what do you suggest?
George: Er, ""Don't Ever Change,"" one of the oldies.

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/The Beatles/AUTHOR	NAME/Don't Let Me Down/NAME	"CONTENT/Don't let me down
Don't let me down
Don't let me down
Don't let me down

Nobody ever loved me like she does
Ooh, she does
Yes, she does
And if somebody loved me like she do me
Ooh, she do me
Yes, she does

Don't let me down
Don't let me down
Don't let me down
Don't let me down

I'm in love for the first time
Don't you know it's gonna last?
It's a love that lasts forever
It's a love that has no past

Don't let me down
Don't let me down
Don't let me down
Don't let me down

And from the first time that she really done me
Ooh, she done me
She done me good
I guess nobody ever really done me
Ooh, she done me
She done me good

Don't let me down
Don't let me down
Don't let me down
Don't let me down
Don't let me down
Don't let me down
Don't let me down
Don't let me down

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/The Beatles/AUTHOR	NAME/Don't Pass Me By/NAME	"CONTENT/I listen for your footsteps
Coming up the drive.
Listen for your footsteps
But they don't arrive.
Waiting for your knock, dear
On my old front door.
I don't hear it,
Does it mean you don't love me anymore?

I hear the clock a'ticking,
On the mantel shelf.
See the hands a'moving,
But I'm by myself.
I wonder where you are tonight,
And why I'm by myself.
I don't see you,
Does it mean you don't love me anymore?

Don't pass me by, don't make me cry, don't make me blue.
'Cause you know darling, I love only you.
You'll never know it hurt me so,
I hate to see you go.
Don't pass me by, don't make me cry.

I'm sorry that I doubted you,
I was so unfair.
You were in a car crash,
And you lost your hair.
You said that you would be late
About an hour or two.
I said, ""That's alright, I'm waiting here,
Just waiting to hear from you"".

Don't pass me by, don't make me cry, don't make me blue.
'Cause you know darling, I love only you.
You'll never know it hurt me so,
I hate to see you go.
Don't pass me by, don't make me cry.

Don't pass me by, don't make me cry, don't make me blue.
'Cause you know darling, I love only you.
You'll never know it hurt me so,
I hate to see you go.
Don't pass me by, don't make me cry.

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/The Beatles/AUTHOR	NAME/Drive My Car/NAME	"CONTENT/Asked a girl what she wanted to be
She said baby, can't you see
I want to be famous, a star on the screen
But you can do something in between
Baby you can drive my car
Yes I'm gonna be a star
Baby you can drive my car
And maybe I'll love you

I told a girl that my prospects were good
And she said baby, it's understood
Working for peanuts is all very fine
But I can show you a better time

Baby you can drive my car
Yes I'm gonna be a star
Baby you can drive my car
And maybe I'll love you

Beep beep'm beep beep yeah

Baby you can drive my car
Yes I'm gonna be a star
Baby you can drive my car
And maybe I'll love you

I told a girl I can start right away
And she said listen babe I got something to say
I got no car and it's breaking my heart
But I've found a driver and that's a start

Baby you can drive my car
Yes I'm gonna be a star
Baby you can drive my car
And maybe I'll love you

Beep beep'm beep beep yeah
Beep beep'm beep beep yeah
Beep beep'm beep beep yeah
Beep beep'm beep beep yeah

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/The Beatles/AUTHOR	NAME/Eight Days A Week/NAME	"CONTENT/Oh, I need your love, babe
Guess you know it's true
Hope you need my love babe
Just like I need you

Hold me, love me, hold me, love me
I ain't got nothing but love, babe
Eight days a week

Love you every day, girl
Always on my mind
One thing I can say, girl
Love you all the time

Hold me, love me, hold me, love me
I ain't got nothing but love, girl
Eight days a week

Eight days a week
I love you
Eight days a week
Is not enough to show I care

Ooh I need your love, babe
Guess you know it's true
Hope you need my love babe
Just like I need you

Hold me, love me, hold me, love me
I ain't got nothing but love, babe
Eight days a week

Eight days a week
I love you
Eight days a week
is not enough to show I care

Love you every day, girl
Always on my mind
One thing I can say girl
Love you all the time

Hold me, love me, hold me, love me
I ain't got nothing but love, babe
Eight days a week
Eight days a week
Eight days a week

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/The Beatles/AUTHOR	NAME/Eleanor Rigby/NAME	"CONTENT/Ah look at all the lonely people
Ah look at all the lonely people

Eleanor Rigby, picks up the rice
In the church where a wedding has been
Lives in a dream
Waits at the window, wearing the face
That she keeps in a jar by the door
Who is it for

All the lonely people
Where do they all come from?
All the lonely people
Where do they all belong?

Father McKenzie, writing the words
Of a sermon that no one will hear
No one comes near
Look at him working, darning his socks
In the night when there's nobody there
What does he care

All the lonely people
Where do they all come from?
All the lonely people
Where do they all belong?

Ah look at all the lonely people
Ah look at all the lonely people

Eleanor Rigby, died in the church
And was buried along with her name
Nobody came
Father McKenzie, wiping the dirt
From his hands as he walks from the grave
No one was saved

All the lonely people
Where do they all come from?
All the lonely people
Where do they all belong?

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/The Beatles/AUTHOR	NAME/Every Little Thing/NAME	"CONTENT/When I'm walking beside her
People tell me I'm lucky.
Yes, I know I'm a lucky guy.
I remember the first time
I was lonely without her.
Can't stop thinking about her now.

Every little thing she does,
She does for me, yeah.
And you know the things she does,
She does for me, oooh.
When I'm with her I'm happy
Just to know that she loves me.
Yes, I know that she loves me now.

There is one thing I'm sure of,
I will love her forever.
For I know love will never die.

Every little thing she does,
She does for me, yeah.
And you know the things she does,
She does for me, ooh.
Every little thing she does,
She does for me, yeah.

And you know the things she does,
She does for me, ooh.
Every little thing.
Every little thing.
Every little

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/The Beatles/AUTHOR	NAME/Everybody's Got Something To Hide Except Me And My Monkey/NAME	"CONTENT/Come on come on, come on come on
Come on its such a joy
Come on its such a joy
Come on let's take it easy
Come on let's take it easy
Take it easy take it easy
Everybody's got something to hide except for me and
My monkey

The deeper you go, the higher you fly
The higher you fly, the deeper you go
So come on come on
Come on its such a joy
Come on its such a joy
Come on let's make it easy
Come on let's make it easy

Take it easy, take it easy
Everybody's got something to hide except for me and
My monkey

Your inside is out when your outside is in
Your outside is in when your inside is out
So come on come on
Come on its such a joy
Come on its such a joy
Come on let's make it easy
Come on let's make it easy
Make it easy, make it easy
Everybody's got something to hide except for me and
My monkey

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/The Beatles/AUTHOR	NAME/Everybody's Trying To Be My Baby/NAME	"CONTENT/Well they took some honey from a tree
Dressed it up and they called it me

Everybody's trying to be my baby
Everybody's trying to be my baby
Everybody's trying to be my baby, now

Well half past nine, half past four
Fifty women knocking on my door

Everybody's trying to be my baby
Everybody's trying to be my baby
Everybody's trying to be my baby, now

Went out last night, I didn't stay late
'Fore I got home I had nineteen dates

Everybody's trying to be my baby
Everybody's trying to be my baby
Everybody's trying to be my baby, now

Went out last night, I didn't stay late
'Fore I got home I had nineteen dates

Well they took some honey from a tree
Dressed it up and they called it me

Everybody's trying to be my baby
Everybody's trying to be my baby
Everybody's trying to be my baby, no

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/The Beatles/AUTHOR	NAME/Fixing A Hole/NAME	"CONTENT/I'm fixing a hole where the rain gets in
And stops my mind from wandering
Where it will go

I'm filling the cracks that ran through the door
And kept my mind from wandering
Where it will go

And it really doesn't matter if I'm wrong I'm right
Where I belong I'm right
Where I belong.

See the people standing there who disagree and never win
And wonder why they don't get in my door
I'm painting my room in the colourful way

And when my mind is wandering
There I will go
And it really doesn't matter if I'm wrong I'm right
Where I belong I'm right
Where I belong.

Silly people run around they worry me
And never ask me why they don't get past my door
I'm taking the time for a number of things
That weren't important yesterday
And I still go

I'm fixing a hole where the rain gets in
And stops my mind from wandering
Where it will go

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/The Beatles/AUTHOR	NAME/Follow The Sun/NAME	"CONTENT/One day, you'll look
To see I've gone.
But tomorrow may rain, so I'll follow the sun.
Someday, you'll know
I was the one.
But tomorrow may rain, so I'll follow the sun.

And now the time has come,
And so, my love, I must go.
And though I loose a friend,
In the end you will know.

One day, you'll find
That I have gone.
But tomorrow may rain, so I'll follow the sun.

But tomorrow may rain, so I'll follow the sun.
And now the time has come,
And so, my love, I must go.
And though I loose a friend,
In the end you will know.

One day, you'll find
That I have gone.
But tomorrow may rain, so I'll follow the sun.

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/The Beatles/AUTHOR	NAME/For You Blue/NAME	"CONTENT/Because you're sweet and lovely, girl, I love you
Because you're sweet and lovely, girl, it's true
I love you more than ever, girl, I do
I want you in the morning, girl, I love you
I want you at the moment I feel blue
I'm living every moment, girl, for you

(Walk, walk cat, walk)
(Go, Johnny, go)
(Same old tale of blues)
(Elmore James got nothing on this, baby)

I've loved you from the moment, I saw you
You looked at me that's all you had to do
I feel it now, I hope you feel it too
Because you're sweet and lovely, girl, I love you
Because you're sweet and lovely, girl, it's true
I love you more than ever, girl, I do

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/The Beatles/AUTHOR	NAME/Free As A Bird/NAME	"CONTENT/Free as a bird
It's the next best thing to be
Free as a bird

La, la, la, la
Home and dry
Like a homin' bird I fly
As a bird on wings

Whatever happened to the life that we once knew
Can we really live without each other?
Where did we lose the touch
That seemed to mean so much
It's always made me feel so

Free as a bird
It's the next best thing to be
Free as a bird

La, la, la, la
Home and dry
Like a homin' bird I fly
As a bird on wings

Whatever happened to
The life that we once knew?
Always made me feel so free

Free as a bird
It's the next best thing to be
Free as a bird

Free as a bird
Free as a bird
Free as a bird, oh, oh, oh

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/The Beatles/AUTHOR	NAME/From Me To You/NAME	"CONTENT/Da da da, da da dumb dumb da
Da da da, da da dumb dumb da
If there's anything that you want
If there's anything I can do
Just call on me and I'll send it along
With love, from me to you

I've got everything that you want
Like a heart that's oh so true
Just call on me and I'll send it along
With love, from me to you

I've got arms that long to hold you
And keep you by my side
I've got lips that long to kiss you
And keep you satisfied (oh)

If there's anything that you want
If there's anything I can do
Just call on me and I'll send it along
With love, from me to you

From me
To you
Just call on me and I'll send it along
With love, from me to you

I've got arms that long to hold you
And keep you by my side
I've got lips that long to kiss you
And keep you satisfied (oh)

If there's anything that you want
If there's anything I can do
Just call on me and I'll send it along
With love, from me to you
To you
To you
To you

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/The Beatles/AUTHOR	NAME/Getting Better/NAME	"CONTENT/It's getting better all the time
I used to get mad at my school
The teacher's that taught me weren't cool
You're holding me down
Filling me up with your rules

I've got to admit it's getting better
A little better all the time
I have to admit it's getting better
It's getting better since you've been mine

Me used to be angry young man
Me hiding me head in the sand
You gave me the word
I finally heard
I'm doing the best that I can
I've got to admit it's getting better

I used to be cruel to my woman
I beat her and kept apart from the things that she loved
Man I was mean but I'm changing my scene
And I'm doing the best that I can

I admit it's getting better
A little better all the time
Yes I admit it's getting better
It's getting better since you've been mine...

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/The Beatles/AUTHOR	NAME/Girl/NAME	"CONTENT/Is there anybody going to listen to my story
All about the girl who came to stay?
She's the kind of girl
You want so much it make you sorry
Still you don't regret a single day
Ah, girl, girl, girl

When I think of all the times
I tried so hard to leave her
She will turn to me and start to cry
And she promises the earth to me
And I believe her
After all this time I don't know why
Ah, girl, girl, girl

She's the kind of girl who puts you down
When friends are there
You feel a fool
When you say she's looking good
She acts as if it's understood
She's cool, ooh, oo, oo, oo
Girl, girl, girl

Was she told when she was young
That pain would lead to pleasure
Did she understand it when they said
That a man must break his back
To earn his day of leisure?
Will she still believe it when he's dead
Ah, girl, girl, girl
Girl

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/The Beatles/AUTHOR	NAME/Glad All Over/NAME	"CONTENT/Ain't no doubt about it
This must be love
One little kiss from you
And I feel glad all over
Oo baby, hot dang gilly
It's silly
But I'm glad all over

Yeah the goosepimples baby
'Cause I feel so good
When you call me like you do
And I feel glad all over
Oo mercy, I'm rock gone puppy
And I'm happy
And I'm glad all over

Your touch sewed me
Like an electric wire
Never thought of make love
It don't take much looking
To see what I've got
But it shows, yes it shows
Come on honey Bonnie
Give me one more time
Every time you do
Well I feel glad all over
Ooo baby, hot dang gilly
It's silly
But I'm glad all over
Yeah!

Tried to tell you
How I'm cooking inside
When we're cheek to cheek
My temperature is low
Fever is high
I can't speak
I'm too weak

Well come on honey Bonnie
Give me one more time
Every time you do
Well I feel glad all over
Ooo baby, hot dang gilly
It's silly
But I'm glad all over
Hot dang gilly
It's silly
But I'm glad all over
Well, hot dang gilly
It's silly
But I'm glad all over.

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/The Beatles/AUTHOR	NAME/Glass Onion/NAME	"CONTENT/I told you about strawberry fields
You know the place where nothing is real
Well here's another place you can go
Where everything flows.

Looking through the bent-backed tulips
To see how the other half live
Looking through a glass onion.

I told you about the walrus and me, man
You know we're as close as can be, man
Well here's another clue for you all
The walrus was Paul.

Standing on the cast iron shore, yeah
Lady Madonna trying to make ends meet, yeah
Looking through the glass onion

Oh yeah, oh yeah, oh yeah
Looking through the glass onion.

I told you about the fool on the hill
I tell you man he's living there still
Well here's another place you can be
Listen to me.

Fixing a hole in the ocean
Trying to make a dove-tail joint, yeah
Looking through a glass onion.

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/The Beatles/AUTHOR	NAME/Golden Slumbers/NAME	"CONTENT/Once there was a way,
To get back homeward.

Once there was a way
To get back home.

Sleep, pretty darling,
Dot not cry
And I will sing a lullaby.

Golden slumbers,
Fill your eyes
Smiles await you when you rise
Sleep pretty darling
Do not cry
And I will sing a lullaby.

Once there was a way
To get back homeward

Once there was a way
To get back home

Sleep, pretty darling
Do not cry
And I will sing a lullaby.

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/The Beatles/AUTHOR	NAME/Good Day Sunshine/NAME	"CONTENT/Good day sunshine,
Good day sunshine,
Good day sunshine.
I need to laugh, and when the sun is out
I've got something I can laugh about,
I feel good, in a special way.
I'm in love and it's a sunny day.

Good day sunshine,
Good day sunshine,
Good day sunshine.
We take a walk, the sun is shining down,
Burns my feet as they touch the ground.

Good day sunshine,
Good day sunshine,
Good day sunshine.
And then we lie, beneath a shady tree,
I love her and she's loving me.
She feels good, she knows she's looking fine.
I'm so proud to know that she is mine.

Good day sunshine,
Good day sunshine,
Good day sunshine.
Good day sunshine,
Good day sunshine,
Good day sunshine,
Good day sunshine.

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/The Beatles/AUTHOR	NAME/Good Morning, Good Morning/NAME	"CONTENT/Good morning, good morning
Nothing to do to save his life call his wife in
Nothing to say but what a day how's your boy been
Nothing to do it's up to you
I've got nothing to say but it's ok
Good morning, good morning

Going to work don't want to go feeling low down
Heading for home you start to roam then you're in town
Everybody knows there's nothing doing
Everything is closed it's like a ruin
Everyone you see is half asleep.
And you're on your own you're in the street.

After a while you start to smile now you feel cool
Then you decide to take a walk by the old school.
Nothing had changed it's still the same
I've got nothing to say but it's ok
Good morning, good morning

People running round it's five o'clock
Everywhere in town is getting dark
Everyone you see is full of life.
It's time for tea and meet the wife
Somebody needs to know the time, glad that I'm here.

Watching the skirts you start to flirt now you're in gear.
Go to show you hope she goes.
I've got nothing to say but it's ok.
Good morning, good morning

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/The Beatles/AUTHOR	NAME/Good Night/NAME	"CONTENT/Now it's time to say good night
Good night sleep tight
Now the sun turns out his light
Good night sleep tight
Dream sweet dreams for me
Dream sweet dreams for you.

Close your eyes and I'll close mine
Good night sleep tight
Now the moon begins to shine
Good night sleep tight
Dream sweet dreams for me
Dream sweet dreams for you.

Close your eyes and I'll close mine
Good night sleep tight
Now the sun turns out his light
Good night sleep tight
Dream sweet dreams for me
Dream sweet dreams for you.

Good night good night everybody
Evberybody everywhere
Good night.

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/The Beatles/AUTHOR	NAME/Got To Get It Into My Life/NAME	"CONTENT/I was alone, I took a ride
I didn't know what I would find there
Another road where maybe I
Could see another kind of mind there

Ooh then I suddenly see you
Ooh did I tell you I need you
Every single day of my life

You didn't run, you didn't lie
You knew I wanted just to hold you
And had you gone, you knew in time
Wed meet again for I had told you

Ooh you were meant to be near me
Ooh and I want you to hear me
Say well be together every day
Got to get you into my life

What can I do, what can I be
When I'm with you I want to stay there
If I'm true I'll never leave
And if I do I know the way there

Ooh then I suddenly see you
Ooh did I tell you I need you
Every single day of my life
Got to get you into my life
I've got to get you into my life

I was alone, I took a ride
I didn't know what I would find there
Another road where maybe I
Could see another kind of mind there

And suddenly I see you
Did I tell you I need you
Every single day...

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/The Beatles/AUTHOR	NAME/Hallelujah, I Love Her So/NAME	"CONTENT/Let me tell you about a girl I know
She's my baby and I love her so
Every morning when the sun comes up
She brings me coffee in my favorite cup
That's why I know, yes I know
Hallelujah I just love her so

When I call her on the telephone
She says: baby, I'm all alone
By the time I count from one to four
She'll be knocking on my door

In the evening when the sun goes down
And there ain't nobody else around
She kisses me and she holds me tight
She says: baby everything is alright
That's why I know, that's why I know
Hallelujah I just love her so
Hallelujah I just love her so
Hallelujah I just love that chick so

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/The Beatles/AUTHOR	NAME/Happiness Is A Warm Gun/NAME	"CONTENT/She's not a girl who misses much
Do do do do do do, oh yeah

She's well acquainted with the touch of the velvet hand like a lizard on a
window pane.

The man in the crowd with the multi-colored mirrors on his hobnail boots.

Lying with his eyes while his hands are busy working overtime.

A soap impression of his wife which he ate and donated to the National Trust.

I need a fix 'cause I'm going down
Down to the bits that I left uptown
I need a fix 'cause I'm going down

Mother Superior jump the gun
Mother Superior jump the gun
Mother Superior jump the gun
Mother Superior jump the gun

Happiness is a warm gun (bang bang shoot shoot)
Happiness is a warm gun, mama (bang bang shoot shoot)
When I hold you in my arms (oh, yeah)
And I feel my finger on your trigger (oh, yeah)
I know nobody can do me no harm (oh, yeah)
Because, (happiness) is a warm gun, mama (bang bang shoot shoot)
Happiness is a warm gun, yes it is (bang bang shoot shoot)

Happiness is a warm, yes it is, gun
Happiness (bang bang shoot shoot)

Well don't you know that happiness (happiness) is a warm gun, (is a warm gun,
yeah).

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/The Beatles/AUTHOR	NAME/Hello, Little Girl/NAME	"CONTENT/Hello little girl
Hello little girl
Hello little girl

When I see you everyday
I say, ""Mm mm hello little girl""
When you're passing on your way
I say, ""Mm mm hello little girl""
When I see you passing by
I cry, ""Mm mm hello little girl""
When I try to catch your eye
I cry, ""Mm mm hello little girl""

I send you flowers but you don't care
You never seem to see me standing there
I often wonder what you're thinking of
I hope it's me and love love love

So I hope there'll come a day
When you'll say, ""Mm you're my little girl""

It's not the first time that it's happened to me,
It's been a long lonely time
And it's funny funny to see that I'm about to lose my mind mind mind

So I hope there'll come a day
When you say, ""Mm mm
You're my little girl, mm mm mm
You're my little girl, mm mm mm""
You're my little girl, oh yeah
You're my little girl

Do do do do do

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/The Beatles/AUTHOR	NAME/Here Comes The Sun/NAME	"CONTENT/Here comes the sun (doo doo doo doo)
Here comes the sun, and I say
It's all right

Little darling, it's been a long cold lonely winter
Little darling, it feels like years since it's been here
Here comes the sun
Here comes the sun, and I say
It's all right

Little darling, the smiles returning to the faces
Little darling, it seems like years since it's been here
Here comes the sun
Here comes the sun, and I say
It's all right

Sun, sun, sun, here it comes
Sun, sun, sun, here it comes
Sun, sun, sun, here it comes
Sun, sun, sun, here it comes
Sun, sun, sun, here it comes

Little darling, I feel that ice is slowly melting
Little darling, it seems like years since it's been clear
Here comes the sun
Here comes the sun, and I say
It's all right

Here comes the sun
Here comes the sun, and I say
It's all right
It's all right

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/The Beatles/AUTHOR	NAME/Hey Bulldog/NAME	"CONTENT/Sheepdog, standing in the rain
Bullfrog, doing it again
Some kind of happiness is
Measured out in miles
What makes you think you're
Something special when you smile

Childlike no one understands
Jackknife in your sweaty hands
Some kind of innocence is
Measured out in years
You don't know what it's like
To listen to your fears

You can talk to me
You can talk to me
You can talk to me
If you're lonely, you can talk to me

Big man (yeah) walking in the park
Wigwam frightened of the dark
Some kind of solitude is
Measured out in you
You think you know me, but you haven't got a clue

You can talk to me
You can talk to me
You can talk to me
If you're lonely, you can talk to me

Hey Hey

Roar

Hey, Bulldog (Hey Bulldog)

Woof

Hey, Bulldog
Hey, Bulldog
Hey, Bulldog

Hey man

Whats up brother?

Roof

What do ya say

I say, ""roof""

You know any more?

Ah ah (You got it, that's it, you had it!)
That's it man, Wo ho, That's it, you got it!

Woah

Look at me man, I only had ten children

Ah ah ah ah ah ah ha ha ha ha
Quiet! Quiet! (OK)
Quiet!
Hey, Bulldog, Hey Bulldog

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/The Beatles/AUTHOR	NAME/Hey Jude/NAME	"CONTENT/Hey Jude, don't make it bad
Take a sad song and make it better
Remember to let her into your heart
Then you can start to make it better

Hey Jude, don't be afraid
You were made to go out and get her
The minute you let her under your skin
Then you begin to make it better

And anytime you feel the pain, hey Jude, refrain
Don't carry the world upon your shoulders
For well you know that it's a fool who plays it cool
By making his world a little colder
Nah nah nah nah nah nah nah nah nah

Hey Jude, don't let me down
You have found her, now go and get her
Remember to let her into your heart
Then you can start to make it better

So let it out and let it in, hey Jude, begin
You're waiting for someone to perform with
And don't you know that it's just you, hey Jude, you'll do
The movement you need is on your shoulder
Nah nah nah nah nah nah nah nah nah yeah

Hey Jude, don't make it bad
Take a sad song and make it better
Remember to let her under your skin
Then you'll begin to make it
Better better better better better better, oh

Nah nah nah nah nah nah, nah nah nah, hey Jude
Nah nah nah nah nah nah, nah nah nah, hey Jude
Nah nah nah nah nah nah, nah nah nah, hey Jude
Nah nah nah nah nah nah, nah nah nah, hey Jude
Nah nah nah nah nah nah, nah nah nah, hey Jude
Nah nah nah nah nah nah, nah nah nah, hey Jude
Nah nah nah nah nah nah, nah nah nah, hey Jude
Nah nah nah nah nah nah, nah nah nah, hey Jude
Nah nah nah nah nah nah, nah nah nah, hey Jude
Nah nah nah nah nah nah, nah nah nah, hey Jude
Nah nah nah nah nah nah, nah nah nah, hey Jude
Nah nah nah nah nah nah, nah nah nah, hey Jude
Nah nah nah nah nah nah, nah nah nah, hey Jude
Nah nah nah nah nah nah, nah nah nah, hey Jude
Nah nah nah nah nah nah, nah nah nah, hey Jude
Nah nah nah nah nah nah, nah nah nah, hey Jude

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/The Beatles/AUTHOR	NAME/Hold Me Tight/NAME	"CONTENT/It feels so right now, hold me tight,
Tell me I'm the only one,
And then I might,
Never be the lonely one.
So hold me tight, to-night, to-night,
It's you, you you you, oh, oh, oh, oh.

Hold me tight,
Let me go on loving you,
To-night to-night,
Making love to only you,
So hold me tight, to-night, to-night,
It's you, you you you, oh, oh, oh, oh.

Don't know what it means to hold you tight,
Being here alone tonight with you,
It feels so right now.

Hold me tight,
Tell me I'm the only one,
And then I might,
Never be the lonely one,
So hold me tight, to-night, to-night,
It's you, you you you, oh, oh, oh, oh.

Don't know what it means to hold you tight,
Being here alone tonight with you,
It feels so right now.

Hold me tight,
Let me go on loving you,
To-night, to-night,
Making love to only you,
So hold me tight, to-night, to-night,
It's you, you you you, oh, oh, oh, oh.
You oh oh

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/The Beatles/AUTHOR	NAME/Honey, Don't/NAME	"CONTENT/Well, how come you say you will when you won't?
Say you do, baby when you don't
Let me know, honey, how you fell
Tell the truth now, is love real?
So, aw, aw

Well, honey don't
Well, honey don't
Honey don't
Honey don't
Honey don't
I say you will when you won't
Aw, aw, honey don't

Well, I love you, baby, and you ought to know
I like the way that you wear your clothes
Everything about you is so doggone sweet
You got that sand all over your feet
So, aw, aw

Well, honey don't
Honey don't
Honey don't
Honey don't
Honey don't
I say you will when you won't
Aw, aw, honey don't

I feel fine
Ooo, oo, I say
Well Sometimes I love you on a Saturday night
Sunday morning you don't look right
You been out painting the town
Uh huh, baby you been slipping around
So, aw, aw

Well, honey don't
I say, honey don't
Honey don't
Honey don't
Honey don't
I say you will when you won't
Aw, aw, honey don't
Well, honey don't
Well, honey don't
A little, little, honey don't
I say, you will when you won't
Aw, aw, honey don't

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/The Beatles/AUTHOR	NAME/Honey Pie/NAME	"CONTENT/She was a working girl
North of England way
Now she's hit the big time
In the U.S.A.
And if she could only hear me
This is what I'd say.

Honey pie, you are making me crazy
I'm in love but I'm lazy
So won't you please come home.

Oh honey pie, my position is tragic
Come and show me the magic
Of your Hollywood song.

You became a legend of the silver screen
And now the thought of meeting you
Makes me weak in the knee.

Oh honey pie, you are driving me frantic
Sail across the Atlantic
To be where you belong.

Will the wind that blew her boat
Across the sea
Kindly send her sailing back to me.

Honey pie, you are making me crazy
I'm in love but I'm lazy
So won't you please come home.

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/The Beatles/AUTHOR	NAME/How Do You Do It/NAME	"CONTENT/How do you do what you do to me?
I wish I knew
If I knew how you do it to me
I'd do it to you

How do you do what you do to me?
I'm feeling blue
Wish I knew how you do it to me
But I haven't a clue

You give me a feeling in my heart, ooh-la-la
Like an arrow piercing through it
I suppose that you think you're very smart
But won't you tell me how do you do it?

How do you do what you do to me?
I wish I knew
If I knew how you do it to me
I'd do it to you

You give me a feeling in my heart, ooh-la-la
Like an arrow piercing through it
I suppose that you think you're very smart
But won't you tell me how do you do it?

How do you do what you do to me?
I wish I knew
Wish I knew how you do it to me
But I haven't a clue

Wish I knew how you do it to me
I'd do it to you
Wish I knew how you do it to me
I'd do it to you

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/The Beatles/AUTHOR	NAME/I Am The Walrus/NAME	"CONTENT/I am he as you are he as you are me and we are all together.
See how they run like pigs from a gun, see how they fly.
I'm crying.

Sitting on a cornflake, waiting for the van to come.
Corporation tee-shirt, stupid bloody Tuesday.
Man, you been a naughty boy, you let your face grow long.
I am the egg man, they are the egg men.
I am the walrus, coo coo cachoo

Mister City Policeman sitting
Pretty little policemen in a row.
See how they fly like Lucy in the Sky, see how they run.
I'm crying, I'm crying.
I'm crying, I'm crying.

Yellow matter custard, dripping from a dead dog's eye.
Crabalocker fishwife, pornographic priestess,
Boy, you been a naughty girl you let your knickers down.
I am the eggman, they are the eggmen.
I am the walrus, coo coo cachoo

Sitting in an English garden waiting for the sun.
If the sun don't come, you get a tan
From standing in the English rain.
I am the egg man, they are the egg men.
I am the walrus, coo coo cachoo ca coo coo cachoo

Expert text pert choking smokers,
Don't you think the joker laughs at you?
See how they smile like pigs in a sty,
See how they snide.
I'm crying.

Semolina pilchard, climbing up the Eiffel Tower.
Elementary penguin singing Hari Krishna.
Man, you should have seen them kicking Edgar Allan Poe.
I am the egg man, they are the egg men.
I am the walrus, coo coo cachoo ca coo coo cachoo. Coo coo cachou ca coo.

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/The Beatles/AUTHOR	NAME/I Call Your Name/NAME	"CONTENT/I call your name but you're not there
Was I to blame for being unfair
Oh I can't sleep at night
Since you've been gone
I never weep at night
I can't go on

Don't you know I can't take it
I don't know who can
I'm not goin' to mayayake it
I'm not that kind of man

Oh I can't sleep at night
But just the same
I never weep at night
I call your name
Aww

Don't you know I can't take it
I don't know who can
I'm not goin' to mayayake it
I'm not that kind of man

Oh I can't sleep at night
But just the same
I never weep at night
I call your name
I call your name
I call your name
I call your name.

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/The Beatles/AUTHOR	NAME/I Don't Want To Spoil The Party/NAME	"CONTENT/I don't want to spoil the party so I'll go
I would hate my disappointment to show
There's nothing for me here so I will disappear
If she turns up while I'm gone please let me know

I've had a drink or two and I don't care,
There's no fun in what I do if she's not there
I wonder what went wrong I've waited far too long
I think I'll take a walk and look for her

Though tonight she's made me sad
I still love her
If I find her I'll be glad
I still love her

I don't want to spoil the party so I'll go
I would hate my disappointment to show
There's nothing for me here so I will disappear
If she turns up while I'm gone please let me know

Though tonight she's made me sad
I still love her
If I find her I'll be glad
I still love her

I've had a drink or two and I don't care
There's no fun in what I do if she's not there
I wonder what went wrong I've waited far too long
I think I'll take a walk and look for her

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/The Beatles/AUTHOR	NAME/I Feel Fine/NAME	"CONTENT/Baby's good to me, you know,
She's happy as can be, you know,
She said so
I'm in love with her and I feel fine

Baby says she's mine, you know,
She tells me all the time, you know,
She said so
I'm in love with her and I feel fine

I'm so glad that she's my little girl
She's so glad, she's telling all the world
That here baby buys her things, you know
He buys her diamond rings, you know,
She said so
She's in love with me and I feel fine

Baby says she's mine, you know,
She tells me all the time, you know,
She said so
I'm in love with her and I feel fine

I'm so glad that she's my little girl
She's so glad, she's telling all the world
That her baby buys her things, you know
He buys her diamond rings, you know,
She said so
She's in love with me and I feel fine
She's in love with me and I feel fine

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/The Beatles/AUTHOR	NAME/I Got To Find My Baby/NAME	"CONTENT/(Berry)

I'm gonna search this town
From door to door
The love I crave
I can't find no more

I got to find my baby
I declare there ain't no lie
I ain't had no real good loving
Since that woman said goodbye

You know I hate to see the sun
Sinking to the west
'cause I know my whole life's
Gonna be one solid mess

I got to find my baby
I declare there ain't no lie
I ain't had no real good loving
Since that woman said goodbye

Well ever since the day
That she said we were through
I've been nervous
And shook up too

I got to find my baby
I declare there ain't no lie
I ain't had no real good loving
Since that woman said goodbye

Well I don't care if the last thing
I ever done in my life
Is to find that little woman
Make her my wife

I got to find my baby
I declare there ain't no lie
I ain't had no real good loving
Since that woman said goodbye.

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/The Beatles/AUTHOR	NAME/I Me Mine/NAME	"CONTENT/All through' the day
I me mine, I me mine, I me mine.
All through' the night
I me mine, I me mine, I me mine.
Now they're frightened of leaving it
Ev'ryone's weaving it,
Coming on strong all the time,
All through' the day I me mine.

I-I-me-me mine, I-I-me-me mine,
I-I-me-me mine, I-I-me-me mine.

All I can hear
I me mine, I me mine, I me mine.
Even those tears
I me mine, I me mine, I me mine.
No-one's frightened of playing it
Ev'ryone's saying it,
Flowing more freely than wine,
All through' the day I me mine.

I-I-me-me mine, I-I-me-me mine,
I-I-me-me mine, I-I-me-me mine.

All I can hear
I me mine, I me mine, I me mine.
Even those tears
I me mine, I me mine, I me mine.
No-one's frightened of playing it
Ev'ryone's saying it,
Flowing more freely than wine,
All through' your life I me mine.

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/The Beatles/AUTHOR	NAME/I Need You/NAME	"CONTENT/You don't realize how much I need you,
Love you all the time
And never leave you.
Please come on back to me.
I'm lonely as can be.
I need you.
Said you had a thing or two to tell me.
How was I to know
You would upset me?
I didn't realize
As I looked in your eyes
You told me, oh yes, you told me you don't want my lovin' anymore.
That's when it hurt me and feeling like this
I just can't go on anymore.
Please remember how I feel about you,
I could never really live without you.
So, come on back and see
Just what you mean to me.
I need you. (repeat)
I need you.
I need you.

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/The Beatles/AUTHOR	NAME/I Saw Her Standing/NAME	"CONTENT/Well, she was just seventeen,
And you know what I mean,
And the way she looked was way beyond compare.
So how could I dance with another
And I saw her standing there.
Well she looked at me, and I, I could see
That before too long I'd fall in love with her.
She wouldn't dance with another
Since I saw her standin' there.
Well, my heart went boom
When I crossed that room
And I held her hand in mine.
Well, we danced through the night,
And we held each other tight,
And before too long, I fell in love with her.
Now I'll never dance with another
Since I saw her standing there

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/The Beatles/AUTHOR	NAME/I Wanna Be Your Man/NAME	"CONTENT/I want to be your lover baby,
I want to be your man,
I want to be your lover baby,
I want to be your man.
Love you like no other baby,
Like no other can,
Love you like no other baby,
Like no other can.

I want to be your man, I want to be your man,
I want to be your man, I want to be your man.

Tell me that you love me baby,
Let me understand,
Tell me that you love me baby,
I want to be your man.
I want to be your lover baby,
I want to be your man,
I want to be your lover baby,
I want to be your man.

I want to be your man, I want to be your man,
I want to be your man, I want to be your man.

I want to be your lover baby,
I want to be your man,
I want to be your lover baby,
I want to be your man.
Love you like no other baby,
Like no other can,
Love you like no other baby,
Like no other can.

I want to be your man, I want to be your man,
I want to be your man, I want to be your man.
I want to be your man, I want to be your man.

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/The Beatles/AUTHOR	NAME/I Want To Hold Your Hand/NAME	"CONTENT/Oh yeah I tell you somethin'
I think you'll understand
When I say that somethin'
I want to hold your hand
I want to hold your hand
I want to hold your hand

Oh please say to me
You'll let me be your man
And please say to me
You'll let me hold your hand
Now, let me hold your hand
I want to hold your hand

And when I touch you
I feel happy inside
It's such a feelin' that my love
I can't hide
I can't hide
I can't hide

Yeah, you got that somethin'
I think you'll understand
When I say that somethin'
I want to hold your hand
I want to hold your hand
I want to hold your hand

And when I touch you
I feel happy inside
It's such a feelin' that my love
I can't hide
I can't hide
I can't hide

Yeah, you got that somethin'
I think you'll understand
When I feel that somethin'
I want to hold your hand
I want to hold your hand
I want to hold your hand
I want to hold your hand

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/The Beatles/AUTHOR	NAME/I Want To Tell You/NAME	"CONTENT/I want to tell you
My head is filled with things to say
When you're here
All those words they seem to slip away

When I get near you
The games begin to drag me down
It's all right
I'll make you maybe next time around

But if I seem to act unkind
It's only me, it's not my mind
That is confusing things
I want to tell you
I feel hung up and I don't know why
I don't mind
I could wait forever, I've got time

Sometimes I wish I knew you well
Then I could speak my mind and tell
Maybe you'd understand

I want to tell you
I feel hung up and I don't know why
I don't mind
I could wait forever, I've got time
I've got time
I've got time

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/The Beatles/AUTHOR	NAME/I Want You/NAME	"CONTENT/I want you, I want you so bad
I want you, I want you so bad
It's driving me mad, it's driving me mad

I want you, I want you so bad babe
I want you, I want you so bad
It's driving me mad, it's driving me mad

I want you, I want you so bad babe
I want you, I want you so bad
It's driving me mad, it's driving me mad

I want you, I want you so bad
I want you, I want you so bad
It's driving me mad, it's driving me mad

She's so heavy
Heavy, heavy, heavy

She's so heavy
She's so heavy, heavy, heavy

I want you, I want you so bad
I want you, I want you so bad
It's driving me mad, it's driving me mad

I want you, you know I want you so bad babe
I want you, you know I want you so bad
It's driving me mad, it's driving me mad yeah

She's so...

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/The Beatles/AUTHOR	NAME/I Will/NAME	"CONTENT/Who knows how long I've loved you
You know I love you still
Will I wait a lonely lifetime
If you want me to-- I will.

For if I ever saw you
I didn't catch your name
But it never really mattered
I will always feel the same.

Love you forever and forever
Love you with all my heart
Love you whenever we're together
Love you when we're apart.

And when at last I find you
Your song will fill the air
Sing it loud so I can hear you
Make it easy to be near you
For the things you do endear you to me
You know I will
I will.

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/The Beatles/AUTHOR	NAME/If I Fell/NAME	"CONTENT/If I fell in love with you
Would you promise to be true
And help me understand
'Cause I've been in love before
And I found that love was more
Than just holding hands

If I give my heart to you
I must be sure
From the very start
That you would love me more than her

If I trust in you oh please
Don't run and hide
If I love you too oh please
Don't hurt my pride like her

'Cause I couldn't stand the pain
And I would be sad if our new love was in vain

So I hope you see that I
Would love to love you
And that she will cry
When she learns we are two
If I fell in love with you

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/The Beatles/AUTHOR	NAME/If I Needed Someone/NAME	"CONTENT/If I needed someone to love
You're the one that I'd be thinking of
If I needed someone

If I had some more time to spend
Then I guess I'd be with you my friend
If I needed someone
Had you come some other day
Then it might not have been like this
But you see now I'm too much in love

Carve your number on my wall
And maybe you will get a call from me
If I needed someone
Ah, ah, ah, ah

If I had some more time to spend
Then I guess I'd be with you my friend
If I needed someone
Had you come some other day
Then it might not have been like this
But you see now I'm too much in love

Carve your number on my wall
And maybe you will get a call from me
If I needed someone
Ah, ah

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/The Beatles/AUTHOR	NAME/If I Needed Someone To Love/NAME	"CONTENT/If I needed someone to love
Youre the woman I'd be thinking of
If I needed someone

If I had some more time to spend
Then I guess I'd be with you my friend
If I needed someone

Had you come some other day
Then it might not have been like this
But you see now I'm too much in love

Carve your number on my wall
And maybe you will get a call from me
If I needed someone

If I had some more time to spend
Then I guess I'd be with you my friend
If I needed someone

Had you come some other day
Then it might not have been like this
But you see now I'm too much in love

Carve your number on my wall
And maybe you will get a call from me
If I needed someone
If I needed someone to love
Youre the woman I'd be thinking of
If I needed someone

If I had some more time to spend
Then I guess I'd be with you my friend
If I needed someone

Had you come some other day
Then it might not have been like this
But you see now I'm too much in love

Carve your number on my wall
And maybe you will get a call from me
If I needed someone

If I had some more time to spend
Then I guess I'd be with you my friend
If I needed someone

Had you come some other day
Then it might not have been like this
But you see now I'm too much in love

Carve your number on my wall
And maybe you will get a call from me
If I needed someone

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/The Beatles/AUTHOR	NAME/If You Love Me Baby/NAME	"CONTENT/If you leave me, baby
I don't know what I'll do
I guess I would die, sweetheart
If I don't get a kiss from you

Take out some insurance on me, baby
Take out some insurance on me, baby
Well, if you ever, ever say goodbye
I'm gonna go right home and die

Oh, if you want me, baby
You've gotta come to me
Mm, I'm just like a stump in a field
You just can't move me

Take out some insurance on me, baby
Ooh, some insurance on me, baby
Well, if you ever, ever say goodbye
I'm gonna go right home and die

Well, if you want me, baby

Mm, you've gotta come to me
I'm just like a stump in a field
You just can't move me

Take out some insurance on me, baby
Mm, some insurance on me, baby
Well, if you ever, ever say goodbye
I'm gonna go right home and die

Well, if you leave me, baby
I don't know what I'll do
I guess I would die, sweetheart
If I don't get a kiss from you

Take out some insurance on me, baby
Mm, some God damned insurance on me, baby
If you ever, ever say goodbye
I'm gonna go right home and die

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/The Beatles/AUTHOR	NAME/If You've Got Trouble/NAME	"CONTENT/If you've got trouble
Then you've got less trouble than me
You say you're worried
You can't be as worried as me...ohh

You're quite content to be bad
With all the advantage you had over me
Just 'cause you're troubled
Then don't bring your troubles to me

And don't think it's funny
When you ask for money for things
Especially when you're standing there
Wearing diamonds and rings...ohh

You think I'm softning her head
Well try someone softer instead anything
It's not so funny
When you know what money can bring
You'd better leave me alone

I don't need a thing from you
You'd better take yourself home
Go and count a ring or two
If you've got trouble
Then you've got less trouble than me

You say you're worried
You can't be as worried as me
You're quite contempt to be bad
With all the advantage you had over me
Just 'cause you're troubled
Then don't bring your troubles to me

You'd better leave me alone
I don't need a thing from you
You'd better take yourself home
Go and count a ring or two
If you've got trouble
Then you've got less trouble than me

You say you're worried
You can't be as worried as me
You're quite contempt to be bad
With all the advantage you had over me

Just 'cause you're troubled
Then don't bring your troubles to me
Just 'cause your troubled
Then don't bring your troubles to me

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/The Beatles/AUTHOR	NAME/I'll Be Back/NAME	"CONTENT/You know, if you break my heart I'll go
But I'll be back again
'Cause I told you once before goodbye
But I came back again

I love you so, oh
I'm the one who wants you
Yes I'm the one who wants you
Oh, ho, oh, ho, oh

You could find better things to do
Than to break my heart again
This time I will try to show that I'm
Not trying to pretend

I thought that you would realize
That if I run away from you
That you would want me to
But I got a big surprise
Oh, ho, oh, ho, oh

You could find better things to do
Than to break my heart again
This time I will try to show that I'm
Not trying to pretend

I want to go,
But I hate to leave you
You know I hate to leave you
Oh, ho, oh, ho

You, if you break my heart I'll go
But I'll be back again

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/The Beatles/AUTHOR	NAME/I'll Be On My Way/NAME	"CONTENT/The sun is fading away
That's the end of the day
As the June light turns to moonlight
I'll be on my way

Just one kiss and I'll go
Don't hide the tears that don't show
As the June light turns to moonlight
I'll be on my way

To where the winds don't blow
And golden rivers flow
This way will I go

They were right, I was wrong
True love didn't last long
As the June light turns to moonlight
I'll be on my way, hey
To where the winds don't blow
And golden rivers flow
This way will I go

They were right, I was wrong
True love didn't last long
As the June light turns to moonlight
I'll be on my way, hey

I'll be on my way, oh, oh
I'll be on my way, oh, oh
I'll be on my way

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/The Beatles/AUTHOR	NAME/I'll Cry Instead/NAME	"CONTENT/I've got every reason on earth to be mad
'Cause I just lost the only girl I had
If I could get my way
I'd get myself locked up today
But I can't, so I'll cry instead

I've got a chip on my shoulder that's bigger that my feet
I can't talk to people that I meet
If I could see you now
I'd try to make you sad somehow
But I can't, so I'll cry instead

Don't want to cry when there's people there
I get shy when they start to stare
I'm gonna hide myself away
But I'll come back again someday

And when you do you'd better hide all the girls
I'm gonna break their hearts all round the world
Yes, I'm gonna break them in two
And show you what your lovin' man can do
Until then I'll cry instead

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/The Beatles/AUTHOR	NAME/I'll Get You/NAME	"CONTENT/Oh yeah, oh yeah
Oh yeah, oh yeah

Imagine I'm in love with you
It's easy 'cause I know
I've imagined I'm in love with you
Many many many times before

It's not like me to pretend
But I'll get you, I'll get you in the end
Yes I will, I'll get you in the end
Oh yeah, oh yeah

I think about you night and day
I need you 'cause it's true
When I think about you I can say
I'm never never never never blue

So I'm telling you my friend
That I'll get you, I'll get you in the end
Yes I will, I'll get you in the end
Oh yeah, oh yeah

Well there's gonna be a time
When I'm gonna change your mind
So you might as well resign yourself to me
Oh yeah

Imagine I'm in love with you
It's easy 'cause I know
I've imagined I'm in love with you
Many many many times before

It's not like me to pretend
But I'll get you, I'll get you in the end
Yes I will, I'll get you in the end

Oh yeah, oh yeah
Oh yeah, oh yeah
Whoa yeah

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/The Beatles/AUTHOR	NAME/I'm A Loser/NAME	"CONTENT/I'm a loser
I'm a loser
And I'm not what I appear to be

Of all the love I have won, and have lost
There is one love I should never have crossed
She was a girl in a million my friend
I should have known she would win in the end

I'm a loser
And I lost someone who's near to me
I'm a loser
And I'm not what I appear to be

Although I laugh and I act like a clown
Beneath this mask I am wearing a frown
My tears are falling like rain from the sky
Is it for her or myself that I cry?

I'm a loser
And I lost someone who's near to me
I'm a loser
And I'm not what I appear to be

What have I done to deserve such a fate?
I realize I have left it too late
And so it's true pride comes before a fall
I'm telling you so that you won't lose all

I'm a loser
And I lost someone who's near to me
I'm a loser
And I'm not what I appear to be

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/The Beatles/AUTHOR	NAME/I'm Down/NAME	"CONTENT/You tell lies thinking I can't see
You can't cry 'cause you're laughing at me
I'm down, I'm down, I''m down
How can you laugh when you know I'm down
How can you laugh when you know I'm down

Man buys ring, woman throws it away
Same old thing happen every day
I'm down, I'm down, I''m down
How can you laugh when you know I'm down
How can you laugh when you know I'm down

We're all alone and there's nobody else
She'll still moan ""Keep your hands to yourself""
I'm down, I'm down, I''m down
How can you laugh when you know I'm down
How can you laugh when you know I'm down, woo

A baby you know I'm down
I guess I'm down
I'm down on the ground
I'm down
Ah, baby I'm upside down
Oh yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah,
I'm down

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/The Beatles/AUTHOR	NAME/I'm Gonna Sit Right Down And Cry/NAME	"CONTENT/I'm gonna sit right down and cry over you
I'm gonna sit right down and cry over you
And if you ever say goodbye
And if you ever even try
I'm gonna sit right down and cry over you

I'm gonna love you more and more every day
I'm gonna love you more and more every way
And if you ever say goodbye
And if you ever even try
I'm gonna sit right down and cry over you

I'm gonna tell your mama
Tell your papa too
So they'll know exactly what i'm gonna do
If you ever say goodbye
If you ever even try
I'm gonna sit right down and cry over you

Wah-hoo!

I'm gonna tell your mama
Tell your papa too
So they'll know exactly what i'm gonna do
If you ever say goodbye
If you ever even try
I'm gonna sit right down and cry over you
I'm gonna sit right down and cry over you
I'm gonna sit right down and cry over you

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/The Beatles/AUTHOR	NAME/I'm Happy Just To Dance With You/NAME	"CONTENT/Before this dance is through
I think I'll love you too
I'm so happy when you dance with me

I don't wanna kiss or hold your hand
If it's funny try and understand
There is really nothing else I'd rather do
'Cause I'm happy just to dance with you

I don't need to hug or hold you tight
I just wanna dance with you all night
In this world there's nothing I would rather do
'Cause I'm happy just to dance with you

Just to dance with you
Is everything I need
Before this dance is through
I think I'll love you too
I'm so happy when you dance with me

If somebody tries to take my place
Let's pretend we just can't see his face
In this world there's nothing I would rather do
'Cause I'm happy just to dance with you

Just to dance with you
Is everything I need
Before this dance is through
I think I'll love you too
I'm so happy when you dance with me

If somebody tries to take my place
Let's pretend we just can't see his face
In this world there's nothing I would rather do
I discovered I'm in love with you
'Cause I'm happy just to dance with you

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/The Beatles/AUTHOR	NAME/I'm Looking Through You/NAME	"CONTENT/I'm looking through you,
Where did you go?
I thought I knew you,
What did I know?
You don't look different, but you have changed
I'm looking through you, you're not the same

Your lips are moving,
I cannot hear
Your voice is soothing,
But the words aren't clear
You don't sound different,
I've learned the game
I'm looking through you,
You're not the same

Why, tell me why, did you not treat me right?
Love has a nasty habit of disappearing overnight

You're thinking of me,
The same old way
You were above me,
But not today
The only difference is you're down there
I'm looking through you,
Any other way

Why, tell me why did you not treat me right?
Love has a nasty habit of disappearing overnight

I'm looking through you,
Where did you go?
I thought I knew you,
What did I know?
You don't look different,
But you have changed
I'm looking through you,
You're not the same!

Yeah, baby you've changed
I'm lookin' through you
Yeah, I'm lookin' through you
You've changed, you've changed, you've changed

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/The Beatles/AUTHOR	NAME/I'm Only Sleeping/NAME	"CONTENT/When I wake up early in the morning
Lift my head, I'm still yawning
When I'm in the middle of a dream
Stay in bed, float up stream (Float up stream)

Please, don't wake me, no, don't shake me
Leave me where I am, I'm only sleeping

Everybody seems to think I'm lazy
I don't mind, I think they're crazy
Running everywhere at such a speed
Till they find there's no need (There's no need)

Please, don't spoil my day, I'm miles away
And after all I'm only sleeping

Keeping an eye on the world going by my window
Taking my time

Lying there and staring at the ceiling
Waiting for a sleepy feeling...

Please, don't spoil my day, I'm miles away
And after all I'm only sleeping

Ooh yeah

Keeping an eye on the world going by my window
Taking my time

When I wake up early in the morning
Lift my head, I'm still yawning
When I'm in the middle of a dream
Stay in bed, float up stream (Float up stream)

Please, don't wake me, no, don't shake me
Leave me where I am, I'm only sleeping

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/The Beatles/AUTHOR	NAME/I'm So Tired/NAME	"CONTENT/I'm so tired, I haven't slept a wink
I'm so tired, my mind is on the blink
I wonder should I get up and fix myself a drink
No, no, no

I'm so tired, I don't know what to do
I'm so tired, my mind is set on you
I wonder should I call you but I know what you would do

You'd say I'm putting you on
But it's no joke, it's doing me harm
You know I can't sleep, I can't stop my brain
You know it's three weeks, I'm going insane
You know I'd give you everything I've got
For a little peace of mind

I'm so tired, I'm feeling so upset
Although I'm so tired, I'll have another cigarette
And curse Sir Walter Raleigh
He was such a stupid get

You'd say I'm putting you on
But it's no joke, it's doing me harm
You know I can't sleep, I can't stop my brain
You know it's three weeks, I'm going insane
You know I'd give you everything I've got
For a little peace of mind

I'd give you everything I've got
For a little peace of mind

I'd give you everything I've got
For a little peace of mind

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/The Beatles/AUTHOR	NAME/Imagine/NAME	"CONTENT/Imagine there's no heaven
It's easy if you try
No hell below us
Above us only sky
Imagine all the people
Living for today...

Imagine there's no countries
It isn't hard to do
Nothing to kill or die for
And no religion too
Imagine all the people
Living life in peace...

You may say I'm a dreamer
But I'm not the only one
I hope someday you'll join us
And the world will be as one

Imagine no possessions
I wonder if you can
No need for greed or hunger
A brotherhood of man
Imagine all the people
Sharing all the world...

You may say I'm a dreamer
But I'm not the only one
I hope someday you'll join us
And the world will live as one

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/The Beatles/AUTHOR	NAME/In My Life/NAME	"CONTENT/There are places I remember
All my life, though some have changed
Some forever, not for better
Some have gone and some remain
All these places have their moments
With lovers and friends I still can recall
Some are dead and some are living
In my life, I've loved them all

But of all these friends and lovers
There is no one compares with you
And these memories lose their meaning
When I think of love as something new
Though I know I'll never lose affection
For people and things that went before
I know I'll often stop and think about them
In my life, I love you more

Though I know I'll never lose affection
For people and things that went before
I know I'll often stop and think about them
In my life, I love you more
In my life I love you more

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/The Beatles/AUTHOR	NAME/In Spite Of All The Danger/NAME	"CONTENT/In spite of all the danger, in spite of all that may be
I'll do anything for you, anything you want me to
If you'll be true to me

In spite of all the heartache, that you may cause me
I'll do anything for you, anything you want me to
If you'll be true to me

I'll look after you like I've never done before
I'll keep all the others from knockin' at your door

In spite of all the danger, in spite of all that may be
I'll do anything for you, anything you want me to
If you'll be true to me

In spite of all the heartache, that you may cause me
I'll do anything for you, anything you want me to
If you'll be true to me
I'll do anything for you, anything you want me to
If you'll be true to me

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/The Beatles/AUTHOR	NAME/It Won't Be Long/NAME	"CONTENT/It won't be long yeah, yeah, yeah
It won't be long yeah, yeah, yeah
It won't be long yeah, till I belong to you

Every night when everybody has fun
Here am I sitting all on my own

It won't be long yeah, yeah, yeah
It won't be long yeah, yeah, yeah
It won't be long yeah, till I belong to you

Since you left me, I'm so alone
Now you're coming, you're coming on home
I'll be good like I know I should
You're coming home, you're coming home

Every night the tears come down from my eyes
Every day I've done nothing but cry

It won't be long yeah, yeah, yeah
It won't be long yeah, yeah, yeah
It won't be long yeah, till I belong to you

Since you left me, I'm so alone
Now you're coming, you're coming on home
I'll be good like I know I should
You're coming home, you're coming home

So every day we'll be happy I know
Now I know that you won't leave me no more

It won't be long yeah, yeah, yeah
It won't be long yeah, yeah
It won't be long yeah, till I belong to you, woo

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/The Beatles/AUTHOR	NAME/It's All Too Much/NAME	"CONTENT/It's all too much, It's all too much

When I look into your eyes, your love is there for me
And the more I go inside, the more there is to see

It's all too much for me to take
The love that's shining all around you
Everywhere, it's what you make
For us to take, it's all too much

Floating down the stream of time, of life to life with me
Makes no difference where you are or where you'd like to be

It's all too much for me to take
The love that's shining all around here
All the world's a birthday cake,
So take a piece but not too much

Set me on a silver sun, for I know that I'm free
Show me that I'm everywhere, and get me home for tea

It's all to much for me to see
A love that's shining all around here
The more I am, the less I know
And what I do is all too much

It's all too much for me to take
The love that's shining all around you
Everywhere, it's what you make
For us to take, it's all too much

It's too much...It's too much

Too much too much too much

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/The Beatles/AUTHOR	NAME/It's Only Love/NAME	"CONTENT/I get high when I see you go by, (my oh my)
When you sigh my inside just flies, (butterflies).
Why am I so shy when I'm beside you.

It's only love and that is all,
Why should I feel the way I do.
It's only love and that is all,
But it's so hard loving you.

Is it right that you and I should fight, (every night)
Just the sight of you makes nighttime bright, (very bright)
Haven't I the right to make it up girl.

It's only love and that is all,
Why should I feel the way I do.
It's only love and that is all,
But it's so hard loving you.
Yes it's so hard loving you.
Loving you.

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/The Beatles/AUTHOR	NAME/I've Got A Feeling/NAME	"CONTENT/I've got a feeling, a feeling deep inside
Oh yeah, oh yeah.
I've got a feeling, a feeling I can't hide
Oh no, oh no, oh no.
Yeah, I've got a feeling.

Oh please believe me, I'd hate to miss the train
Oh yeah, oh yeah.
And if you leave me I won't be late again
Oh no, oh no, oh no.
Yeah, I've got a feeling, yeah.

All these years I've been wandering around,
Wondering how come nobody told me
All that I was looking for was somebody
Who looked like you.

I've got a feeling, that keeps me on my toes
Oh yeah, oh yeah.

I've got a feeling, I think that everybody knows
Oh yeah, oh yeah, oh yeah.
Yeah, yeah, I've got a feeling, yeah.
Yeah

Ev'rybody had a hard year
Ev'rybody had a good time
Ev'rybody had a wet dream,
Ev'rybody saw the sunshine
Oh yeah, oh yeah.

Ev'rybody had a good year,
Ev'rybody let their hair down,
Ev'rybody pulled their socks up,
Ev'rybody put their foot down.
Oh yeah, oh yeah.

Yeah I've got a feeling
A feeling deep inside
Oh yeah, oh yeah.

I've got a feeling, a feeling I can't hide
Oh no
Oh no no no

Yeah yeah yeah yeah
I've got a feeling
I've got a feeling

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/The Beatles/AUTHOR	NAME/I've Just Seen A Face/NAME	"CONTENT/I've just seen a face,
I can't forget the time or place
Where we just met.
She's just the girl for me
And I want all the world to see
We've met, mm-mm-mm-m'mm-mm

Had it been another day
I might have looked the other way
And I'd have never been aware.
But as it is I'll dream of her
Tonight, di-di-di-di'n'di.

Falling, yes I am falling,
And she keeps calling
Me back again.

I have never known
The like of this, I've been alone
And I have missed things
And kept out of sight
But other girls were never quite
Like this, di-di-di-di'n'di.

Falling, yes I am falling,
And she keeps calling
Me back again.

Yeah!
Bup-a-lup-bup!

Falling, yes I am falling,
And she keeps calling
Me back again.

I've just seen a face,
I can't forget the time or place
Where we just met.
She's just the girl for me
And I want all the world to see
We've met, mm-mm-mm-di-di-di.

Falling, yes I am falling,
And she keeps calling
Me back again.

Falling, yes I am falling,
And she keeps calling
Me back again.

Oh, falling, yes I am falling,
And she keeps calling
Me back again.

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/The Beatles/AUTHOR	NAME/Jingle Bells/NAME	"CONTENT/Dashing through the snow, in a one-horse open sleigh
Over the fields we go, laughing all the way
Bells on bob-tail ring, making spirits bright
What fun it is to ride and sing a sleighing song tonight

[Chorus:]
Jingle bells, jingle bells, jingle all the way!
O what fun it is to ride in a one-horse open sleigh
Jingle bells, jingle bells, jingle all the way!
O what fun it is to ride in a one-horse open sleigh

A day or two ago, I thought I'd take a ride
And soon Miss Fanny Bright, was seated by my side
The horse was lean and lank, misfortune seemed his lot
He got into a drifted bank and we got upsot

[Chorus:]

A day or two ago, the story I must tell
I went out on the snow, and on my back I fell
A gent was riding by, in a one-horse open sleigh
He laughed as there I sprawling lie but quickly drove away

[Chorus:]

Now the ground is white, go it while you're young
Take the girls tonight, and sing this sleighing song
Just get a bob-tailed bay, two-forty as his speed
Hitch him to an open sleigh and crack! you'll take the lead

[Chorus:]

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/The Beatles/AUTHOR	NAME/Johnny B. Goode/NAME	"CONTENT/Deep down in Louisianna
Close to New Orleans
Way back up in the woods
Among the evergreens
There stand a country cabin
Made of clay and wood
Where lives a young country boy
Named Johnny B. Goode
He never ever learned
To read or write a book so well
But he could play his guitar
Just like a-ringing a bell

Go go, go Johnny go go go!
Go Johnny go go go!
Go Johnny go go go!
Go Johnny go go go!
Aah Johnny B. Goode!

He used to carry his guitar
In a gunny sack
Sit beneath the trees
By the railroad track
Oh sitting and a-playing
In the shade
Drumming to the rhythm
That the drivers made
People passing by
Used to stop and say
My oh my
That country boy can play

Go go, go Johnny go go go!
Go Johnny go go go!
Go Johnny go go go!
Go Johnny go go go!
Aah Johnny B. Goode!

Well his mama told him
Someday you will be a man
And you will be the leader
Of a big old band
Many people coming
From miles around
To hear you play your music
Till the sun goes down
Maybe some day
Your name will be in light
Saying Johnny B. Goode tonight!

Go go, go Johnny go go go!
Go Johnny go go go!
Go Johnny go go go!
Go Johnny go go go!
Aah Johnny B.Goode!

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/The Beatles/AUTHOR	NAME/Julia/NAME	"CONTENT/Half of what I say is meaningless
But I say it just to reach you, Julia.

Julia, Julia, oceanchild, calls me
So I sing a song of love, Julia
Julia, seashell eyes, windy smile, calls me
So I sing a song of love, Julia.

Her hair of floating sky is shimmering, glimmering
In the sun

Julia, Julia, morning moon, touch me
So I sing a song of love, Julia.

When I cannot sing my heart
I can only speak my mind, Julia.

Julia, sleeping sand, silent cloud, touch me
So I sing a song of love, Julia.

Hum hum hum hum, calls me
So I sing a song of love, Julia, Julia, Julia.

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/The Beatles/AUTHOR	NAME/Junk/NAME	"CONTENT/Motorcars, handlebars, bicycles for two
Broken hearted jubilee
Parachutes, army boots, sleeping bags for two
Na na na na jamboree
Buy buy...
Motorcars, handlebars, bicycles for two
Broken hearted jubilee
Parachutes, army boots, sleeping bags for you
Na na na jamboree
Buy buy...
...
The shopwindow
Why why, says the sign in the yard
Buy buy, says the sign in the shop window
Why why, says the junk in the yard

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/The Beatles/AUTHOR	NAME/Just A Rumour/NAME	"CONTENT/[Speech]

Alan Freeman: George, is it true that you're a connoisseur of the classics?
George: No, it's just a rumour, a rumour.
Alan: Just a rumour?
George: Hmm.
Alan: Did you enjoy singing ""Beethoven""?
George No. Been singing it for 28 years, now, you know.
Alan: For how long?
George: Twenty-eight years.
Alan: That's incredible. Could you manage one more performance?
George: Um, possibly.
Alan: Oh, go on, say, ""yes.""
George: Yes, thank you

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/The Beatles/AUTHOR	NAME/Kansa City/NAME	"CONTENT/Ah Kansas City
Going to get my baby back home
I'm going to Kansas City
Going to get my baby back home
Well its a long long time too
My baby's been gone

Ah, Kansas City
Going get my baby one time
I'm going to Kansas City
Going get my baby one time
Its a just a 1-2-3-4,
5-6-7-8-9

Hey hey hey hey
(hey hey hey hey)
Hey, baby
(hey, baby)
Ooh now girl
(yeah, yeah)
I said yeah now, huh
(girl, girl)
Now now now now tell me baby
What's been wrong with you

Hey hey hey hey
(hey hey hey hey)
Hey now baby
(hey baby)
Ooh now girl
(yeah, yeah)
I said yeah now, huh
(girl, girl)
Now now now now tell me baby
What's been wrong with you

I said bye
(bye bye bye bye)
Bye bye baby bye bye
(bye bye bye bye)
So long
(so long so long)
Bye bye baby I'm gone
(bye bye bye bye)
I said bye bye baby
Bye, bye, bye, bye

Bye now bye
(bye bye bye bye)
Bye now baby bye
(bye bye bye bye)

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/The Beatles/AUTHOR	NAME/Keep Your Hands Off My Baby/NAME	"CONTENT/We've been friends for oh, so long
I let you share what's mine
But when you mess with the boy I love
It's time to draw the line
Keep your hands (keep your hands) off my bay-ee-a-by
I ain't gonna tell you but-a one more time
Oh, keep your hands (keep your hands) off my bay-ee-a-by
Girl, you get it through your head
That boy is mine
I don't mind when you lend my clothes
My jewelry and such
But, honey, let's get something straight
There's one thing you don't touch
Keep your hands (keep your hands) off my baby
Girl, you get it through your head
That boy is mine
Keep your hands (keep your hands) off my bay-ee-a-by
I ain't gonna tell you but-a one more time
Oh, keep your hands (keep your hands) off my bay-ee-a-by
Girl, you get it through your head
That boy is mine
(Keep your hands)
Oh, keep your hands (off my) off my baby (bay-ee-a-by )
I ain't gonna tell you twice
(Keep your hands off my)
He's mine (bay-ee-a-by)
Yay, yay, yeah, he's mine
(Keep your hands off my)
You better watch yourself, now (bay-ee-a-by)

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/The Beatles/AUTHOR	NAME/Komm, Gib Mir Deine Hand/NAME	"CONTENT/Oh, komm doch, komm zu mir
Do nimmst mir den verstand
Oh, komm doch, komm zu mir
Komm, gib mir deine hand
Komm, gib mir deine hand
Komm, gib mir deine hand

Oh, do bist so schon
Schon wie ein diamant
Ich will mit dir gehen
Komm, gib mir deine hand
Komm, gib mir deine hand
Komm, gib mir deine hand

In deinen armen bin ich glucklich und froh
Das war noch nie bei einer anderen
Einmal so
Einmal so
Einmal so

Oh, komm doch, komm zu mir
Do nimmst mir den verstand
Oh, komm doch, komm zu mir
Komm, gib mir deine hand
Komm, gib mir deine hand
Komm, gib mir deine hand

In deinen armen bin ich glucklich und froh
Das war noch nie bei einer anderen
Einmal so
Einmal so
Einmal so

Oh, do bist so schon
Schon wie ein diamant
Ich will mit dir gehen
Komm, gib mir deine hand
Komm, gib mir deine hand
Komm, gib mir deine hand
Komm, gib mir deine hand

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/The Beatles/AUTHOR	NAME/Lady Madonna/NAME	"CONTENT/Lady Madonna, children at your feet
Wonder how you manage to make ends meet
Who find the money when you pay the rent
Did you think that money was heaven sent

Friday night arrives without a suitcase
Sunday morning creeping like a nun
Monday's child has learned to tie his bootlace
See how they run

Lady Madonna, baby at your breast
Wonders how you manage to feed the rest
Pa pa pa pa,
See how they run

Lady Madonna lying on the bed
Listen to the music playing in your head

Tuesday afternoon is never ending
Wednesday morning papers didn't come
Thursday night you stocking needed mending
See how they run

Lady Madonna, children at your feet
Wonder how you manage to make ends meet

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/The Beatles/AUTHOR	NAME/Lend Me Your Comb/NAME	"CONTENT/Lend me your comb
It's time to go home
I got to go past
My hair is a mess

Your mammie will scold
Your pappie will shout
Unless we come in
The way we went out

Kissing you was fun honey
But thanks for the date
But I must come to run honey
But you know baby it's getting late

Just wait till I say
My darling
Lend me your comb
We got to go home
Kissing you was fun honey

But thanks for the date
But I must come to run, honey
But sugar, it's getting late

Just wait till I
Say, my darling
Lend me your comb
We got to go home

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/The Beatles/AUTHOR	NAME/Let It Be/NAME	"CONTENT/When I find myself in times of trouble, Mother Mary comes to me
Speaking words of wisdom, let it be
And in my hour of darkness she is standing right in front of me
Speaking words of wisdom, let it be
Let it be, let it be, let it be, let it be
Whisper words of wisdom, let it be

And when the broken hearted people living in the world agree
There will be an answer, let it be
For though they may be parted, there is still a chance that they will see
There will be an answer, let it be
Let it be, let it be, let it be, let it be
There will be an answer, let it be
Let it be, let it be, let it be, let it be
Whisper words of wisdom, let it be
Let it be, let it be, let it be, let it be
Whisper words of wisdom, let it be

And when the night is cloudy there is still a light that shines on me
Shine until tomorrow, let it be
I wake up to the sound of music, Mother Mary comes to me
Speaking words of wisdom, let it be
Let it be, let it be, let it be, yeah, let it be
There will be an answer, let it be
Let it be, let it be, let it be, yeah, let it be
Whisper words of wisdom, let it be

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/The Beatles/AUTHOR	NAME/Like Dreamers Do/NAME	"CONTENT/I, I saw a girl in my dreams
And so it seems
That I will love her
Oh you, you are that girl
In my dreams
And so it seems
That I will love you

And I waited for your kiss
Waited for the bliss
Like dreamers do

And I, I, I, I
Oh I'll be there, yeah
Waiting for you, you, you, you, you
You, you came just one dream ago
And now I know that I will love you
I knew when you first said hello
That's how I know
That I will love you

And I, I, I waited for your kiss
Waited for the bliss
Like dreamers do

And I, I, I, I
Oh I'll be there, yeah
Waiting for you, you, you, you, you
You, you came just one dream ago
And now I know that I will love you
Oh I knew when you first said hello
That's how I know
That I will love you

And I waited for your kiss
Waited for the bliss
Like dreamers do
Oh, like dreamers do
Like dreamers do

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/The Beatles/AUTHOR	NAME/Long Tall Sally/NAME	"CONTENT/I'm gonna tell Aunt Mary 'bout Uncle John
He said he had the misery but he got a lot of fun
Baby, yeah now baby
Woo baby, some fun tonight

I saw Uncle John with Long Tall Sally
He saw Aunt Mary comin' and he ducked back in the alley
Oh, baby, yeah now baby
Woo baby, some fun tonight

Well Long Tall Sally's built pretty sweet
She got everything that Uncle John need
Baby, yeah now baby
Woo baby, some fun tonight

Well, we're gonna have some fun tonight
Have some fun tonight
Everything's all right
Have some fun tonight
Have some fun
Yeah, yeah, yeah,
We're gonna have some fun tonight
Have some fun tonight
Everything's all right
Have some fun tonight
Yeah, we'll have some fun
Some fun tonight

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/The Beatles/AUTHOR	NAME/Los Paranoias/NAME	"CONTENT/Joe Praries and the prarie walliflowers
Los Paranoias
Los paranoias invites you to (I can't make it)
To just enjoy us (I can't make it)
Come on you can do it baby
Come on and join los paranoias
Just enjoy us
Los paranoias
Oh! los paranoias
Come on and join us
Los paranoias
Come on enjoy us
Well! los paranoias
We're here to sing for you
And whenever you want us to
We will sing a little song for you
Los paranoias...

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/The Beatles/AUTHOR	NAME/Love Me Do/NAME	"CONTENT/Love, love me do.
You know I love you,
I'll always be true,
So please, love me do.
Whoa, love me do.

Love, love me do.
You know I love you,
I'll always be true,
So please, love me do.
Whoa, love me do.

Someone to love,
Somebody new.
Someone to love,
Someone like you.

Love, love me do.
You know I love you,
I'll always be true,
So please, love me do.
Whoa, love me do.

Love, love me do.
You know I love you,
I'll always be true,
So please, love me do.
Whoa, love me do.
Yeah, love me do.
Whoa, oh, love me do.

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/The Beatles/AUTHOR	NAME/Love Of The Loved/NAME	"CONTENT/Each time I look into your eyes
I see that there a heaven lies
And as I look
I see the love of the loved.

Someday they'll see that from the start
My place has been deep in your heart.
And in your heart
I see the love of the loved.

Though I said it all before
I will say it more and more,
Now that I'm really sure
You love me.

And I know that from today
I'll see it in the way
That you look at me
And say ah you love me.

So let it rain, I'll never care?
Deep in your heart, I'd still be there.
And when I'm there
I see the love of the loved.

Though I said it all before
I will say it more and more,
Now that I'm really sure
You love me.

And I know that from today
I'll see it in the way
That you look at me
And say ah you love me.

So let it rain, I'll never I care?
Deep in your heart, I'd still be there.
And when I'm there

I see the love of the loved.
I see the love of the loved.
I see the love of the loved.

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/The Beatles/AUTHOR	NAME/Love These Goon Shows!/NAME	"CONTENT/[Speech]

Lee Peters: But now, John has his work cut out on the next one, as he takes
his guitar on and off his neck and pulls the harmonica in and out of his face.
John: Harp. It's a harp.
Lee: What? Harp?
John: The harp. 'Cause I'm playing the harp on this one.
Lee: Playing the harp?
John: Harmonica I play on ""Love Me Do,"" harp, on this one, little goes in the
orang.
Lee: But it goes in and out? Do you wanna do this announcement? Well, go on,
you go ahead, no, it's all right. Tell them. Tell them about the next song.
John: Oh, er, we'd like to carry on with Chuck Berry's ""I Gotta Find My Baby.""
Don't know where she's been, pardon, hello? Love these goon shows

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/The Beatles/AUTHOR	NAME/Love You To/NAME	"CONTENT/Each day just goes so fast
I turn around, it's past
You don't get time to hang a sign on me

Love me while you can
Or I'll get a plan

A lifetime is so short
A new one can't be bought
But what you've got means such a lot to me

Make love all day long
Make love singing songs

Make love all day long
Make love singing songs

There's people standing round
Who screw you in the ground
They'll fill you in with all the things you see

I'll make love to you
If you want me to

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/The Beatles/AUTHOR	NAME/Lovely Rita/NAME	"CONTENT/Lovely Rita meter maid,
Nothing can come between us,
When it gets dark I tow your heart away.

Standing by a parking meter,
When I caught a glimpse of Rita,
Filling in a ticket in her little white book.
In a cap she looked much older,
And the bag across her shoulder
Made her look a little like a military man.

Lovely Rita meter maid,
May I inquire discreetly,
When are you free to take some tea with me.
Took her out and tried to win her,
Had a laugh and over dinner,
Told her I would really like to see her again

Got the bill and Rita paid it,
Took her home I nearly made it,
Sitting on the sofa with a sister or two.

Oh, lovely Rita meter maid,
Where would I be without you,
Give us a wink and make me think of you

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/The Beatles/AUTHOR	NAME/Lucy In The Sky With Diamonds/NAME	"CONTENT/Picture yourself in a boat on a river
With tangerine trees and marmalade skies
Somebody calls you, you answer quite slowly
A girl with kaleidoscope eyes

Cellophane flowers of yellow and green
Towering over your head
Look for the girl with the sun in her eyes
And she's gone

Lucy in the sky with diamonds
Lucy in the sky with diamonds
Lucy in the sky with diamonds
Ah

Follow her down to a bridge by a fountain
Where rocking horse people eat marshmallow pies
Everyone smiles as you drift past the flowers
That grow so incredibly high

Newspaper taxis appear on the shore
Waiting to take you away
Climb in the back with your head in the clouds
And you're gone

Lucy in the sky with diamonds
Lucy in the sky with diamonds
Lucy in the sky with diamonds
Ah

Picture yourself on a train in a station
With plasticine porters with looking glass ties
Suddenly someone is there at the turnstile
The girl with the kaleidoscope eyes

Lucy in the sky with diamonds
Lucy in the sky with diamonds
Lucy in the sky with diamonds
Ah
Lucy in the sky with diamonds
Lucy in the sky with diamonds
Lucy in the sky with diamonds
Ah
Lucy in the sky with diamonds
Lucy in the sky with diamonds
Lucy in the sky with diamonds

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/The Beatles/AUTHOR	NAME/Magical Mystery Tour/NAME	"CONTENT/Roll up roll up for the Mystery Tour
Roll up roll up for the Mystery Tour

Roll up
That's an invitation
Roll up for the Mystery Tour
Roll up
To make a reservation
Roll up for the Mystery Tour

The Magical Mystery Tour
Is waiting to take you away
Waiting to take you away

Roll up
Roll up for the Mystery Tour
Roll up
Roll up for the Mystery Tour

Roll up
They've got everything you need
Roll up for the Mystery Tour
Roll up
Satisfaction guaranteed
Roll up for the Mystery Tour

The Magical Mystery Tour is hoping to take you away
Hoping to take you away

The Mystery Tour

Ah

The Magical Mystery Tour
Roll up
Roll up for the Mystery Tour

Roll up
That's an invitation
Roll up for the Mystery Tour
Roll up
To make a reservation
Roll up for the Mystery Tour

The Magical Mystery Tour
Is coming to take you away
Coming to take you away

The Magical Mystery Tour
Is dying to take you away
Dying to take you away
Take you today

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/The Beatles/AUTHOR	NAME/Martha, My Dear/NAME	"CONTENT/Martha, my dear
Though I spend my days in conversation, please
Remember me
Martha, my love
Don't forget me
Martha, my dear

Hold your head up, you silly girl
Look what you've done
When you find yourself in the thick of it
Help yourself to a bit of what is all around you
Silly girl

Take a good look around you
Take a good look you're bound to see
That you and me were meant to be
With each other
Silly girl

Hold you're hand out, you silly girl
See what you've done
When you find yourself in the thick of it
Help yourself to a bit of what is all around you
Silly girl

Martha, my dear
You have always been my inspiration
Please, be good to me
Martha, my love
Don't forget me
Martha, my dear.

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/The Beatles/AUTHOR	NAME/Matchbox/NAME	"CONTENT/I said I'm sitting here watching
Matchbox hole in my clothes
I said I'm sitting here wondering
Matchbox hole in my clothes
I ain't got no matches
But I sure got a long way to go

I'm an old poor boy
I'm a long way from home
I'm an old poor boy
And I'm a long way from home
I've never been happy
'Cause everything I ever did was wrong

Well, if you don't want my peaches
Honey please don't shake my tree
If you don't want any of those peaches
Honey, please don't mess around my tree
I've got news for you baby
Leave me here in misery, all right!

Well let me be your little dog
Till your big dog comes
Let me be your little dog
Till your big dog comes
And when your big dog gets here
Watch how your puppy dog runs

Well I said I'm sitting here watching
Matchbox hole in my clothes
I said I'm sitting here wondering
Matchbox hole in my clothes
I ain't got no matches
But I sure got a long way to go

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/The Beatles/AUTHOR	NAME/Mean Mr. Mustard/NAME	"CONTENT/Mean Mister Mustard sleeps in the park
Shaves in the dark trying to save paper
Sleeps in a hole in the road
Saving up to buy some clothes
Keeps a ten-bob note up his nose
Such a mean old man
Such a mean old man

His sister Pam works in a shop
She never stops, she's a go-getter
Takes him out to look at the queen
Only place that he's ever been
Always shouts out something obscene
Such a dirty old man
Dirty old man

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/The Beatles/AUTHOR	NAME/Memphis, Tenessee/NAME	"CONTENT/Long distance information
Give me Memphis, Tennessee
Try to find the party
Trying to get in touch with me
She would not leave her number
But I know who placed the call
Cos my uncle took the message
And he wrote it on the wall

Help me, information
Get in touch with my Marie
She's the only one who'd phone me here
From Memphis, Tennessee
Her home is on the south side
Just beyond the ridge
Just a half a mile
From the Mississippi Bridge

Help me, information
More than that I cannot add
Only that I miss her
And all the fun we had
We were pulled apart
Because her mom would not agree
Help me get in touch with her
In Memphis, Tennessee

The last time I saw Marie
She was waving me goodbye
With hurry homedrops on her cheek
That trickled from her eyes
Marie is only six years old
Information please
Help me get in touch with her
In Memphis, Tennessee

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/The Beatles/AUTHOR	NAME/Michelle/NAME	"CONTENT/Michelle, ma belle
These are words that go together well
My Michelle
Michelle, ma belle
Sont les mots qui vont tres bien ensemble
Tres bien ensemble
I love you, I love you, I love you
That's all I want to say
Until I find a way
I will say the only words I know that you'll understand

Michelle, ma belle
Sont les mots qui vont tres bien ensemble
Tres bien ensemble
I need to, I need to, I need to
I need to make you see
Oh, what you mean to me
Until I do, I'm hoping you will know what I mean
I love you...

I want you, I want you, I want you
I think you know by now
I'll get to you somehow
Until I do, I'm telling you so you'll understand
Michelle, ma belle
Sont les mots qui vont tres bien ensemble
Tres bien ensemble
And I will say the only words I know that you'll understand
My Michelle

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/The Beatles/AUTHOR	NAME/Money/NAME	"CONTENT/The best things in life are free
But you can tell me 'bout the birds and bees.
Now gimme money that's what I want
That's what I want that's what I want
That's what I want, ye-ye-yeh,
That's what I want.

Money don't get everything it's true.
What it don't get I can't use.
So gimme money that's what I want
A little money that's what I want
That's what I want, ye-ye-yeh,
That's what I want.

Yeh gimme money that's what I want
A little money that's what I want
That's what I want that's what I want
So gimme money that's what I want
That's what I want, ye-ye-yeh,
That's what I want.

Your lovin' give me a thrill
But your lovin' don't pay my bill.
Now gimme money that's what I want
That's what I want that's what I want
That's what I want, ye-ye-yeh,
That's what I want.

Money don't get everything it's true.
What it don't get I can't use.
So gimme money that's what I want
A little money that's what I want
That's what I want, ye-ye-yeh,
That's what I want.

Yeh gimme money that's what I want
A little money that's what I want
That's what I want that's what I want
So gimme money that's what I want
That's what I want, ye-ye-yeh,
That's what I want.

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/The Beatles/AUTHOR	NAME/Mr. Moonlight/NAME	"CONTENT/Mister Moonlight
You came to me one summer night
And from your beam you made my dream
And from the world you sent my girl
And from above you sent us love
And now she is mine, I think you're fine
'Cause we love you Mister Moonlight

Mister Moonlight come again please
Here I am on my knees begging if you please
And the night you don't come my way
I pray and pray more each day
'Cause we love you Mister Moonlight

And the night you don't come my way
I pray and pray more each day
'Cause we love you Mister Moonlight

Mister Moonlight come again please
Here I am on my knees begging if you please
And the night you don't come my way
I pray and pray more each day
'Cause we love you Mister Moonlight
Mister Moonlight

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/The Beatles/AUTHOR	NAME/Mrs. Robinson/NAME	"CONTENT/and here's to you Mrs. Robinson
jesus loves you more than you will know wuwuwu
god bless you please Mrs. Robinson
heaven holds a place for those who pray
hey hey hey...hey hey hey

we like to know a little bit about you for our files
we like to help you learn to help yourself
look around youu all you see are sympathetic lies
stroll around the grounds until you feel at home

and here's to you Mrs. Robinson
jesus loves you more than you will know wuwuwu
god bless you please Mrs. Robinson
heaven holds a place for those who pray
hey hey hey...hey hey hey

Hide it in a hiding place where no one ever goes
Put it in your pantry with your cupcakes
It's a little secret, just the Robinsons' affair
Most of all, you've got to hide it from the kids

Coo, coo, ca-choo, Mrs Robinson
Jesus loves you more than you will know (Wo, wo, wo)
God bless you please, Mrs. Robinson
Heaven holds a place for those who pray
(Hey, hey, hey...hey, hey, hey)

sitting on a sofa on a sunday afternoon
Going to the candidates debate
Laugh about it, shout about it
When you've got to choose
Ev'ry way you look at it, you lose

where have you gone Joe Damajiou
A nation turns its lonely eyes to you wuwuwu
what's that you say
Mrs. robinson
Joe Damajiou has long left and gone away
hey hey hey hey hey hey

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/The Beatles/AUTHOR	NAME/My Bonnie/NAME	"CONTENT/My Bonnie lies over the ocean,
My Bonnie lies over the sea.
My Bonnie lies over the ocean.
Oh bring back my Bonnie to me.

My Bonnie lies over the ocean,
My Bonnie lies over the sea.
Well my Bonnie lies over the ocean.
Yeah bring back my Bonnie to me.

Yeah bring back, ah bring back,
Oh bring back my Bonnie to me to me.
Oh bring back, oh bring back,
Oh bring back my Bonnie to me.

Well my Bonnie lies over the ocean,
My Bonnie lies over the sea.
Yeah my Bonnie lies over the ocean.
Oh I said bring back my Bonnie to me.

Yeah bring back, ah bring back,
Oh bring back my Bonnie to me to me.
Oh bring back, ah bring back,
Oh bring back my Bonnie to me.

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/The Beatles/AUTHOR	NAME/No Reply/NAME	"CONTENT/This happened once before
When I came to your door
No reply
They said it wasn't you
But I saw you peep through
Your window
I saw the light
I saw the light
I know that you saw me
'Cause I looked up to see
Your face

I tried to telephone
They said you were not home
That's a lie
'Cause I know where you've been
And I saw you walk in
Your door
I nearly died
I nearly died
'Cause you walked hand in hand
With another man
In my place

If I were you, I'd realize that I
Love you more than any other guy
And I'll forgive the lies that I
Heard before, when you gave me no reply

I tried to telephone
They said you were not home
That's a lie
'Cause I know where you've been
And I saw you walk in
Your door
I nearly died
I nearly died
'Cause you walked hand in hand
With another man
In my place
No reply
No reply

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/The Beatles/AUTHOR	NAME/Norwegian Wood/NAME	"CONTENT/I once had a girl, or should I say, she once had me...
She showed me her room, isn't it good, norwegian wood?

She asked me to stay and she told me to sit anywhere,
So I looked around and I noticed there wasn't a chair.

I sat on a rug, biding my time, drinking her wine
We talked until two and then she said, ""It's time for bed""

She told me she worked in the morning and started to laugh.
I told her I didn't and crawled off to sleep in the bath

And when I awoke, I was alone, this bird had flown
So I lit a fire, isn't it good, norwegian wood?

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/The Beatles/AUTHOR	NAME/Not A Second Time/NAME	"CONTENT/You know you made me cry
I see no use in wondering why
I cry for you

And now you've changed your mind
I see no reason to change mine
I cry it's through, oh

You're giving me the same old line
I'm wondering why
You hurt me then
You're back again
No, no, no, not a second time

You know you made me cry
I see no use in wondering why
I cry for you, yea

And now you've changed your mind
I see no reason to change mine
I cry it's through, oh

You're giving me the same old line
I'm wondering why
You hurt me then
You're back again
No, no, no, not a second time
Not a second time
Not the second time
No, no, no, no, no
No, no no

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/The Beatles/AUTHOR	NAME/Not Guilty/NAME	"CONTENT/Not guilty
For getting in your way
While you're trying to steal the day.
Not guilty
And I'm not here for the rest,
I'm not trying to steal your vest.

I am not trying to be smart,
I only want what I can get.
I'm really sorry for your ageing head.
But like you heard me said:
Not guilty.

No use handing me a writ
While I'm trying to do my bit.

I don't expect to take your heart.
I only want what I can get.
I'm really sorry that you're underfed.
But like you heard me said:
Not guilty.

Not guilty
For looking like a freak,
Making friends with every Sikh.
Not guilty
For leading you astray
On the road to Mandalay.

I won't upset the apple cart.
I only want what I can get.
I'm really sorry that you've been misled.
But like you heard me said:
Not guilty.

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/The Beatles/AUTHOR	NAME/Nothin' Shakin'/NAME	"CONTENT/I tried to find out
What love is all about,
And every day
It sure lets out.
I see my baby
I get week in my knees.
There's nothing shaking
But the leaves on the trees.
My pappie told me
There'd be times like these.
There's nothing shaking
But the leaves on the trees.

We meet the gang
And go to rocking Joes.
The cats are something
On the heels and toes.
I grab my baby,
Tried to give her a squeeze.
There's nothing shaking
But the leaves on the trees.
Why must she be
Such a doggone tease?
There's nothing shaking
But the leaves on the trees.

She's got a way
That makes me act like a fool.
Spent my money,
Then she plays me cool.
I beg her for kisses
On my bended knees.
Oh won't you give me
Some loving, baby,
Please please please.

Though I keep trying hard
To make her mine,
One day the wind will blow
And the sun will shine.
Till that time
She puts my heart at ease.
There's nothing shaking
But the leaves on the trees
She locked my heart
And threw away the keys.
There's nothing shaking
But the leaves on the trees, yeah.

She's got a way
That makes me act like a fool.
Spent my money,
Then she plays me cool.
I'm begging her for kisses
On my bended knees.
Oh won't you give me
Some of your loving, baby,
Please please please.

Though I keep trying hard
To make her mine,
One day the wind will blow
And the sun will shine.
Till that time
She puts my heart at ease.
There's nothing shaking
But the leaves on the trees
She locked my heart
And threw away the keys.
There's nothing shaking
But the leaves on the trees
There's nothing shaking
But the leaves on the trees
There's nothing shaking
But the leaves on the trees
There's nothing shaking
But the leaves on the trees

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/The Beatles/AUTHOR	NAME/Nowhere Man/NAME	"CONTENT/He's a real nowhere man
Sitting in his nowhere land
Making all his nowhere plans for nobody

Doesn't have a point of view
Knows not where he's going to
Isn't he a bit like you and me?
Nowhere man please listen
You don't know what you're missing
Nowhere man, The world is at your command

He's as blind as he can be
Just sees what he wants to see
Nowhere man, can you see me at all
Nowhere man don't worry
Take your time, don't hurry
Leave it all till somebody else
Lends you a hand
Ah, la, la, la, la

Doesn't have a point of view
Knows not where he's going to
Isn't he a bit like you and me?
Nowhere man please listen
You don't know what you're missing
Nowhere man, The world is at your command
Ah, la, la, la, la

He's a real nowhere man
Sitting in his nowhere land
Making all his nowhere plans for nobody
Making all his nowhere plans for nobody
Making all his nowhere plans for nobody

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/The Beatles/AUTHOR	NAME/Ob-La-Di, Ob-La-Da/NAME	"CONTENT/Desmond has a barrow in the marketplace
Molly is the singer in a band
Desmond says to Molly girl I like your face
And Molly says this as she takes him by the hand

[Chorus]
Ob la di ob la da life goes on bra
La la how the life goes on
Ob la di ob la da life goes on bra
La la how the life goes on

Desmond takes a trolley to the jeweler's store
Buys a twenty carat golden ring
Takes it back to Molly waiting at the door
And as he gives it to her she begins to sing

[Chorus]

In a couple of years they have built
A home sweet home
With a couple of kids running in the yard
Of Desmond and Molly Jones

Happy ever after in the market place
Desmond lets the children lend a hand
Molly stays at home and does her pretty face
And in the evening she still sings it with the band

[Chorus]

In a couple of years they have built
A home sweet home
With a couple of kids running in the yard
Of Desmond and Molly Jones

Happy ever after in the market place
Molly lets the children lend a hand
Desmond stays at home and does his pretty face
And in the evening he's a singer with the band

[Chorus]

And if you want some fun sing ob la di bla da

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/The Beatles/AUTHOR	NAME/Octopus's Garden/NAME	"CONTENT/I'd like to be under the sea
In an octopus' garden in the shade
He'd let us in, knows where we've been
In his octopus' garden in the shade

I'd ask my friends to come and see
An octopus' garden with me
I'd like to be under the sea
In an octopus' garden in the shade.

We would be warm below the storm
In our little hideaway beneath the waves
Resting our head on the sea bed
In an octopus' garden near a cave

We would sing and dance around
Because we know we can't be found
I'd like to be under the sea
In an octopus' garden in the shade

We would shout and swim about
The coral that lies beneath the waves
(Lies beneath the ocean waves)
Oh what joy for every girl and boy
Knowing they're happy and they're safe
(Happy and they're safe)

We would be so happy you and me
No one there to tell us what to do
I'd like to be under the sea
In an octopus' garden with you.

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/The Beatles/AUTHOR	NAME/Oh! Darling/NAME	"CONTENT/Oh! Darling, please believe me
I'll never do you no harm
Believe me when I tell you
I'll never do you no harm

Oh! Darling, if you leave me
I'll never make it alone
Believe me when I beg you
Don't ever leave me alone

When you told me you didn't need me anymore
Well you know I nearly broke down and cried
When you told me you didn't need me anymore
Well you know I nearly broke down and died

Oh! Darling, if you leave me
I'll never make it alone
Believe me when I beg you
I'll never do you no harm, no harm

When you told me you didn't need me anymore
Well you know I nearly broke down and cried
When you told me you didn't need me anymore
Well you know I nearly broke down and cried

Oh! Darling, please believe me
I'll never let you down
Believe me when I tell you
I'll never do you no harm

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/The Beatles/AUTHOR	NAME/Old Brown Shoe/NAME	"CONTENT/I want a love that's right but right is only half of what's wrong.
I want a short haired girl who sometimes wears it twice as long.
Now I'm stepping out this old brown shoe, baby, I'm in love with you.
I'm so glad you came here, it won't be the same now, I'm telling you.

You know you pick me up from where some try to drag me down
And when I see your smile replace every thoughtless frown.
Got me escaping from this zoo, baby, I'm in love with you.
I'm so glad you came here, it won't be the same now when I'm with you.

If I grow up I'll be a singer wearing rings on every finger.
Not worrying what they or you say I'll live and love and maybe someday
Who knows, baby, you may comfort me.
I may appear to be imperfect, my love is something you can't reject.
I'm changing faster than the weather if you and me should get together
Who knows, baby, you may comfort me.

That love of your, to miss that love is something I'd hate.
I'll make an early start, I'm making sure that I'm not late.
For you sweet top lip I'm in the queue, baby, I'm in love with you.
I'm so glad you came here, it won't be the same now when I'm with you.
I'm so glad you came here, it won't be the same now when I'm with you.

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Bob Dylan/AUTHOR	NAME/4Th Time Around/NAME	"CONTENT/When she said, ""Don't waste your words, they're just lies,""
I cried she was deaf.
And she worked on my face until breaking my eyes,
Then said, ""What else you got left?""
It was then that I got up to leave
But she said, ""Don't forget,
Everybody must give something back
For something they get.""

I stood there and hummed,
I tapped on her drum
And asked her how come.
And she buttoned her boot,
And straightened her suit,
Then she said, ""Don't get cute.""
So I forced my hands in my pockets
And felt with my thumbs,
And gallantly handed her
My very last piece of gum.

She threw me outside,
I stood in the dirt where ev'ryone walked.
And after finding I'd forgotten my shirt,
I went back and knocked.
I waited in the hallway, she went to get it,
And I tried to make sense
Out of that picture of you in your wheelchair
That leaned up against--

Her Jamaican rum
And when she did come, I asked her for some.
She said, ""No, dear.""
I said, ""Your words aren't clear,
You'd better spit out your gum.""
She screamed till her face got so red,
Then she fell on the floor,
And I covered her up and then
Thought I'd go look through her drawer.

And when I was through
I filled up my shoe and brought it to you.
And you, you took me in,
You loved me then, you never wasted time.
And I, I never took much,
I never asked for your crutch
And I don't ask for mine.

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Bob Dylan/AUTHOR	NAME/A Satisfied Mind/NAME	"CONTENT/How many times have you heard someone say
If I had his money I'd do things my way
Hmm, but little they know
Hmm, it's so hard to find
One man in ten with a satisfied mind.

Hmm, once I was wading in fortune and fame
Everything that I dreamed of to get a start in lifes game
But suddenly it happened
Hmm, I lost every dime
But I'm richer by far with a satisfied mind.

Hmm, when my life is over and my time has run out
My friends and my loved ones I'll leave there ain't no doubt
But one things for certain
When it comes my time
I'll leave this old world with a satisfied mind.

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Bob Dylan/AUTHOR	NAME/Ain't Gonna Grieve/NAME	"CONTENT/By Bob Dylan

Well, I ain't a-gonna grieve no more, no more
Ain't a-gonna grieve no more, no more
Ain't a-gonna grieve no more, no more
And ain't a-gonna grieve no more.

Come on brother, join the band,
Come on sisters, clap your hands,
Tell everybody that's in the land,
You ain't a-gonna grieve no more.

Well, I ain't a-gonna grieve no more, no more
Ain't a-gonna grieve no more, no more
Ain't a-gonna grieve no more, no more
And ain't a-gonna grieve no more.

Brown and blue and white and black,
All one color on the one-way track,
We got this far and ain't a-goin' back
And ain't a-gonna grieve no more.

Well, I ain't a-gonna grieve no more, no more
Ain't a-gonna grieve no more, no more
Ain't a-gonna grieve no more, no more
I ain't a-gonna grieve no more.

We're gonna notify your next of kin,
You're gonna raise the roof until the house falls in.
If you get knocked down get up again,
We ain't a-gonna grieve no more.

Well, I ain't a-gonna grieve no more, no more
Ain't a-gonna grieve no more, no more
Ain't a-gonna grieve no more, no more
I ain't a-gonna grieve no more.

We'll sing this song all night long,
Sing it to my baby from midnight on.
She'll sing it to you when I'm dead and gone,
Ain't a-gonna grieve no more.

Well, I ain't a-gonna grieve no more, no more
Ain't a-gonna grieve no more, no more
Ain't a-gonna grieve no more, no more
I ain't a-gonna grieve no more

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Bob Dylan/AUTHOR	NAME/All Over You/NAME	"CONTENT/By Bob Dylan

Well, if I had to do it all over again,
Babe, I'd do it all over you.
And if I had to wait for ten thousand years,
Babe, I'd even do that too.
Well, a dog's got his bone in the alley,
A cat, she's got nine lives,
A millionaire's got a million dollars,
King Saud's got four hundred wives.
Well, ev'rybody's got somethin'
That they're lookin' forward to.
I'm lookin' forward to when I can do it all again
And babe, I'll do it all over you.

Well, if I had my way tomorrow or today,
Babe, I'd run circles all around.
I'd jump up in the wind, do a somersault and spin,
I'd even dance a jig on the ground.
Well, everybody gets their hour,
Everybody gets their time,
Little David when he picked up his pebbles,
Even Sampson after he went blind.
Well, everybody gets the chance
To do what they want to do.
When my time arrives you better run for your life
'Cause babe, I'll do it all over you.

Well, I don't need no money, I just need a day that's sunny,
Baby, and my days are gonna come.
And I grab me a pint, you know that I'm a giant
When you hear me yellin', ""Fee-fi-fo-fum.""
Well, you cut me like a jigsaw puzzle,
You made me to a walkin' wreck,
Then you pushed my heart through my backbone,
Then you knocked off my head from my neck.
Well, if I'm ever standin' steady
A-doin' what I want to do,
Well, I tell you little lover that you better run for cover
'Cause babe, I'll do it all over you.

I'm just restin' at your gate so that I won't be late
And, momma, I'm a-just sittin' on the shelf.
Look out your window fair and you'll see me squattin' there
Just a-fumblin' and a-mumblin' to myself.
Well, after my cigarette's been smoked up,
After all my liquor's been drunk,
After my dreams are dreamed out,
After all my thoughts have been thunk,
Well, after I do some of these things,
I'm gonna do what I have to do.
And I tell you on the side, that you better run and hide
'Cause babe, I'll do it all over you.

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Bob Dylan/AUTHOR	NAME/Ballad Of Donald White/NAME	"CONTENT/My name is Donald White, you see,
I stand before you all.
I was judged by you a murderer
And the hangman's knot must fall.
I will die upon the gallows pole
When the moon is shining clear,
And these are my final words
That you will ever hear.

I left my home in Kansas
When I was very young,
I landed in the old Northwest,
Seattle, Washington
Although I'd a-traveled many miles,
I never made a friend,
For I could never get along in life
With people that I met.

If I had some education
To give me a decent start,
I might have been a doctor or
A master in the arts.
But I used my hands for stealing
When I was very young,
And they locked me down in jailhouse cells,
That's how my life begun.

Oh, the inmates and the prisoners,
I found they were my kind,
And it was there inside the bars
I found my peace of mind.
But the jails they were too crowded,
Institutions overflowed,
So they turned me loose to walk upon
Life's hurried tangled road.

And there's danger on the ocean
Where the salt sea waves split high,
And there's danger on the battlefield
Where the shells of bullets fly,
And there's danger in this open world
Where men strive to be free,
And for me the greatest danger
Was in society.

So I asked them to send me back
To the institution home.
But they said they were too crowded,
For me they had no room.
I got down on my knees and begged,
""Oh, please put me away,""
But they would not listen to my plea
Or nothing I would say.

And so it was on Christmas eve
In the year of '59,
It was on that night I killed a man,
I did not try to hide,
The jury found me guilty
And I won't disagree,
For I knew that it would happen
If I wasn't put away.

And I'm glad I've had no parents
To care for me or cry,
For now they will never know
The horrible death I die.
And I'm also glad I've had no friends
To see me in disgrace,
For they'll never see that hangman's hood
Wrap around my face.

Farewell unto the old north woods
Of which I used to roam,
Farewell unto the crowded bars
Of which've been my home,
Farewell to all you people
Who think the worst of me,
I guess you'll feel much better when
I'm on that hanging tree.

But there's just one question
Before they kill me dead,
I'm wondering just how much
To you I really said
Concerning all the boys that come
Down a road like me,
Are they enemies or victims
Of your society?

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Bob Dylan/AUTHOR	NAME/Ballad Of Hollis Brown/NAME	"CONTENT/Hollis Brown
He lived on the outside of town
Hollis Brown
He lived on the outside of town
With his wife and five children
And his cabin brokin' down.

You looked for work and money
And you walked a rugged mile
You looked for work and money
And you walked a rugged mile
Your children are so hungry
That they don't know how to smile.

Your baby's eyes look crazy
They're a-tuggin' at your sleeve
Your baby's eyes look crazy
They're a-tuggin' at your sleeve
You walk the floor and wonder why
With every breath you breathe.

The rats have got your flour
Bad blood it got your mare
The rats have got your flour
Bad blood it got your mare
If there's anyone that knows
Is there anyone that cares?

You prayed to the Lord above
Oh please send you a friend
You prayed to the Lord above
Oh please send you a friend
Your empty pocket tell you
That you ain't a-got no friend.

Your babies are crying louder now
It's pounding on your brain
Your babies are crying louder now
It's pounding on your brain
Your wife's screams are stabbin' you
Like the dirty drivin' rain.

Your grass is turning black
There's no water in your well
Your grass is turning black
There's no water in your well
Your spent your last lone dollar
On seven shotgun shels.

Way out in the wilderness
A cold coyote calls
Way out in the wilderness
A cold coyote calls
Your eyes fix on the shortgun
That's hangin' on the wall.

Your brain is a-bleedin'
And your legs can't seem to stand
Your brain is a-bleedin'
And your legs can't seem to stand
Your eyes fix on the shortgun
That you're holdin' in your hand.

There's seven breezes a-blowin'
All around the cabin door
There's seven breezes a-blowin'
All around the cabin door
Seven shots ring out
Like the ocean's pounding roar.

There's seven people dead
On a south Dakota farm
There's seven people dead
On a south Dakota farm
Somewhere in the distance
There's seven new people born.

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Bob Dylan/AUTHOR	NAME/Belle Isle/NAME	"CONTENT/One evening for pleasure I rambled to view
The fair fields all alone
Down by the banks of Loch Eiron
Where beauty and pleasure were known.

I spied a fair maid at her labour
Which caused me to stay for a while
And I thought of a goddess to beauty
Bloomin' bright star of Bright Isle.

I humbled myself to her beauty
""Fair maiden, where do you belong ?
Are you from heaven descended
Abiding in Cupid's fair throne ?"".

""Young man, I will tell you a secret
It's true I'm a maid that is poor
And to part from my vows and my promise
Is more than my heart can endure.

Therefore I remain at my service
And go through all my hardship and toil
And wait for the lad that has left me
All alone on the banks of Belle Isle"".

""Young maiden I wish not to banter
It's true I come here in disguise
I came here to fulfill our last promise
And hope to give you a surprise.

I've known you're a maid I love dearly
And you've been in my heart all the while
For me there is no other damsel
Than my bloomin' bright star of Belle Isle"".

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Bob Dylan/AUTHOR	NAME/Beyond Here Lies Nothin'/NAME	"CONTENT/Oh well, I love you pretty baby
You're the only love I've ever known
Just as long as you stay with me
The whole world is my throne
Beyond here lies nothin'
Nothing we can call our own

Well, I'm moving after midnight
Down boulevards of broken cars
Don't know what I do without it
Without this love that we call ours
Beyond here lies nothin'
Nothing but the moon and stars

Down every street there's a window
And every window made of glass
We'll keep on loving pretty baby
For as long as love will last
Beyond here lies nothin'
But the mountains of the past

Well my ship is in the harbor
And the sails are spread
Listen to me, pretty baby
Lay your hand upon my head
Beyond here lies nothin'
Nothing done and nothing said

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Bob Dylan/AUTHOR	NAME/Beyond The Horizon/NAME	"CONTENT/Beyond the horizon, behind the sun
At the end of the rainbow life has only begun
In the long hours of twilight 'neath the stardust above
Beyond the horizon it is easy to love

My wretched heart's pounding
I felt an angel's kiss
My memories are drowning
In mortal bliss

Beyond the horizon, in the Springtime or Fall
Love waits forever for one and for all

Beyond the horizon across the divide
'Round about midnight, we'll be on the same side
Down in the valley the water runs cold
Beyond the horizon someone prayed for your soul

I'm touched with desire
What don't I do?
I'll throw the logs on the fire
I'll build my world around you

Beyond the horizon, at the end of the game
Every step that you take, I'm walking the same

Beyond the horizon the night winds blow
The theme of a melody from many moons ago
The bells of St. Mary, how sweetly they chime
Beyond the horizon I found you just in time

It's dark and it's dreary
I ponder in vain
I'm weakened, I'm weary
My repentance is plain

Beyond the horizon o'er the treacherous sea
I still can't believe that you've set aside your love for me

Beyond the horizon, 'neath crimson skies
In the soft light of morning I'll follow you with my eyes
Through countries and kingdoms and temples of stone
Beyond the horizon right down to the bone

It's late in the season
Never knew, never cared
Whatever the reason
Someone's life has been spared

Beyond the horizon the sky is so blue
I've got more than a lifetime to live lovin' you

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Bob Dylan/AUTHOR	NAME/Black Crow Blues/NAME	"CONTENT/I woke in the mornin', wand'rin',
Wasted and worn out.
I woke in the mornin', wand'rin',
Wasted and worn out.
Wishin' my long-lost lover
Will walk to me, talk to me,
Tell me what it's all about.

I was standin' at the side road
Listenin' to the billboard knock.
Standin' at the side road
Listenin' to the billboard knock.
Well, my wrist was empty
But my nerves were kickin',
Tickin' like a clock.

If I got anything you need, babe,
Let me tell you in front.
If I got anything you need, babe,
Let me tell you in front.
You can come to me sometime,
Night time, day time,
Any time you want.

Sometimes I'm thinkin'
I'm too high to fall.
Sometimes I'm thinkin'
I'm too high to fall.
Other times I'm thinkin' I'm
So low I don't know
If I can come up at all.

Black crows in the meadow
Across a broad highway.
Black crows in the meadow
Across a broad highway.
Though it's funny, honey,
I just don't feel much like a
Scarecrow today.

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Bob Dylan/AUTHOR	NAME/Blind Willie Mctell/NAME	"CONTENT/Seen the arrow on the doorpost
Saying, ""This land is condemned
All the way from New Orleans
To Jerusalem. ""
I traveled through East Texas
Where many martyrs fell
And I know no one can sing the blues
Like Blind Willie Mctell

Well, I heard the hoot owl singing
As they were taking down the tents
The stars above the barren trees
Were his only audience
Them charcoal gypsy maidens
Can strut their feathers well
But nobody can sing the blues
Like Blind Willie Mctell

See them big plantations burning
Hear the cracking of the whips
Smell that sweet magnolia blooming
(And) see the ghosts of slavery ships
I can hear them tribes a-moaning
(I can) hear the undertaker's bell
(Yeah), nobody can sing the blues
Like Blind Willie Mctell

There's a woman by the river
With some fine young handsome man
He's dressed up like a squire
Bootlegged whiskey in his hand
There's a chain gang on the highway
I can hear them rebels yell
And I know no one can sing the blues
Like Blind Willie Mctell

Well, God is in heaven
And we all want what's his
But power and greed and corruptible seed
Seem to be all that there is
I'm gazing out the window
Of the St. James Hotel
And I know no one can sing the blues
Like Blind Willie Mctell

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Bob Dylan/AUTHOR	NAME/Blowin' In The Wind/NAME	"CONTENT/How many roads must a man walk down
Before you can call him a man?
How many seas must a white dove sail
Before she sleeps in the sand?
Yes, how many times must the cannon balls fly
Before they're forever banned?
The answer my friend is blowin' in the wind
The answer is blowin' in the wind.

Yes, how many years can a mountain exist
Before it's washed to the sea?
Yes, how many years can some people exist
Before they're allowed to be free?
Yes, how many times can a man turn his head
Pretending he just doesn't see?
The answer my friend is blowin' in the wind
The answer is blowin' in the wind.

Yes, how many times must a man look up
Before he can really see the sky?
Yes, how many ears must one man have
Before he can hear people cry?
Yes, how many deaths will it take till he knows
That too many people have died?
The answer my friend is blowin' in the wind
The answer is blowin' in the wind.

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Bob Dylan/AUTHOR	NAME/Bob Dylan's Blues/NAME	"CONTENT/Well, the Lone Ranger and Tonto
They are ridin' down the line
Fixin' ev'rybody's troubles
Ev'rybody's 'cept mine
Somebody musta tol' 'em
That I was doin' fine

Oh you five and ten cent women
With nothin' in your heads
I got a real gal I'm lovin'
And Lord I'll love her till I'm dead
Go away from my door and my window too
Right now

Lord, I ain't goin' down to no race track
See no sports car run
I don't have no sports car
And I don't even care to have one
I can walk anytime around the block

Well, the wind keeps a-blowin' me
Up and down the street
With my hat in my hand
And my boots on my feet
Watch out so you don't step on me

Well, lookit here buddy
You want to be like me
Pull out your six-shooter
And rob every bank you can see
Tell the judge I said it was all right
Yes!

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Bob Dylan/AUTHOR	NAME/Bob Dylan's Dream/NAME	"CONTENT/While riding on a train goin' west,
I fell asleep for to take my rest.
I dreamed a dream that made me sad,
Concerning myself and the first few friends I had.

With half-damp eyes I stared to the room
Where my friends and I spent many an afternoon,
Where we together weathered many a storm,
Laughin' and singin' till the early hours of the morn.

By the old wooden stove where our hats was hung,
Our words were told, our songs were sung,
Where we longed for nothin' and were quite satisfied
Talkin' and a-jokin' about the world outside.

With haunted hearts through the heat and cold,
We never thought we could ever get old.
We thought we could sit forever in fun
But our chances really was a million to one.

As easy it was to tell black from white,
It was all that easy to tell wrong from right.
And our choices were few and the thought never hit
That the one road we traveled would ever shatter and split.

How many a year has passed and gone,
And many a gamble has been lost and won,
And many a road taken by many a friend,
And each one I've never seen again.

I wish, I wish, I wish in vain,
That we could sit simply in that room again.
Ten thousand dollars at the drop of a hat,
I'd give it all gladly if our lives could be like that.

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Bob Dylan/AUTHOR	NAME/Bob Dylan's New Orleans Rag/NAME	"CONTENT/By Bob Dylan

I was sittin' on a stump
Down in New Orleans,
I was feelin' kinda low down,
Dirty and mean.
Along came a fella
And he didn't even ask.
He says, ""I know of a woman
That can fix you up fast. ""
I didn't think twice,
I said like I should,
""Let's go find this lady
That can do me some good. ""
We walked across the river
On a sailin' spree
And we came to a door
Called one-oh-three.

I was just about ready
To give it a little knock
When out comes a fella
Who couldn't even walk.
He's linkin' and a-slinkin',
Couldn't stand on his feet,
And he moaned and he groaned
And he shuffled down the street.
Well, out of the door
There comes another man.
He wiggled and he wobbled,
He couldn't hardly stand.
He had this frightened
Look in his eyes,
Like he just fought a bear,
He was ready to die.

Well, I peeked through the key crack,
Comin' down the hall
Was a long-legged man
Who couldn't hardly crawl.
He muttered and he uttered
In broken French,
And he looked like he'd been through
A monkey wrench.

Well, by this time
I was a-scared to knock,
I was a-scared to move,
I's in a state of shock.
I hummed a little tune
And I shuffled my feet
And I started walkin' backwards
Down that broad street.
Well, I got to the corner,
I tried my best to smile.
I turned around the corner
And I ran a bloody mile.
Man, I wasn't runnin'
'Cause I was sick,
I was just a-runnin'
To get out of there quick.

Well, I tripped right along
And I'm a-wheezin' in my chest.
I musta run a mile
In a minute or less.
I walked on a log
And I tripped on a stump,
I caught a fast freight
With a one-arm jump.
So, if you're travelin' down
Louisiana way,
And you feel kinda lonesome
And you need a place to stay,
Man, you're better off
In your misery
Than to tackle that lady
At one-oh-three.

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Bob Dylan/AUTHOR	NAME/Broke Down Engine/NAME	"CONTENT/Feel like a broke-down engine, ain't got no drivin' wheel,
Feel like a broke-down engine, ain't got no drivin' wheel.
You all been down and lonesome, you know just how a poor man feels.

Been shooting craps and gambling, momma, and I done got broke,
Been shooting craps and gambling, momma, and I done got broke,
I done pawned my pistol, baby, my best clothes been sold.

Lordy, Lord, Lordy, Lord, Lordy, Lord, Lordy, Lord,
Lordy, Lord.

I went down in my praying ground, fell on my bended knees,
I went down in my praying ground, fell on my bended knees,
I ain't cryin' for no religion, Lord, give me back my good gal please.

If you give me back my baby, I won't worry you no more,
Give me back my baby, I won't worry you no more,
Don't have to put her in my house, Lordy, just lead her to my door.

Lordy, Lord, Lordy, Lord, Lordy, Lord, Lordy, Lord,
Lordy, Lord.

Can't you hear me, baby, rappin' on your door?
Can't you hear me, baby, rappin' on your door?
Now you hear me tappin', tappin' across your floor.

Feel like a broke-down engine, ain't got no drive at all,
Feel like a broke-down engine, ain't got no drive at all.
What make me love my woman, she can really do the Georgia Crawl.

Feel like a broke-down engine, ain't got no whistle or bell,
Feel like a broke-down engine, ain't got no whistle or bell,
If you're a real hot momma, come take away Daddy's weeping spell.

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Bob Dylan/AUTHOR	NAME/California/NAME	"CONTENT/By Bob Dylan

I'm goin' down south,
'Neath the borderline.
I'm goin' down south,
'Neath the borderline.
Some fat momma
Kissed my mouth one time.

Well, I needed it this morning
Without a shadow of doubt.
My suitcase is packed,
My clothes are hangin' out.

San Francisco's fine,
You sure get lots of sun.
San Francisco is fine.
You sure get lots of sun.
But I'm used to four seasons,
California's got but one.

Well, I got my dark sunglasses,
I got for good luck my black tooth.
I got my dark sunglasses,
And for good luck I got my black tooth.
Don't ask me nothin' about nothin',
I just might tell you the truth.

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Bob Dylan/AUTHOR	NAME/Can You Please Crawl Out Your Window?/NAME	"CONTENT/He sits in your room, his tomb with a fist full of tacks
Preoccupied with his vengeance
Cursin' the dead that can't answer him back
You know he has no intentions
Of looking your way, unless it's to say
That he needs you to test his inventions.

Please crawl out your window
Use your arms and legs it won't ruin you
How can you say he will haunt you
You can go back to him any time you want to.

He looks so truthful, is this how he feels
Trying to peel the moon and expose it
With his business-like anger and bloodhounds that kneel
If he needs a third eye he just grows it
He just needs you to talk or to hand him his chalk
Or pick it up after he throws it.

Please crawl out your window
Use your arms and legs it won't ruin you
How can you say he will haunt you
You can go back to him any time you want to.

He looks so righteous while your face is so changed
Are you frightened of the box you keep him in
While his genocide fools and friends rearrange
Their religion of the little ten women
That backs up their views but your face is so bruised
Come on out the dark is beginning.

Please crawl out your window
Use your arms and legs it won't ruin you
How can you say he will haunt you
You can go back to him any time you want to.

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Bob Dylan/AUTHOR	NAME/Can't Help Falling In Love/NAME	"CONTENT/Wise men say only fools rush in
But I can't help falling in love with you.
Shall I stay, will it be a sin
If I can't help falling in love with you?

Like a river flows surely to the sea
Darling, so it goes, some things were meant to be.
Take my hand, take my whole life too
For I can't help falling in love with you.

Like a river flows surely to the sea
Darling, so it goes, some things were meant to be.
Take my hand, take my whole life too
For I can't help falling in love with you.

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Bob Dylan/AUTHOR	NAME/Catfish/NAME	"CONTENT/Lazy stadium night
Catfish on the mound.
""Strike three,"" the umpire said,
Batter have to go back and sit down.

Catfish, million-dollar-man,
Nobody can throw the ball like Catfish can.

Used to work on Mr. Finley's farm
But the old man wouldn't pay
So he packed his glove and took his arm
An' one day he just ran away.

Catfish, million-dollar-man,
Nobody can throw the ball like Catfish can.

Come up where the Yankees are,
Dress up in a pinstripe suit,
Smoke a custom-made cigar,
Wear an alligator boot.

Catfish, million-dollar-man,
Nobody can throw the ball like Catfish can.

Carolina born and bred,
Love to hunt the little quail.
Got a hundred-acre spread,
Got some huntin' dogs for sale.

Catfish, million-dollar-man,
Nobody can throw the ball like Catfish can.

Reggie Jackson at the plate
Seein' nothin' but the curve,
Swing too early or too late
Got to eat what Catfish serve.

Catfish, million-dollar-man,
Nobody can throw the ball like Catfish can.

Even Billy Martin grins
When the Fish is in the game.
Every season twenty wins
Gonna make the Hall of Fame.

Catfish, million-dollar-man,
Nobody can throw the ball like Catfish can.

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Bob Dylan/AUTHOR	NAME/Chimes Of Freedom/NAME	"CONTENT/Far between sundown's finish an' midnight's broken toll
We ducked inside the doorway, thunder crashing
As majestic bells of bolts struck shadows in the sounds
Seeming to be the chimes of freedom flashing
Flashing for the warriors whose strength is not to fight
Flashing for the refugees on the unarmed road of flight
An' for each an' ev'ry underdog soldier in the night
An' we gazed upon the chimes of freedom flashing.

In the city's melted furnace, unexpectedly we watched
With faces hidden while the walls were tightening
As the echo of the wedding bells before the blowin' rain
Dissolved into the bells of the lightning
Tolling for the rebel, tolling for the rake
Tolling for the luckless, the abandoned an' forsakened
Tolling for the outcast, burnin' constantly at stake
An' we gazed upon the chimes of freedom flashing.

Through the mad mystic hammering of the wild ripping hail
The sky cracked its poems in naked wonder
That the clinging of the church bells blew far into the breeze
Leaving only bells of lightning and its thunder
Striking for the gentle, striking for the kind
Striking for the guardians and protectors of the mind
An' the unpawned painter behind beyond his rightful time
An' we gazed upon the chimes of freedom flashing.

Through the wild cathedral evening the rain unraveled tales
For the disrobed faceless forms of no position
Tolling for the tongues with no place to bring their thoughts
All down in taken-for-granted situations
Tolling for the deaf an' blind, tolling for the mute
Tolling for the mistreated, mateless mother, the mistitled prostitute
For the misdemeanor outlaw, chased an' cheated by pursuit
An' we gazed upon the chimes of freedom flashing.

Even though a cloud's white curtain in a far-off corner flashed
An' the hypnotic splattered mist was slowly lifting
Electric light still struck like arrows, fired but for the ones
Condemned to drift or else be kept from drifting
Tolling for the searching ones, on their speechless, seeking trail
For the lonesome-hearted lovers with too personal a tale
An' for each unharmful, gentle soul misplaced inside a jail
An' we gazed upon the chimes of freedom flashing.

Starry-eyed an' laughing as I recall when we were caught
Trapped by no track of hours for they hanged suspended
As we listened one last time an' we watched with one last look
Spellbound an' swallowed 'til the tolling ended
Tolling for the aching ones whose wounds cannot be nursed
For the countless confused, accused, misused, strung-out ones an' worse
An' for every hung-up person in the whole wide universe
An' we gazed upon the chimes of freedom flashing.

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Bob Dylan/AUTHOR	NAME/Christmas Island/NAME	"CONTENT/How'd ya like to spend Christmas
On Christmas Island?
How'd ya like to spend the holiday
Away across the sea?
How'd ya like to spend Christmas
On Christmas Island?
How'd ya like to hang a stocking
On a great big coconut tree?

How'd ya like to stay up late
Like the islanders do?
Wait for Santa to sail
In with your presents in a canoe
If you ever spend Christmas
On Christmas Island
You will never stray for everyday
Your Christmas dreams come true

How'd ya like to stay up late
Like the islanders do?
Wait for Santa to sail
In with your presents
In a canoe
If you ever spend Christmas
On Christmas Island
You will never stray
For everyday
Your Christmas dreams
Come true
On Christmas Island
Your dreams come true

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Bob Dylan/AUTHOR	NAME/Clean-Cut Kid/NAME	"CONTENT/Everybody's asking why he couldn't adjust
Adjust to what, a dream that bust?

They took a clean-cut kid
And they made a killer out of him
That's what they did.

They said what's up is down, they said what isn't is
They put ideas in his head that he thought were his.

They took a clean-cut kid
And they made him a killer
That's what they did.

He was on the basketball team, he was in the marching band
When he was ten years old he had a watermelon stand.

They took a clean-cut kid
And they made a killer out of him
That's what they did.

They said, ""Listen boy, you're just a pup""
They sent him to a napalm health spa to shape up.

They gave him dope to smoke, drinks and pills
A jeep to drive, blood to spill.

They said, ""Congratulation, you got what it takes""
They sent him back into the race without any brakes.

They took a clean-cut kid
And they made a killer out of him
That's what they did.

He bought the American Dream but put it in doubt
Only game he could play was Russian Roulette.

He drank Coca-Cola, he was eating Wonder Bread
He ate Burger Kings, he was well fed.

He went to Hollywood to see Peter O'Toole
He stole a Rolls Royce and drove in a pool.

They took a clean-cut kid
And they made a killer out of him
That's what they did.

He could've sold insurance, owned a restaurant or bar
He could've been an accountant or a tennis star.

He was wearing boxing gloves, took a dive one day
Off the Golden Gate Bridge into China Bay.

His mama walks the floor, his daddy weeps and moans
They gotta sleep together in a home they don't own.

They took a clean-cut kid
And they made a killer out of him
That's what they did.

Everybody's asking why he didn't adjust
All he wanted was somebody to trust.

They took his head and turned it inside out
He never did know what it was all about.

He had a steady job, he joined the choir
He never did plan to walk the high wire.

They took a clean-cut kid
And they made a killer out of him That's what they did.

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Bob Dylan/AUTHOR	NAME/Clothes Line/NAME	"CONTENT/After a while we took in the clothes,
Nobody said very much.
Just some old wild shirts and a couple pairs of pants
Which nobody really wanted to touch.
Mama come in and picked up a book
An' Papa asked her what it was.
Someone else asked, ""What do you care?""
Papa said, ""Well, just because.""
Then they started to take back their clothes,
Hang 'em on the line.
It was January the thirtieth
And everybody was feelin' fine.

The next day everybody got up
Seein' if the clothes were dry.
The dogs were barking, a neighbor passed,
Mama, of course, she said, ""Hi!""
""Have you heard the news?"" he said, with a grin,
""The Vice-President's gone mad!""
""Where?"" ""Downtown."" ""When?"" ""Last night.""
""Hmm, say, that's too bad!""
""Well, there's nothin' we can do about it,"" said the neighbor,
""It's just somethin' we're gonna have to forget.""
""Yes, I guess so,"" said Ma,
Then she asked me if the clothes was still wet.

I reached up, touched my shirt,
And the neighbor said, ""Are those clothes yours?""
I said, ""Some of 'em, not all of 'em.""
He said, ""Ya always help out around here with the chores?""
I said, ""Sometime, not all the time.""
Then my neighbor, he blew his nose
Just as papa yelled outside,
""Mama wants you t' come back in the house and bring them clothes.""
Well, I just do what I'm told,
So, I did it, of course.
I went back in the house and Mama met me
And then I shut all the doors.

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Bob Dylan/AUTHOR	NAME/Copper Kettle/NAME	"CONTENT/Get you a copper kettle, get you a copper coil
Fill it with new made corn mash and never more you'll toil
You'll just lay there by the juniper while the moon is bright
Watch them just a-filling in the pale moonlight.

Build you a fire with hickory, hickory, ash and oak
Don't use no green or rotten wood, they'll get you by the smoke
You'll just lay there by the juniper while the moon is bright
Watch them just a-filling in the pale moonlight.

My daddy he made whiskey, my granddaddy he did too
We ain't paid no whiskey tax since 1792
You'll just lay there by the juniper while the moon is bright
Watch them just a-filling in the pale moonlight.

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Bob Dylan/AUTHOR	NAME/Country Pie/NAME	"CONTENT/Just like old Saxophone Joe
When he's hot ,the hogshead up on his toe
Oh me, oh my
Love that country pie.

Listen to the fiddler play
When he's playin' 'til the break of day
Oh me, oh my
Love that country pie.

Raspberry, strawberry, lemon and lime
What do I care?
Blueberry, apple, cherry, pumpkin and plum
Call me for dinner,
Honey, I'll be there.

Saddle me up on my big white goose
Tie me on 'er turn her loose
Oh me, oh my
Love that country pie.

I don't need much and that ain't no lie
Ain't runnin' any race
Give to me my country pie
I won't throw it up in anybody's face.

Shake me up that old peach tree
Little Jack Horner's got nothin' on me
Oh me, oh my
Love that country pie.

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Bob Dylan/AUTHOR	NAME/Cry A While/NAME	"CONTENT/Well, I had to go down and see a guy named Mr. Goldsmith
A nasty, dirty, double-crossin', back-stabbin' phony I didn't want to have to
be dealin' with
But I did it for you and all you gave me was a smile
Well, I cried for you - now it's your turn to cry awhile

I don't carry dead weight - I'm no flash in the pan
All right, I'll set you straight, can't you see I'm a union man?
I'm lettin' the cat out of the cage, I'm keeping a low profile
Well, I cried for you - now it's your turn, you can cry awhile

Feel like a fighting rooster - feel better than I ever felt
But the Pennsylvania line's in an awful mess and the Denver road is about to
melt
I went to the church house, every day I go an extra mile
Well, I cried for you - now it's your turn, you can cry awhile

Last night 'cross the alley there was a pounding on the walls
It must have been Don Pasquale makin' a two a.m. booty call
To break a trusting heart like mine was just your style
Well, I cried for you - now it's your turn to cry awhile

I'm on the fringes of the night, fighting back tears that I can't control
Some people they ain't human, they got no heart or soul
Well, I'm crying to The Lord - I'm tryin' to be meek and mild
Yes, I cried for you - now it's your turn, you can cry awhile

Well, there's preachers in the pulpits and babies in the cribs
I'm longin' for that sweet fat that sticks to your ribs
I'm gonna buy me a barrel of whiskey - I'll die before I turn senile
Well, I cried for you - now it's your turn, you can cry awhile

Well, you bet on a horse and it ran on the wrong way
I always said you'd be sorry and today could be the day
I might need a good lawyer, could be your funeral, my trial
Well, I cried for you, now it's your turn, you can cry awhile

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Bob Dylan/AUTHOR	NAME/Dark Eyes/NAME	"CONTENT/Oh, the gentlemen are talking and the midnight moon is on the riverside
They're drinking up and walking and it is time for me to slide
I live in another world where life and death are memorized
Where the earth is strung with lover's pearls and all I see are dark eyes.

A cock is crowing far away and another soldier's deep in prayer
Some mother's child has gone astray, she can't find him anywhere
But I hear another rum beating for the dead that rise
Whom nature's beast fear as they come and all I see are dark eyes.

They tell me to be discreet for all intended purposes
They tell me revenge is sweet, I'm sure it is
But I feel nothing for their game, where beauty goes unrecognized
All I feel is heat and flame, and all I see are dark eyes.

Oh, the French girl, she's in paradise and a drunken man is at the wheel
Hunger pays a heavy prize to the falling god of speed and steel
Oh, time is short and the days are sweet and passion rules the arrow that
flies
A million faces at my feet but all I see are dark eyes.

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Bob Dylan/AUTHOR	NAME/Dear Landlord/NAME	"CONTENT/Dear landlord,
Please don't put a price on my soul.
My burden is heavy,
My dreams are beyond control.
When that steamboat whistle blows,
I'm gonna give you all I got to give,
And I do hope you receive it well,
Dependin' on the way you feel that you live.

Dear landlord,
Please heed these words that I speak.
I know you've suffered much,
But in this you are not so unique.
All of us, at times, we might work too hard
To have it too fast and too much,
And anyone can fill his life up
With things he can see but he just cannot touch.

Dear landlord,
Please don't dismiss my case.
I'm not about to argue,
I'm not about to move to no other place.
Now, each of us has his own special gift
And you know this was meant to be true,
And if you don't underestimate me,
I won't underestimate you.

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Bob Dylan/AUTHOR	NAME/Denise/NAME	"CONTENT/By Bob Dylan

Denise, Denise,
Gal, what's on your mind?
Denise, Denise,
Gal, what's on your mind?
You got your eyes closed,
Heaven knows that you ain't blind.

Well, I can see you smiling,
But oh your mouth is inside out.
I can see you smiling,
But you're smiling inside out.
Well, I know you're laughin'
But what are you laughin' about.

Well, if you're tryin' to throw me,
Babe, I've already been tossed.
If you're tryin' to throw me,
Babe, I've already been tossed.
Babe, you're tryin' to lose me.
Babe, I'm already lost.

Well, what are you doing,
Are you flying or have you flipped?
Oh, what are you doing,
Are you flying or have you flipped?
Well, you call my name
And then say your tongue just slipped.

Denise, Denise,
You're concealed here on the shelf.
Denise, Denise,
You're concealed here on the shelf.
I'm looking deep in your eyes, babe,
And all I can see is myself.

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Bob Dylan/AUTHOR	NAME/Dirt Road Blues/NAME	"CONTENT/Gonna walk down that dirt road 'Til someone will let me ride
Gonna walk down that dirt road 'Til someone will let me ride
If I can't find my baby I'm gonna run away and hide
Well, I been pacing round the room, hoping maybe she come back
pacing round the room, hoping maybe she come back
Well, I been praying for salvation
Laying round in a one-room country shack
Gonna walk down that dirt road, until my eyes begin to bleed
Gonna walk down that dirt road, until my eyes begin to bleed
'Til there's nothing left to see
'Til the chains have been shattered and I been freed
But I'm looking at my shadow, I been watching the clouds up above
looking at my shadow, watching the clouds up above
Rolling through the rain and hail
Looking for the sunny side of love
Gonna walk down that dirt road 'til everything becomes the same
Gonna walk down that dirt road 'til everything becomes the same
I keep on walking 'til I hear her holler out my name

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Bob Dylan/AUTHOR	NAME/Disease Of Conceit/NAME	"CONTENT/There's a whole lot of people suffering tonight from the disease of conceit
Whole lot of people struggling tonight from the disease of conceit
Comes right down the highway straight down the line
Rips into your senses through your body and your mind
Nothing about it that's sweet
The disease of conceit.

There's a whole lot of hearts breaking tonight from the disease of conceit
Whole lot of hearts shaking tonight from the disease of conceit
Steps into your eats into your soul
Over your senses you have no control
Ain't nothing too discreet about the disease of conceit.

There's a whole lot of people dying tonight from the disease of conceit
Whole lot of people crying tonight from the disease of conceit
Comes right out of nowhere and you're down for the count
From the outside world the pressure will mount
Turn you into a piece of meat
The disease of conceit.

Conceit is the disease that the doctors got no cure
They've done a lot of research on it but what it is they're still not sure.

There's a whole lot of people in trouble tonight from the disease of conceit
Whole lot of people seeing trouble tonight fro the disease of conceit
Give you delusions of grandeur an evil eye
Give you the idea that you're too good to die
The they bury you from head to feet
From the disease of conceit.

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Bob Dylan/AUTHOR	NAME/Dixie/NAME	"CONTENT/I wish I was in the land of cotton
Old times there are not forgotten
Look away, look away, look away to Dixie Land

[Chorus]
In Dixie Land where i was born
Early on one frosty morn
Look away, look away, look away to Dixie Land

I wish I was in Dixie
Away, away
In Dixie Land I'll take my stand
To live and die in Dixie
Away, away, away down south in Dixie
Away, away, away down south in Dixie

[Chorus]

I wish I was in Dixie
Away, away
In Dixie Land I'll take my stand
To live and die in Dixie
Away, away, away down south in Dixie
Away, away, away down south in Dixie

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Bob Dylan/AUTHOR	NAME/Do Right To Me Baby/NAME	"CONTENT/Don't wanna judge nobody, don't wanna be judged,
Don't wanna touch nobody, don't wanna be touched.
Don't wanna hurt nobody, don't wanna be hurt,
Don't wanna treat nobody like they was dirt.

But if you do right to me, baby,
I'll do right to you, too.
Ya got to do unto others
Like you'd have them, like you'd have them, do unto you.

Don't wanna shoot nobody, don't wanna be shot,
Don't wanna buy nobody, don't wanna be bought.
Don't wanna bury nobody, don't wanna be buried,
Don't wanna marry nobody if they're already married.

But if you do right to me, baby,
I'll do right to you, too.
Ya got to do unto others
Like you'd have them, like you'd have them, do unto you.

Don't wanna burn nobody, don't wanna be burned,
Don't wanna learn from nobody what I gotta unlearn.
Don't wanna cheat nobody, don't wanna be cheated,
Don't wanna defeat nobody if they already been defeated.

But if you do right to me, baby,
I'll do right to you, too.
Ya got to do unto others
Like you'd have them, like you'd have them, do unto you.

Don't wanna wink at nobody, don't wanna be winked at,
Don't wanna be used by nobody for a doormat.
Don't wanna confuse nobody, don't wanna be confused,
Don't wanna amuse nobody, don't wanna be amused.

But if you do right to me, baby,
I'll do right to you, too.
Ya got to do unto others
Like you'd have them, like you'd have them, do unto you.

Don't wanna betray nobody, don't wanna be betrayed,
Don't wanna play with nobody, don't wanna be waylaid.
Don't wanna miss nobody, don't wanna be missed,
Don't put my faith in nobody, not even a scientist.

But if you do right to me, baby,
I'll do right to you, too.
Ya got to do unto others
Like you'd have them, like you'd have them, do unto you.

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Bob Dylan/AUTHOR	NAME/Do You Hear What I Hear?/NAME	"CONTENT/Said the night wind to the little lamb
Do you see what I see?
Way up in the sky, little lamb
Do you see what I see?
A star, a star, dancing in the night
With a tail as big as a kite
With a tail as big as a kite

Said the little lamb to the shepherd boy
Do you hear what I hear?
Ringing through the sky, shepherd boy
Do you hear what I hear?
A song, a song high above the trees
With a voice as big as the sea
With a voice as big as the sea

Said the shepherd boy to the mighty king
Do you know what I know?
In your palace warm, mighty king
Do you know what I know?
A Child, a Child shivers in the cold
Let us bring him silver and gold
Let us bring him silver and gold

Said the king to the people everywhere
Listen to what I say!
Pray for peace, people, everywhere
Listen to what I say!
The Child, the Child sleeping in the night
He will bring us goodness and light
He will bring us goodness and light

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Bob Dylan/AUTHOR	NAME/Don't Fall Apart On Me Tonight/NAME	"CONTENT/Just a minute before you leave, girl
Just a minute before you touch the door
What is it that you're trying to achieve, girl?
Do you think we can talk about it some more?
You know the streets are filled with vipers
Who've lost all ray of hope
You know, it ain't even safe no more
In the palace of the Pope.

Don't fall apart on me tonight
I just don't think that I could handle it
Don't fall apart on me tonight
Yesterday's just a memory
Tomorrow is never what it's supposed to be
And I need you, yeah.

Come over here from over there, girl
Sit down here, you can have my chair
I can't see us going anywhere, girl
The only place open is a thousand miles away and I can't take you there
I wish I'd have been a doctor
Maybe I'd have saved some life that had been lost
Maybe I'd have done some good in the world
'Stead of burning every bridge I crossed.

Don't fall apart on me tonight
I just don't think that I could handle it
Don't fall apart on me tonight
Yesterday's just a memory
Tomorrow is never what it's supposed to be
And I need you, yeah.

I ain't too good at conversation, girl
So you might not know exactly how I feel
But if I could, I'd bring you to the mountaintop, girl
And build you a house made out of stainless steel
But it's like I'm stuck inside a painting
My throat start to tickle and my nose itches
But I know that I can't move.

Don't fall apart on me tonight
I just don't think that I could handle it
Don't fall apart on me tonight
Yesterday's gone but the past lives on
Tomorrow's just one step beyond
And I need you, yeah.

Who are these people who are walking towards you
Do you know them or will there be a fight?
With their humorless smiles so easy to see through
Can they tell you what's wrong from right?

Do you remember St. James Street
Where you blew Jackie P.'s mind?
You were so fine, Clark Gable would have fell at your feet
And laid his life on the line.

Let's try to get beneath the surface waste, girl
No more booby traps and bombs
No more decadence and charm
No more affection that's been misplaced, girl
No more mud cake creatures lying in your arms
What about that millionaire with the drumsticks in his pants?
He looked so baffled and bewildered
When he played and we didn't dance.

Don't fall apart on me tonight
I just don't think that I could handle it
Don't fall apart on me tonight
Yesterday's just a memory
Tomorrow's never what it's supposed to be
And I need you, yeah.

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Bob Dylan/AUTHOR	NAME/Don't Think Twice, It's All Right/NAME	"CONTENT/It ain't no use to sit and wonder why, babe
It don't matter, anyhow
An' it ain't no use to sit and wonder why, babe
If you don't know by now
When your rooster crows at the break of dawn
Look out your window and I'll be gone
You're the reason I'm trav'lin' on
Don't think twice, it's all right

It ain't no use in turnin' on your light, babe
That light I never knowed
An' it ain't no use in turnin' on your light, babe
I'm on the dark side of the road
Still I wish there was somethin' you would do or say
To try and make me change my mind and stay
We never did too much talkin' anyway
So don't think twice, it's all right

It ain't no use in callin' out my name, gal
Like you never did before
It ain't no use in callin' out my name, gal
I can't hear you any more
I'm a-thinkin' and a-wond'rin' all the way down the road
I once loved a woman, a child I'm told
I give her my heart but she wanted my soul
But don't think twice, it's all right

I'm walkin' down that long, lonesome road, babe
Where I'm bound, I can't tell
But goodbye's too good a word, gal
So I'll just say fare thee well
I ain't sayin' you treated me unkind
You could have done better but I don't mind
You just kinda wasted my precious time
But don't think twice, it's all right

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Bob Dylan/AUTHOR	NAME/Drifter's Escape/NAME	"CONTENT/""Oh, help me in my weakness,""
I heard the drifter say,
As they carried him from the courtroom
And were taking him away.
""My trip hasn't been a pleasant one
And my time it isn't long,
And I still do not know
What it was that I've done wrong.""

Well, the judge, he cast his robe aside,
A tear came to his eye,
""You fail to understand,"" he said,
""Why must you even try?""
Outside, the crowd was stirring,
You could hear it from the door.
Inside, the judge was stepping down,
While the jury cried for more.

""Oh, stop that cursed jury,""
Cried the attendant and the nurse,
""The trial was bad enough,
But this is ten times worse.""
Just then a bolt of lightning
Struck the courthouse out of shape,
And while ev'rybody knelt to pray
The drifter did escape.

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Bob Dylan/AUTHOR	NAME/Dusty Old Fairgrounds/NAME	"CONTENT/by Bob Dylan

Well, it's all up from Florida at the start of the spring,
The trucks and the trailers will be winding
Like a bullet we'll shoot for the carnival route.
We're following them dusty old fairgrounds a-calling.

From the Michigan mud past the Wisconsin sun
'Cross that Minnesota border, keep 'em scrambling
Through the clear county lakes and the lumberjack lands,
We're following them dusty old fairgrounds a-calling.

Hit Fargo on the jump and down to Aberdeen
'Cross them old Black Hills, keep 'em rolling
Through the cow country towns and the sands of old Montana.
We're following them fairgrounds a-calling.

As the white line on the highway sails under your wheels,
I've gazed from the trailer window laughing.
Oh, our clothes they was torn but the colors they was bright.
Following them dusty old fairgrounds a-calling.

It's a-many a friend that follows the bend,
The jugglers, the hustlers, the gamblers.
Well, I've spent my time with the fortune-telling kind
Following them fairgrounds a-calling.

Oh, it's pound down the rails and it's tie down the tents,
Get that canvas flag a-flying.
Well, let the caterpillars spin, let the ferris wheel wind
Following them fairgrounds a-calling.

Well, it's roll into town straight to the fairgrounds
Just behind the posters that are hanging
And it's fill up every space with a different kind of face
Following them fairgrounds a-calling.

Get the dancing girls in front, get the gambling show behind,
Hear that old music box a-banging.
Hear them kids, faces, smiles, up and down the midway aisles
We're following them fairgrounds a-calling.

It's a-drag it on down by the deadline in the town,
Hit the old highway by the morning
And it's ride yourself blind for the next town on time
Following them fairgrounds a-calling.

As the harmonicas whined in the lonesome nighttime
Drinking red wine as we're rolling,
Many a turnin' I turn, many a lesson I learn
From following them fairgrounds a-calling.

And it's roll back down to St. Petersburg
Tie down the trailers and camp 'em
And the money that we made will pay for the space
From following them dusty old fairgrounds a-calling.

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Bob Dylan/AUTHOR	NAME/Emotionally Yours/NAME	"CONTENT/Come baby, find me, come baby, remind me of where I once begun
Come baby, show me, show me you know me, tell me you're the one
I could be learning, you could be yearning to see behind the closed door
But I will always be emotionally yours.

Come baby, rock me, come baby, locl me into the shadows of your heart
Come baby, teach me, come baby, reach me, let the music start
I could be dreaming but I keep believing you're the one I'm living for
And I will always be emotionally yours.

It's like my whole life never happened
When I see you, it's if I never had a thought
I know this dream, it might be crazy
But it's the only one I got. Okay.

Come baby, shake me, come baby, take me, I would be satisfied
Come baby, hold me, come baby, help me, my arms are open wide
I could be unraveling wherever I'm traveling, even to foreign shores
But I will always be emotionally yours.

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Bob Dylan/AUTHOR	NAME/Fixin' To Die/NAME	"CONTENT/Feelin' funny in my mind Lord, I believe I'm fixin' to die
Feelin' funny in my mind Lord, I believe I'm fixin' to die
Well I don't mind dyin' but I hate to leave my children cryin'

Well look over yonder, to that buryin' ground
Look over yonder, to that buryin' ground
Sure seems lonesome, Lord when the sun goes down

Feelin' funny in my eyes Lord, I believe I'm fixin' to die, fixin' to die
Feelin' funny in my eyes Lord, I believe I'm fixin' to die
Well I don't mind dyin' but I hate to leave my children cryin'

Well there's black smoke risin' Lord, it's risin' up above my head, up above
my head
Well there's black smoke risin' Lord, it's risin' up above my head
Can tell Jesus, ""Make up my dyin' bed""

Well I'm walkin' kinda funny Lord, I believe I'm fixin' to die, fixin' to die
Yes I'm walkin' kinda funny Lord, I believe I'm fixin' to die, fixin' to die,
fixin' to die
Well I don't mind dyin' but I hate to leave my children cryin'

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Bob Dylan/AUTHOR	NAME/Floater/NAME	"CONTENT/Down over the window
From the dazzling sunlit rays
Through the back alleys, through the blinds
Another one of them endless days

Honey bees are buzzing
Leaves begin to stir
I'm in love with my second cousin
I tell myself I could be happy forever with her

I keep listening for footsteps
But I ain't never hearing any
From the boat, I fish for bullheads
I catch a lot, sometimes too many

A summer breeze is blowin'
A squall is setting in
Sometimes it's just plain stupid
To get into any kind of wind

Well the old men 'round here
Sometimes they get on bad terms
With the younger men,
Old, young, age don't carry weight
It doesn't matter in the end

One of the boss' hangers-on
Sometimes comes to call
At times you least expect
Tryin' to bully you, strongarm you,
Inspire you with fear
It has the opposite effect

There's a new grove of trees on the outskirts of town
The old one is long gone
10 foot, 2 foot, 6 across
Burns with the bark still on

They say times are hard
If you don't believe it you can follow your nose
It don't bother me, times are hard anywhere
We'll just have to see how it goes

My old man, he's like some feudal lord
He's got more lives than a cat
I've never seen him quarrel with my mother even once
Things come alive or they fall flat

You can smell the pine wood burnin'
You can hear the school bell ring
Got to get up near the teacher, if you can
If you wanna learn anything

Romeo, he said to Juliet, you got a poor complexion
It don't give you an appearance or a youthful touch
Juliet said back to Romeo,
Why don't you just shove off,
If it bothers you so much

They got outta here any way they could
Cold rain can give you the shivers
They went down the Ohio, the Cumberland, the Tennessee,
All the rest of them rebel rivers

If you ever try to interfere with me
Or cross my path again,
You do so at the peril of your life
I'm not quite as cool, or forgiving as I sound
I've seen enough heartache and strife

My grandfather was a duck trapper,
He could do it with just dragnets and ropes [?]
My grandmother could sew new dresses out of old cloth,
I don't know if they had any dreams or hopes.

I had 'em once, though I suppose
To go along with all the ring dancing,
Christmas carols and all the Christmas eves
I left all my dreams and hopes
Buried under tobacco leaves

Not always easy kicking someone up
Got to wait awhile, it can be an unpleasant task
Sometimes somebody wants you to give something up
And tears or not, it's too much to ask.

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Bob Dylan/AUTHOR	NAME/Freight Train Blues/NAME	"CONTENT/I was born in Dixie in a boomer shack
Just a little shanty by the railroad track
Freight train was it taught me how to cry
Hummin' of the driver was my lullaby
I got the freight train blues
Oh Lord mama, I got them in the bottom of my rambling shoes
And when the whistle blows I gotta go baby, don't you know
Well, it looks like I'm never gonna lose the freight train blues.

Well, my daddy was a fireman and my old ma here,
She was the only daughter of the engineer
My sweetheart loved a brakeman and it ain't no joke
It's a shame the way she keeps a good man broke
I got the freight train blues
Oh Lord mama, I got them in the bottom of my rambling shoes
And when the whistle blows I gotta go oh mama, don't you know
Well, it looks like I'm never gonna lose the freight train blues.

Well, the only thing that makes me laugh again
Is a southbound whistle on a southbound train
Every place I want to go
I never can go, because you know
I got the freight train blues
Oh Lord mama, I got them in the bottom of my rambling shoes.

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Bob Dylan/AUTHOR	NAME/Get Your Rocks Off/NAME	"CONTENT/By Bob Dylan

You know, there's two ol' maids layin' in the bed,
One picked herself up an' the other one, she said:
""Get your rocks off!
Get your rocks off! (Get 'em off!)
Get your rocks off! (Get 'em off!)
Get your rocks off-a me! (Get 'em off!)""

Well, you know, there late one night up on Blueberry Hill,
One man turned to the other man and said, with a blood-curdlin' chill, he
said:
""Get your rocks off! (Get 'em off!)
Get your rocks off! (Get 'em off!)
Get your rocks off! (Get 'em off!)
Get your rocks off-a me! (Get 'em off!)""

Well, you know, we was layin' down around Mink Muscle Creek,
One man said to the other man, he began to speak, he said:
""Get your rocks off! (Get 'em off!)
Get your rocks off! (Get 'em off!)
Get your rocks off! (Get 'em off!)
Get your rocks off-a me! (Get 'em off!)""

Well, you know, we was cruisin' down the highway in a Greyhound bus.
All kinds-a children in the side road, they was hollerin' at us, sayin':
""Get your rocks off! (Get 'em off!)
Get your rocks off! (Get 'em off!)
Get your rocks off! (Get 'em off!)
Get your rocks off-a me! ""

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Bob Dylan/AUTHOR	NAME/Girl Of The North Country/NAME	"CONTENT/If you're travelin' in the North Country fair
Where the winds hit heavy on the borderline
Remember me to one who lives there
For she once was a true love of mine
If you go when the snowflakes storm
When the rivers freeze and summer ends
Please see she has a coat so warm
To keep her from the howlin' winds
Please see if her hair hangs long
If it rolls and flows all down her breast
Please see for me if her hair's hanging long
For that's the way I remember her best
I'm a-wonderin' if she remembers me at all
Many times I've often prayed
In the darkness of my night
In the brightness of my day
So if you're travelin' the North Country fair
Where the winds hit heavy on the borderline
Remember me to one who lives there
For she once was a true love of mine

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Bob Dylan/AUTHOR	NAME/Going, Going, Gone/NAME	"CONTENT/I've just reached a place
Where the willow don't bend.
There's not much more to be said
It's the top of the end.
I'm going,
I'm going,
I'm gone.

I'm closin' the book
On the pages and the text
And I don't really care
What happens next.
I'm just going,
I'm going,
I'm gone.

I been hangin' on threads,
I been playin' it straight,
Now, I've just got to cut loose
Before it gets late.
So I'm going,
I'm going,
I'm gone.

Grandma said, ""Boy, go and follow your heart
And you'll be fine at the end of the line.
All that's gold isn't meant to shine.
Don't you and your one true love ever part.""

I been walkin' the road,
I been livin' on the edge,
Now, I've just got to go
Before I get to the ledge.
So I'm going,
I'm just going,
I'm gone.

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Bob Dylan/AUTHOR	NAME/Golden Loom/NAME	"CONTENT/Smoky autumn night, stars up in the sky,
I see the sailin' boats across the bay go by.
Eucalyptus trees hang above the street
And then I turn my head, for you're approachin' me.
Moonlight on the water, fisherman's daughter, floatin' in to my room
With a golden loom.

First we wash our feet near the immortal shrine
And then our shadows meet and then we drink the wine.
I see the hungry clouds up above your face
And then the tears roll down, what a bitter taste.
And then you drift away on a summer's day where the wildflowers bloom
With your golden loom.

I walk across the bridge in the dismal light
Where all the cars are stripped between the gates of night.
I see the trembling lion with the lotus flower tail
And then I kiss your lips as I lift your veil.
But you're gone and then all I seem to recall is the smell of perfume
And your golden loom.

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Bob Dylan/AUTHOR	NAME/Gonna Change My Way Of Thinking/NAME	"CONTENT/Gonna change my way of thinking,
Make myself a different set of rules.
Gonna change my way of thinking,
Make myself a different set of rules.
Gonna put my good foot forward,
And stop being influenced by fools.

So much oppression,
Can't keep track of it no more.
So much oppression,
Can't keep track of it no more.
Sons becoming husbands to their mothers,
And old men turning young daughters into whores.

Stripes on your shoulders,
Stripes on your back and on your hands.
Stripes on your shoulders,
Stripes on your back and on your hands.
Swords piercing your side,
Blood and water flowing through the land.

Well don't know which one is worse,
Doing your own thing or just being cool.
Well don't know which one is worse,
Doing your own thing or just being cool.
You remember only about the brass ring,
You forget all about the golden rule.

You can mislead a man,
You can take ahold of his heart with your eyes.
You can mislead a man,
You can take ahold of his heart with your eyes.
But there's only one authority,
And that's the authority on high.

I got a God-fearing woman,
One I can easily afford.
I got a God-fearing woman,
One I can easily afford.
She can do the Georgia crawl,
She can walk in the spirit of the Lord.

Jesus said, ""Be ready,
For you know not the hour in which I come.""
Jesus said, ""Be ready,
For you know not the hour in which I come.""
He said, ""He who is not for Me is against Me,""
Just so you know where He's coming from.

There's a kingdom called Heaven,
A place where there is no pain of birth.
There's a kingdom called Heaven,
A place where there is no pain of birth.
Well the Lord created it, mister,
About the same time He made the earth.

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Bob Dylan/AUTHOR	NAME/Gospel Plow/NAME	"CONTENT/Mary wore three links of chain
Every link was Jesus name
Keep your hand on that plow, hold on
Oh Lord, Oh Lord, keep your hand on that plow, hold on.

Mary, Mark, Luke and John
All these prophets are dead and gone
Keep your hand on that plow, hold on
Oh Lord, Oh Lord, keep your hand on that plow, hold on.

Well, I've never been to heaven
But I've been told streets up there
Are lined with gold
Keep your hand on that plow, hold on
Oh Lord, Oh Lord, keep your hand on that plow, hold on
Oh Lord, Oh Lord, keep your hand on that plow, hold on
Oh Lord, Oh Lord, keep your hand on that plow, hold on.

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Bob Dylan/AUTHOR	NAME/Handsome Molly/NAME	"CONTENT/Well, I wish I was in London,
Or some other seaport town
I'd put my foot on a steamboat
I'd sail the ocean 'round.
While sailing 'round the ocean,
While sailing 'round the sea
I'd think of handsome molly
Wherever she might be.
Don't you remember, molly
You gave me your right hand?
You said whenever you'd marry
I would be the man.
But you broke your promise
Go with whom you please
My poor heart is aching
You are at your ease.
I went to church last Sunday
Molly came ridin' by
I could tell her mind was changin'
By the rovin' of her eye.
I go down to the river
Though everyone's asleep
I think of handsome molly
An' I begin to weep.
So I wish I was in London,
Or some other seaport town
I'd put my foot on a steamboat
I'd sail the ocean 'round.

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Bob Dylan/AUTHOR	NAME/Handy Dandy/NAME	"CONTENT/Handy dandy, controversy surrounds him
He been around the world and back again
Something in the moonlight still hounds him
Handy dandy, just like sugar and candy

Handy dandy, if every bone in his body was broken he would never admit it
He got an all girl orchestra and when he says
""Strike up the band"", they hit it
Handy dandy, handy dandy

You say, ""What are ya made of?""
He says, ""Can you repeat what you said?""
You'll say, ""What are you afraid of?""
He'll say, ""Nothin' neither 'live nor dead""

Handy dandy, he got a stick in his hand and a pocket full of money
He says, ""Darling, tell me the truth, how much time I got?""
She says, ""You got all the time in the world, honey""
Handy dandy, Handy dandy

He's got that clear crystal fountain
He's got that soft silky skin
He's got that fortress on the mountain
With no doors, no windows, no thieves can break in

Handy dandy, sitting with a girl named Nancy in a garden feelin' kind of lazy
He says, ""Ya want a gun? I'll give you one."" She says, ""Boy, you talking
crazy""
Handy dandy, just like sugar and candy
Handy dandy, pour him another brandy

Handy dandy, he got a basket of flowers and a bag full or sorrow
He finishes his drink, he gets up from the table he says,
""Okay, boys, I'll see you tomorrow""
Handy dandy, handy dandy, just like sugar and candy
Handy dandy, just like sugar and candy

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Bob Dylan/AUTHOR	NAME/House Carpenter/NAME	"CONTENT/Well met, well met, my own true love
Well met, well met, cried she
I've just returned from the salt, salt sea
And it's all for the love of thee

I could have married a King's daughter there
She would have married me
But I have forsaken my King's daughter there
It's all for the love of thee

Well, if you could have married a King's daughter there
I'm sure you're the one to blame
For I am married to a house carpenter
And I'm sure he's a fine young man

Forsake, forsake your house carpenter
And come away with me
I'll take you where the green grass grows
On the shores of sunny Italy

So up she picked her babies three
And gave them kisses, one, two, three
Saying ""take good care of your daddy while I'm gone
And keep him good company.""

Well, they were sailin' about two weeks
I'm sure it was not three
When the younger of the girls, she came on deck
Sayin' she wants company

""Well, are you weepin' for your house and home?
Or are you weepin' for your babies three?""
""Well, I'm not weepin' for my house carpenter
I'm weepin' for my babies three.""

Oh what are those hills yonder, my love
They look as white as snow
Those are the hill of heaven, my love
You and I'll never know

Oh what are those hills yonder, my love
They look as dark as night
Those are the hills of hell-fire my love
Where you and I will unite

Oh twice around went the gallant ship
I'm sure it was not three
When the ship all of a sudden, it sprung a leak
And it drifted to the bottom of the sea

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Bob Dylan/AUTHOR	NAME/I Can't Get You Off Of My Mind/NAME	"CONTENT/[Chorus]
Oh, I can't get you off of my mind
When I try I 'm just wastin' my time
Lord I've tried and I've tried
and all night long I've cried
But I can't get you off of my mind.

Didn't think you would leave me behind
But I guess you're the two-timin' kind
Do you think that it's smart to jump from heart to heart
When I can't get you off of my mind.

[Chorus]

You believe that a true love is blind
So you fool ev'ry new love you find
You've got stars in your eyes but they can't hide the lies
Oh, I can't get you off my mind.

[Chorus]

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Bob Dylan/AUTHOR	NAME/I Feel A Change Comin' On/NAME	"CONTENT/Well I'm lookin' the world over
Looking far off into the east
And I see my baby comin'
She's walking with the village beast
I feel a change comin' on
And the last part of the day's already gone

We got so much in common
We strive for the same old ends
And I just can't wait
Wait for us to become friends
I feel a change comin' on
And the fourth part of the day's already gone

Well life is for love
And they say that love is blind
If you wanna live easy
Baby, pack your clothes with mine
I feel a change comin' on
And the fourth part of the day's already gone

Well now what's the use in dreaming
You got better things to do
Dreams never did work for me anyway
Even when they did come true

You are as porous as ever
Baby you can start a fire
I must be losing my mind
You're the object of my desire
I feel a change comin' on
And the fourth part of the day's already gone

I'm listening to Billy Joe Shaver
And I'm reading James Joyce
Some people they tell me
I got the blood of the land in my voice

Everybody got all the money
Everybody got all the beautiful clothes
Everybody got all the flowers
I don't have one single rose
I feel a change comin' on
And the fourth part of the day's already gone

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Bob Dylan/AUTHOR	NAME/If You Gotta Go, Go Now/NAME	"CONTENT/Listen to me, baby,
There's something you must see.
I want to be with you, gal,
If you want to be with me.

But if you got to go,
It's all right.
But if you got to go, go now,
Or else you gotta stay all night.

It ain't that I'm questionin' you.
To take part in any quiz.
It's just that I ain't got no watch
An' you keep askin' me what time it is.

But if you got to go,
It's all right.
But if you got to go, go now,
Or else you gotta stay all night.

I am just a poor boy, baby,
Lookin' to connect.
But I certainly don't want you thinkin'
That I ain't got any respect.

But if you got to go,
It's all right.
But if you got to go, go now,
Or else you gotta stay all night.

You know I'd have nightmares
And a guilty conscience, too,
If I kept you from anything
That you really wanted to do.

But if you got to go,
It's all right.
But if you got to go, go now,
Or else you gotta stay all night.

It ain't that I'm wantin'
Anything you never gave before.
It's just that I'll be sleepin' soon,
It'll be too dark for you to find the door.

But if you got to go,
It's all right.
But if you got to go, go now,
Or else you gotta stay all night.

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Bob Dylan/AUTHOR	NAME/In The Summertime/NAME	"CONTENT/I was in your presence for an hour or so
Or was it a day?
I truly don't know
Where the sun never set, where the trees hung low
By that soft and shining sea
Did you respect me for what I did
Or what I didn't do, or keeping it hid?
Did I lose my mind when I tried to get rid
Of everything you see?

In the summertime, ah in the summertime
In the summertime, when you were with me.

I got the heart and you got the blood
We cut through iron and we cut through mud
Then came the warning that was before the flood
That set everybody free
Fools they made a mock of sin
Our loyalty they tried to win
But you were closer to me than my next of kin
When they didn't want to know or see.

In the summertime, ah in the summertime
In the summertime, when you were with me.

Strangers, they meddled in our affairs
Poverty and shame were theirs
But all that suffering was not to be compared
With the glory that is to be
And I'm still carrying the gift you gave
It's a part of me now, it's been cherished and saved
It'll go with me unto the grave
And into eternity.

In the summertime, ah in the summertime
In the summertime, when you were with me.

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Bob Dylan/AUTHOR	NAME/It Takes A Lot To Laugh It Takes A Train To Cry/NAME	"CONTENT/Well, I ride on a mailtrain, babe
Can't buy a thrill
Well, I've been up all night
Leanin' on the window sill
Well, if I die
On top of the hill
And if I don't make it
You know my baby will.

Don't the moon look good, mama
Shinin' through the trees?
Don't the brakeman look good, mama
Flaggin down the ""Double E""?
Don't the sun look good
Goin' down over the sea?
Don't my gal look fine
When she's comin' after me?

Now the wintertime is coming
The windows are filled with frost
I went to tell everybody
But I could not get across
Well, I wanna be your lover, baby
I don't wanna be your boss
Don't say I never warned you
When your train gets lost.

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Bruce Springsteen/AUTHOR	NAME/30 Days Out/NAME	"CONTENT/We fell in love and I made you the world
I spent all my time tryin' to satisfy you, girl
Just one thing that I can't figure out
Closer I get, farther baby I am out

30 days, 30 days out
Well I'm six days runnin' but I'm 30 days out
30 days, 30 days out
With every kiss you leave a little shadow of doubt

The roof was leakin' honey where we live
And I'm wonderin' what's that something that you won't give
I started loving you but I gotta stop
You got me mostly waitin' for that other shoe to drop

30 days, 30 days out
You keep me six days runnin' but I'm 30 days out
30 days, 30 days out
With every kiss you leave a little shadow of doubt

Tried to talk about what's goin' on
You just smile and tell me ""Baby there ain't nothin' wrong""
In your smile there's a sign in red
It said ""Thousand miles of hard road dead ahead""

30 days, 30 days out
Yeah I'm six days runnin' but I'm 30 days out
30 days, 30 days out
With every kiss you leave a little shadow of doubt

30 days, 30 days out
Well I'm six days runnin' but I'm 30 days out
30 days, 30 days out
With every kiss you leave a little shadow of doubt

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Bruce Springsteen/AUTHOR	NAME/Action In The Streets/NAME	"CONTENT/Well don't move
Why don't you listen to what I'm saying
And hey you
You better get up if you plan to be staying
Get loose
You got to listen to what the band is playing
Oh tonight
There's action in the street all night
We're bopping to the big beat, go
Get up off your seat and roll
At school
The girls you know their dancing, mister 's just my speed
And hey cool
If action is the thing you need
Well don't fool
The kid's satisfaction guaranteed
Oh tonight
There's action in the street all night
We're bopping to the big beat, go
Get up off your seat and roll
Well hey man
Yeah don't let the little girl sigh
Understand
If you just move your body side to side
Raise your hand
Shout until you're satisfied
Oh tonight
There's action in the street all night
We're bopping to the big beat, go
Get up off your seat and roll

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Bruce Springsteen/AUTHOR	NAME/All I'm Thinkin' About/NAME	"CONTENT/Blind man wavin' by the side of the road
I'm in a flat bed Ford carrying a heavy load
With a sweet thing sippin' on a blueberry wine
On a flat black highway down in Carolina
Black bird slippin' in a sky of blue

All I'm thinkin' about is you, baby
All I'm thinkin' about is you, honey
All I'm thinkin' about is you, baby
All I'm thinkin' about is you
Ain't nothin' in this world I can do about it
All I'm thinkin' about is you

Little boy carryin' a fishin' pole
Little girl pickin' berries straight off of the vine
Brown bag filled with a little green toad
We hook 'em through the lip and throw 'em off of the line
Your sweet brown legs got me feeling so blue

All I'm thinkin' about is you, baby
All I'm thinkin' about is you
All I'm thinkin' about is you, baby
All I'm thinkin' about is you
Ain't nothin' in this world I can do about it
All I'm thinkin' about is you

Black car shinin' on a Sunday morn
Mama go to church now, Mama go to church now
Friday night daddy's shirt is torn
Daddy's goin' downtown, daddy's goin' downtown
Ain't no one understand this sweet thing we do

All I'm thinkin' about is you, baby
All I'm thinkin' about is you
All I'm thinkin' about is you, baby
All I'm thinkin' about is you
Ain't nothin' in this world I can do about it
All I'm thinkin' about is you

Field turned up, the seed is sowed
Rain comin' in from over 'cross the road
Big black curtain coming 'cross the field
Blind 'll see, the lame will be healed
Brown eyed girl, I turned my back on you, now it's lonely

All I'm thinkin' about is you, babe
All I'm thinkin' about is you
All I'm thinkin' about is you, babe
All I'm thinkin' about is you,
Ain't nothin' in this world take away these blues

All I'm thinkin' about is you
All I'm thinkin' about is you, babe
All I'm thinkin' about is you
All I'm thinkin' about is you
All I'm thinkin' about is you
Ain't nothin' in this world I can do about it
All I'm thinkin' about is you

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Bruce Springsteen/AUTHOR	NAME/All Night Long/NAME	"CONTENT/I was born saved in heaven
It was nothing like the promised land
Raised in a good christian house
Underneath a good christian hand
I was schooled down and dirty
Signed a note back to town
It was there that the workers slaved all week
Waiting for payday to come around

Break out, come on if you're coming
Cause baby i just can't stay
I want to take out the walls of this joint
I want to blow this town away

Now i ain't into fast livin'
I ain't into dying young
And i ain't looking to be forgiven
For any of the stupid things that i've done

For the ones who once had a notion
A notion it was good to be alive
Feel the spark, the rush of emotion
I want to break out baby tonight

I want to dream, that i got a place
I want to scream in somebody's face
Make it seem, get out of this muddy race
All night long

Well all little kings lose their thrones tonight
All you little pretty things better learn to sleep alone tonight
It was down in the cool dirty living
With the man with the master plan
Some girl who can beg forgiveness
And a ticket to the promised land

Down where they'll tear your guts out
Making out what you're all about
Making while we were blasting like a ??
I want out i want out i want out

Want out to the outside
Well i'm a small fool
I want to shout i'm bound for nothing
I want to shout about something too

For the ones who once had a notion
It ain't no sin to be glad you're alive
I feel the heat, the rush of devotion
I want to tear out baby tonight

I wanna do what ain't ever been done
I wanna win what ain't ever been won
I wanna lose blow it all away
I wanna lose what i've always won
Prove it all night long

I wanna know that i got a place
I wanna go where i can see your face
I wanna rock the roof off this place
I want you to know
I wanna live

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Bruce Springsteen/AUTHOR	NAME/All That Heaven Will Allow/NAME	"CONTENT/I got a dollar in my pocket
There ain't a cloud up above
I got a picture in a locket
That says baby I love you
Well if you didn't look then boys
Then fellas don't go lookin' now
Well here she comes a-walkin'
All that heaven will allow

Say hey there mister bouncer
Now all I want to do is dance
But I swear I left my wallet
Back home in my workin' pants
C'mon Slim slip me in man
I'll make it up to you somehow
I can't be late I got a date
With all that heaven will allow

Rain and storm and dark skies
Well now they don't mean a thing
If you got a girl that loves you
And who wants to wear your ring
So c'mon mister trouble
We'll make it through you somehow
We'll fill this house with all the love
All that heaven will allow

Now some may want to die young man
Young and gloriously
Get it straight now mister
Hey buddy that ain't me
'Cause I got something on my mind
That sets me straight and walkin' proud
And I want all the time
All that heaven will allow

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Bruce Springsteen/AUTHOR	NAME/All The Way Home/NAME	"CONTENT/I know what it's like to have failed, baby
With the whole world lookin' on
I know what it's like to have soared
And come crashin' like a drunk on a bar room floor

Now you got no reason to trust me
My confidence is a little rusty
But if you don't feel like bein' alone
Baby, I could walk you all the way home

Well now our old fears and failures
Baby, they do linger
Like the shadow of that ring
That was on your finger
Those days they've come and gone
Baby, I could walk you all the way home

Love leaves nothin' but shadows and vapor
We go on, as is our sad nature
Now it's some old Stones'
Song the band is trashin'
But if you feel like dancin'
Baby, I'm askin'

It's comin' on closing time
Bartender, he's ringin' last call
These days I don't stand on pride
And I ain't afraid to take a fall

So if you're seein' what you like
Maybe your first choice he's gone
Well that's all right
Baby, I could walk you all the way home

Baby, I could walk you all the way home

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Bruce Springsteen/AUTHOR	NAME/Bobby Jean/NAME	"CONTENT/Well I came by your house the other day, your mother said you went away
She said there was nothing that I could have done
There was nothing nobody could say
Me and you weve known each other ever since we were sixteen
I wished I would have known I wished I could have called you
Just to say goodbye bobby jean

Now you hung with me when all the others turned away turned up their noise
We liked the same music we liked the same bands we liked the same clothes
We told each other that we were the wildest, the wildest things wed ever
Seen
Now I wished you would have told me I wished I could have talked to you
Just to say goodbye bobby jean

Now we went walking in the rain talking about the pain from the world we hid
Now there aint nobody nowhere nohow gonna ever understand me the way you did
Maybe you'll be out there on that road somewhere
In some bus or train traveling along
In some motel room therell be a radio playing
And you'll hear me sing this song
Well if you do you'll know I'm thinking of you and all the miles in between
And I'm just calling one last time not to change your mind
But just to say I miss you baby, good luck goodbye, bobby jean

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Bruce Springsteen/AUTHOR	NAME/Boom Boom Boom/NAME	"CONTENT/Boom boom boom boom
I wanna shoot you right down
Take you in my arms
I'm in love with you
A love that is true
Boom boom boom boom

I need you right now
I mean right now
I don't mean tomorrow
I mean right now
Come on come on
I wanna give it up babe

Shake it up babe
Come on and shake
Shake it up babe
Come on come on shake it up babe

I like the way you walk
I like the way you talk
When you walk that walk
And you talk that talk
You knock me out
Right over my feet

Shake it up babe
Come on and shake
Shake it up babe
Come on come on shake it up babe

Boom boom boom boom
I wanna shoot you right down
Take you in my arms
I'm in love with you
A love that is true
Boom boom boom boom

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Bruce Springsteen/AUTHOR	NAME/Born To Run/NAME	"CONTENT/In the day we sweat it out on the streets of a runaway American dream
At night we ride through the mansions of glory in suicide machines
Sprung from cages out on highway nine,
Chrome wheeled, fuel injected, and steppin' out over the line
H-Oh, Baby this town rips the bones from your back
It's a death trap, it's a suicide rap
We gotta get out while we're young
'Cause tramps like us, baby we were born to run

Yes, girl we were

Wendy let me in I wanna be your friend
I want to guard your dreams and visions
Just wrap your legs 'round these velvet rims
And strap your hands 'cross my engines
Together we could break this trap
We'll run till we drop, baby we'll never go back
H-Oh, Will you walk with me out on the wire
'Cause baby I'm just a scared and lonely rider
But I gotta know how it feels
I want to know if love is wild
Babe I want to know if love is real

Oh, can you show me

Beyond the Palace hemi-powered drones scream down the boulevard
Girls comb their hair in rearview mirrors
And the boys try to look so hard
The amusement park rises bold and stark
Kids are huddled on the beach in a mist
I wanna die with you Wendy on the street tonight
In an everlasting kiss

One, two, three, four!

The highway's jammed with broken heroes on a last chance power drive
Everybody's out on the run tonight
But there's no place left to hide
Together Wendy we can live with the sadness
I'll love you with all the madness in my soul
H-Oh, Someday girl I don't know when
We're gonna get to that place
Where we really wanna go
And we'll walk in the sun
But till then tramps like us
Baby we were born to run

Oh honey, tramps like us
Baby we were born to run

Come on Wendy, tramps like us
Baby we were born to run

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Bruce Springsteen/AUTHOR	NAME/Buffalo Gals/NAME	"CONTENT/As I was walking down the street
Down the street, down the street
A pretty girl I chanced to meet
And we danced by the light of the moon

Buffalo gals won't you come out tonight
Come out tonight come out tonight
Buffalo gals won't you come out tonight
And we'll dance by the light of the moon

I danced with a gal with a hole in her stocking
And he knees was a-knockin' and her shoes was a'rockin'
I danced with a gal with a hole in her stocking
And we danced by the light of the moon

Buffalo gals won't you come out tonight
Come out tonight come out tonight
Buffalo gals won't you come out tonight
And we'll dance by the light of the moon

I danced with a gal with a hole in her stocking
And her knees was a-knockin' and her shoes was a-rockin'
I danced with a gal with a hole in her stocking
And we danced by the light of the moon

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Bruce Springsteen/AUTHOR	NAME/Cadillac Ranch/NAME	"CONTENT/Well there she sits buddy just a-gleaming in the sun
There to greet a working man when his day is done
I'm gonna pack my pa and I'm gonna pack my aunt
I'm gonna take them down to the Cadillac ranch

Eldorado fins, whitewalls and skirts
Rides just like a little bit of heaven here on earth
Well buddy when I die throw my body in the back
And drive me to the junkyard in my Cadillac

Cadillac, Cadillac
Long and dark shiny and black
Open up your engines let 'em roar
Tearing up the highway like a big old dinosaur

James Dean in that mercury '49
Junior Johnson runnin' through the woods of Carolina
Even Burt Reynolds in that black Trans Am
All gonna meet down at the Cadillac ranch

Cadillac, Cadillac
Hey little girlie in the blue jeans so tight
Drivin' alone through the Wisconsin night
You're my last love you're my last chance
Don't let 'em take me to the Cadillac ranch

Cadillac, Cadillac

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Bruce Springsteen/AUTHOR	NAME/Car Wash/NAME	"CONTENT/Well my name is Catherine LeFevre
I work at the Astrowash on Sunset and Vine
I drop my kids at school in the morning
And I pick them up at Mary's just 'fore suppertime

[Chorus: x2]
Well I work down at the car wash
For a dollar and a dime
And mister, I hate my boss
It's at the car wash I'm doing my time
Pick up my water bottle and my towel, sir
And I take 'em one by one
From Mercedes to V.W's
I do 'em all and I don't favor none

Well someday I'll sing in a night club
I'll get a million-dollar break
A handsome man will come here with a contract in his hand
And say ""Catherine, this has all been some mistake""

[Chorus]

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Bruce Springsteen/AUTHOR	NAME/Cautious Man/NAME	"CONTENT/Bill Horton was a cautious man of the road
He walked lookin' over his shoulder and remained faithful to its code
When something caught his eye he'd measure his need
And then very carefully he'd proceed

Billy met a young girl in the early days of May
It was there in her arms he let his cautiousness slip away
In their lovers twilight as the evening sky grew dim
He'd lay back in her arms and laugh at what had happened to him

On his right hand Billy tattooed the word love and on his left hand was the
word fear
And in which hand he held his fate was never clear
Come Indian summer he took his young lover for his bride
And with his own hands built a great house down by the riverside

Now Billy was an honest man he wanted to do what was right
He worked hard to fill their lives with happy days and loving nights
Alone on his knees in the darkness for steadiness he'd pray
For he knew in a restless heart the seed of betrayal lay

One night Billy awoke from a terrible dream callin' his wife's name
She lay breathing beside him in a peaceful sleep, a thousand miles away
He got dressed in the moonlight and down to the highway he strode
When he got there he didn't find nothing but road

Billy felt a coldness rise up inside him that he couldn't name
Just as the words tattooed 'cross his knuckles he knew would always remain
At their bedside he brushed the hair from his wife's face as the moon shone on
her skin so white
Filling their room with the beauty of God's fallen light

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Bruce Springsteen/AUTHOR	NAME/Child Bride/NAME	"CONTENT/A lovely, poignant song
About a man fated to be kept apart from his true love

""well, sometimes I dream of gettin' outta here,
Headin' down towards them old tracks
I swore I'd come and get her
But I know I ain't never goin' back

""there's nights I can't sleep
No matter how hard I try
So from my window I watch the moonlight
Fall on the far hillside

""I imagine I put on my jacket,
Go down to this little roadside bar
Pick a stranger and spin around the dance floor
To a mexican guitar""

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Bruce Springsteen/AUTHOR	NAME/Chimes Of Freedom - At Stockholm, Sweden/NAME	"CONTENT/Well, far between sundown's finish and midnight's broken toll
We ducked inside the doorway, thunder crashing
As majestic bells of bolts struck shadows in the sound
Seeming to be the chimes of freedom crashing

Yeah, flashing for the warriors whose strength is not to fight
Flashing for the refugees on their unarmed road of flight
And for each and every underdog soldier in the night
We gazed upon the chimes of freedom flashing

Well, in the city's melted furnace, unexpectedly we watched
With faces hidden here while the walls were tightening
As the echo of the wedding bells before the blowing rain
Dissolved into the wild bales of lightning

Yeah, tolling for the rebel, yeah, tolling for the rake
Tolling for the luckless, the abandoned and forsaken
Yeah tolling for the outcast, burning constantly at stake
And we gazed upon the chimes of freedom flashing

Alright now

And then through a cloud like curtain in a far off corner flashed
As the hypnotic splattered mist was slowly lifting
Well, electric light still struck like arrows
Fired but for the ones condemned to drift or else be kept from drifting

Well, tolling for the searching ones, on their speechless seeking trail
For the lonesome-hearted lovers with too personal a tale
And for each un-harmful gentle soul misplaced inside a jail
And we gazed upon the chimes of freedom flashing

Well, starry-eyed and laughing, I recall when we were caught
Trapped by no track of hours for they hanged suspended
As we listened one last time and we watched with one last look
Spellbound and swallowed as the tolling ended

Yeah, tolling for the aching ones whose wounds
Cannot be nursed for the countless confused
Accused, misused, strung out ones and worse
And for every hung-up person in the whole wide universe
(Yeah)
And we gazed upon the chimes of freedom flashing

Alright, now, whoa, whoa, whoa
Well, whoa, whoa, whoa, whoa
Well, whoa, whoa, whoa
Well, whoa, whoa, whoa

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Bruce Springsteen/AUTHOR	NAME/Countin' On A Miracle/NAME	"CONTENT/It's a fairytale so tragic
There's no prince to break the spell
I don't believe in the magic
But for you I will, for you I will
If I'm a fool, I'll be a fool
Darlin' for you

I'm countin' on a miracle
Baby I'm countin' on a miracle
Darlin' I'm countin' on miracle
To come through

There ain't no storybook story
There's no never-ending song
Our happily ever after Darlin'
Forever come and gone
I'm movin' on
If I'm gonna believe
I'll put my faith
Darlin' in you

I'm countin' on a miracle
Baby I'm countin' on a miracle
Darlin' I'm countin' on miracle
To come through

Sleeping beauty awakes from her dream
With her lover's kiss on her lips
Your kiss was taken from me
Now all I have is this...

Your kiss, your kiss, your touch, your touch
Your heart, your heart, your strength, your strength
Your hope, your hope, your faith, your faith
Your face, your face, your love, your love
Your dream, your dream, your life, your life

I'm runnin' through the forest
With the wolf at my heels
My king is lost at midnight
When the tower bells peal
We've got no fairytale ending
In God's hands our fate is complete
Your heaven's here in my heart
Our love's this dust beneath my feet
Just this dust beneath my feet
If I'm gonna live
I'll lift my life
Darlin' to you

I'm countin' on a miracle
Baby I'm countin' on a miracle
Darlin' I'm countin' on miracle
To come through

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Bruce Springsteen/AUTHOR	NAME/County Fair/NAME	"CONTENT/Every year when summer comes around
They stretch a banner 'cross the main street in town
You can feel somethin's happenin' in the air
Well, from Carol's house up on Telegraph Hill
You can see the lights going up out in Soldiers Field
Getting ready, for the county fair

County fair, county fair,
Everybody in town'll be there
So come on, hey we're goin' down there
(hey) Little girl with the long blond hair
Come win your daddy one of them stuffed bears
Baby, down at the country fair

Now you'll be hangin' tight when we hit the top
And that rollercoaster's ready to drop
And your braggin', how you wasn't even scared
Well baby you know I just love the sound
Of that pipe organ on the merry-go-round
Baby, down at the county fair

County fair, county fair,
Everybody in town'll be there
So come on, hey we're goin' down there
(hey) Little girl with the long blond hair
Come win your daddy one of them stuffed bears
Baby, down at the country fair

At the north end of the field they set up a stand
And they got a little rock and roll band
People dancin' out in the open air
It's James Young and the Immortal Ones
Two guitars, (baby) bass and drums
Just rockin', down at the county fair

(well) County fair, county fair
Everybody in town'll be there
So come on, we're goin' down there
Little girl with the long blond hair
Come win your daddy one of them stuffed bears
Baby, down at the county fair

Now it's getting late before we head back to town
We let that fortune wheel spin around
Come on mister tell me what's waiting out there
On my way out I steal a kiss in the dark
Hope I can remember where our car's parked
Baby, out at the county fair

Now off down the highway there's the last stream of cars
We sit a while in my front yard
With the radio playin' soft and low
I pull Carol close to my heart
And I lean back and stare up at the stars
Oh I wish, I'd never have to let this moment go

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Bruce Springsteen/AUTHOR	NAME/Cover Me/NAME	"CONTENT/The times are tough now, just getting tougher
This old world is rough, it's just getting rougher
Cover me, come on baby, cover me
Well I'm looking for a lover who will come on in and cover me
Promise me baby you won't let them find us
Hold me in your arms, let's let our love blind us
Cover me, shut the door and cover me
Well I'm looking for a lover who will come on in and cover me

Outside's the rain, the driving snow
I can hear the wild wind blowing
Turn out the light, bolt the door
I ain't going out there no more

This whole world is out there just trying to score
I've seen enough I don't want to see any more,
Cover me, come on and cover me
I'm looking for a lover who will come on in and cover me
Looking for a lover who will come on in and cover me

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Bruce Springsteen/AUTHOR	NAME/Cross My Heart/NAME	"CONTENT/First time I crossed my heart
I was begging baby please
At your bedside
Down on my knees
When I crossed my heart
When I crossed my heart
I crossed my heart,
Pretty baby over you

Second time I crossed my heart
Rain came in from the south
I was lying there with something sweet and salty in my mouth
When I crossed my heart
When I crossed my heart
When I crossed my heart, pretty darling over you.

Well you may think the world's black and white
And you're dirty or you're clean, son
You better watch out you don't slip
Through them spaces in between

Well the night gets sticky
And the sky gets black
I grabbed you baby, and you grabbed me back
And we crossed our hearts
Mmm we crossed our hearts
Yeah, I crossed my heart
Mmmhmmmhmmmm

Well little boys little girls
Hell they don't know wrongs from their rights,
And once you cross your heart, you ain't ever supposed to lie
Well life ain't nothing but a cold, hard ride
I ain't leaving til I'm satisfied.
I cross my heart
Yeah I cross my heart
Well I cross my heart
Pretty darling over you

Oohoooohoooh

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Bruce Springsteen/AUTHOR	NAME/Crush On You/NAME	"CONTENT/My feets were flyin' down the street just the other night
When a Hong Kong special pulled up at the light
What was inside, man, was just see'est magnifique
I wanted to hold the bumper and let her drag me down the street

[Chorus:]
Ooh, ooh, I gotta crush on you
Ooh, ooh, I gotta crush on you
Ooh, ooh, I gotta crush on you tonight

Sometimes I spot a little stranger standing 'cross the room
My brain takes a vacation just to give my heart more room
For one kiss, darling I swear everything I would give
'Cause SHES A walking, talking reason to live

[Chorus:]

Well now she might be the talk of high society
She's probably got a lousy personality
She might be a heiress to Rockefeller
She might be a waitress or a bank teller
She makes the Venus de Milo look like she's got no style
She make Sheena of the Jungle look meek and mild
I need a quick shot, Doc, knock me off my feet
'Cause I'll be minding my own business walking down the street...watchout!

[Chorus:]

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Bruce Springsteen/AUTHOR	NAME/Cynthia/NAME	"CONTENT/Cynthia, when you come walkin' by you're an inspiring sight
Cynthia, you don't smile or say hi but baby that's alright
'Cause I don't need to hold you or taste your kiss
I just like knowin', Cynthia, you exist
in a world like this

Cynthia, when you pass it seems like this whole town drops
Cynthia, or maybe it's just me, baby, and these fools stuck here punchin' this
clock
Well you give us a reason to stop just for a while
Stop, stand and salute your style

Well now you ain't the finest thing I'll never have
And when you go the hurt you leave, baby, it ain't so bad
There ain't a man in this whole town who'd say you ain't fine
You hear them guys talkin', tell me baby do you mind
Well you make us happy, honey, when we feel sad
To see something so good in a world gone bad
There's still Cynthia

Cynthia, no one knows your number, no one knows where you live
Cynthia, I wonder do you understand this strange thing you give
Well baby is it your style, the mystery in your smile
Or just how cool you walk in a world gone wild
Tell me if you will, Cynthia

Well I gotta be pretty naive to believe in you
I know you ain't ever gonna be my dream come true
That's alright, I got other dreams as good as you, Cynthia
Yeah now baby, now this ain't no come-on
Just walk on, Cynthia, walk on
You make me holler, yeah, yeah, alright
I said yeah, yeah, alright
Well she's a yeah, yeah, alright
I said yeah, yeah, alright

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Bruce Springsteen/AUTHOR	NAME/Darlington County/NAME	"CONTENT/Driving in to darlington county
Me and wayne on the fourth of july
Driving in to darlington county
Looking for some work on the county line
We drove down from new york city
Where the girls are pretty but they just want to know your name
Driving in to darlington city
Got a union connection with an uncle of waynes
We drove eight hundred miles without seeing a cop
We got rock and roll music blasting off the t-top singing

Sha la la la la la la la la, sha la la la la la la

Hey little girl standing on the corner
Todays your lucky day for sure all right
Me and my buddy were from new york city
We got two hundred dollars we want to rock all night
Girl you're looking at two big spenders
Why the world don't know what me and wayne might do
Our pas each own one of the world trade centers
For a kiss and a smile I'll give mine all to you
Come on baby take a seat on my fender
Its a long night and tell me what else were you gonna do
Just me and you we could

Sha la la...

Little girl sitting in the window
Aint seen my buddy in seven days
County man tells me the same thing
He don't work and he don't get paid
Little girl you're so young and pretty
Walk with me and you can have your way
And well leave this darlington city
For a ride down that dixie highway

Driving out of darlington county
My eyes seen the glory of the coming of the lord
Driving out of darlington county
Seen wayne handcuffed to the bumper of a state troopers ford

Sha la la...

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Bruce Springsteen/AUTHOR	NAME/Dollhouse/NAME	"CONTENT/Well ever since you were a little girl
You set the rules in your little world
But girls grow up and throw their toys away
You're a big girl now but you still wanna play
(Girl we're living)
You dress them up the way you want to
(Girl we're living)
You make them do just what you want them to
(Girl we're living)
Once I thought we had a love that was true
But I'm just another doll in your dollhouse to you

We're living in a dollhouse
We're living in a dollhouse
Girl we're living in a dollhouse
You may feel safe and sound
But your dollhouse, girl, is falling down

It's all been neatly arranged in your mind
Every detail fits your own design
Every room is perfectly in place
But I can see the sadness, baby, on your face
You had a plan and darling like a child
You thought it's down to fashion, down to style
But your little dreamhouse is runnin' wild
Before your very eyes we're shrinking down to size

We're living in a dollhouse
We're living in a dollhouse
Girl we're living in a dollhouse
You may feel safe and sound
But your dollhouse, girl, is falling down

Everything's as you dreamed it would be
But there's something wrong that you can't see
Room by room you keep looking for some little flaw
A crack somewhere in your dollhouse wall
Something, girl, that will explain away
The hurt you feel, darling, when we play

Your little dolls they got grip on you
Until you're just another doll in your dollhouse too
We're living in a dollhouse
Girl, we're living in a dollhouse
Oh we're living in a dollhouse
We may feel safe and sound
But our dollhouse, girl, is falling down
Oh we're living in a dollhouse
Girl, we're living in a dollhouse
Yeah we're living in a dollhouse

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Bruce Springsteen/AUTHOR	NAME/Downbound Train/NAME	"CONTENT/I had a job, I had a girl
I had something going, mister, in this world
I got laid off down at the lumber yard
Our love went bad, times got hard
Now I work down at the car wash
Where all it ever does is rain
Don't you feel like you're a rider on a downbound train

She just said, ""Joe, I gotta go
We had it once, we ain't got it anymore""
She packed her bags, left me behind
She bought a ticket on the Central Line
Nights as I sleep, I hear that whistle whining
I feel her kiss in the misty rain
And I feel like I'm a rider on a downbound train

Last night I heard your voice
You were crying, crying, you were so alone
You said your love had never died
You were waiting for me at home
Put on my jacket, I ran through the woods
I ran till I thought my chest would explode
There in the clearing, beyond the highway
In the moonlight, our wedding house shone
I rushed through the yard
I burst through the front door, my head pounding hard
Up the stairs I climbed
The room was dark, our bed was empty
Then I heard that long whistle whine
And I dropped to my knees, hung my head and cried
Now I swing a sledge hammer on a railroad gang
Knocking down them cross ties, working in the rain
Now, don't it feel like you're a rider on a downbound train

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Bruce Springsteen/AUTHOR	NAME/Empty Sky/NAME	"CONTENT/I woke up this morning
I could barely breathe
Just an empty impression
In the bed there you used to be
I want a kiss from your lips
I want an eye for an eye
I woke up this morning to an empty sky

Empty sky, empty sky
I woke up this morning to an empty sky
Empty sky, empty sky
I woke up this morning to an empty sky

Blood on the streets
Blood flowin' down
I hear the blood of my blood
Cryin' from the ground

Empty sky, empty sky
I woke up this morning to an empty sky
Empty sky, empty sky
I woke up this morning to an empty sky

On the plains of Jordan
I cut my bow from the wood
Of this tree of evil
Of this tree of good
I want a kiss from your lips
I want an eye for an eye
I woke up this morning to the empty sky

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Bruce Springsteen/AUTHOR	NAME/Evacuation Of The West/NAME	"CONTENT/It was on the day the cowboys were abandoned from the ranch
Middle touch world as a master
They rode their ponies down in the cities of gold
To leave them for ever after
Now the sun was swollen red and old
The earth it was windy, dark and cold
Were the highway ends the desert takes its toll
Sodusty, red and angry
It was a time when men died out on the praire
From not having a decent friend
At nights the ghosts to the more of riders
Was a howl in the candid winds

You can here them crying
Good god, I think they're dying

When them rangers down in dallas
Had all, but given it up and left
And those that hang on hoping
Was trying their best to, to forget
The way those outlaws and desperadoes
Right from the cheapest to the best
Rode in on ponies made of skin and bones
Keep up their rusty guns and went back home
And the governor was sent down from population control
And marshall all was past
Riverboat gamblers put their money on faith
For the time for hope they passed

In the cold blue light of the desert night
There was a thousand starry ships
And men came down from still I don't now where
With death on their fingertips
Now there's no more kings in texas
I swear they rounded up each and everyone
And old atlanta canastoga
Reached from the rocky mountains into the old dead sun
Now anna maria walks the blames alone
The last of a struggling people
She thinks of all those outlaws who wanted to reach for the skies
And got stuck up on a steamboat
Oh, you can hear them crying
Good god, I think they're dying
In the wind you can hear them sighing

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Bruce Springsteen/AUTHOR	NAME/Factory/NAME	"CONTENT/Early in the morning factory whistle blows,
Man rises from bed and puts on his clothes,
Man takes his lunch, walks out in the morning light,
It's the working, the working, just the working life.

Through the mansions of fear, through the mansions of pain,
I see my daddy walking through them factory gates in the rain,
Factory takes his hearing, factory gives him life,
The working, the working, just the working life.

End of the day, factory whistle cries,
Men walk through these gates with death in their eyes.
And you just better believe, boy,
Somebody's gonna get hurt tonight,
It's the working, the working, just the working life.

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Bruce Springsteen/AUTHOR	NAME/Fade Away/NAME	"CONTENT/Well now you say you've found another man who does things to you that I can't
And that no matter what I do it's all over now
Between me and you girl
But I can't believe what you say
No I can't believe what you say
'Cause baby

[Chorus:]
I don't want to fade away
Oh I don't want to fade away
Tell me what can I do what can I say
'Cause darlin' I don't want to fade away

Well now you say that you've made up your mind
It's been such a long, long time since it's been good with us
And that somewhere back along the line you lost your love and I lost your
trust
Now rooms that once were so bright are filled with the coming night, darlin'

[Chorus:]

You say it's not easy for you
And that you've been so lonely
While other girls go out doing what they want to do
You say that you miss the nights whe we'd go out dancing
The days when you and I walked as two
Well girl, I miss them too
Oh I swear that I do
Oh girl

Now baby I don't want to be just another useless memory holding you tight
Or just some other ghost out on the street to whom you stop and politely speak
When you pass on by vanishing into the night
Left to vanish into the night
No baby

[Chorus:]

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Bruce Springsteen/AUTHOR	NAME/Family Song/NAME	"CONTENT/Well ya know when you're young,
There's such a distance between you and your family.
Just can't see things from the same point of view.

Papa wants a lawyer and mama she wants an author,
And all you want is for them to want you.

Well, I saw lot of bad signs and we had some real bad timesback on the east
coast.
And I guess you could say it took california to bring us close.
There was a lot of hard livin' and some stone cold women on the east coast.
And I saw my papa turn away when I need him the most.
And california, she's an angel.
Lo, so heavenly dressed
And the pacific she's a woman
The lord must have loved her best.
I got a california rainbow to come give them thunder clouds a rest
And the mountain is my friend now, she put me to her test
Well you know every father has dreams and schemes for his own kid.
And dreaming it ain't been declaired no capital crime
But I just hope when I grow up to have my own kids
I'll love them all I can and let 'em make their own minds
Now you know how a mother can hold the son through understanding.
And my father he once held me close by crying.
Whoa, and my mama's love it don't ever leave me standing.
And papa's love it just leaves me smiling.
Whoa, and my mama she's a rainbow,
Gotta see hen on sunday when she's dressed
Whoa, and my papa he's a good man, he gives me and mama his best.
Whoa, my mama she's a rainbow, come to give them thunder clouds a rest.
And my family is my friend now california put us through her test.

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Bruce Springsteen/AUTHOR	NAME/Fire/NAME	"CONTENT/I'm driving in my car, I turn on the radio
I'm pulling you close, you just say no
You say you don't like it, but girl I know you're a liar
'Cause when we kiss, fire

Late at night I'm takin' you home
I say I want to stay, you say you want to be alone
You say you don't love me, girl you can't hide your desire
'Cause when we kiss, fire

You had a hold on me, right from the start
A grip so tight I couldn't tear it apart
My nerves all jumpin' actin' like a fool
Well your kisses they burn but your heart stays cool

Romeo and Juliet, Samson and Delilah
You can bet their love they didn't deny
Your words say split but your words they lie
'Cause when we kiss, fire

(Repeat)

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Bruce Springsteen/AUTHOR	NAME/Frankie/NAME	"CONTENT/Dark weekends in the sun out on Chelsea Road
Descending the stairs, Frankie, my one
Check your makeup in the mirror c'mon babe let's go
We'll dance 'round this dirty town 'til the night is all done
Let all the finer things sleep alone tonight
Let all the minor kings lose their thrones tonight
Don't worry about us, baby, we'll be alright

Well everybody's dying, this town's closing down
They're all sittin' down at the courthouse waiting for 'em to take the flag
down
I see strange flashes in the sky up above
Gonna spend the night at the drive-in with the one that I love
At dusk the stars all appear on the screen
Yeah, just like they do each night in my dreams
But tonight's no dream, Frankie, I can feel myself too
Well now and forever my love is for you

Walk softly tonight little stranger
Yeah into these shadows we're passing through
Talk softly tonight, little angel
You make all my dream worlds come true

Well lately I've been standing out in the freezing rain
Readin' them want ads out on Chelsea Road
I'm winging down the street in search of new games
Hustling through these nightlights' diamond glow
Well Frankie I don't know what I'm gonna find
Maybe nothing at all, maybe a world I can call mine
Shining like these streetlights down here on the strand
Bright as the rain in the palm of your hand

Walk softly tonight, little stranger
Into the shadows where lovers go
Talk softly to me, little angel
Whisper your secrets so soft and low

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Bruce Springsteen/AUTHOR	NAME/Froggie Went A-courtin'/NAME	"CONTENT/Froggie went a-courtin' and he did ride, a - huh
Froggie went a-courtin' and he did ride, a - huh
Froggie went a-courtin' and he did ride
Sword and pistol by his side, a - huh, a - huh, fare the well

Well he rode down to Miss Mouse's door
Where he had often been before

He took Miss Mousie on his knee
Said ""Miss Mousie will you marry me""

I'll have to ask my Uncle Rat
See what he will say to that

Well, Uncle Rat laughed and shook his fat sides
To think his niece would be a bride

Well, Uncle Rat rode off to town
To buy his niece a wedding gown

Where will the wedding supper be
Way down yonder in a hollow tree

What will the wedding supper be
A fried misquito and a roasted flea

First to come in were to little ants
Fixing around to have a dance

Next to come in was a bumble bee
Bouncing a fiddle on his knee

Next to come in was a fat sassy lad
Thinks himself as big as his dad

Thinks himself a man indeed
Because he chews the tobacco weed

And next to come in was a big tomcat
He swallowed the frog and the mouse and the rat

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Bruce Springsteen/AUTHOR	NAME/Fun, Fun, Fun/NAME	"CONTENT/Well she got her daddy's car
And she cruised through the hamburger stand now
Seems she forgot all about the library
Like she told her old man now
And with the radio blasting
Goes cruising just as fast as she can now

And she'll have fun fun fun
'Til her daddy takes the T-Bird away
(Fun fun fun 'til her daddy takes the T-Bird away)

Well the girls can't stand her
'Cause she walks looks and drives like an ace now
(You walk like an ace now you walk like an ace)
She makes the Indy 500 look like a Roman chariot race now
(You look like an ace now you look like an ace)
A lotta guys try to catch her
But she leads them on a wild goose chase now
(You drive like an ace now you drive like an ace)

And she'll have fun fun fun
'Til her daddy takes the T-Bird away
(Fun fun fun 'til her daddy takes the T-Bird away)

(Solo)

Well you knew all along
That your dad was gettin' wise to you now
(You shouldn't have lied now you shouldn't have lied)
And since he took your set of keys
You've been thinking that your fun is all through now
(You shouldn't have lied now you shouldn't have lied)

But you can come along with me
'Cause we gotta a lot of things to do now
(You shouldn't have lied now you shouldn't have lied)

And we'll have fun fun fun now that daddy took the T-Bird away
(Fun fun fun now that daddy took the T-Bird away)
And we'll have fun fun fun now that daddy took the T-Bird away
(Fun fun fun now that daddy took the T-Bird away)
(Fun fun now that daddy took the T-Bird away)
(Fun fun now that daddy took the T-Bird away)
(Fun fun now that daddy took the T-Bird away)
(Fun fun now that daddy took the T-Bird away)
(Fun fun now that daddy took the T-Bird away)
(Fun fun now that daddy took the T-Bird away)
(Fun fun now that daddy took the T-Bird away)
(Fun fun now that daddy took the T-Bird away)

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Bruce Springsteen/AUTHOR	NAME/Further On/NAME	"CONTENT/Where the road is dark
And the seat is soaked
Where the gun is cocked
And the bullet's cold
Where the miles are marked in blood and gold
I'll meet you further on up the road

Got on my dead man's suit
And my smilin' skull ring
My lucky graveyard boots
And a song to sing
I got a song to sing, keep me out of the cold
And I'll meet you further on up the road

Further on up the road
Further on up the road
Where the way is dark
And the night is cold
But one sunny morning we'll rise, I know
And I'll meet you further on up the road

Well I been out in the desert
Was doin' my time
Searching through the dust
Looking for a sign
If there's a light up ahead
Well, buddy, I don't know
But I got this fever
Burning in my soul
So let's take the good times as they come
And I'll meet you further on up the road

Further on up the road
Further on up the road
Where the way is dark
And the night is cold
One sunny morning we'll rise, I know
And I'll meet you further on up the road
One sunny morning we'll rise, I know
And I'll meet you further on up the road
Yeah I'll meet you further on up the road
Well I'll meet you further on up the road

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Bruce Springsteen/AUTHOR	NAME/Galveston Bay/NAME	"CONTENT/Fifteen years Le Bing Son
Fought side by side with the Americans
In the mountains and deltas of Vietnam

In '75 Saigon fell
And he left his command
And brought his family to the promised land

Seabrook Texas and the small towns
In the Gulf of Mexico
It was delta country and reminded him of home

He worked as a machinist, put his money away
And bought a shrimp boat with his cousin
And together they harvested Galveston Bay

In the mornin' 'fore the sun come up
He'd kiss his sleepin' daughter
Steer out through the channel
And casts his nets into the water

Billy Sutter fought with Charlie Company
In the highlands of Quang Tri
He was wounded in the battle of Chu Lai
And shipped home in '68

There he married and worked the gulf fishing grounds
In a boat that'd been his father's
In the morning he'd kiss his sleeping son
And cast his nets into the water

Billy sat in front of his TV as the south fell
And the Communists rolled into Saigon
He and his friends watched as the refugees came
Settle on the same streets and worked the coast they grew up on

Soon in the bars around the harbor was talk
Of America for Americans
Someone said, ""You want 'em out, you got to burn 'em out""
And brought in the Texas klan

One humid Texas night there were three shadows on the harbor
Come to burn the Vietnamese boats into the sea
In the fire's light shots rang out
Two Texans lay dead on the ground
Le stood with a pistol in his hand

A jury acquitted him in self defense
As before the judge he did stand
But as he walked down the courthouse steps
Billy said ""My friend, you're a dead man""

One late summer night Le stood watch along the waterside
Billy stood in the shadows
His K-bar knife in his hand
And the moon slipped behind the clouds

Le lit a cigarette, the bay was as still as glass
As he walked by Billy stuck his knife into his pocket
Took a breath and let him pass

In the early darkness Billy rose up
Went into the kitchen for a drink of water
Kissed his sleeping wife
Headed into the channel
And casts his nets into the water

Of Galveston Bay

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Bruce Springsteen/AUTHOR	NAME/Glory Days/NAME	"CONTENT/I had a friend was a big baseball player
Back in high school
He could throw that speedball by you
Make you look like a fool boy
Saw him the other night at this roadside bar
I was walking in, he was walking out
We went back inside sat down had a few drinks
But all he kept talking about was

Glory days well they'll pass you by
Glory days in the wink of a young girl's eye
Glory days, glory days

Well there's a girl that lives up the block
Back in school she could turn all the boy's heads
Sometimes on a Friday I'll stop by
And have a few drinks after she put her kids to bed
Her and her husband Bobby well they split up
I guess it's two years gone by now
We just sit around talking about the old times,
She says when she feels like crying
She starts laughing thinking about

Glory days well they'll pass you by
Glory days in the wink of a young girl's eye
Glory days, glory days

Think I'm going down to the well tonight
And I'm going to drink till I get my fill
And I hope when I get old I don't sit around thinking about it
But I probably will
Yeah, just sitting back trying to recapture
A little of the glory, well time slips away
And leaves you with nothing mister but
Boring stories of

Glory days yeah they'll pass you by
Glory days in the wink of a young girl's eye
Glory days, glory days

Yeah they'll pass you by
Glory days in the wink of a young girl's eye
Glory days, glory days

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Bruce Springsteen/AUTHOR	NAME/Good Rockin' Tonight/NAME	"CONTENT/Well have you heard the news
There's good rockin' tonight.
Well have you heard the news
Everybody rocking tonight.

I'm gonna squeeze you baby
Just as tight as I can
Tonight you're gonna know
I'm a mighty, mighty man.
Have you heard the news?
There's good rockin' tonight.

I'm gonna meet you in the alley
Out behind the barn
Don't be afraid,
I'll do you no harm.
Bring along your tap dancin' shoes,
Tonight I'm gonna rock away all your blues.
There's good news?
There's good rockin' tonight.

We're gonna rock,
We're gonna rock,
We're gonna rock all my cares away
Watch out now

Now have you heard the news
There's good rockin' tonight.
Well have you heard the news
Everybody rocking tonight.

I'm gonna hold my baby
Just as tight as I can
Tonight she's gonna know
I'm her mighty mighty man.
Have you heard the news?
There's good rockin' tonight.

Have you heard the news?
There's good rockin' tonight.
Have you heard the news?
There's good rockin' tonight.
Have you heard the news?
Everybody's rockin' tonight.
Have you heard the news?
Everyone's rockin' tonight.

Have you heard the news?
Everybody's rockin' tonight.
Have you heard the news?
Everybody's rockin' tonight.
Have you heard the news?
Everybody's rockin' tonight.

Now have you heard the news?
There's good rockin' tonight.
Have you heard the news?

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Bruce Springsteen/AUTHOR	NAME/Growin' Up/NAME	"CONTENT/I stood stonelike at midnight suspended in my masquerade
I combed my hair till it was just right and commanded the night brigade
I was open to pain and crossed by the rain and I walked on a crooked crutch
I strolled all alone through a fallout zone and came out with my soul
Untouched
I hid in the clouded wrath of the crowd but when they said 'Sit down' I stood
up
Ooh-ooh growin' up
The flag of piracy flew from my mast my sails were set wing to wing
I had a jukebox graduate for first mate she couldn't sail but she sure could
sing
I pushed B-52 and bombed 'em with the blues with my gear set stubborn on
standing
I broke all the rules strafed my old high school never once gave thought to
landing
I hid in the clouded wrath of the crowd but when they said 'Come down' I threw
up
Ooh-ooh growin' up

I took month-long vacations in the stratosphere and you know it's really hard
to hold your breath
I swear I lost everything I ever loved or feared I was the cosmic kid
Well my feet they finally took root in the earth but I got me a nice little
Place in the stars
I swear I found the key to the universe in the engine of an old parked car
I hid in the clouded wrath of the crowd but when they said 'Sit down' I stood
up
Ooh-ooh growin' up
Ooh-ooh growin' up

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Bruce Springsteen/AUTHOR	NAME/Gypsy Woman/NAME	"CONTENT/From nowhere through the caravan
Round the campfire light
Lovely woman in motion
With hair as dark as night
Her eyes were like that of a cat in the dark
That hypnotized me with love

She was a gypsy woman
She was a gypsy woman
She was a gypsy woman
She was a gypsy woman
She was a gypsy woman
She danced around and round

Guitar's melody
From the fire her face was aglow
How she enchanted me
I'd like to hold her near
And kiss her hair and whisper in her ear

I love you gypsy woman
I love you gypsy woman
I love you gypsy woman
I love you gypsy woman

All through the caravan
She was dancing with all the men
Waiting for the rising sun
Everyone was having fun
Hated to see her go
Knowing that she'll never know
That I love her
That I love her

I love you gypsy woman
I love you gypsy woman
I love you gypsy woman
I love you gypsy woman

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Bruce Springsteen/AUTHOR	NAME/Happy/NAME	"CONTENT/Some need gold and some need diamond rings
Or a drug to take away the pain that living brings
A promise of a better world to come
When whatever here is done
I don't need that sky of blue
All I know's since I found you, I'm happy when I'm in your arms
Happy, darling, come the dark
Happy when I taste your kiss
I'm happy in a love like this

There's a house upon a distant hill
Where you can hear the laughter of children ring
Guardian angels, they watch from above
Watching over the love that they bring
But at night I feel the darkness near, I awake and I find you near
I'm happy with you in my arms
I'm happy with you in my heart
Happy when I taste your kiss
I'm happy in love like this

In a world of doubt and fear
I wake at night and reach to find you near
Lost in a dream, you caught me as I fell
I want more than just a dream to tell

We're born in this world, darling, with few days and trouble never far behind
Man and woman circle each other in a cage
A cage that's been handed down the line
Lost and running 'neath a million dead stars
Tonight let's shed our skins and slip these bars
Happy in each other's arms
Happy, baby, come the dark
Happy in each other's kiss
I'm happy in a love like this

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Bruce Springsteen/AUTHOR	NAME/Highway Patrolman/NAME	"CONTENT/My name is Joe Roberts I work for the state
I'm a sergeant out of Perrineville barracks number eight
I always done an honest job as honest as I could
I got a brother named Frankie and Frankie ain't no good

Now ever since we was young kids it's been the same come down
I get a call over the radio Frankie's in trouble downtown
Well if it was any other man, I'd put him straight away
But when it's your brother sometimes you look the other way

Yeah me and Frankie laughin' and drinkin'
Nothin' feels better than blood on blood
Takin' turns dancin' with Maria as the band
Played ""Night of the Johnstown Flood""

I catch him when he's strayin' like any brother would
Man turns his back on his family well he just ain't no good

Well Frankie went in the army back in 1965
I got a farm deferment, settled down, took Maria for my wife
But them wheat prices kept on droppin' till it was like we were gettin'
Robbed
Frankie came home in '68, and me, I took this job

Yeah we're laughin' and drinkin'
Nothin' feels better than blood on blood
Takin' turns dancin' with Maria as the band
Played ""Night of the Johnstown Flood""

I catch him when he's strayin' teach him how to walk that line
Man turns his back on his family he ain't no friend of mine

Well the night was like any other, I got a call 'bout quarter to nine
There was trouble in a roadhouse out on the Michigan line
There was a kid lyin' on the floor lookin' bad bleedin' hard from his head
There was a girl cry'n' at a table and it was Frank, they said

Well I went out and I jumped in my car and I hit the lights
Well I musta done one hundred and ten through Michigan county that night
It was out at the crossroads, down 'round Willow bank
Seen a Buick with Ohio plates. Behind the wheel was Frank

Well I chased him through them county roads
Till a sign said ""Canadian border five miles from here""
I pulled over the side of the highway and watched his tail-lights disappear

Me and Frankie laughin' and drinkin'
Nothin' feels better than blood on blood
Takin' turns dancin' with Maria as the band
Played ""Night of the Johnstown Flood""

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Bruce Springsteen/AUTHOR	NAME/Human Touch/NAME	"CONTENT/You and me we were the pretenders
We let it all slip away
In the end what you don't surrender
Well the world just strips away

Girl, ain't no kindness in the face of strangers
Ain't gonna find no miracles here
Well you can wait on your blesses my darlin'
I got a deal for you right here

I ain't lookin' for praise or pity
I ain't comin' 'round searchin' for a crutch
I just want someone to talk to
And a little of that human touch
Just a little of that human touch

Ain't no mercy on the streets of this town
Ain't no bread from heavenly skies
Ain't nobody drawin' wine from this blood
It's just you and me tonight

Tell me, in a world without pity
Do you think what I'm askin's too much
I just want something to hold on to
And a little of that human touch
Just a little of that human touch

Oh girl that feeling of safety you prize
Well it comes at a hard hard price
You can't shut off the risk and the pain
Without losin' the love that remains
We're all riders on this train

So you've been broken and you've been hurt
Show me somebody who ain't
Yeah, I know I ain't nobody's bargain
But, hell, a little touchup
And a little paint

You might need somethin' to hold on to
When all the answers, they don't amount to much
Somebody that you could just to talk to
And a little of that human touch

Baby, in a world without pity
Do you think what I'm askin's too much
I just want to feel you in my arms
Share a little of that human touch
Share a little of that human touch
Feel a little of that human touch
Feel a little of that human touch
Share a little of that human touch
Feel a little of that human touch
Give me a little of that human touch
Give me a little of that human touch

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Bruce Springsteen/AUTHOR	NAME/Hunter Of Invisible Game/NAME	"CONTENT/I hauled myself up out of a ditch
I built me an ark out of gopher wood and pitch
Sat down by the roadside and waited on the rain
Honey, I'm the hunter of invisible game

Well I woke last night to the heavy clicking and clack
And a scarecrow on fire along the railroad tracks
There were empty cities and burning plains
Honey, I'm the hunter of invisible game

We all come up a little short and we go down hard
These days I spend my time skipping through the dark
Through the empires of dust I chant your name
Honey, I'm the hunter of invisible game

Through the bone yard we rattled and black smoke we rolled on
Down into the valley where the beast has his throne
I sing my song and I sharpen my blade
Honey, I'm the hunter of invisible game

Strength is vanity and time is illusion
I feel you breathing, the rest is confusion
Your skin touches mine, what else to explain
Honey, I'm the hunter of invisible game

Now pray for yourself and that you may not fall
When the hour of deliverance comes on us all
When high hope and faith and courage and trust
Can rise or vanish like dust and dust
Now there's a kingdom of love waiting to be reclaimed
Honey, I'm the hunter of the invisible game
Honey, I'm the hunter of the invisible game
Honey, I'm the hunter of the invisible game

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Bruce Springsteen/AUTHOR	NAME/Hurry Up/NAME	"CONTENT/It's the end of another working day
Come on and pack your blues away
Change your clothes, we'll go for a ride
To the other side

Hurry up sundown, hurry up sundown
Hurry up sundown, hurry up sundown

Over here it's easier to breathe
There's a place for you and me
And there's no devil here to pay
And come the light of day we pray

Hurry up sundown, hurry up sundown
Hurry up sundown, hurry up sundown

And together we'll ride the other side
We'll feel so free, just you and me
And I'll pray what is due
Till the night sees us through

And together we'll ride the other side
We'll feel so free, just you and me
When this long is day is through
We will dance in blue

Hurry up sundown, hurry up sundown
Hurry up sundown, hurry up sundown, hurry up sundown

It's the end of another working day
Come and pack your blues away
It's the end of another working day
Come on and pack your blues away

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Bruce Springsteen/AUTHOR	NAME/Incident On 57th Street/NAME	"CONTENT/Spanish Johnny drove in from the underworld last night
With bruised arms and broken rhythm and a beat-up old Buick but dressed just
like dynamite
He tried sellin' his heart to the hard girls over on Easy Street
But they said, ""Johnny, it falls apart so easily, and you know hearts these
days are cheap""
And the pimps swung their axes and said, ""Johnny, you're a cheater""
And the pimps swung their axes and said, ""Johnny, you're a liar""
And from out of the shadows came a young girl's voice, said, ""Johnny, don't
cry""
Puerto Rican Jane, oh, won't you tell me, what's your name?
I want to drive you down to the other side of town
Where paradise ain't so crowded and there'll be action goin' down on Shanty
Lane tonight
All the golden-heeled fairies in a real bitch-fight
Pull .38's and kiss their girls goodnight

Goodnight, it's alright, Jane
Now let them black boys in to light the soul flame
We may find it out on the street tonight, baby
Or we may walk until the daylight, maybe

Well, like a cool Romeo he made his moves, oh, she looked so fine
Like a late Juliet, she knew she'd never be true but then, she really didn't
mind
Upstairs a band was playin' and the singer was singin' something about going
home
She whispered, ""Spanish Johnny, you can leave me tonight, but just don't leave
me alone""
And Johnny cried, ""Puerto Rican Jane, word is down, the cops have found the
vein""
Them barefoot boys left their homes for the woods
Them little barefoot street boys, they said their homes ain't no good
They left the corners, threw away their switchblade knives and kissed each
other goodbye

Johnny was sittin' on the fire escape, watchin' the kids playin' down the
street
He called down, ""Hey little heroes, summer's long, but I guess it ain't very
sweet around here anymore""
Janey sleeps in sheets damp with sweat
Johnny sits up alone and watches her dream on, dream on
And the sister prays for lost souls, then breaks down in the chapel after
everyone's gone

Jane moves over to share her pillow but opens her eyes to see Johnny up and
putting his clothes on
She says, ""Those romantic young boys, all they ever want to do is fight
Those romantic young boys, they're callin' through the window
Hey, Spanish Johnny, you want to make a little easy money tonight?""

And Johnny whispered, ""Goodnight, it's all tight, Jane
I'll meet you tomorrow night on Lover's Lane
We may find it out on the street tonight, now, baby
Or we may walk until the daylight, maybe""
Goodnight, it's alright, Jane
I'm gonna meet you tomorrow night on Lover's Lane
We can find it out on the street tonight, now, baby
Or we may walk until the daylight, maybe

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Bruce Springsteen/AUTHOR	NAME/Into The Fire/NAME	"CONTENT/The sky was falling and streaked with blood
I heard you calling me then you disappeared into the dust
Up the stairs, into the fire
Up the stairs, into the fire
I need your kiss, but love and duty called you someplace higher
Somewhere up the stairs, into the fire

May your strength give us strength
May your faith give us faith
May your hope give us hope
May your love give us love

May your strength give us strength
May your faith give us faith
May your hope give us hope
May your love bring us love

You gave your love to see, in fields of red and autumn brown
You gave your love to me and lay your young body down
Up the stairs, into the fire
Up the stairs, into the fire
I need you near, but love and duty called you someplace higher
Somewhere up the stairs, into the fire

May your strength give us strength
May your faith give us faith
May your hope give us hope
May your love give us love

May your strength give us strength
May your faith give us faith
May your hope give us hope
May your love bring us love

May your strength give us strength
May your faith give us faith
May your hope give us hope
May your love bring us love

It was dark, too dark to see, you held me in the light you gave
You lay your hand on me
Then walked into the darkness of your smoky grave
Up the stairs, into the fire
Up the stairs, into the fire
I need your kiss, but love and duty called you someplace higher
Somewhere up the stairs, into the fire

May your strength give us strength
May your faith give us faith
May your hope give us hope
May your love bring us love...

May your love bring us love

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Bruce Springsteen/AUTHOR	NAME/Jack Of All Trades/NAME	"CONTENT/I'll mow your lawn, clean the leaves out your drain
I'll mend your roof to keep out the rain
I'll take the work that God provides
I'm a Jack of all trades, honey, we'll be alright

I'll hammer the nails, and I'll set the stone
I'll harvest your crops when they're ripe and grown
I'll pull that engine apart and patch her up 'til she's running right
I'm a Jack of all trades, we'll be alright

A hurricane blows, brings a hard rain
When the blue sky breaks, feels like the world's gonna change
We'll start caring for each other like Jesus said that we might
I'm a Jack of all trades, we'll be alright

The banker man grows fatter, the working man grows thin
It's all happened before and it'll happen again
It'll happen again, they'll bet your life
I'm a Jack of all trades and, darling, we'll be alright

Now sometimes tomorrow comes soaked in treasure and blood
Here we stood the drought, now we'll stand the flood
There's a new world coming, I can see the light
I'm a Jack of all trades, we'll be alright

So you use what you've got, and you learn to make do
You take the old, you make it new
If I had me a gun, I'd find the bastards and shoot 'em on sight
I'm a Jack of all trades, we'll be alright
I'm a Jack of all trades, we'll be alright

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Bruce Springsteen/AUTHOR	NAME/Janey, Don't You Lose Heart/NAME	"CONTENT/You got your book baby with all your fears
Let me honey and I'll catch your tears
I'll take your sorrow if you want me to
Come tomorrow
That's what I'll do
Listen to me
Janey don't you lose heart
Janey don't you lose heart
Janey don't you lose heart
Janey don't you lose heart
Well you say you got no new dreams to touch
You feel like a stranger babe who knows too much
You come home late and get undressed
You lie in bed and feel this emptiness
Well listen to me
Janey don't you lose heart
Janey don't you lose heart
Janey don't you lose heart
Janey don't you lose heart
Till every river it runs dry
Until the sun's torn from the sky
Till every feel you've felt burst free
Gone tumblin' down into the sea
Listen to me
Janey don't you lose heart
Janey don't you lose heart
Janey don't you lose heart
Janey don't you lose heart

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Bruce Springsteen/AUTHOR	NAME/Johnny 99/NAME	"CONTENT/Well they closed down the auto plant in Mahwah late that month
Ralph went out lookin' for a job but he couldn't find none
He came home too drunk from mixin' Tanqueray and wine
He got a gun shot a night clerk now they call'm Johnny 99

Down in the part of town where when you hit a red light you don't stop
Johnny's wavin' his gun around and threatenin' to blow his top
When an off-duty cop snuck up on him from behind
Out in front of the Club Tip Top they slapped the cuffs on Johnny 99

Well the city supplied a public defender but the judge was Mean John Brown
He came into the courtroom and stared young Johnny down
Well the evidence is clear gonna let the sentence son fit the crime
Prison for ninety eight and a year and we'll call it even Johnny 99
A fist fight broke out in the courtroom they had to drag Johnny's girl away
His mama stood up and shouted ""Judge don't take my boy this way""
Well son you got a statement you'd like to make
Before the bailiff comes to forever take you away

Now judge I had debts no honest man could pay
The bank was holdin' my mortgage and they were gonna take my house away
Now I ain't sayin' that makes me an innocent man
But it was more 'n all this that put that gun in my hand

Well your honor I do believe I'd be better off dead
So if you can take a man's life for the thoughts that's in his head
Then sit back in that chair and think it over judge one more time
And let 'em shave off my hair and put me on that killin' line

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Bruce Springsteen/AUTHOR	NAME/Jungleland/NAME	"CONTENT/The Rangers had a homecoming
In Harlem late last night
And the Magic Rat drove his sleek machine
Over the Jersey state line
Barefoot girl sitting on the hood of a Dodge
Drinking warm beer in the soft summer rain
The Rat pulls into town, rolls up his pants
Together they take a stab at romance
And disappear down Flamingo Lane

Well, the Maximum Lawmen run down Flamingo
Chasing the Rat and the barefoot girl
And the kids 'round there live just like shadows
Always quiet, holding hands
From the churches to the jails
Tonight all is silence in the world
As we take our stand
Down in Jungleland

The midnight gang's assembled
And picked a rendezvous for the night
They'll meet 'neath that giant Exxon sign
That brings this fair city light
Man, there's an opera out on the Turnpike
There's a ballet being fought out in the alley
Until the local cops, Cherry-Tops, rips this holy night
The street's alive as secret debts are paid
Contacts made, they flash unseen
Kids flash guitars just like switchblades
Hustling for the record machine
The hungry and the hunted
Explode into rock 'n' roll bands
That face off against each other out in the street
Down in Jungleland

In the parking lot the visionaries dress in the latest rage
Inside the backstreet girls are dancing to the records that the DJ plays
Lonely-hearted lovers struggle in dark corners
Desperate as the night moves on
Just one look and a whisper, and they're gone

Beneath the city, two hearts beat
Soul engines running through a night so tender
In a bedroom locked in whispers
Of soft refusal and then surrender
In the tunnels uptown, the Rat's own dream guns him down
As shots echo down them hallways in the night
No one watches when the ambulance pulls away
Or as the girl shuts out the bedroom light

Outside the street's on fire in a real death waltz
Between what's flesh and what's fantasy
And the poets down here don't write nothing at all
They just stand back and let it all be
And in the quick of a knife, they reach for their moment
And try to make an honest stand
But they wind up wounded, not even dead
Tonight in Jungleland

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Bruce Springsteen/AUTHOR	NAME/Last To Die/NAME	"CONTENT/We took the highway till the road went black
We marked Truth Or Consequences on our map
A voice drifted up from the radio
We saw the voice from long ago

[Chorus]
Who'll be the last to die for a mistake
The last to die for a mistake
Whose blood will spill, whose heart will break
Who'll be the last to die for a mistake

The kids asleep in the backseat
We're just countin' the miles you and me
We don't measure the blood we've drawn anymore
We just stack the bodies outside the door

The wise men were all fools
What to do

The sun sets in flames as the city burns
Another day gone down as the night turns
And I hold you here in my heart
As things fall apart

A downtown window flushed with light
Faces of the dead at five (faces of the dead at five)
A martyr's silent eyes
Petition the drivers as we pass by

Who'll be the last to die for a mistake
The last to die for a mistake
Whose blood will spill, whose heart will break
Who'll be the last to die

Who'll be the last to die for a mistake
The last to die for a mistake
Darlin' your tyrants and kings form the same fate
Strung up at your city gates
And you're the last to die for a mistake

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Bruce Springsteen/AUTHOR	NAME/Leavin' Train/NAME	"CONTENT/When I asked you if everything is alright
You whisper ""Don't worry"" and you shut out the light
Now black is black in this bed we're laying
And I want to believe the words that you're saying

[Chorus]
But your eyes look like a leavin' train
They keep on dragging me down
Your eyes look like a leavin' train
They keep on draggin'
They keep on draggin'
They keep on draggin' me down

Well I did anything just to try to get close to you
I took it step by step like a man's supposed to
Tell me now, is this my
Is this my contrition
To have the love that I longed for fill me with suspicion

[Chorus]

Now it's tellin' time, oh my little sister
Now can I believe the words, the words of love you whisper
Is my train in vain, has my soul gone to waste
Am I just a victim of, a victim of my lost faith

[Chorus]

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Bruce Springsteen/AUTHOR	NAME/Life Itself/NAME	"CONTENT/We met down in the valley, where the wine of love and destruction flows
There in that curve of darkness where flowers of temptation grow
I left the rest for the others it was you and nothing else
You felt so good to me baby, as good as life itself

You were life itself, rushing over me
Life itself, the wind in the black elms
Life itself, in your heart and in your eyes
I can't make it without you

I knew you were in trouble, anyone could tell
You carried your little black book from which all your secrets fell
You squandered all your riches, your love, your beauty and your wealth
Like you had no further use for, for life itself

You were life itself, rushing over me
Life itself, the wind in the black elms
Life itself, in your heart and in your eyes
I can't make it without you

Why the things that we treasure most slip away in time
'Til to the music we grow deaf and to god's beauty blind
Why do the things that connect us slowly pull us apart
'Til we fall away in our own darkness, stranger to our own hearts

And to life itself, rushing over me
Life itself, the wind in the black elms
Life itself, in your heart and in your eyes
I can't make it without you

So here's one for the road
Here's one to your health
And to life itself, rushing over me
Life itself, the wind in the black elms
Life itself, in your heart and in your eyes
I can't make it without you

Life itself
Life itself
Life itself
Life itself

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Bruce Springsteen/AUTHOR	NAME/Linda Let Me Be The One/NAME	"CONTENT/The midnight boys are outside
Scraping tears up off the street
Standin' guard beneath the window
Where only Linda sleeps
The leader is a kid named Eddie
Walkin' like an angel in defeat
He trashes her old man's car, slashes Linda's name in the street
And calls out

Linda will you let me be the one
Linda will you let me be the one
Linda will you let me be the one
Linda will you let me be the one

In a room full of contenders
Eddy spars 'til he drops to his bed and surrenders Draped in the scarves
He stole from Linda's bedroom
The night he laid at her feet
When the midnight boys were stranded
Down on Cason Street

Linda will you let me be the one
Linda will you let me be the one
Linda will you let me be the one
Linda will you let me be the one

In the basement of St Mary's
Eddy hides from the rain
In with the stolen sisters 'til the streets are dry again
Talkin' fast cars and spare parts
Empty homes and hearts
Distant worlds with strange girls
And kneeling with Linda in the dark

Linda will you let me be the one
Linda will you let me be the one
Linda will you let me be the one
Linda will you let me be the one

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Bruce Springsteen/AUTHOR	NAME/Little Queenie/NAME	"CONTENT/I got lumps in my throat
When I saw her comin down the aisle
I got the wiggles in my knees
When she looked at me and sweetly smiled
Well there she is again
Standin over by the record machine
Well she looks like a model
On the cover of a magazine
But she's too cute
To be a minute over seventeen

Meanwhile I was thinkin'

Well if she's in the mood
No need to break it
I got the chance and I oughta take it
If she can dance we can make it
C'mon queenie let's shake it

I said go, go, go, little queenie
I said go, go, go, little queenie
I said go, go, go, little queenie

Won't someone tell me
Who's the queen standin over by the record machine
Well she looks like a model
On the cover of a magazine
But she's too cute
To be a minute over seventeen
I said go, go, go, little queenie
I said go, go, go, little queenie
I said go, go, go, little queenie

Meanwhile, I was still thinkin, hmmmm,
Well if it's a slow one
We'll omit it
If it's a rocker, then we'll get it
If it's a good one, she'll admit it
C'mon queenie, let's get with it

I said go, go, go, little queenie
I said go, go, go, little queenie
I said go, go, go, little queenie

I said go, go, go, little queenie
I said go, go, go, little queenie
I said go, go, go, little queenie...

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Bruce Springsteen/AUTHOR	NAME/Livin' In The Future/NAME	"CONTENT/A letter come blowin' in
On an ill wind
Somethin' 'bout me and you
Never seein' one another again

And what I knew had come
Stars struck deaf and dumb
Like when we kissed
That taste of blood on your tongue

[Chorus: x 2]
Don't worry, darlin'
No baby, don't you fret
We're livin' in the future
And none of this has happened yet

Woke up election day
Sky's gunpowder and shades of grey
Beneath the dirty sun
I whistle my time away

Then just about sun down
You come walkin' through town
Your boot heels clickin' like
The barrel of a pistol spinnin' round

[Chorus]

The earth it gave away
The sea rose towards the sun
I opened up my heart to you
It got all damaged and undone

My ship Liberty sailed away
On a bloody red horizon
The grounds keeper opened the gates
And let the wild dogs run

Alone I limp through town
A lost cowboy at sundown
Got my monkey on a leash
Got my ear tuned to the ground

My faith's been torn asunder
Tell me is that rollin' thunder
Or just the sinkin' sound
Of somethin' righteous goin' under

[Chorus]

None of this has happened yet
None of this has happened yet
None of this has happened yet
None of this has happened yet

Na na na na, na na na na-na [Repeat until fade]

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Bruce Springsteen/AUTHOR	NAME/Look Toward The Land/NAME	"CONTENT/Live performance
Well, I dreamed I was a gypsy riding the land
With a tambourine and a gypsy queen
And a rainbow caravan
Happy old land sailor, yeah, that's what I want to be
Stealing diamonds from the rich men to throw in the sea
Singing look toward the land
'cause the land holds the key
Keep an eye on the land
And an eye on man

Well, I dreamed I was a cabin boy
On an American Clipper line
Watering flowers for the captain
That they may not wilt
Bringing cargo to colonies of South Caroline
On the best ol' Clipper Dave Mckay ever built

Singing look toward the land
'cause the land is the key
Singing keep an eye on the land
And an eye on the sea

Well, I dreamed I was your lover
'Cause that's what I want to be
And I dreamed that every night you dreamed only of me
And we walked along the beach, and ooh, we held hands
And I told you you were my only woman
And I was your only man

Singing look toward the lovers
For they are the key
Keep an eye on the lovers
And an eye on the war machine

Yes I dreamed I was a captain of a river queen
Caressing Mississippi waters down to New Orleans
Yeah, a happy ol' riverboat captain, that's what I'd like to be
And I'd let you ride my honey, I'd let you ride her for free

Singing look toward the river
'Cause the river's the key
Keep an eye on the river
And an eye on the sea

Well, I dreamed I was your friend
'Cause that's what I want to be
And every night, you had dreams
And they were all of me
We'd walk all the streets together
Hand in hand
And be kind to the women
And the women be kind to the me

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Bruce Springsteen/AUTHOR	NAME/Looking Out For No. 1/NAME	"CONTENT/They call him mr. outside
Cause he don't care
Mr. outside
He's just havin' his fun
Mr. outside
He's just looking out for no. 1

Well mr. outside
All your money and your power
Won't help you come the dark hour
Well kingdoms crumble
Unto your feet
You're lest another thief out on the street

Mr. outside
Yeah he don't care
Mr. outside
He's just having his fun
Mr. outside
Oh looking out for no. 1

Dark glasses and money for hire
He got (?) and hight tension wire (?)
He got dark,dark cadillac
He got pretty little little girl in back

Mr. outside
Oh yeah he don't care
Mr. outside
He's just having his fun
Mr. outside
Just looking out for no. 1

Oh little baby got no diamond ring
You cry cause you ain't got no pretty things
Them pretty things babe just look dumb
You gotta take 'em when they come

Mr. outside
Oh lord he don't care
Mr. outside
Oh has his fun
Mr. outside
He's just looking out for no. 1

Mr. outside
Oh yeah he don't care
Mr. outside
He's just having his fun
Mr. outside
He's just looking out for no. 1

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Bruce Springsteen/AUTHOR	NAME/Loose Change/NAME	"CONTENT/Met her at a friendly little bar down along the coast
She said it was her birthday so we had us a nice little toast
Drove around for a while, smoked a few cigarettes
Took her back to my place, she slipped off her party dress
She sat for a while on the edge of the bed just talkin'
Loose change in my pocket
Loose change in my pocket

Pint of gin in my boot cuff, I'm drivin' for a drink and a dance
Sittin' on the next stool, miss a little time on her hands
Yeah I knew she was trouble, but trouble sure was lookin' fine
And when I pulled her close what I knew kinda slipped my mind
We lay in bed and watched the moon come up crawling
Loose change in my pocket
Loose change in my pocket

I pour another drink, wait for the night to get through
Stars are burning in that black void so far away and blue

Now I'm sittin' at a red light I feel somethin' tickin' way down
The night's moving like a slow train crawling through this shithole town
Got my bags packed in the back and I'm tryin' to get going again
But red just goes to green and green goes red and then
Then all I hear's the clock on the dash tick-tocking
Loose change in my pocket
Loose change in my pocket

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Bruce Springsteen/AUTHOR	NAME/Losin' Kind/NAME	"CONTENT/My name is frank davis, drive up Dixie 109
I was out on Highway 17, just south of the camden line
It was down there in heart of Wilsonville, where I met my fate
She was standing outside a barroom, said she was waitin' for a date
but I knew that was just a line
And I knew I was messin' with the losin' kind

well I knew what we were both doin', and I knew that u cant win
But when the light turned green, I reached across the seat,popped the lock and
she slid in,
She said she liked Mexican music, she knew a place if I had the time
So we had a few drinks and we danced for a while,I pulled her close, she didnt
mind
And what I knew kinda slipped my mind,
And I couldnt resist her kiss, with the losin' kind

Well we drove around in my Buick, getting drunk and having fun
We ended up at the Best Western, out on Highway 101
It was around 3:00a.m., we went out, to this empty little roadside bar
It was there the cash register was open, it was there I hit that guy real hard
But I knew, when I hit him, for a second time,
that one attracts the other, when there the losin' kind

Well I grabbed her hand to get out of there, then I felt like I was gonna be
sick
About a half hour later the sleet started comin' down,

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
AUTHOR/Bruce Springsteen/AUTHOR	NAME/Matamoras Banks/NAME	"CONTENT/Each year many die crossing the deserts, mountains, and rivers of our southern
border in search of a better life. Here I follow the journey backwards, from
the body at the river bottom, to the man walking across the desert towards the
banks of the Rio Grande.

For two days the river keeps you down
Then you rise to the light without a sound
Past the playgrounds and empty switching yards
The turtles eat the skin from your eyes, so they lay open to the stars

Your clothes give way to the current and river stone
'Till every trace of who you ever were is gone
And the things of the earth they make their claim
That the things of heaven may do the same
Goodbye, my darling, for your love I give God thanks,
Meet me on the Matamoros
Meet me on the Matamoros
Meet me on the Matamoros banks

Over rivers of stone and ancient ocean beds
I walk on sandals of twine and tire tread
My pockets full of dust, my mouth filled with cool stone
The pale moon opens the earth to its bones
I long, my darling, for your kiss, for your sweet love I give God thanks
The touch of your loving fingertips
Meet me on the Matamoros
Meet me on the Matamoros
Meet me on the Matamoros banks

Your sweet memory comes on the evenin' wind
I sleep and dream of holding you in my arms again
The lights of Brownsville, across the river shine
A shout rings out and into the silty red river I dive
I long, my darling, for your kiss, for your sweet love I give God thanks
A touch of your loving fingertips
Meet me on the Matamoros
Meet me on the Matamoros
Meet me on the Matamoros banks

Meet me on the Matamoros
Meet me on the Matamoros
Meet me on the Matamoros banks

/CONTENT"	AGE/Modern/AGE
